Safety key was fine...except I purchased treadmill without book and it was not the size I was looking for. I took a chance at the size so my own fault</review_text>
Product was exactly as advertised and was shipped in timely manner. I'm very satisfied</review_text>
The heavy tension Gripmaster provides a great workout for the fingers and wrists.  The average person may want to start with the medium Gripmaster to get up to speed (about a month of daily use).  But for people involved in daily wrist/finger activities, Martial Arts, guitarists, etc. you probably could plunge right in with the heavy tension with no problem.</review_text>
I purchased both the 7 lbs. and 9 lbs. tension units and I'm extremely satisfied with both models. Both models allow for independent work on particular fingers or your grip as a whole. My hand strength, which had been decreasing a bit as I age, has returned very quickly as has increased freedom of movement through fingers. Whichever level of tension you choose I'm sure you will be satisfied with the Gripmaster</review_text>
Comfortable in my hand and with a variety of exercises I find it a great thing to have at my desk to use periodically during the day</review_text>
Let me start saying that this is a wonderful product. Small, light, and well constructed (they feel like they will last forever). You can carry them with you, allowing to workout your fingers at the office, at home or wherever you find suitable. I bought the four different color-coded gripmasters: Black/heavy, Red/medium, Blue/light, and Yellow/extra light. I only found the resistance of the red and black ones useful for me, but my wife loves the blue and yellow ones. It was a great buy because of their high quality and affordable price.The product comes with a foldable instruction booklet where you find details for six different exercises:- Trigger pinch. This one simulates the movement of squeezing a trigger, and it isolates the index finger for enhanced strength and coordination.- Gross grasp. This one strengthens fingers, thumb, wrist and forearm for a firm grip.- Hook position. This one strengthens longer muscles in forearm and wrist while stretching smaller muscles in hand for greater motion and endurance.- Tip to tip pinch. This exercise strengthens specific fingers, thumb, smaller hand muscles and forearm for greater control and endurance.- Wrist flexion. It strengthens wrist and forearm muscles.- Key pinch. Strengthens thumb and index finger for greater stability and coordination.At the gripmaster website you can find more exercises for different activities and sports.If you are looking to crush hands when handshaking this is not the product for you, but if you need finger strength, control, endurance and coordination you are in the right place</review_text>
I bought the red/medium tension and it's a good beginner challenge for most. It looks like a little instrument of torturebut I love it. I am a 50 something woman who is an advanced-beginner guitar player and it's helping tremendously plus there is something about having hand and finger strength that makes all your everyday chores easier such as typing this recommendation. Also great for stress.</review_text>
I love this product. In Fact I own two and not because I use two at the time(I don't, I just like to have a spare). First off this is the only gripper that allows you to exercise each finger individually. Second it is one of the very few that exercise the thumb individually. Third, despite all of this it is very compact. I put it in my pocket and get most or all of the exercises on it done at work. Fourth it offers a variety of exercises. Definitely a good value for your money</review_text>
I originally bought the Blue (5 lb), Red (7 lb) and the Black (9 lb) Gripmasters for my 14 year old boys. The Blue is a little too easy for gripping but excellent for exercising the ring and little finger. The Blue was too easy for them so they did not use it so I ended inherited it. It is pretty habit forming and fun to use because the tension is light, this makes it good for use anytime, anywhere. (I have used it stuck in traffic and it is also a good stress reliever) If I had to do it again, I would have probably not bought the Blue unless you have a very light grip, probably have started with the Red. I started to use the Red and the Black. The Red is just right for me, challenging for the fingers and I am working my way to use the Black consistently. Although it doesn't seem like it at first, the Black is challenging for the hand and fingers and will give a good workout. Just remember that this is mainly for fingers and hand exercise so very easy to use for gripping, the challenge is working out the fingers. It is not like using the regular heavy hand grippers. It has increased my hand strength and grip just by having it with me and using it during the course of the day without planned workouts. Great product, excellent for finger or hand exercise, good quality. Also bought from DMM Products, great price fast shipping</review_text>
The gripmaster is very well made, I was impressed by the high quality. I have played guitar for many years but I found the heavy tension to much for me to start. I ordered the medium tension and am working my way into the heavy. It's doing many reps that is the key to hand strengh not moving heavy tension.I really like the gripmaster</review_text>
I bought both the Medium and Heavy tension Gripmasters. The Medium (red) one is not much of a challenge for me. I'm a man of average build, and I actually bought these because I was starting weight training at the gym and I wanted more grip strength for my hands and stronger forearms.I'd say if you are looking for individual finger strength, such as for playing an instrument, then the red Gripmaster might be enough resistance. But I use the black one much more for whole hand strength.The product comes with a guide containing instructions on a variety of exercises. I would also recommend visiting Gripmaster's website, as they have a more complete list of exercises, and recommendations for different sports</review_text>
High quality exercise/ equipment mat. Wipes off well and helps keep bike steady</review_text>
It had special meaning for me, because when my two daughters were little (they are now in their late 30s), I taught them to flush finally by telling them there was a toilet monster that would come out and get them if they didn't flush.  I caught them both with the Toilet Monster joke and it was quite funny and led to some fond reminiscences.It is more funny than scary, though it does give you a start when you first open the lid</review_text>
I got a few great chuckles out of this thing.  Just get's kinda grossweird using it over nad over again.  But a great one no matter</review_text>
it does what it promises, i nearly fell over when my boyfriend let this surprise for me.  he needed a little bit of tape in addition to the suction cups, but worth getting. can work well for keeping pets out of the toilet as well</review_text>
Most posters here haven't actually bought/used a Toilet Monster.  It's a really great joke/prank.  We bought one and used it for my mother-in-law.  She was stunned and a bit disoriented...then...wait for it...she laughed really really hard.  It's not scary, just startling.  The way we installed it, if someone opens the lid and seat, they won't see it, so it's best to try on women.  Great for the price</review_text>
This is quite possibly the greatest thing since sliced bread ! other than sliced bread with the crusts removed of course.I was in an difficult situation last year, let me explain.I, for a long time, have had a love for open spaces and the whole hiking and campology scene.  I am a regular purchaser of "Hikers Monthly" and own a mint condition copy of "The Art Of Camp".  I've been hiking in several places around Canada and the Rockies but for a long time I've truly wished I could scale the heights of Everest or wander the mountain passes of the Pyrenees.  Well one day my opportunity came ! My friend, who is part of the WCO(World Camp Organisation), called me up and asked me if I'd be interested in a fortnight up the Pyrenees !!  As you can imagine I nearly passed out in my two berth with excitement(I was camping at the time).  I hurried home to pack as he said we needed to leave that weekend.the problem came when I opened the door of my house I was met by Tchaikovsky, my alsation.  "NO !", I thought, "What am I supposed to do with Tchaikovsky ?".  There had been an unfortunate incident at the kennels earlier that year, although the courts could prove nothing, and Harold, my neighbours Iguana, had been harassed a little too much so I didn't like to ask.I was feeling decidedly down when my friend rang me back.  When I had finished updating him on the situation he suggested I look for at the Mountainsmith Dog Backpack.  A little confused I looked on Amazon as he had suggested and as soon as I saw it I knew what he meant.  I ordered it straight away and it came within two days.  Thanks Amazon !When I slipped it onto Tchaikovsky's back he went mad with delight and shot off round the garden barking at the trees and anything else he could find.Friday soon came around and after Harold's funeral(sadly he died of a heart attack but again nothing could be proven), we were off !We had an amazing time seeing the sites and climbing ridge after ridge.  Tchaikovsky carried the instant mash powder and my collection of David Bowie CDs + CD player, in his saddle bags.  Not once did he wimper due to chafing and we took some great pictures of him in his little red bobble hat.Thanks for making my holiday</review_text>
After much deliberation and self debate, I bought this bike from someone other than Amazon. (I spend about 2 months doing research, then needed the "immediate satisfaction" that comes from purchasing from a walk-in store). I've had it since right after thanksgiving, and think it's one of the better purchases I've made. It seems that with the fan-type exercise bike you get fewer bells and whistles, but more strength and reliability. I've had one treadmill and one "fancy" exercise bike die after just a few months. While this machine doesn't play music or show me videos that try to make me believe I'm riding through the French country side, it does feel like it might just last forever.</review_text>
I use my treadmill 4 times a week and noticed that their was friction building up...I tried silicone from an auto parts store but the odor was unbearable and later learned that their are propellants in the aerosol cans that actually cause more harm than good!I came across the LifeSpan treadmill lube, as I was looking for a product that was 100% silicone. It is easy to apply and I felt immediate results...I also like the fact that it provides me with a (1) year supply</review_text>
The backpack is great.  It is a wonderful tool for dogs with lots of energy.  You can fill it with lots of weight and they love carrying it.  It secures well, and dogs love it.  If you give a dog a job, they really feel useful, and I think they appreciate it a lot</review_text>
Good product.  Great deal for the price.  Based on prior reviews, I ordered the Medium size for my 100 lb. German Shepherd, and it fits great.  I put 2 water bottles in each pocket to help burn fat (she needs to lose some weight!)I'm going to order the Small size for my 70 lb. German Shepherd to help her burn some of her energy!  She wore the Medium size on our walk today and it help focus her (she tends to be all over the place).  The medium size works, but I think the small would be ideal</review_text>
I bought the large for my 90lb 11 month old lab/great dane mix and it is pretty big on him.  Admittedly he's still pretty skinny despite his weight but I had to tighten the straps all the way in order to fit him.  Probably better for broader dogs but I'm sure mine will grow into it :o )The quality is excellent and there's plenty of packing space, overall I'm pleased with it especially for the price.  If your dog is skinny/narrow I'd order the next smaller siz</review_text>
Arrived quickly and was EXACTLY what we wanted... we arevery satisfied with the product and the process..</review_text>
I purchased both the medium and high tension Gripmasters.  For the average person the medium does not present too great a challenge, however it is a good place to start.  Every day activity does not provide the mobility or range of motion that the medium will give you.  After a month of daily use you will be more than ready to move up to the high tension Gripmaster and not experience frustration that may lead you to quit.</review_text>
I purchased both the 7 lbs. and 9 lbs. tension units and I'm extremely satisfied with both models. Both models allow for independent work on particular fingers or your grip as a whole. My hand strength, which had been decreasing a bit as I age, has returned very quickly as has increased freedom of movement through fingers. Whichever level of tension you choose I'm sure you will be satisfied with the Gripmaster</review_text>
Let me start saying that this is a wonderful product. Small, light, and well constructed (they feel like they will last forever). You can carry them with you, allowing to workout your fingers at the office, at home or wherever you find suitable. I bought the four different color-coded gripmasters: Black/heavy, Red/medium, Blue/light, and Yellow/extra light. I only found the resistance of the red and black ones useful for me, but my wife loves the blue and yellow ones. It was a great buy because of their high quality and affordable price.The product comes with a foldable instruction booklet where you find details for six different exercises:- Trigger pinch. This one simulates the movement of squeezing a trigger, and it isolates the index finger for enhanced strength and coordination.- Gross grasp. This one strengthens fingers, thumb, wrist and forearm for a firm grip.- Hook position. This one strengthens longer muscles in forearm and wrist while stretching smaller muscles in hand for greater motion and endurance.- Tip to tip pinch. This exercise strengthens specific fingers, thumb, smaller hand muscles and forearm for greater control and endurance.- Wrist flexion. It strengthens wrist and forearm muscles.- Key pinch. Strengthens thumb and index finger for greater stability and coordination.At the gripmaster website you can find more exercises for different activities and sports.If you are looking to crush hands when handshaking this is not the product for you, but if you need finger strength, control, endurance and coordination you are in the right place</review_text>
I originally bought the Blue (5 lb), Red (7 lb) and the Black (9 lb) Gripmasters for my 14 year old boys. The Blue is a little too easy for gripping but excellent for exercising the ring and little finger. The Blue was too easy for them so they did not use it so I ended inherited it. It is pretty habit forming and fun to use because the tension is light, this makes it good for use anytime, anywhere. (I have used it stuck in traffic and it is also a good stress reliever) If I had to do it again, I would have probably not bought this tension unless you have a very light grip, probably have started with the Red. I started to use the Red and the Black. The Red is just right for me, challenging for the fingers and I am working my way to the Black. Just remember that this is mainly for fingers and hand exercise so very easy to use for gripping, the challenge is working out the fingers. It is not like using the regular heavy hand grippers. It has increased my hand strength and grip just by having it with me and using it during the course of the day without planned workouts. Great product, excellent for finger or hand exercise, good quality. Also bought from DMM Products, great price fast shipping</review_text>
I like a lot, is easy to use, exercise your fingers individualy</review_text>
I bought both the Medium and Heavy tension Gripmasters. The Medium (red) one is not much of a challenge for me. I'm a man of average build, and I actually bought these because I was starting weight training at the gym and I wanted more grip strength for my hands and stronger forearms.I'd say if you are looking for individual finger strength, such as for playing an instrument, then the red Gripmaster might be enough resistance. But I use the black one much more for whole hand strength.The product comes with a guide containing instructions on a variety of exercises. I would also recommend visiting Gripmaster's website, as they have a more complete list of exercises, and recommendations for different sports</review_text>
I recently purchased a pair of the Gripmaster Hand & Finger Exercisers in order to help build forearm strength.  As I was unsure which tension would be appropriate, I bought one each of the Light/Blue (5 lbs. tension) and Medium/Red (7 lbs. tension) grips.  I've had them for a little more than a week now, and I just love, love, love them!  Perhaps that's a little more enthusiasm than anyone should muster up for exercise accessories, but I really do enjoy the grips.  I leave one out on my desk at all times, and get in a little work here and there when I stop to read a document or whatnot.The Gripmaster Exercisers are different from conventional grips in that you can either work your entire hand at once, or each finger individually (great for guitar players, I've heard!).  One side features four small levers, each with its own spring, that can be squeezed together or one at a time.  The plastic on the flip side is molded together so that you can work your whole hand as one unit.  The black rubber cushion is removable, and you can place it on either side of the grip.  It's an awesome idea, and allows for maximum versatility!Just for reference, I'm a female, in relatively good shape, but with painfully little forearm strength (my biceps are huge from years of Tae Bo, though!).  The 7 lb. Medium/Red grip is do-able, but challenging.  The 5 lb. Light/Blue grip, on the other hand, makes for a much easier workout; I oftentimes find myself squeezing it while doing other things, and I only feel it after a number of reps.  If you're a female and not in great shape, you'll want to start out with the Light/Blue grips (or even the Extra Light/Yellow ones), and work your way up.  Out-of-shape guys can probably get away with the Medium/Red ones to start.  If you've got good hand/wrist/forearm strength, don't even both with the lighter tensions - skip ahead to the Medium/Red or Heavy/Black.Although I've only owned my Gripmasters for a week or two, and can't personally vouch for their durability, they do seem sturdy and well-crafted.  My fianc's brother, an amateur boxer and guitar player, used his for years without a problem, so I have faith that I'll be squeezing these babies well into 2015!- Kelly Garbato, Couch Potato Turned Fitness Fanati</review_text>
This tools is really really great. It helped me to overcome the problem I faced while playing guitar, specially the barre chords</review_text>
We bought this for our 4 year old son.  He loves playing with it and it has really helped him with coordination.  It is well built and I am sure will last a long time.  It did take two of us to put it together, though...</review_text>
My boys LOVE all types of construction and farm toys.  This one is the best!  They can sit on it and dig, dig, dig!  It is a little pricey, but well constructed and extremely worth the price!  A MUST!  We have had this toy for 8 months, and if my 3 boys can't break it, that in itself says quite a lot</review_text>
My kids just love this inexpensive little scooter.  We have another one at home, which has been used for years. We've had other scooters, but have found the Razor brand to be the most stable and reliable.</review_text>
this is a good scooter you have to admit but i used to have a viper brand scooter and it was fast!! but it got stolein i hate people who do that i wish i had my viper brand scooter back from 2000 i tryed to find it online but they dont sell any i wish i knew where my dad got it he died in 2001 ok i just wonder if they had it here but they dont  o man</review_text>
The ablounge 2 is great! Easy to use, and does not hurt my neck like regular sit ups. Works great. after 2 weeks of use already saw results!!! THanks!</review_text>
The item was very easy to assemble and it works well and certainly seems to do what it says. It is great</review_text>
I don't actually own one yet, but my boyfriend does so I've been sneaking over to his house to use it until I make room in my own home for one.  When I first used it I was like some of the other reveiwers, disappointed that it didn't work my abs the way I expected, but then I realized I wasn't doing it correctly.  It makes it pretty easy to use your legs and arms instead of just your abs so it helps to focus at the beginning on just using your abs and nothing else and then you can really feel it! The strap is way too small though, I usually just put my fingers under it, but there's no way to do somme things that the lady on the video does, like sticking your arms through the strap and holding them straight...and I have pretty small arms.The range of motion thing is great, and feels so good on the back, which is the complete opposite of doing crunches on the ground(I used to do about 1,000 crunches a day but then I started getting bruises on my back from them and I pretty much hit a plateau where I wasn't seeing any changes in my abs).  I have so much fun using the ab lounge while I watch TV too, it's a great way to make the commercial time go by.I would recommend that the people having problems with this try to go slowly and really focus on working just your abs, it makes it so much more worth it</review_text>
I have owned this device since June 2006.  The device linclines from 0-12 degrees and provides speeds of up to 12 mph.  This tread mill gets up to speed and stop quickly but should not trip up most people.  There is no cool-down cycle like on the systems at the club.  Also the pluse sensors in the hand grips take a while and some adjustment to get an accurate reading.  I plan on ordering the chest band monitor from the manufacture in hopes that will provide better feedback during my exercise routine.-</review_text>
Bought 2 of these mats on Amazon's Friday sale about 5 months ago, I paid 25 dollars a piece.  For 25 dollars they are well worth the price. At their regular retail price ($100) I think they are a bit over priced.  I am very pleased with the mats anyway</review_text>
I am so glad amazon offered the Bowflex mat as a bonus item. I have the bowflex set up in my familyroom which is newly carpeted, and I was concerned about divets in the rug. I have to say, the mat is a big help</review_text>
Just got my mat, which was free with the Bowflex I bought, and it is pretty nice. Nothing special.. it is what it is.. a nice looking mat. I don't see this thing ripping anytime soon. And mine doesn't make the whole room smell like rubber like someone else commented.. But like I said.. mine was free. I would never pay $90 for one of these :</review_text>
Bought this to put under my exercise bike and protect the floor. I've found it to be sturdy (yet it's really dense, and thinner than you would think). It doesn't have the cushion-like feel of an exercise mat, but rather is much firmer. So far, it has proveb to be a great surface for the bike (and is also keeping my floor in good shape)</review_text>
I bought this mat for my exercise bike.  It was large and gave my floor great protection.  I would recommend this mat to anyone that has exercise equipment</review_text>
Got the mat for free for ordering the Series 7 treadmill and while putting the mat under my treadmill it ripped.  It is made by this rubbery plastic, and it's just okay.  I wouldn't pay $100 for it, it's true, but I was very disappointed that it ripped so easily.  Not very durable... but I got mine for free, so I guess I wasn't too surprised it was given away.</review_text>
Let me start saying that this is a wonderful product. Small, light, and well constructed (they feel like they will last forever). You can carry them with you, allowing to workout your fingers at the office, at home or wherever you find suitable. I bought the four different color-coded gripmasters: Black/heavy, Red/medium, Blue/light, and Yellow/extra light. I only found the resistance of the red and black ones useful for me, but my wife loves the blue and yellow ones. It was a great buy because of their high quality and affordable price.The product comes with a foldable instruction booklet where you find details for six different exercises:- Trigger pinch. This one simulates the movement of squeezing a trigger, and it isolates the index finger for enhanced strength and coordination.- Gross grasp. This one strengthens fingers, thumb, wrist and forearm for a firm grip.- Hook position. This one strengthens longer muscles in forearm and wrist while stretching smaller muscles in hand for greater motion and endurance.- Tip to tip pinch. This exercise strengthens specific fingers, thumb, smaller hand muscles and forearm for greater control and endurance.- Wrist flexion. It strengthens wrist and forearm muscles.- Key pinch. Strengthens thumb and index finger for greater stability and coordination.At the gripmaster website you can find more exercises for different activities and sports.If you are looking to crush hands when handshaking this is not the product for you, but if you need finger strength, control, endurance and coordination you are in the right place</review_text>
Our daughter took up guitar about 6 months ago.  It took her about forever to master the pesky "F" chord.  Her teacher noticed she was developing the bad habit of holding her third finger on top of the pinky finger to get it to hold down the strings.  "Just not enough strength in that pinky finger", says the teacher.  Enter Gripmaster Finger Exerciser!  Works like a charm.  And hey, her basketball dribble is stronger now too!  The kids at school are jealous, they think it's cool, her bright yellow contraption.  Rock on, Gripmaster</review_text>
So many children and even adults bounce on my ball whenever they come over and happen to see it!  That's not what it's supposed to be used for but it just shows how sturdy it is.  My friend who is probably about 250 lbs didn't even pop it</review_text>
I train people for a living and have sent all of my clients to this seller for their exercise balls.  Being one that works with different sized people on a daily basis on the Max Fitness balls, I can tell you that they provide a great product and they are very fast to get it to my clients.  I own one myself.  Thanks for the great product and service.Jason</review_text>
I've had one of these for 13 years.  ONE.  For THIRTEEN years.  It still works great.PLEASE use it carefully, if you're going to use it.  You can very easily give yourself a very nasty case of some obscure (or not) repetitive stress syndrome.  To completely avoid that, and any similar problems you'll need Dr. Sonnon... but in the meantime, just be careful</review_text>
Two years ago, I tore one of the transverse ligaments in my wrist playing racquetball, which was the unfortunate combination of a dusty court, 200 pounds of player moving about 15 miles an hour, a poorly timed forehand and very hard wall.I had two surgeries to repair the injury, and it was mostly successful.  The biggest side effect has been weakness in my injured wrist and hand.  I have moved beyond squeezing toys and putty, but I lacked the strength to do weight training.This device has been a tremendous breakthrough for me.  I have been able to make some rapid gains in my strength without risking injury with weights.  I am already seeing the difference in just two weeks.If you are recovering from surgery such as carpal tunnel or other wrist related injuries, I strongly recommend making this device part of your recovery plan.  Of course, check with your doctor and/or physical therapist before starting up a new exercise</review_text>
This is the first product I've ever bought to work out my forearm, so I can't compare it to anything else...but I will say it does work.  I've noticed a strength increase in my forearm in just a month of using it.  It's comfortable and easy to use.  I would like the highest resistance to be a little harder, though</review_text>
second best exercise for lengthing your golf drives...improves club head speed very nicely.  If you are wondering, #1 is pulldowns for the lats.</review_text>
This is a very good product for the cost but if it has the ability to be flat, I can't figure it out.  It is always on a constant incline, when there are times I'd like it to be flat</review_text>
I bought this to replace an electric treadmill that was too big for my space.  I am happy with the treadmill because it is portable and stores easily. It is necessary to keep the belt oiled underneath in order to walk without much friction..That has not been a problem,though..The only drawback is that I am not comfortable walking without holding onto the siderails..It is more difficult to control the speed by simply walking with arms swinging(or holding a book to read)as I did with my electric treadmill.All in all,however, it has been worth the time and money spent for the treadmill.I can easily move it from room to room and put it away when done</review_text>
This machine is a great buy for the price.  It was simple to put together, doesn't take up much room and is easy to use.  There is just a little noise when you are walking, but nothing the TV can't drown out.</review_text>
I used to try to strengthen my fingers using the Gripp balls, and later, the  Gravity Gripp, which were grip balls that were also 1 pound weights.  However, they were bulky, hard to get a grip on, and heavy and pretty silly looking.  So, when I saw the picture of these awesome little gizmos in a catalog, I ordered one right away.  They are about the same price of the Grip balls, but they are SO much cooler!  Not only is this good for  fitness training, they're even better for musicians!  (my instrument is piano.)  These are light and flat and they fit right into a purse.    I don't feel silly using this out in public -- if anyone asks, I just let them try it, and they are immediately hooked.  I carried my blue one around everywhere until this weekend, when I gave it away to a friend.It is difficult to know which tension to use.  I'm a woman with small hands, and found that I am right between the blue and the red.  I use the blue one for 4th and 5th finger (left hand).  I can usually handle the red one for everything else, but the booklet says that repititions are more effective than heavier tension.  I use mainly the blue one now.  I hope to work up to the red, but that will be a while.  I'm also going to buy a couple more so I can work both hands simultaneously.I do have one caveat -- make sure you use these correctly. Don't overdo it, or try to use a heavier tension to just to feel all macho.  Like any weight training, you have to press the buttons precisely to isolate the muscles.  Don't use your whole arm just to get the button pressed.  I found that if I started to cheat, I got a little wrist pain and felt the beginnings of tendonitis.  (another reason I'm staying on the blue tension for now.)Oh, and buy your Gripmaster here at Amazon.  They are $15 each everywhere else</review_text>
Yes.........I like it, after using for 2 weeks, my fingers were strong. Good thing is that this exercise helps in smooth blood flowing in your body</review_text>
I recently purchased a pair of the Gripmaster Hand & Finger Exercisers in order to help build forearm strength.  As I was unsure which tension would be appropriate, I bought one each of the Light/Blue (5 lbs. tension) and Medium/Red (7 lbs. tension) grips.  I've had them for a little more than a week now, and I just love, love, love them!  Perhaps that's a little more enthusiasm than anyone should muster up for exercise accessories, but I really do enjoy the grips.  I leave one out on my desk at all times, and get in a little work here and there when I stop to read a document or whatnot.The Gripmaster Exercisers are different from conventional grips in that you can either work your entire hand at once, or each finger individually (great for guitar players, I've heard!).  One side features four small levers, each with its own spring, that can be squeezed together or one at a time.  The plastic on the flip side is molded together so that you can work your whole hand as one unit.  The black rubber cushion is removable, and you can place it on either side of the grip.  It's an awesome idea, and allows for maximum versatility!Just for reference, I'm a female, in relatively good shape, but with painfully little forearm strength (my biceps are huge from years of Tae Bo, though!).  The 7 lb. Medium/Red grip is do-able, but challenging.  The 5 lb. Light/Blue grip, on the other hand, makes for a much easier workout; I oftentimes find myself squeezing it while doing other things, and I only feel it after a number of reps.  If you're a female and not in great shape, you'll want to start out with the Light/Blue grips (or even the Extra Light/Yellow ones), and work your way up.  Out-of-shape guys can probably get away with the Medium/Red ones to start.  If you've got good hand/wrist/forearm strength, don't even both with the lighter tensions - skip ahead to the Medium/Red or Heavy/Black.Although I've only owned my Gripmasters for a week or two, and can't personally vouch for their durability, they do seem sturdy and well-crafted.  My fianc's brother, an amateur boxer and guitar player, used his for years without a problem, so I have faith that I'll be squeezing these babies well into 2015!- Kelly Garbato, Couch Potato Turned Fitness Fanati</review_text>
these are the third and fourth ones I have ordered for family and friends.  I love it.  It is not fancy, but that's not what I wanted.  They got here in record time and work perfectly</review_text>
I often walk to the store or post office and was curious about how far I was walking, so when I saw how inexpensive this pedometer was, I decided that it would be fun to try and that I wouldn't really be out anything if it didn't work, or if I didn't use it.It counts steps very accurately.  The first day I used it I counted my steps myself, and would check every one hundred steps...it was right on.It's not as accurate as far as measuring distance, but I know that's my own error in setting the stride length.  My pace and stride length vary as I go so I'm still working on finding an average.If you're looking for a simple pedometer for a good price, I recommend this product.</review_text>
I received my Sportline 340 Strider Pedometer and have been utilizing it at every advantage, it keeps wonderful count of your steps, and does not give you false reading as many others have.  The numbers are quite viewable</review_text>
I went to a lot of stores trying out many differnt treads and researching what I should get. I need a good unit that's going to last. This one was one of the models I kept seeing and hearing good things about. I loved it in the stores, but Amazon had a better price, and I didn't mind waiting a week to get it. I've been using it now for about 3 weeks, and I can see why I kept hearing good things about it. It's really sturdy, and there was a lot of attention put on the little details. Everythings right where it should be, it's very quiet, and very sturdy. I'd reccomend it if you want something your going to use every day.</review_text>
This was replacement for original that was damaged when we received it.  Replacement was handled very well and in timely manner.Thank</review_text>
I wanted a full featured treadmill for a reasonable price.  I got it and more with the Ironman 220t.  It is easy to use and the controls are accessible.  Smooth running and quiet.  I have used it for over 4 months and find it to be a great asset to my daily workout routine</review_text>
4x20 = 4X magnification x 20mm diameter objective lens (the end closest to the target).Included rings mount to 3/8" "Dovetail" grooves on .22 caliber rifles. Owners manual should list what kind of ring mount (base) is on the rifle or air gun you want to put a scope on. There are bases and rings made for just about every combination possible. And conversion bases to change from one type to another. At the ranges possible with an air gun 4X is sufficient. The higher the magnification the smaller the area (field of view) that you can see thru the scope. For comparison, 4X is used extensively by deer hunters in wooded situations, and some consider that too high. For moving targets and less than 100 yard ranges 4X will work great.Also Nitrogen filled prevents internal fogging, and is a feature usually used on much more expensive scopes.</review_text>
I cannot say that I have had many Crosman products that I liked.  Granted they were purchased at Walmart for under $50, and not the best Crosman had to offer.I had always been curious about their higher end products, but was nervous about spending more money on something that might not be any better than the cheap stuff at wally world.  I found this rifle at Pyramid Arms online for $99.00.  I read the description and my interest was perked.  The cool design, semi automatic, and airsource fuel intrigued me.  I decided, what the hell and ordered it.The rifle came with 4 clips and 1 Airsource tank.  I had ordered Crosman wad cutter pellets for it and   4 additional clips from Pyramid.  My son and I loaded the clips and went out in the back yard to see what she would do.  Our target was a GIANT Tide laundry detergent bottle.  We sat about 70 feet from the target and opened fire.  I was truly impressed!  The wad cutters went clean through the Tide bottle and were stuck in the concrete block behind it.  The accuracy was extremely good.  No recoil.  Very Very Very slight pressure drop when going nuts on the trigger.  We shot a total of 16, 12 shot clips on one Airsource tank at 50 degrees.  This was less than what the box said it would shot on one tank, but the performance of the rifle was so impressive that I won't hold it against Crosman.Points that I liked:*  Very good weight and balance*  Not plagued by massive pressured drop from tank freezing.  Anyone who has shot a CO2 pistol that uses the old small cartridges will know exactly what I'm talking about here.*  Semi Automatic*  New Mowhawk sights.*  Dove tail for scope mounting (Will need high mount scope rings to clear open sights).*  Rugged construction.*  Evil styling.  At night this thing would make most men drop the chilupa!Points that would improve this rifle:*  A way to shut off and remove the Airsource tank without wasting unused CO2.*  A last shot, bolt open, feature.  When it's out of ammo the bolt should stay open like a SKS or AK47.*  A little more room to insert and remove the clips.  Inserting a clip can be trying.I have to say that this is the most impressive Crosman I have ever owned.  It is EXTREMELY fun to shoot!  Crosman hit a home run with this one!Kids will need the supervision of an adult while operating this.  Unless you want to be paying for broken windshields, dented fenders, dead animals, or like wise events of mayhem.</review_text>
Good Points-Great sight design-No pumping-Built To lastBad Points-Picky about the pellets you feed it-No airsouce CO2 shutoff valve included, and the manual states that you shouldn't store the rifle with an airsource cartridge attached to it (if you follow the manual, you could end up wasting a lot of CO2 if you have to remove a partially used cartridge when you're finished shooting.-It only gets about 200 shots per cartridge unlike the advertised  350 shots!General CommentsI purchased a Crosman Nightstalker air rifle several weeks ago for about $110. The Nightstalker is solid and shoots well.The sight on the gun are very well made and allow for extreem acuracy. I've shot approximately 1,000 shots through the Nightstalker thus far, experimenting with several types of pellets in an attempt to wring out as much accuracy as I can. With the rifle supported, the best 5 shot group I've shot so far at 30 feet could be completely covered by a dime, and at 60 feet a quarter. It seems to be somewhat finicky about the pellets I feed it - here is my summary on pellets I've tried (in order of increasing accuracy):Beeman Crow Magnum - very poor accuracy - pellets tumbled and groups were by far the worst of all pellets triedDaisy Flat Nosed Pellets (wadcutters) - below average accuracyDaisy Pointed Field Pellets - below average accuracyRWS Superpoints Extra - average accuracyBenjamin Domed Pellets - above average accuracy (I expected this pellet to do better, considering it is what the 392's manual recommends)Crosman Copperhead Pointed - above average accuracyCrosman Copperhead Wadcutters - very good accuracyGamo Hunter - very good accuracyI have encountered a few jams, but they were easily fixed. Although I've only owned the rifle several for serveral weeks, so far I am extremely satisfied with the Nightstalker.</review_text>
Bought this bike for my wife. It arrived a day late for the next day delivery. The packaging was a little crumpled but the contents were ok. The directions for assembly couldn't have been more clear and easy to understand. It took me about an hour, taking my time to put it together. The bike seems solid and sturdy enough to last a long time. Also very comfortable</review_text>
My box arrived somewhat banged up, but apart from a cosmetic scuff on one handlebar, it was OK. BUT, after 2 days I started hearing a noise, seemed to come from the interior of the pedals/gearbox, sounded like a loose object bouncing around. I was afraid I would have to ship it back. I called Schwinn, and the woman asked me to take the pedals off and see if I could reproduce the sound. I assured her, it was not the pedals. She said, "yes sir, now please take the pedals off".  I did, and, it was the left pedal! Sounded just like the interior. Anyway, they will send me new pedals, so problem solved. Sounds like they have encountered this problem before.Also, I was frustrated by the inability to see the blue display screen, so I bought 2 doorstops, removed the standard mounting screws, and used "GOOP" adhesive to make the screen lean forward. Now I can read it!  Someone at Scwinn did not do the Q.C. on that screen issue.Anyway, great bike, now I'm happy.</review_text>
The bike arrived in 6 days.  Our shipment was from UPS.  Great service.  No damage during shipment</review_text>
This is a good recumbent exercise bike. The heart-rate monitor is a little inconsistent, and you have to hold the sensors firmly. But it is solid and works well</review_text>
I was a little standoffish about it at first because I did not know what I needed.  This bike is great.  I have no idea why anyone would buy anything else.  I have seen bikes like this go for $3k and I have no idea why as this bike does it all.  It is awsome.  Feels great and is almost silent.  Great purchase.  I am going to try out a schwin eliptical machine next probably</review_text>
Just as others have reported, the bike ordered arrived in a box that was beaten up and full of very large holes. Looking into the holes, there was no sign of packing material, but there was sign of damage to the bike. The driver making the delivery handed over the paperwork to sign, at the same time saying, "I wouldn't accept delivery of this." Needless to say, delivery was refused. A replacement bike will be coming, I'm told by Amazon. I wonder what the odds are that this bike will arrive in the same condition</review_text>
Baby Einstein has done it again!  They have created an engaging learning toy that both babies and parents love.The best part of it is (they call it) the activity star.  It's what many of those cute babies in the customer images are smiling up at.  The activity star has different settings for playing music:  on, short play and motion activated.  It's also got a smiling face in the center and lights on each star-tip that flash along with the music.  My 3 month old daughter loves the smiling face and flashing lights.Compared to other play mats in the same price range, this one is the best (in my opinion).</review_text>
We bought this for my son when he was about 2 months old. He would just lay in it and would be entertained for a long time, which bought me time to do housework around him, etc.  You can take the hanging pieces down and hang up other objects so that there's always variety.  I'd say he lost interest in it though at about 7 months when he learned to crawl. I bought mine used on ebay and it was worth the $35 I spent. I wouldn't spend much more than that.</review_text>
We originally set this gym up for our son when we moved into our new house, and had nowhere to put him (he was 3 weeks old).  As time went on, it just became convient to put him on the mat, close to us.  It was really fun to watch him grow into all the toys!  He started by just swinging his arms, and finally has learned to grab and interact with the toys!  He loves the star in the middle.  He could spend all day talking to that thing alone!  He loves this gym so much that we take it everywhere we go.  I highly suggest this gym for any baby!  It is something that us or the baby couldn't live without</review_text>
My 3 month old was bored with his current play gym.  While at a friends house he fell in love with the activity star that this gym included.  I went home and ordered it right away.  We now carry the star wherever we go. I give it 4 instead of 5 because the other stuff is just as good as his old gym.</review_text>
I registered for this playmat not sure if our baby was going to like it, but when I received it, I thought it was bright and cheerful and the right size for our already cluttered living room!  When our son was 4 weeks old, he started showing signs of interest in bright objects so we put him on the mat and were really surprised with the results - he absolutely LOVES the mat!He especially loves the musical star (that can be moved around with the velcro straps) and watches as it lights up in different areas!  Now he is almost 6 weeks and it has become a calming and interesting place to be when he gets fussy- he will lay on his back and gaze at the mirror, lights on the star, and kick the birds and watch them move!  This mat is a must for baby registries and great for newborns to gain alertness.Another reviewer did not like the rabbit card, but it comes in a sleeve that will hold a 4x6 photo, so we printed out a photo (of my husband's college mascot, because it is bright colored) and put it in the sleeve.  You could also put a photo of mommy or daddy, grandparents or a pet, too.  Also, you can add other toys to the rings when the baby gets bored with the birds/bug/rattle.</review_text>
The activity gym is nice and bright and happy.  Its only shortcoming is that the mat is a bit thin, making it necessary to use a heavy blanket underneath if you're using it on hard floors/surfaces</review_text>
We enjoy all of the Baby Einstein products. This playmat has many toys. I even added extra links to make them easier for my daughter to see and reach. It is so colorful, too. It really seems to capture her attention. Our 2 year old loves to hear the music while her sister is playing on the mat. I think having this mat early on will help our baby make connections when she watches the Baby Einstein videos</review_text>
My 3 1/2 month old LOVES LOVES LOVES this playmat.  He's been rolling over since 11 weeks and I swear it's because of this mat and all there is to look at.  He loves the star and the red bird the most.  I highly recommend this to anyone looking for something to keep your baby happy and occupied</review_text>
Excellent product.  Keeps baby amused from newborn to six months when there is not much for the baby to do. It fascinates the baby but it does not overstimulate.</review_text>
This BILLY Blanks set is amazing. Did I say it was amazing? After giving birth in Feburary 13,2006, I am in great shape. I am actually developing a six pack! I am advanced and this workout is challenging. Don't be deceived this is not for the faint of heart. If you are one that whines this not your dvd. Billy Blanks has really taken taebo to the next level. I must warn you to count yourself Billy sometimes is off, however this dvd is like Isaid amazing.</review_text>
With the first workout, I was INSTANTLY toned, more muscular, more defined and I LOVED it!I have done all three of the DVDs included in this set a couple of times now, and I am ALWAYS looking forward to doing them again- I can't wait for the workout and the feeling my body gets after I've done them! :)I do wonder, though, will it really melt off the stubborn pudge from my hips/stomach?The answer is hidden somewhere, I think, in how "doable" the workouts are- you're neither exhausted/hurt nor left wanting do do more- so I suppose it's just enough to eventually get those results with regular use. Other people have written that muscle builds and fat melts so I will keep this up!*The cardio DVD is not included, but I found it awesome to use an elliptical machine or speed walking to substitute for cardio work, either before, after, or both, when I do a Tae Bo DVD. My body literally turned into a furnace and I could feel my metabolism was sky high!Just be patient, give your body rest days, and do as much as you can from each DVD. You'll be addicted too.....</review_text>
I bought this DVD set at a warehouse store yesterday and I've just finished the first workout.  There are some familiar moves from the original TAE-BO tapes, but these exercises are much more challenging.  The 'Billy Bands' add resistance to the basic moves.  This allows you to get a strength, cardio and flexibility workout in one.   The choreography is really simple so that even the least co-ordinated people should be able to stay in step.  This is a very challenging workout, and might be a little difficult for people who are not in shape.  If you are moderately fit, you'll find this workout to be fun and very motivating. According to my heart rate monitor, this workout burned a little less than 700 calories, so it will be a great substitute for a jog when the Seattle rain hampers my enthusiasm to exercise outdoors.</review_text>
Prior to getting this item, I read the reviews and they were love it or hate it.  Thankfully, I am one that loved it.  The workouts are HARD, but you can tell that you are doing wonderful things to your body</review_text>
I own this cooler, circa 1968.  It is bombproof and looks like it survived a tour in Vietnam, but we haul this bad boy out each summer because it does the job.  The cam lock on the lid keeps it from flying free if jarred or jostled; this is a very good thing if you take it fishing and have your catch inside.  Construction is good enough to last near 40 years of use before considering a replacement.  It really will survive that many seasons of use, which is more than you can say for many fragile thermoplastic knockoffs.There are few camping or summertime essentials that can be universally adopted, but the Coleman steel cooler has to be one.  Bring it on your next outing, and even if you have boring cans of Diet Coke inside, people will stop to check it out.-Fred</review_text>
As for the bad reviews: This is not a million candlepower spotlight.  It's not even as bright as your standard quality 2D-cell flashlight.  Yes, you do have to expend some energy charging it.  IT'S AN EMERGENCY FLASHLIGHT!As advertised, 1 1/2 minutes of shaking provides light that begins to fade out at 20 minutes, but lasts  up to 2 hours.  I've found it useful for up to an hour between charges.  Initial light output is similar to battery powered LED keychain lights.  Just enough to safely make your way from the house to the shed to haul out the generator, to change a tire, or to read a book on those nights the power fails.Living on the side of a mountain where we frequently lose power for days, this is a cheap insurance policy.  I will never find I have no batteries or a dead bulb.The only problem i have with this flashlight is the front lens is plastic and easily scratched, but that's minor - just use lens paper for cleaning if it needs it.</review_text>
This flashlight is simply awesome if you just have a little common sense. This is meant to be an EMERGENCY flashlight and if you use it as such, it is great. This is definately not a spotlight type of light and it isn't meant to be. But when you need some light in an emergency, a little shaking and you have some light. It's starting to dim? Just shake it some more and voila, more light. You could be lost miles from anywhere and you know your batteries are not going to go dead on the walk for help.I don't know why people are giving this bad reviews. This is so easy my 6 year old niece can shake it and get it working. And if you are smart enough to shake it like the instructions say, the light will last longer then people on here are saying. If my 6 year old niece can figure it out, I would think that adults could too. But, there are always going to be people out there who complain about everything.This is an emergency, no battery SHAKE flashlight. I think some people were expecting a flashlight that would shake itself.You should keep one of these flashlights in your vehicles, campers, boats, kids rooms, etc. How many times have you went to get a flashlight and the batteries were dead and you couldn't find new ones? This one has worked everytime I have uesd it. But then again, I do have common sense.This flashlight is Great!</review_text>
I like this product for the great taste and I don't need a blender to mix it - a shaker cup is all you need so it is very easy to get ready quickly.  I've been using it for 2 weeks and have actually lost body fat so no complaints here (started at 14%, at 12% now)  Give it a try, that is really the only way to tell for your yourself.  It's easy enough to adjust how thick you want your shake to be, just add more water for a thinner drink.  2 scoops in 10oz of water is thin and fluid, my personal preference</review_text>
This is a really good product. Being a gym owner and trainer in Southern Calif. for over 20 years I've seen and used a few products and this one ranks near the top. Most of the fats are M.C.T.s and are used for energy, not to make it taste better! Protein NEEDS fat to be properly utilized by the body!The carbs and sugars are low, which make this a true LEAN GAINER. Keep your protein high ,your carbs moderate and get some good healthy fats like flax or fish oil and you've got the diet to grow some muscle with</review_text>
Product was exactly as advertised and was shipped in timely manner. I'm very satisfied</review_text>
We bought this for our 4 year old son.  He loves playing with it and it has really helped him with coordination.  It is well built and I am sure will last a long time.  It did take two of us to put it together, though...</review_text>
My boys LOVE all types of construction and farm toys.  This one is the best!  They can sit on it and dig, dig, dig!  It is a little pricey, but well constructed and extremely worth the price!  A MUST!  We have had this toy for 8 months, and if my 3 boys can't break it, that in itself says quite a lot</review_text>
My son is 5 years old and absolutly loves this digger.It was easy to put togther and is very durable.I would highly recommend it. He also likes that it has tracks so he can sit on it and move it where he wants</review_text>
I bought this ball as an alternative to a regular office chair. I am able to work on my abdominal muscles while surfing the web, or other computer work. It helps me to stay focused on the work and not get frustrated with not being able to move around. It is exactly what I was looking for</review_text>
My kids just love this inexpensive little scooter.  We have another one at home, which has been used for years. We've had other scooters, but have found the Razor brand to be the most stable and reliable.</review_text>
this is a good scooter you have to admit but i used to have a viper brand scooter and it was fast!! but it got stolein i hate people who do that i wish i had my viper brand scooter back from 2000 i tryed to find it online but they dont sell any i wish i knew where my dad got it he died in 2001 ok i just wonder if they had it here but they dont  o man</review_text>
The ablounge 2 is great! Easy to use, and does not hurt my neck like regular sit ups. Works great. after 2 weeks of use already saw results!!! THanks!</review_text>
This machine really makes you feel it. I like the fact that it also stretches your back which feels great. The only thing I can say is I wish it folded up for better storage but other than that, I like it.</review_text>
Make sure you do other forms of exercise and good diet habits to compliment this. I like using it when I'm at home and don't feel like going to the gym. I cardio, (running or something) afterwards. It's really effective if your form is correct.</review_text>
I have owned this device since June 2006.  The device linclines from 0-12 degrees and provides speeds of up to 12 mph.  This tread mill gets up to speed and stop quickly but should not trip up most people.  There is no cool-down cycle like on the systems at the club.  Also the pluse sensors in the hand grips take a while and some adjustment to get an accurate reading.  I plan on ordering the chest band monitor from the manufacture in hopes that will provide better feedback during my exercise routine.-</review_text>
This is quite possibly the greatest thing since sliced bread ! other than sliced bread with the crusts removed of course.I was in an difficult situation last year, let me explain.I, for a long time, have had a love for open spaces and the whole hiking and campology scene.  I am a regular purchaser of "Hikers Monthly" and own a mint condition copy of "The Art Of Camp".  I've been hiking in several places around Canada and the Rockies but for a long time I've truly wished I could scale the heights of Everest or wander the mountain passes of the Pyrenees.  Well one day my opportunity came ! My friend, who is part of the WCO(World Camp Organisation), called me up and asked me if I'd be interested in a fortnight up the Pyrenees !!  As you can imagine I nearly passed out in my two berth with excitement(I was camping at the time).  I hurried home to pack as he said we needed to leave that weekend.the problem came when I opened the door of my house I was met by Tchaikovsky, my alsation.  "NO !", I thought, "What am I supposed to do with Tchaikovsky ?".  There had been an unfortunate incident at the kennels earlier that year, although the courts could prove nothing, and Harold, my neighbours Iguana, had been harassed a little too much so I didn't like to ask.I was feeling decidedly down when my friend rang me back.  When I had finished updating him on the situation he suggested I look for at the Mountainsmith Dog Backpack.  A little confused I looked on Amazon as he had suggested and as soon as I saw it I knew what he meant.  I ordered it straight away and it came within two days.  Thanks Amazon !When I slipped it onto Tchaikovsky's back he went mad with delight and shot off round the garden barking at the trees and anything else he could find.Friday soon came around and after Harold's funeral(sadly he died of a heart attack but again nothing could be proven), we were off !We had an amazing time seeing the sites and climbing ridge after ridge.  Tchaikovsky carried the instant mash powder and my collection of David Bowie CDs + CD player, in his saddle bags.  Not once did he wimper due to chafing and we took some great pictures of him in his little red bobble hat.Thanks for making my holiday</review_text>
Bought 2 of these mats on Amazon's Friday sale about 5 months ago, I paid 25 dollars a piece.  For 25 dollars they are well worth the price. At their regular retail price ($100) I think they are a bit over priced.  I am very pleased with the mats anyway</review_text>
I am so glad amazon offered the Bowflex mat as a bonus item. I have the bowflex set up in my familyroom which is newly carpeted, and I was concerned about divets in the rug. I have to say, the mat is a big help</review_text>
Just got my mat, which was free with the Bowflex I bought, and it is pretty nice. Nothing special.. it is what it is.. a nice looking mat. I don't see this thing ripping anytime soon. And mine doesn't make the whole room smell like rubber like someone else commented.. But like I said.. mine was free. I would never pay $90 for one of these :</review_text>
Bought this to put under my exercise bike and protect the floor. I've found it to be sturdy (yet it's really dense, and thinner than you would think). It doesn't have the cushion-like feel of an exercise mat, but rather is much firmer. So far, it has proveb to be a great surface for the bike (and is also keeping my floor in good shape)</review_text>
Let me start saying that this is a wonderful product. Small, light, and well constructed (they feel like they will last forever). You can carry them with you, allowing to workout your fingers at the office, at home or wherever you find suitable. I bought the four different color-coded gripmasters: Black/heavy, Red/medium, Blue/light, and Yellow/extra light. I only found the resistance of the red and black ones useful for me, but my wife loves the blue and yellow ones. It was a great buy because of their high quality and affordable price.The product comes with a foldable instruction booklet where you find details for six different exercises:- Trigger pinch. This one simulates the movement of squeezing a trigger, and it isolates the index finger for enhanced strength and coordination.- Gross grasp. This one strengthens fingers, thumb, wrist and forearm for a firm grip.- Hook position. This one strengthens longer muscles in forearm and wrist while stretching smaller muscles in hand for greater motion and endurance.- Tip to tip pinch. This exercise strengthens specific fingers, thumb, smaller hand muscles and forearm for greater control and endurance.- Wrist flexion. It strengthens wrist and forearm muscles.- Key pinch. Strengthens thumb and index finger for greater stability and coordination.At the gripmaster website you can find more exercises for different activities and sports.If you are looking to crush hands when handshaking this is not the product for you, but if you need finger strength, control, endurance and coordination you are in the right place</review_text>
Our daughter took up guitar about 6 months ago.  It took her about forever to master the pesky "F" chord.  Her teacher noticed she was developing the bad habit of holding her third finger on top of the pinky finger to get it to hold down the strings.  "Just not enough strength in that pinky finger", says the teacher.  Enter Gripmaster Finger Exerciser!  Works like a charm.  And hey, her basketball dribble is stronger now too!  The kids at school are jealous, they think it's cool, her bright yellow contraption.  Rock on, Gripmaster</review_text>
This is a great exercise ball.  It is great in helping your body tone up by balancing yourself using the ball with various floor routines.  Let me tell you!!!  It is very hard to balance yourself on this ball and I can really feel my muscles working out .  It helps strengthen your muscles and gives you better balance and flexibility.  this is a great  product!!!!!!!!</review_text>
The last ball I had requirted the bicycle pump to fill it. I'm just too lazy to run out and find the bike pump every time I need a little more air. The pump that comes with this ball doubles for filling other things too. At my kids birthday party I used it to fill some inflatable decorations and I've used it to fill an air mattress. So two things: the ball is easily inflated and the pump is handy</review_text>
Great product. I just received my ball today. I couldn't wait to work out. If I learn how to stay on it that would be saying something! I will always recommend Max-Fitness</review_text>
I train people for a living and have sent all of my clients to this seller for their exercise balls.  Being one that works with different sized people on a daily basis on the Max Fitness balls, I can tell you that they provide a great product and they are very fast to get it to my clients.  I own one myself.  Thanks for the great product and service.Jason</review_text>
I use my treadmill 4 times a week and noticed that their was friction building up...I tried silicone from an auto parts store but the odor was unbearable and later learned that their are propellants in the aerosol cans that actually cause more harm than good!I came across the LifeSpan treadmill lube, as I was looking for a product that was 100% silicone. It is easy to apply and I felt immediate results...I also like the fact that it provides me with a (1) year supply</review_text>
second best exercise for lengthing your golf drives...improves club head speed very nicely.  If you are wondering, #1 is pulldowns for the lats.</review_text>
it was better than i expected it to be. very easy to us</review_text>
This is a very good product for the cost but if it has the ability to be flat, I can't figure it out.  It is always on a constant incline, when there are times I'd like it to be flat</review_text>
I bought this to replace an electric treadmill that was too big for my space.  I am happy with the treadmill because it is portable and stores easily. It is necessary to keep the belt oiled underneath in order to walk without much friction..That has not been a problem,though..The only drawback is that I am not comfortable walking without holding onto the siderails..It is more difficult to control the speed by simply walking with arms swinging(or holding a book to read)as I did with my electric treadmill.All in all,however, it has been worth the time and money spent for the treadmill.I can easily move it from room to room and put it away when done</review_text>
This machine is a great buy for the price.  It was simple to put together, doesn't take up much room and is easy to use.  There is just a little noise when you are walking, but nothing the TV can't drown out.</review_text>
I recently decided to try and teach myself guitar after having stopped for a while.  One of the suggestions i got was to get a Gripmaster, and when i checked it out, I found this gizmo could actually help in more ways than just strengthening my fingers. I ordered one, and I can definitely say it was a good investment! There's a big difference in my grip now - I can even crack a nut with one hand easily (using a nutcracker of course). I can't wait to try the 7-lb one</review_text>
Let me start saying that this is a wonderful product. Small, light, and well constructed (they feel like they will last forever). You can carry them with you, allowing to workout your fingers at the office, at home or wherever you find suitable. I bought the four different color-coded gripmasters: Black/heavy, Red/medium, Blue/light, and Yellow/extra light. I only found the resistance of the red and black ones useful for me, but my wife loves the blue and yellow ones. It was a great buy because of their high quality and affordable price.The product comes with a foldable instruction booklet where you find details for six different exercises:- Trigger pinch. This one simulates the movement of squeezing a trigger, and it isolates the index finger for enhanced strength and coordination.- Gross grasp. This one strengthens fingers, thumb, wrist and forearm for a firm grip.- Hook position. This one strengthens longer muscles in forearm and wrist while stretching smaller muscles in hand for greater motion and endurance.- Tip to tip pinch. This exercise strengthens specific fingers, thumb, smaller hand muscles and forearm for greater control and endurance.- Wrist flexion. It strengthens wrist and forearm muscles.- Key pinch. Strengthens thumb and index finger for greater stability and coordination.At the gripmaster website you can find more exercises for different activities and sports.If you are looking to crush hands when handshaking this is not the product for you, but if you need finger strength, control, endurance and coordination you are in the right place</review_text>
I recently purchased a pair of the Gripmaster Hand & Finger Exercisers in order to help build forearm strength.  As I was unsure which tension would be appropriate, I bought one each of the Light/Blue (5 lbs. tension) and Medium/Red (7 lbs. tension) grips.  I've had them for a little more than a week now, and I just love, love, love them!  Perhaps that's a little more enthusiasm than anyone should muster up for exercise accessories, but I really do enjoy the grips.  I leave one out on my desk at all times, and get in a little work here and there when I stop to read a document or whatnot.The Gripmaster Exercisers are different from conventional grips in that you can either work your entire hand at once, or each finger individually (great for guitar players, I've heard!).  One side features four small levers, each with its own spring, that can be squeezed together or one at a time.  The plastic on the flip side is molded together so that you can work your whole hand as one unit.  The black rubber cushion is removable, and you can place it on either side of the grip.  It's an awesome idea, and allows for maximum versatility!Just for reference, I'm a female, in relatively good shape, but with painfully little forearm strength (my biceps are huge from years of Tae Bo, though!).  The 7 lb. Medium/Red grip is do-able, but challenging.  The 5 lb. Light/Blue grip, on the other hand, makes for a much easier workout; I oftentimes find myself squeezing it while doing other things, and I only feel it after a number of reps.  If you're a female and not in great shape, you'll want to start out with the Light/Blue grips (or even the Extra Light/Yellow ones), and work your way up.  Out-of-shape guys can probably get away with the Medium/Red ones to start.  If you've got good hand/wrist/forearm strength, don't even both with the lighter tensions - skip ahead to the Medium/Red or Heavy/Black.Although I've only owned my Gripmasters for a week or two, and can't personally vouch for their durability, they do seem sturdy and well-crafted.  My fianc's brother, an amateur boxer and guitar player, used his for years without a problem, so I have faith that I'll be squeezing these babies well into 2015!- Kelly Garbato, Couch Potato Turned Fitness Fanati</review_text>
these are the third and fourth ones I have ordered for family and friends.  I love it.  It is not fancy, but that's not what I wanted.  They got here in record time and work perfectly</review_text>
I often walk to the store or post office and was curious about how far I was walking, so when I saw how inexpensive this pedometer was, I decided that it would be fun to try and that I wouldn't really be out anything if it didn't work, or if I didn't use it.It counts steps very accurately.  The first day I used it I counted my steps myself, and would check every one hundred steps...it was right on.It's not as accurate as far as measuring distance, but I know that's my own error in setting the stride length.  My pace and stride length vary as I go so I'm still working on finding an average.If you're looking for a simple pedometer for a good price, I recommend this product.</review_text>
I received my Sportline 340 Strider Pedometer and have been utilizing it at every advantage, it keeps wonderful count of your steps, and does not give you false reading as many others have.  The numbers are quite viewable</review_text>
I love my treadmill!  My son put it together for me and he had no trouble.  I love all the options on this treadmill.  I use only the basic so far, but I can see the benefit in having the pre-programmed workouts.  I can't wait to get there to try it!It's hard to say enough about this machine.  It's a great MACHINE</review_text>
I received this from my husband as a birthday present. It figures he was going to get something with the name 'IronMan'. =P I've only used it for a week, but I think we're going to have a long and happy relationship. (Tho' I've found my husband using it more then I am!) Its easy to fold up, which is important as I'm not the strongest woman in the world. But I leave it out as I know that if it's folded and put away I probably won't use it. However, this sucker looks so cool that I really have no desire to put it in the closet. Everything on it is convinent, with one exception. They made the display easy to see, but it blocks the TV! LOL. One star off for that... =</review_text>
This was replacement for original that was damaged when we received it.  Replacement was handled very well and in timely manner.Thank</review_text>
I wanted a full featured treadmill for a reasonable price.  I got it and more with the Ironman 220t.  It is easy to use and the controls are accessible.  Smooth running and quiet.  I have used it for over 4 months and find it to be a great asset to my daily workout routine</review_text>
4x20 = 4X magnification x 20mm diameter objective lens (the end closest to the target).Included rings mount to 3/8" "Dovetail" grooves on .22 caliber rifles. Owners manual should list what kind of ring mount (base) is on the rifle or air gun you want to put a scope on. There are bases and rings made for just about every combination possible. And conversion bases to change from one type to another. At the ranges possible with an air gun 4X is sufficient. The higher the magnification the smaller the area (field of view) that you can see thru the scope. For comparison, 4X is used extensively by deer hunters in wooded situations, and some consider that too high. For moving targets and less than 100 yard ranges 4X will work great.Also Nitrogen filled prevents internal fogging, and is a feature usually used on much more expensive scopes.</review_text>
The heavy tension Gripmaster provides a great workout for the fingers and wrists.  The average person may want to start with the medium Gripmaster to get up to speed (about a month of daily use).  But for people involved in daily wrist/finger activities, Martial Arts, guitarists, etc. you probably could plunge right in with the heavy tension with no problem.</review_text>
I purchased both the 7 lbs. and 9 lbs. tension units and I'm extremely satisfied with both models. Both models allow for independent work on particular fingers or your grip as a whole. My hand strength, which had been decreasing a bit as I age, has returned very quickly as has increased freedom of movement through fingers. Whichever level of tension you choose I'm sure you will be satisfied with the Gripmaster</review_text>
Comfortable in my hand and with a variety of exercises I find it a great thing to have at my desk to use periodically during the day</review_text>
Let me start saying that this is a wonderful product. Small, light, and well constructed (they feel like they will last forever). You can carry them with you, allowing to workout your fingers at the office, at home or wherever you find suitable. I bought the four different color-coded gripmasters: Black/heavy, Red/medium, Blue/light, and Yellow/extra light. I only found the resistance of the red and black ones useful for me, but my wife loves the blue and yellow ones. It was a great buy because of their high quality and affordable price.The product comes with a foldable instruction booklet where you find details for six different exercises:- Trigger pinch. This one simulates the movement of squeezing a trigger, and it isolates the index finger for enhanced strength and coordination.- Gross grasp. This one strengthens fingers, thumb, wrist and forearm for a firm grip.- Hook position. This one strengthens longer muscles in forearm and wrist while stretching smaller muscles in hand for greater motion and endurance.- Tip to tip pinch. This exercise strengthens specific fingers, thumb, smaller hand muscles and forearm for greater control and endurance.- Wrist flexion. It strengthens wrist and forearm muscles.- Key pinch. Strengthens thumb and index finger for greater stability and coordination.At the gripmaster website you can find more exercises for different activities and sports.If you are looking to crush hands when handshaking this is not the product for you, but if you need finger strength, control, endurance and coordination you are in the right place</review_text>
I bought the red/medium tension and it's a good beginner challenge for most. It looks like a little instrument of torturebut I love it. I am a 50 something woman who is an advanced-beginner guitar player and it's helping tremendously plus there is something about having hand and finger strength that makes all your everyday chores easier such as typing this recommendation. Also great for stress.</review_text>
I love this product. In Fact I own two and not because I use two at the time(I don't, I just like to have a spare). First off this is the only gripper that allows you to exercise each finger individually. Second it is one of the very few that exercise the thumb individually. Third, despite all of this it is very compact. I put it in my pocket and get most or all of the exercises on it done at work. Fourth it offers a variety of exercises. Definitely a good value for your money</review_text>
I originally bought the Blue (5 lb), Red (7 lb) and the Black (9 lb) Gripmasters for my 14 year old boys. The Blue is a little too easy for gripping but excellent for exercising the ring and little finger. The Blue was too easy for them so they did not use it so I ended inherited it. It is pretty habit forming and fun to use because the tension is light, this makes it good for use anytime, anywhere. (I have used it stuck in traffic and it is also a good stress reliever) If I had to do it again, I would have probably not bought the Blue unless you have a very light grip, probably have started with the Red. I started to use the Red and the Black. The Red is just right for me, challenging for the fingers and I am working my way to use the Black consistently. Although it doesn't seem like it at first, the Black is challenging for the hand and fingers and will give a good workout. Just remember that this is mainly for fingers and hand exercise so very easy to use for gripping, the challenge is working out the fingers. It is not like using the regular heavy hand grippers. It has increased my hand strength and grip just by having it with me and using it during the course of the day without planned workouts. Great product, excellent for finger or hand exercise, good quality. Also bought from DMM Products, great price fast shipping</review_text>
The gripmaster is very well made, I was impressed by the high quality. I have played guitar for many years but I found the heavy tension to much for me to start. I ordered the medium tension and am working my way into the heavy. It's doing many reps that is the key to hand strengh not moving heavy tension.I really like the gripmaster</review_text>
I bought both the Medium and Heavy tension Gripmasters. The Medium (red) one is not much of a challenge for me. I'm a man of average build, and I actually bought these because I was starting weight training at the gym and I wanted more grip strength for my hands and stronger forearms.I'd say if you are looking for individual finger strength, such as for playing an instrument, then the red Gripmaster might be enough resistance. But I use the black one much more for whole hand strength.The product comes with a guide containing instructions on a variety of exercises. I would also recommend visiting Gripmaster's website, as they have a more complete list of exercises, and recommendations for different sports</review_text>
I cannot say that I have had many Crosman products that I liked.  Granted they were purchased at Walmart for under $50, and not the best Crosman had to offer.I had always been curious about their higher end products, but was nervous about spending more money on something that might not be any better than the cheap stuff at wally world.  I found this rifle at Pyramid Arms online for $99.00.  I read the description and my interest was perked.  The cool design, semi automatic, and airsource fuel intrigued me.  I decided, what the hell and ordered it.The rifle came with 4 clips and 1 Airsource tank.  I had ordered Crosman wad cutter pellets for it and   4 additional clips from Pyramid.  My son and I loaded the clips and went out in the back yard to see what she would do.  Our target was a GIANT Tide laundry detergent bottle.  We sat about 70 feet from the target and opened fire.  I was truly impressed!  The wad cutters went clean through the Tide bottle and were stuck in the concrete block behind it.  The accuracy was extremely good.  No recoil.  Very Very Very slight pressure drop when going nuts on the trigger.  We shot a total of 16, 12 shot clips on one Airsource tank at 50 degrees.  This was less than what the box said it would shot on one tank, but the performance of the rifle was so impressive that I won't hold it against Crosman.Points that I liked:*  Very good weight and balance*  Not plagued by massive pressured drop from tank freezing.  Anyone who has shot a CO2 pistol that uses the old small cartridges will know exactly what I'm talking about here.*  Semi Automatic*  New Mowhawk sights.*  Dove tail for scope mounting (Will need high mount scope rings to clear open sights).*  Rugged construction.*  Evil styling.  At night this thing would make most men drop the chilupa!Points that would improve this rifle:*  A way to shut off and remove the Airsource tank without wasting unused CO2.*  A last shot, bolt open, feature.  When it's out of ammo the bolt should stay open like a SKS or AK47.*  A little more room to insert and remove the clips.  Inserting a clip can be trying.I have to say that this is the most impressive Crosman I have ever owned.  It is EXTREMELY fun to shoot!  Crosman hit a home run with this one!Kids will need the supervision of an adult while operating this.  Unless you want to be paying for broken windshields, dented fenders, dead animals, or like wise events of mayhem.</review_text>
Good Points-Great sight design-No pumping-Built To lastBad Points-Picky about the pellets you feed it-No airsouce CO2 shutoff valve included, and the manual states that you shouldn't store the rifle with an airsource cartridge attached to it (if you follow the manual, you could end up wasting a lot of CO2 if you have to remove a partially used cartridge when you're finished shooting.-It only gets about 200 shots per cartridge unlike the advertised  350 shots!General CommentsI purchased a Crosman Nightstalker air rifle several weeks ago for about $110. The Nightstalker is solid and shoots well.The sight on the gun are very well made and allow for extreem acuracy. I've shot approximately 1,000 shots through the Nightstalker thus far, experimenting with several types of pellets in an attempt to wring out as much accuracy as I can. With the rifle supported, the best 5 shot group I've shot so far at 30 feet could be completely covered by a dime, and at 60 feet a quarter. It seems to be somewhat finicky about the pellets I feed it - here is my summary on pellets I've tried (in order of increasing accuracy):Beeman Crow Magnum - very poor accuracy - pellets tumbled and groups were by far the worst of all pellets triedDaisy Flat Nosed Pellets (wadcutters) - below average accuracyDaisy Pointed Field Pellets - below average accuracyRWS Superpoints Extra - average accuracyBenjamin Domed Pellets - above average accuracy (I expected this pellet to do better, considering it is what the 392's manual recommends)Crosman Copperhead Pointed - above average accuracyCrosman Copperhead Wadcutters - very good accuracyGamo Hunter - very good accuracyI have encountered a few jams, but they were easily fixed. Although I've only owned the rifle several for serveral weeks, so far I am extremely satisfied with the Nightstalker.</review_text>
After much deliberation and self debate, I bought this bike from someone other than Amazon. (I spend about 2 months doing research, then needed the "immediate satisfaction" that comes from purchasing from a walk-in store). I've had it since right after thanksgiving, and think it's one of the better purchases I've made. It seems that with the fan-type exercise bike you get fewer bells and whistles, but more strength and reliability. I've had one treadmill and one "fancy" exercise bike die after just a few months. While this machine doesn't play music or show me videos that try to make me believe I'm riding through the French country side, it does feel like it might just last forever.</review_text>
I purchased both the medium and high tension Gripmasters.  For the average person the medium does not present too great a challenge, however it is a good place to start.  Every day activity does not provide the mobility or range of motion that the medium will give you.  After a month of daily use you will be more than ready to move up to the high tension Gripmaster and not experience frustration that may lead you to quit.</review_text>
I purchased both the 7 lbs. and 9 lbs. tension units and I'm extremely satisfied with both models. Both models allow for independent work on particular fingers or your grip as a whole. My hand strength, which had been decreasing a bit as I age, has returned very quickly as has increased freedom of movement through fingers. Whichever level of tension you choose I'm sure you will be satisfied with the Gripmaster</review_text>
Let me start saying that this is a wonderful product. Small, light, and well constructed (they feel like they will last forever). You can carry them with you, allowing to workout your fingers at the office, at home or wherever you find suitable. I bought the four different color-coded gripmasters: Black/heavy, Red/medium, Blue/light, and Yellow/extra light. I only found the resistance of the red and black ones useful for me, but my wife loves the blue and yellow ones. It was a great buy because of their high quality and affordable price.The product comes with a foldable instruction booklet where you find details for six different exercises:- Trigger pinch. This one simulates the movement of squeezing a trigger, and it isolates the index finger for enhanced strength and coordination.- Gross grasp. This one strengthens fingers, thumb, wrist and forearm for a firm grip.- Hook position. This one strengthens longer muscles in forearm and wrist while stretching smaller muscles in hand for greater motion and endurance.- Tip to tip pinch. This exercise strengthens specific fingers, thumb, smaller hand muscles and forearm for greater control and endurance.- Wrist flexion. It strengthens wrist and forearm muscles.- Key pinch. Strengthens thumb and index finger for greater stability and coordination.At the gripmaster website you can find more exercises for different activities and sports.If you are looking to crush hands when handshaking this is not the product for you, but if you need finger strength, control, endurance and coordination you are in the right place</review_text>
I originally bought the Blue (5 lb), Red (7 lb) and the Black (9 lb) Gripmasters for my 14 year old boys. The Blue is a little too easy for gripping but excellent for exercising the ring and little finger. The Blue was too easy for them so they did not use it so I ended inherited it. It is pretty habit forming and fun to use because the tension is light, this makes it good for use anytime, anywhere. (I have used it stuck in traffic and it is also a good stress reliever) If I had to do it again, I would have probably not bought this tension unless you have a very light grip, probably have started with the Red. I started to use the Red and the Black. The Red is just right for me, challenging for the fingers and I am working my way to the Black. Just remember that this is mainly for fingers and hand exercise so very easy to use for gripping, the challenge is working out the fingers. It is not like using the regular heavy hand grippers. It has increased my hand strength and grip just by having it with me and using it during the course of the day without planned workouts. Great product, excellent for finger or hand exercise, good quality. Also bought from DMM Products, great price fast shipping</review_text>
I like a lot, is easy to use, exercise your fingers individualy</review_text>
I bought both the Medium and Heavy tension Gripmasters. The Medium (red) one is not much of a challenge for me. I'm a man of average build, and I actually bought these because I was starting weight training at the gym and I wanted more grip strength for my hands and stronger forearms.I'd say if you are looking for individual finger strength, such as for playing an instrument, then the red Gripmaster might be enough resistance. But I use the black one much more for whole hand strength.The product comes with a guide containing instructions on a variety of exercises. I would also recommend visiting Gripmaster's website, as they have a more complete list of exercises, and recommendations for different sports</review_text>
The gripmaster has helped me strengthen my left fingers which is so important in the use of my reins when riding.  I took it with me on vacation to Florida, and two of my friends--one older who wanted to use it for arthritic hands and the other just for stiff joints--saw it, started using it and loved it.  So I ordered two more!</review_text>
Initially I had some trouble figuring out the right port to use. But now it works and I've used it constantly for at least 2 years</review_text>
The bike arrived in 6 days.  Our shipment was from UPS.  Great service.  No damage during shipment</review_text>
This is a good recumbent exercise bike. The heart-rate monitor is a little inconsistent, and you have to hold the sensors firmly. But it is solid and works well</review_text>
First off you can find this price lots of places.  It is probably the minimum sale price allowed by schwinn.  I choose to buy mine through AMAZON becasue I got 3% back with my visa, free delivery, and didn't pay sales tax.  That made up for most of the cost difference between the 212 and the 213.  I wanted the extra programs.Delivery was smooth except they had to come back once for me to sign for the delivery.  No problems with the packaging in our case.Assembly took about an hour and a half.  It was pretty simple and the tools you need were included which was nice.  Overall this assembly was much easier than most things I have put together.The bike is stable, quiet and smooth.  Easy to ride and easy to adjust between the big guy and the little woman.  Overall we are very pleased and look forward to years of use.  I didn't rate this a 5 cause we've only had ours a week</review_text>
I was a little standoffish about it at first because I did not know what I needed.  This bike is great.  I have no idea why anyone would buy anything else.  I have seen bikes like this go for $3k and I have no idea why as this bike does it all.  It is awsome.  Feels great and is almost silent.  Great purchase.  I am going to try out a schwin eliptical machine next probably</review_text>
I did read all the reviews and was afraid something bad could happen during delivery. My fears proved wrong. I received a heavy package not damage, with all contents inside. The bike is working well and it is really a great exercise bike</review_text>
My physician told me to exercise or else, so I looked at Comsumer Reports and listened to friends who spoke of a recumbent bike. Amazon's  price was great and I have been delighted. If you like to read and exercise, this one's for you</review_text>
Just as others have reported, the bike ordered arrived in a box that was beaten up and full of very large holes. Looking into the holes, there was no sign of packing material, but there was sign of damage to the bike. The driver making the delivery handed over the paperwork to sign, at the same time saying, "I wouldn't accept delivery of this." Needless to say, delivery was refused. A replacement bike will be coming, I'm told by Amazon. I wonder what the odds are that this bike will arrive in the same condition</review_text>
Wow, it's not often a person gets excited about exercise equipment, but my Schwinn 213 Recumbent bike arrived today.  I have read several reviews about the condition of the box when it arrives.  My bike arrived in a timely manner.  The box had taken a minimal amount of abuse and was mostly intact.  Nothing inside was broken, scratched or bent.  The instructions were crystal clear.  It only took me about 30 minutes to have it up and running.  The hardware comes vacuum sealed onto a piece of cardboard and clearly labeled.  The hardware for step 1 is labeled step 1, etc.  I have never assembled anything with the ease in which this went together.  It is a solidly built piece of equipment.  I only tried it out for a few minutes, but it is quiet, pedals smoothly, and has a ton of features.Ok, now for the things I don't like, the list is small but worth noting.  The fan and digital display is not angled enough for you to get any benefit from the fan, nor can you read the display.  Only if you are very short and have to sit close to the screen can you read it with ease.  I am 5'10" and the fan does not adjust to blow on me.  I can just barely read the display from where I have to sit.  A book holder would have been nice.  That is it.  The things I like far outweigh the things I don't.  It comes with 10 pre-programmed routines, manual mode, timed trials, etc.  You can even input how many calories you want to burn and it will count down the calories instead of minutes.  I haven't used all the features, but so far I am thrilled to death with my purchase and despite some of the negative things about it, I would still recommend it to anyone looking for a comfortable way to exercise.10-15-06Ok, I've had this for a week now and I want to shout from the rooftops how comfortable and great it is.  I solved my problem of not being able to read the screen very well but taking a crow-bar and GENTLY prying up on the top edge of the metal plate that the read-out screen is attached to. Take the electronic screen off before doing this.  The plate bent up just enough that now I can read the screen just fine.  I still don't get much benefit from the fan, but the fan doesn't really blow hard enough anyway.  I have tried out the easiest program and it is amazing.  I can't begin to say enough about this bike.  If you truly hate exercising, this is the bike for you.  Schwinn has taken an activity some of us dread and has transformed it into something I don't mind doing.  I am using this bike along with the Weider Crossbow, another piece of equipment I can't rave enough about, as my total body workout.  I hope to be slimmer, trimmer and stronger 6-8 weeks from now.  Also, I want to mention again how quiet this bike is while operating.  When I used a treadmill, I had to either blast the television if I wanted to hear it, or use headphones, which were uncomfortable once I started sweating.  This bike is so quiet you can have the television or stereo at a normal volume.  If you are interested in an exercise bike that is comfortable and versatile, this is the bike for you</review_text>
My 3 month old was bored with his current play gym.  While at a friends house he fell in love with the activity star that this gym included.  I went home and ordered it right away.  We now carry the star wherever we go. I give it 4 instead of 5 because the other stuff is just as good as his old gym.</review_text>
I registered for this playmat not sure if our baby was going to like it, but when I received it, I thought it was bright and cheerful and the right size for our already cluttered living room!  When our son was 4 weeks old, he started showing signs of interest in bright objects so we put him on the mat and were really surprised with the results - he absolutely LOVES the mat!He especially loves the musical star (that can be moved around with the velcro straps) and watches as it lights up in different areas!  Now he is almost 6 weeks and it has become a calming and interesting place to be when he gets fussy- he will lay on his back and gaze at the mirror, lights on the star, and kick the birds and watch them move!  This mat is a must for baby registries and great for newborns to gain alertness.Another reviewer did not like the rabbit card, but it comes in a sleeve that will hold a 4x6 photo, so we printed out a photo (of my husband's college mascot, because it is bright colored) and put it in the sleeve.  You could also put a photo of mommy or daddy, grandparents or a pet, too.  Also, you can add other toys to the rings when the baby gets bored with the birds/bug/rattle.</review_text>
The activity gym is nice and bright and happy.  Its only shortcoming is that the mat is a bit thin, making it necessary to use a heavy blanket underneath if you're using it on hard floors/surfaces</review_text>
We enjoy all of the Baby Einstein products. This playmat has many toys. I even added extra links to make them easier for my daughter to see and reach. It is so colorful, too. It really seems to capture her attention. Our 2 year old loves to hear the music while her sister is playing on the mat. I think having this mat early on will help our baby make connections when she watches the Baby Einstein videos</review_text>
My 3 1/2 month old LOVES LOVES LOVES this playmat.  He's been rolling over since 11 weeks and I swear it's because of this mat and all there is to look at.  He loves the star and the red bird the most.  I highly recommend this to anyone looking for something to keep your baby happy and occupied</review_text>
Excellent product.  Keeps baby amused from newborn to six months when there is not much for the baby to do. It fascinates the baby but it does not overstimulate.</review_text>
This BILLY Blanks set is amazing. Did I say it was amazing? After giving birth in Feburary 13,2006, I am in great shape. I am actually developing a six pack! I am advanced and this workout is challenging. Don't be deceived this is not for the faint of heart. If you are one that whines this not your dvd. Billy Blanks has really taken taebo to the next level. I must warn you to count yourself Billy sometimes is off, however this dvd is like Isaid amazing.</review_text>
With the first workout, I was INSTANTLY toned, more muscular, more defined and I LOVED it!I have done all three of the DVDs included in this set a couple of times now, and I am ALWAYS looking forward to doing them again- I can't wait for the workout and the feeling my body gets after I've done them! :)I do wonder, though, will it really melt off the stubborn pudge from my hips/stomach?The answer is hidden somewhere, I think, in how "doable" the workouts are- you're neither exhausted/hurt nor left wanting do do more- so I suppose it's just enough to eventually get those results with regular use. Other people have written that muscle builds and fat melts so I will keep this up!*The cardio DVD is not included, but I found it awesome to use an elliptical machine or speed walking to substitute for cardio work, either before, after, or both, when I do a Tae Bo DVD. My body literally turned into a furnace and I could feel my metabolism was sky high!Just be patient, give your body rest days, and do as much as you can from each DVD. You'll be addicted too.....</review_text>
I love these workouts. They are very intense, and the results are almost immediate;however this series is not for beginners. The best part of these workouts is your left feeling it for at least a day.My only complaints with this series were the lack of attention Billy paid to the lower half of the body and the bands are sometimes cumbersome to use with certain moves.All in all this was a great purchase for me. I will probably purchase the new Bootcamp elite series</review_text>
Billy is great, full of energy and enthusiam.  I get great results from his workout much better than any other instructor. My family get great results from his workout.  His customer service rep were helpful.HOWEVER, I strongly, strongly recommend ordering your Taebo products through Amazon.  I've been doing business with Amazon many years and have placed over 150 orders.  I never, never once had any problems with my orders at Amazon.  When I had questions, it's amazing at not only how quick Amazon will reply but will give a long thorough and kind explanation.  Because they reply within a day and take so much time with the response, it shows they truly care for you and want to give you the best service possible.  I've never found customer service of this  very high and rare quality.In November of 2005, after ordering the Billy Bands from the official Billy Bank's website.  I was sent a package, without my permission from the company that contained Billy's energy formula supplements.  It was a 14 day delayed bill for 31.85.  I was upset this was sent without me knowing but here's the worse part.  I contacted customer service, a gentleman told me don't worry you haven't been billed just send us back the package and we'll credit you $5 into your account for the shipping, packaging, and mailing cost you pay out of your own pocket to have the items sent back.  Within a few days I send the product I never requested back.  Twice by phone and once by email from 3 different cust rep I was told I would receive a $5 credit to my bank account within 7 to 10 days.I was already upset about this matter but it wasn't that big of a concern.  However, about 2 weeks well over 10 days I never received the $5 credit to my account.  But there was a charge taken from their company without my permisson or authorization from my own personal bank account for $8.97 .  A few days later the $8.97 was put back into my account.When I contacted the company this is their reply:Thank you for your recent e-mail. We apologize for the inconvenience. Our records show that your vitamin shipment was on a 14 day delay billing cycle (I sent the item I never wanted back in 7 days not over the 14 day limit). This means that when the charges actually went through, you were only charged for a small portion of the amount that showed on the invoice (I kept the copy and nowhere on the invoice is this stated). You received a credit for the shipping and handling plus 5.00 dollars to ship it back too. This means, when the charge for the vitamins actually went through you were only charged for 8.97. This is also the refund that you have received, the amount paid (again since the item was sent back within 14 days I shouldn't have been charged and nowhere on the invoice is this stated that I would only be charged a small portion).So basically they sent me a product I never requested.  Told me they would give me some money to have the product sent back.  Took money from my bank account without me knowing and paid me back with my own money they stolen.To sum it up, do business with Amazon!</review_text>
Prior to getting this item, I read the reviews and they were love it or hate it.  Thankfully, I am one that loved it.  The workouts are HARD, but you can tell that you are doing wonderful things to your body</review_text>
High quality exercise/ equipment mat. Wipes off well and helps keep bike steady</review_text>
I got a few great chuckles out of this thing.  Just get's kinda grossweird using it over nad over again.  But a great one no matter</review_text>
it does what it promises, i nearly fell over when my boyfriend let this surprise for me.  he needed a little bit of tape in addition to the suction cups, but worth getting. can work well for keeping pets out of the toilet as well</review_text>
I thought this would be an actual toilet monster, and was happy to see such a low price. It is, however, made out of rubber, and can not actually eat people</review_text>
I own this cooler, circa 1968.  It is bombproof and looks like it survived a tour in Vietnam, but we haul this bad boy out each summer because it does the job.  The cam lock on the lid keeps it from flying free if jarred or jostled; this is a very good thing if you take it fishing and have your catch inside.  Construction is good enough to last near 40 years of use before considering a replacement.  It really will survive that many seasons of use, which is more than you can say for many fragile thermoplastic knockoffs.There are few camping or summertime essentials that can be universally adopted, but the Coleman steel cooler has to be one.  Bring it on your next outing, and even if you have boring cans of Diet Coke inside, people will stop to check it out.-Fred</review_text>
Good product.  Great deal for the price.  Based on prior reviews, I ordered the Medium size for my 100 lb. German Shepherd, and it fits great.  I put 2 water bottles in each pocket to help burn fat (she needs to lose some weight!)I'm going to order the Small size for my 70 lb. German Shepherd to help her burn some of her energy!  She wore the Medium size on our walk today and it help focus her (she tends to be all over the place).  The medium size works, but I think the small would be ideal</review_text>
Arrived quickly and was EXACTLY what we wanted... we arevery satisfied with the product and the process..</review_text>
I write a lot of reviews on books,but seldom write one on a product.However; I feel like breaking my trend by reviewing this lite.I,like I suppose,just about everyone else,keep looking for the lite that is right for all people,for all purposes.If It exists,I haven't seen it yet.The plain ordinary battery flashlight has remained essentially the same since I got my first as a kid,60 years ago. They often fail you when they are needed,batteries are expensive,but overall they serve a purpose. About 50 years ago ,a hand held magneto lite appeared.As long as you kept squeezing it,it gave a light comparable to a normal flashlght.It was similar to a lite sold for use on a bicycle,where it was powered by the turning of the wheel.However; as soon as the bicycle stopped ,the light went out.For some reason,they disappeared off the market.A few years ago,a new almost similar magneto lite appeared.The biggest difference is, it made a lot of noise when squeezed.They don't appear to have been very popular.This Faraday principle Lite has been made very popular due toTV ads, More because what they don't say than what they do say,many people are disappointed upon getting one.The ad flouts the idea that it can be seen for up to a mile.Sowhat!,we learned in the military, that a lit cigarette can be seen hundreds of yards away at night.So,if that's not you were looking for,it is meaningless to you.In fact,it is very poor at casting light on a suface more than a few feet away.For this purpose ,it can't begin to compete with a normal flashlight;and if that's what you want,forget it.As a matter of fact,those little LED keychain lites can do just as much;and can be picked up for a buck at the "Dollar Stores". They last for a couple of years,weigh next to nothing,and you'll always have one with you.I Leave them around the house  and they are handy to look for something in a dark spot,or for the occasional time you need to find a circuit breaker panel or find your way in a power failure.These lites are so weak you can't assume they will meet your expectations in a store,or from watching a TV ad.My advice is try and compare with a Key Chain lite,one might serve you as well as the other,at a huge difference in cost.</review_text>
As for the bad reviews: This is not a million candlepower spotlight.  It's not even as bright as your standard quality 2D-cell flashlight.  Yes, you do have to expend some energy charging it.  IT'S AN EMERGENCY FLASHLIGHT!As advertised, 1 1/2 minutes of shaking provides light that begins to fade out at 20 minutes, but lasts  up to 2 hours.  I've found it useful for up to an hour between charges.  Initial light output is similar to battery powered LED keychain lights.  Just enough to safely make your way from the house to the shed to haul out the generator, to change a tire, or to read a book on those nights the power fails.Living on the side of a mountain where we frequently lose power for days, this is a cheap insurance policy.  I will never find I have no batteries or a dead bulb.The only problem i have with this flashlight is the front lens is plastic and easily scratched, but that's minor - just use lens paper for cleaning if it needs it.</review_text>
Fantastic product--I am a group fitness instructor and I use this product everyday--I add a banana, peanut or cashew butter, plain yogurt, ice and water--this is in lieu of dinner--I don't get hungry and it really keeps my energy levels up</review_text>
I like this product for the great taste and I don't need a blender to mix it - a shaker cup is all you need so it is very easy to get ready quickly.  I've been using it for 2 weeks and have actually lost body fat so no complaints here (started at 14%, at 12% now)  Give it a try, that is really the only way to tell for your yourself.  It's easy enough to adjust how thick you want your shake to be, just add more water for a thinner drink.  2 scoops in 10oz of water is thin and fluid, my personal preference</review_text>
This is a really good product. Being a gym owner and trainer in Southern Calif. for over 20 years I've seen and used a few products and this one ranks near the top. Most of the fats are M.C.T.s and are used for energy, not to make it taste better! Protein NEEDS fat to be properly utilized by the body!The carbs and sugars are low, which make this a true LEAN GAINER. Keep your protein high ,your carbs moderate and get some good healthy fats like flax or fish oil and you've got the diet to grow some muscle with</review_text>
I didn't find any of the fabrication problems seen with other reviewers.  The rack seems well built and sturdy, and I don't see any real issues with it.  My only complaints would be the assembly instructions, which are pretty vague and require an inordinate amount of interpretation, and the fact that the hardware dimensions with the product don't really facilitate setting it up as they've illustrated.  Specifically, the bikes shown in the photos must be VERY small, in order to be both mounted on the bottom length of the rack.  Using the mounting holes on the top section (required if you've got two adult bikes) require staggering the brackets, as opposed to setting them on  a straight horizontal line.  It's just a bit confusing, and given the cost of the things I'm mounting on it, I don't want to have any confusion</review_text>
This pillow is small and compact. It is just the right size for traveling and camping and it stays fluffed through the night</review_text>
I have the small size pillow, mainly because I didn't realize it was a small when I bought it.  We recently went on a road trip/camping trip last week and this came in very handy.  While it is too small for me to use as a sleeping pillow at night, it is great for in the car or on a plane.  I kept falling asleep in the car and it was very comfy/.  You just have to give it a good 10-20 minutes to fluff up after you unwrap it, then it's nice and fluffy/comfy.  If you were going to get a camping pillow to use at night, I'd recommend that you spring for the larger one.  A bit pricy but worth it.</review_text>
I had Gastric Bypass surgery on Oct 06 so I've been through many protein drinks. This one is by far the best tasting I've had. Very smooth, mixes very easy and no after taste. You can't beat it..</review_text>
This trunk bag works SO well!  I commute by bike, and this bag is so easy on and off.  It holds all of my "stuff" and lunch besides.  Great design, roomier than it looks, and good looking besides-it's perfect</review_text>
The Go Diego Go 16-Inch Bike is a very well engineered and finished product that is made with high quality materials. The only problem that I had during DIY assembly was to obtain the allen hex driver key that is required to fix the steering handle bar. Manufacturer could include an allen hex driver key in the kit of accessory parts.</review_text>
I RECIEVED MY PRODUCT IN RECORD TIME AND I WAS VERY PLEASED THAT THE ASSEMBLY WAS QUICK AND SIMPLE JUST LIKE THE BOX SAID!!! I WAS SO PLEASED THAT I PURCHASED ANOTHER DIEGO BIKE AND A DORA BIKE!!</review_text>
It was so easy to assemble it.  Perfect for my son.... very nice</review_text>
This was a wonderful buy that my son just loves.  It's well built since he's a big boy and a little tough on things so he needs sturdy toys.  I would recommend this to other Diego fans!  The only thing missing is reflectors but those were easy to purchase.</review_text>
Very nice bike, especially at the sale price.It has a warning inside the box: This product contains products known in the state of california to cause cancer.Not sure what they are referring to. This is the second toy I see it on. Perhaps someone can shed some light</review_text>
The ramp was a litte smaller than anticipated, however it is great starter ramp.  Just the right size for my little man to practice his jumps with his bike, scooter and skateboard</review_text>
my son loves this ramp  its small enough to learn the tricks he wants to learn but not so small as to be easy to break.</review_text>
I'm using this with a mountain bike that has a standard "bolt and nut" (non-quick-release skewer) rear axle, and a slick tire on the rear wheel. It works quite well with this setup. It was easy to get the bike on the trainer and locked in place, and was fairly easy to adjust the resistance roller a little to the left to line it up with the bike's tire.The trainer is very quiet compared to my old "squirrel cage" fan-based trainer. It gives a fairly realistic road-resistance feel. It is very solid and stable, and I can get on and off the bike with confidence that everything won't go crashing over. I've only been using it for a few days, but so far, no leaks at all.My only complaint is that the clamp used to hook the resistance control level to the handlebars won't tighten down hard enough to keep the lever from slipping; as soon as I get the clamp almost tight enough, it "gives" a bit and unhooks completely. This might be partially due to my handlbar tube being a bit on the small size. The two included sizing shims help, but don't solve the problem. So, I have the clamp almost tight enough,  and the lever slips a bit when I push on it. This isn't a huge problem, as I can just grab the lever mechanism with one hand and the lever with the other and change the resistance.Other than that, it seems to be a very nice trainer for the price: quiet, adjustable, and stable</review_text>
I bought this for my son at two and a half years age, and even with the seat all the way down, his feet barely make the ground and he looks intimidated. He's too young. His big brother, age seven, thought it was a hoot, and wheeled around confidently, but he's too big. Quality and construction are excellent, assembly was easy. The orange wheelcovers come off so you can get at the valve stems to put air in the tires. We also have a Kettler trike and they're terrific, too.  Get the trike at age 2-3. Get this at age 3-4. Spoil them rotten</review_text>
I bought this for my almost two year old. He's not quite tall enough for it but will be soon. I read that it was supposed to make you ride a two wheeler without training wheels sooner. What happened is that my 5 year old wanted to try it. (He still was riding his bike with training wheels.) He and our neighbor's kids (4 year old twins) tried it for one whole day and then they ALL decided that they wanted their training wheels off the next day. We took them off and they have never looked back. It seemed to put the 'idea' in their head that they no longer needed the training wheels. Now they still play with it sometimes, but it usually sits in our garage waiting for my younger son. I am very glad I bought it, but I only gave it 4 stars as the seat is tricky to tighten and loosen, which is what you must do to raise and lower it. It would be great to have a quick-release instead. For the money, though, it is worth it</review_text>
Free strings... and perfect shape...power...i couldn't be betterHiroshi: mada mada dane</review_text>
You have to be bloody stupid to need a manual on how to light these, they are no different to normal matches except they are windproof.These matches do really work, the only other thing they compare to are turbo lighters</review_text>
This boken is perfect for learning how to handle a live blade. The size and weight, as well as the wrapping and guard, offer a feel for an actual katana. I was so excited when it showed up days ahead of schedule. I started practicing with it immediately. The color is darker than the pictures show, but it is a beautiful boken nonetheless</review_text>
this woked great for me...i ordered it and it even came ahead of sced...i go this and the black one and this was the beter of the two..i use it to spar with a friend and it holds up well...my only complaint is thet the finish comes off rather quickly but all in all it is a good practice weapon and i would sugest this to anyon</review_text>
I finally had a chance to wear this glove and it is truely a no numbness glove. My hand felt fine after 15 miles of riding. With my old gloves my hands would start bothering me after 1 mile of riding! You can't beat the price for these gloves either. I highly recommend these gloves</review_text>
They are not a magic bullet, but the gloves do largely deliver on their promise -- to reduce numbness in the hands due to pressure on the ulnar nerve while bike riding.  I am an adventure racer and ride a mountain bike on varied terrain for hours at a time.  I still get some numbness, but it is definitely reduced when wearing these gloves.  The gloves are otherwise similar to other bike gloves.  They are lightweight and cool (I live, train and race in Florida).</review_text>
Great Deal!!! Very pleased with the product and the quickness of delivery. Recommend to anyone</review_text>
I found this product ( Hydration pack)  to be every thing I read about it and I am very satisfied with it..</review_text>
One thing I really like is that there was no plastic or rubber taste on the first use.  It holds enough for long bike ride and was cold all the way to the end of the ride.  It feels good on your back too.  It helps in this Florida heat.Cons:  The mouth piece is hard to hold onto because of the 180 degree angle.  It would be easier to have a T mouth piece.  I will be looking for a replacement.</review_text>
Perfect to place on top of your sticky mat.  Soaks up the sweat and keeps from sliding.  Wash often or it will get really smelly!</review_text>
This is a great product.  I got it for a little extra traction during power yoga, and it was great for that.  It provides a little extra cushioning, and completely covers the mat.  I also use it during Bikram (hot) yoga instead of a towel, and it's great.  It stay nice and smooth because of the little nubbly things, and of course--the very best thing--it's machine washable.  I washed it seperately for awhile, because the directions said that the colors could run, but after a few weeks I started washing it with regular clothes and it's fine.  It's a pleasure to use</review_text>
After sweating and slipping in many a vinyasa class (even on a "non-slip" mat), a friend recommended this yoga towel.  This product has saved my yoga practice! It does take one or two classes to get used to, but once you do, you are off to non-slip yoga bliss.  Plus, the well-placed circle at the top of the mat gives you a visual to focus on to stay centered.  Thank you Yogitoes</review_text>
I bought this at the same time as a new mat and love it.  Even with the best skidless mat I tend to skid once I get sweaty palms.  So it solves that problem when I take class. I also teach and like to have two mats in a t shape when leading yoga.  This way I can use my mat on its own and cross the gym mat with the towel on top of it.  Voila, no mat with someone else's germs on it for me.If you want to be sanitary but not haul around your own mat, this is a perfect solution</review_text>
Finally found the answer to my "slippage" problem. What a difference it makes in my routine! My only regret is that I didn't purchase it months ago!</review_text>
I love it! The skidless yoga towel really works and I don't have to worry about keeping my yoga mat clean</review_text>
When it is too cold to ride  the trainer is perfect for your fix. I love my cycle-ops wind trainer because it allows me to get a good workout whenever it rains etc. It is relatively quite as well as being easy to fold up and put away. The bike fits easy with the built in skewers that lock perfectly without coming loose no matter how hard you hammer the pedals. You will feel confident  locked in because it is very stable. The video is a little cheesy and I only looked at mine once or twice when I bought it. The girl and guy are just too darned happy, meanwhile I'm going through pain and grimacing trying to keep up with them. If you are into spinning you can spin away and never leave the comfort of your home. All in all it is a good accessory to have if you are a dedicated cyclist</review_text>
I purchased this for my husband and he loves it. I had been searching for one for some time. This one was so reasonably priced. It appears to be well-made and exactly what he was wanting.</review_text>
Bought this for the girlfriend so she can practice her Karate at home.  She loves it!  Great quality, great deal</review_text>
We've had this for about 2 years now and it's still working just great.  I am truly amazed at how much better I feel after having a good stretch and it's been very helpful for chronic backpain</review_text>
Like it, love it and hate it.... I have had some of the best work outs on this table and then again, some of the worst... Be careful if you have ankle, knee or hip problems, this will not help you, but it does help your back and doing inverted sit ups, it certainly will give you one heck of a good work out</review_text>
top notch quality, well made, smooth movement, actually helps with tight back muscles,back pain, plus i use it as a part of my meditation since it's so relaxing</review_text>
This is strong, stable, and has all the features of tables three times its price.  It helps relieve my back pain.  I think it will help even more as I use it more</review_text>
I've had this inversion table now for about a month.  Weird getting used to, but immediately soothing, rocking back and forth.  I am now addicted and love it.  It was a subtle change, but definitely a positive one.  My neck and shoulders feel great and I am sleeping better.  I would recommend inversion to anyone.  The shipping was fast.  There was some assembly but if you read the instructions and not be rushed to put it together, if I could do it, anyone can do it.  Happy inverting!</review_text>
Very low price, well below retail for this table and far below competitors' prices.  Free shipping.  Surprisingly high quality, well built.  I liked it so well, I bought a second one for my work.  I get instant relief from my backaches and long-term relief as well.  I removed the safety devices that kept the table from being adjusted for the various pivot positions.  It required wrenches and some disassembly to make the adjustments.  A call to the manufacturer revealed these items were add-ons due to a claim of an injury.  I cannot see how such an accident can happen if the instructions are even haphazardly followed.  Instructions might be more clear on setting the foot bar to the appropriate position, as well as the ankle/instep pad adjustment.  However, trial and error will resolve this to each person's liking.  Again, the tinker-toy wrenches are needed to adjust the foot bar.  The wrenches give out after about three to four uses.  Get some real wrenches to keep with the table.  Also, it is very important to view the video that accompanies the table.  In the video, the pivot adjustment is discussed and it is obvious the safety devices discussed above are not present on the machine used in the video</review_text>
This inversion table is a decent piece of equipment.  It is sturdy, not hard to assemble and relatively inexpensive compared to similar units.It does feel good on your back, but don't expect to hang upside down very long, it will take some time to get used to the blood rushing to your head which will cut short the time your back has to feel decompressed or stretched out....whatever term you want to use.Some reviewers mentioned the ankle brackets as being uncomfortable; I didn't find them too bad, mostly it will take some time to get used to being held upside down by your ankles.  If you are kind of frail in the bones, then I could see this being a problem because you are holding your body weight by your ankles.While it is not designed to go totally vertical, you can get there by walking your hands back on the floor. The instructions say it will lock into place if you go vertical, but I haven't found that to be true, maybe other peoples do but mine doesn't.All in all, if you are really sure you want an inversion table and don't want to invest a lot of money into it, then this table will fit your needs.One recommendation: If you can,... try using an inversion table of a friends or at a store a couple times to make sure this is something you will really use.</review_text>
Recommended to me by my trainer at the gym to improve my balance (I'm in my late 50's) and have enjoyed it tremendously.  Takes a while to get the hang of it; great results</review_text>
This is your basic wiffle bat.  Good deal for the price</review_text>
This is the classic wiffle bat, fluorescent yellow and 32 inches long.  A lot of people will try to sell you a black-and-white bat, or a red bat that flares out at the end.  You must decline these bats, politely but firmly.  The wiffle bat has stood the test of time, and will continue to do so long after the imitators are gone.Most people know that the wiffle bat is ideal for hitting the aptly-named wiffle ball, but few newcomers know about the bonus features:1)  If your opponent throws a hanging curveball and you make solid contact, the ball will slide down the bat even as you are hitting it.  The result will be a monstrous home run that makes a whistling sound as it disappears into your cranky neighbor's yard.2)  The lower part of the wiffle bat has a textured grip.  Nice.3)  The base of the bat has a little hole in it that, when the bat is waved around, makes a cool, low-pitched whistle not unlike the hum of a light saber.Highly recommended for anyone with a ball, a yard, and a friend</review_text>
We purchased this racket for my daughter and she loves it. She loves the color and she feels like a real tennis champion learning to play tennis with it!!!. The quality and the brand are just excellent</review_text>
Never thought I'd own a hyd pack, but now I don't know what I'd do without one.  This company offers free lifetime tip replacement.  Previous reviews are accurate-- no initial taste or odor.  Take proper care for long periods of storage (rinse with lemon juice or baking soda) and you'll enjoy a long life out of this.  Zippered pocket is nice, too</review_text>
I found this product ( Hydration pack)  to be every thing I read about it and I am very satisfied with it..</review_text>
Perfect item desired, super easy to install, and great price and delivery</review_text>
My three month old loves it!  I first put it in his crib at 2 1/2 months and his face lit up and he immediately reached for it.  I usually hit the smiley face which plays a melody and he spins the two wheels and stares at himmself in the mirror.  He used to fuss when he woke up and could not reach it but now he can move over to it himself.  He can play with this for up to half hour before wanting to move on to another distraction.  There are two things I wish it had - a remote so I don't to continuously reach in to hit the smiley face (though this is meant for the baby to activate he is still not physically able to do this himself) and changing melodies (it plays the same melody over and over) and although my son does not mind, it can drive a parent up a wall.   I also love the fact that it is two-sided toy and will grow with him. All in all a great item, I highly recommend</review_text>
I own both this trail seat and the camp seat.  The camp seat inflates twice as thick, so it offers more of a cushioned feel.  Both are great in that you can let the air out, roll up the cushion, and then let it self-inflate when you're ready to sit</review_text>
Enough said ... this was light with a small but secure grip and big head, perfect for her first lessons</review_text>
This home plate solid and of good quality to last many years of backyard baseball games</review_text>
My 1 year old niece loved it.  The lowest height is perfect for small children and we'll adjust it as she grows.  The bright colors really caught her attention and the back support on the seat makes it safer for small children.</review_text>
Bought this trike for my 2 year old granddaughter for Christmas.  She loves Dora but this trike with its low profile looked especially safe. It has lived up to our expectation.  It does not tip over, and is easy for her to climb onto without assistance.  Only problem was Dora picture for the front of the bike did not have great attachments and is now in the toy box :</review_text>
it's hard to find a tricycle with rubber treads on the wheels.  most trikes and big wheels have hard plastic wheels which slip on the concrete when the kid pedals...i liked this one, it was easy to put together, except for the front decorative plate with Dora on it, but it wasn't necessary and my daughter doesn't know who Dora is so i just didn't put it on...the trike is small enough for a really petite or young child, which is why i bought it.  we had a bigger trike (the Radio Flyer) which was no where near small enough for our 2 year old...my only complaint is that the bar that the seat is attached to and connects to the rear axle is just a little bit loose-fitting but it doesn't seem to be causing a problem.  very good trike overall</review_text>
I am  a begining golfer. These clubs are fine for my purpose. so far it has been great</review_text>
Got them last week and have played 3 games and been to the driving range for a total of 6 hours.  No problems with them at all, they feel great and play well.  I put them through a few very rough swings to the ground and no bends or breaks.  VERY solid.  Great clubs</review_text>
I was very impressed the free shipping'''The time it took to get to me'''And the quality i got for the best price on the internet'''This is the best shopping network in the whole entire internet 'Honestly''''</review_text>
I bought this set because I was just getting into golf, looking for something inexpensive, and that looked OK.  Eight rounds of golf later (and lots of time at the range) I'm still very happy with this set.  I gave this a 4 because I like my set, but there are some things that I don't like.It comes with a pretty good bag.  I carry my bag when I play.  I don't use both straps because I make a lot of noise that way, but it's comfortable enough on my shoulders just using one.  The stand is a great feature.  It also has a good number of pockets.  The bag and head covers are a little too blue and some of the plastic makes it look cheap to me, but nothing has torn yet.The woods are cool looking and the hybrid gets a lot of attention.  The hybrid can be used off the tee, on the fairway, in the rough, and to chip (so, you can avoid the irons until you get some practice with them).  I'm glad that the woods came with head covers or I would have scratched them all up by now.It has just one long iron (4) - the rest are mids and shorts.  I think that's good because I've seen some sets that come with a 3 instead of a hybrid.  The long irons are pretty hard for me to use; I think that's true for most beginners.I hate the putter.  It handles poorly and it's cheap looking.  They may have changed the putter on later sets.  It will be the first club I replace.</review_text>
OK, I should first say that I'm not a great golfer.  I started playing a few weeks ago, and bought these online because they looked like a great deal.  A customer of mine invited me out to a golf outting, and the club rental fee on the course was more than I wanted to pay, and being that I'd most likely be doing this again (it's not really about the game, is it now?) I figured these would pay for themselves in 2 or 3 outtings.I'm not a great golfer, I don't know much about clubs.  But, these seemed to swing ok, my buddies were kind of impressed considering what I paid, and I didn't do too badly.  Nothing came broken, nothing broke on the course, the drivers had decent range, the irons did they're job.  If you're tall like I am, you'll find the irons a little short and will need to get the grips extended.  I'm 6' 4".   I'll keep these until my game deems me worthy of something nicer</review_text>
If you suffer from chronic back pain, this inversion table is your solution.  It's extremely sturdy and perfectly engineered</review_text>
Brought this table based on price (Amazon's was by far the best) and ratings.  The table was easy to assemble, operate and adjust.  The materials are very high quality, which means that it should last your lifetime under normal conditions.The only problem encountered was with the ankle anchoring system.  The ratchet works fine but it puts excessive pressure on my achilles tendon and hanging becomes increasingly uncomfortable as time passes.  Hanging for more than 4-5 minutes actually becomes painful.  As a powerlifter, there is more mass packed onto my frame than the average person.  To be fair, this may be part of the problem?!?  My solution has been to add additional wrapping around the ankles.Other than the anchoring, this is a great product that should last forever</review_text>
I purchased this item for my husband who is working out of town.  He has used inversion tables for years, and even has two older models.  He has bad back problems, and when he goes out of town to work ( he works construction as a heavy equipment operator ), his back gets even worse.  I had this inversion table sent to where he was, and he can do nothing but rave about it.  It was easy to put together, easy to take apart, and EASY to use!  I'm very impressed, especially for the price!  KM</review_text>
This was purchased as an Xmas present for my wife.  She uses it daily and claims it has helped with her chronic back pain.  The table is excellently made.  It is very sturdy!  The design is well-engineered.  It is perfectly balanced when set up to the correct body height.  A very good buy</review_text>
I had the opportunity to try a table with telescoping ankle system for several weeks before I bought this.  It was enough to let me know inversion tables could do wonders for my back.  But the ankle restraints were uncomfortable and I had to put on shoes every time I used the table.I'm so glad I paid for the ankle ratchet system on this lifegear.  So much more comfortable and easy to use.  The rest of the table was what I expected: solid and well designed.  Lifegear, my back thanks you</review_text>
My husband and myself have suffered back pain for years. We've made multiple trips to the chiropractor over the years in search of releif, and would get it if only temporarily. I knew there were inversion tables out there somewhere (cannot find in stores out here), so one day I searched on Amazon and low and behold Amazon came through for me again. I love this store!! I admit, I'm an Amazon junkie!!I had purchased this inversion table as a Christmas gift for my husband. He was very excited to get it. It didn't take long to set it up and in no time we were using it and trying it out. We could feel some instant releif on the 1st day!It releases the tension and pressure in your vertebrae and adjusts your back. After a really stressful day it's relaxing to get on it for a few minutes to feel the stress in your back just go away. If you have a desk job and sit all day, that compresses your vertebrae and this releases that compression.The padding in the ankle area is comfortable. Unless you have a bad ankle, it makes it more comfortable to hang upside down. And it adjusts to different heights pretty easily, so everyone in the family can benifit from it's use.It's hard to use when you have a bad head cold and your congested-it's hard to breathe when your standing upright, let alone hanging upside down. But that is not the fault of the machine. I just couldn't use if for a few weeks due to a nasty head cold, and my back suffered as a result of it.As a result of getting this inversion table, we've made fewer visits to our chiropractor, who does advocate the use of inversion tables. You do need to be careful and as with any other piece of equipment you bring home and use, you need to follow all directions and consult with your doctor first. Your heath and safety is your #1 priority-you do not need to jepordize it.</review_text>
Great unit....solid, easy to assemble and easy to use.  Great Price plus free shipping</review_text>
After reading many reviews and doing price comparisions I settled on this product. I got fast shipping as always. This table for the money is well worth the purchase price. I am using this table to help stablize a bulging disk in my lower back. The table was easy to asemble and operate. I am sure I will get many years of use from it because of how well it is made. I would recommend this table to those who consider price to value.Thank</review_text>
My daughter got these roller skates for a present.  And we have to go skating more often than before.  She loves them, she likes the pink wheels & that their white, she feels very girly.  We went from the barbie skates that she was having a little hard time with and when she put these on she was rolling like a pro.  I'm not sure what it is but she is actually rolling instead of walking, still falls some, but I believe that takes a lot of time before that stops.</review_text>
After searching every store in a 6 town radius, we found them on Amazon.the kids love them</review_text>
The lanyards and whistles were purchased for a Christmas gift which was well received.Thank you</review_text>
Your kids will be waiting for their turns to use it</review_text>
The twist board was exactly what I expected everything was shipped and received on time</review_text>
Easy to install.  Easy to adjust angle.  Stays in place.  Clear view of road behind cyclist.</review_text>
The pink color of this bag is not the same shade as the pink 1/4" Extra Thick Deluxe High Density yoga mat.  It looks pink/purple, yet the mat is hot pink.  However, it fits the mat very nicely.  Also, it's very light weight, and it's very easy to fold up when not in used.  Even though it has no extra pockets for cell phone stuff, I think it's better than canvas bags which is quite heavy. I bought this bag and the mat at the same time, so the shipping rate was not too bad.  Of course, it would have been better if it was cheaper</review_text>
I wish the shipping wasn't over half the price of the item but, the service and item are very nice for the money. If you want to pay more for a more comfy or longer strap so be it. Otherwise, this is the best deal I've seen anywhere. And I researched thouroughly on and off line</review_text>
This just arrived and appears to be a nice quality mat - I'm excited</review_text>
I would normally wear totes from abercrombie or hollister. When I saw the black crazy dots I thought it looked really cool! This is the best backpack I have ever found and I wish that I figured that out a long time ago. Bit you know what they say it is better late then never finding that out. Overall JanSport mad another great, durable, and cute backpace. I reccomend it for anyone that needs a new, stylish backpack</review_text>
I always liked JanSport bags for their durability.  I bought one for my husband 5 years ago.  He uses it to go back and forth from work, to rock concerts and when we go rock climbing.</review_text>
I ordered this backpack as a temporary solution. I thought it was cheap ($20 item, around $10 shipping), but now I realize it isn't.Maybe I will start with the negative aspect of the product: Too simple, only one big and one small compartments, with the small one being the front pocket. In addition, The straps are small. I am big, but I see many larger people than me around and to be honest if you are aroun XL or XXL size it would be quite uneasy to put the backpack over a jacket as its straps are simply too short.The good part: it looks durable, does the business, and now I will keep it as a spare since I now have another one(Not JanSport:) but sill, the price somehow appears to be alittle too much for me. For the same amount I gave I could find a real nice Adidas or Nike (original ones:) back in my country</review_text>
This is the best. I have always used Jansport backpacks they last forever</review_text>
This is a great backpack it has plenty of space for all my stuff</review_text>
I bought this pack for hiking. I find all JanSport products to be of good quality. I don't like lots of "bells & whistles" on a day pack and this one is pretty basic. It is a decent size to allow me to carry all my necessities and some extras but not so big to tempt me into over-packing.A larger pack would be preferable for a winter hike to carry bulkier items. This pack is fully functional and if it lives up to previous Jansport packs I've owned, then it will be around for some years to com.</review_text>
The backpack was very good, however, it was packed in a box that was wayyyy to big and i have to incurred additional charges since it was shipped out of the US to the Caribbean. I will really like it if you guys can send make your packages much smaller. ThanksRemo</review_text>
This is a nice looking, sturdy back pack for most elementary school children. The only drawback is, it's a bit small.I bought it for my middle school son. He loved it, but could not fit all of his books and school supplies in it. My fourth-grader, who is notorious for tearing up back-packs, uses it every day. It's a perfect fit for him. It is holding up quite well</review_text>
The pump that came with the ball was easy to use, and I was shocked at how quickly I was able to blow up the ball with it.  Not saying it didn't hurt my arm, but I'm quite out of shape - hence the fitness ball!  It really just took a few minutes, and it was blown up.  I was a little confused at first about how to fit the pump into the hole, but once I got that figured out, it went very smoothly.The ball itself is very easy to use, and it works really well.The "fitness guide" that it comes with is nothing more than a small piece of paper with three or four exercises drawn out.  I was thinking it was going to be a DVD or something.  For $15 though, I can't complain about that.I think it's completely worth the $15 I paid for it.</review_text>
I've had this exact exercise ball for at least 2 years. My mother, brother, and myself all use it. I am a 200 pound gym rat and I can tell you, this is the best ab tool you'll ever need. My brother is 250+ pounds and the ball has never popped/leaked. I am actually purchasing another one today because my brother is moving out and wants one for X-Mas.Just put on the TV and do crunches during your favorite shows</review_text>
I like this item. I got the one with the lock because of the ease of carring the lock.  I use a chain with the lock to secure the whole bike.  I had a problem with the reflector breaking off.  I called the company and I had a replacement within a week.  Great Service!!!I use this rack with both the topeak bag and basketI love the versitility.  Great purchas</review_text>
These gloves are of a good quality, though have a strong smell (leather dye, I assume).  I am using them almost daily, and they cusion palms and fingers nicely.  The velcro on the back is slightly uncomfortable, probably due to the sie being too small.  I ordered gloves in medium size, but they are too small for my relatively small hands.  If you think you need medium, you, probably, should order large.  I am giving 4 stars for the size issue, but the quality and price combination is very good</review_text>
These are the best pair of weightlifting gloves I have owned. They last forever, and do not tear. Also great for batting and biking</review_text>
These bases are solid and of good quality to last many years of backyard baseball games</review_text>
I bought this carrier to carry my MTB. Later my 5-year old son joined me with his 20-inch BMX bike. Then my wife and my 4-year old daughter wanted to come with us too. So I bought the 4-bike adopter. Now we are very happy with the complete set-up. It is very easy to use and I could store it in the back of my mini van. The only area I see that can be improved is the finish</review_text>
Pros:- Fits any bike, no crossbar adapter needed for Y frames- Folds up nicely for storage- Easy to load/unload.  30 seconds to hook the rack into the hitch, 30 seconds to load a bike on the rack.- can't beat the price- optional extension (sold separately) allows for carrying-up to 4 bikes- light.  I can carry the rack in one hand.- low price.  Similar Thule and Yakima racks are nearly 3 times the price.Cons:- the rack does not extend out far enough (at least on my Hyundai Tucson SUV).  When mounted, my bike's handle bars and pedals come within 2 inches of my back door.  I'm worried the pedal could scratch my vehicle's paint.  I usually put a sock over the pedal just to be safe.- the hooks can be hard to adjust because the release levers are small and tend to stick.  Squeezing the lever can be painful on your finger.- the rack has several inches of sway.  perhaps a hitch stabilizer would fix this.- i found the assembly a little difficult.  luckily you only do this once.</review_text>
Bike rack was very simple to put together and with a full suspension bike you can adjust the wheel holders to fit and holder ratchets down very tight to hold bike very good</review_text>
I really love this bike rack!!   It is so easy to load bikes and they ride with no swaying</review_text>
All though I have not used the bike rack as yet I have put it together which was very simple to do. This was exactly what I was looking for as I travel in my motor home and needed to have a bike tack that I could transport my new Jeep bike with out taking it apart.</review_text>
This is outstanding for my use.  I have a SWB recumbent bike as well as a road bike and both fit the system very well.  Easy to assemble and adjust.  Exactly what I was looking for</review_text>
I spent some time searching for a bike carrier for my SUV trailer hitch.  I selected the Swagman based upon the reviews posted here on Amazon.  I have been very pleased with this unit.  It is very easy to put on and take off.  The bike loads easily.  It probably takes me 30 seconds to get the carrier on the car and 15 seconds to load the bike.  No hassel at all</review_text>
Very impressed with the rack set up and ease of use.  The description does not do this bike rack justice.  Very functional and easy to mount the bikes on even if they are odd frame shapes or sizes.  They ride very securely and the rack has very little wiggle with no noise.  Center arm moves out of the way to open the tailgate (if no bike is attached).  Arms that hold the bike ratchet down and lock until a clip is pressed to release them.  I love it, money well spent.</review_text>
Don't spend the money on the bearings without buying the lube -- squirt some in and notice an immediate difference</review_text>
I really like the look and feel of it. It has a really good 'heft' to it and feels like it is build like a battleship. If you threw it at somebodys head it would leave a dent, unlike the cheap plastic ones out there. The large display is very easy to read. The buttons are very positive to use and have a nice 'click' to them. It looks like the old fashioned mechanical stopwatches, but is only a third the price. 4 out of 5 because I wish it had a stand-by mode (it is always on) and Emerson do not seem to have a website, and I have lost the original manual and want to reset the default count-down time to something else. Guess I will just have to sit and play with button combinations for 20 minutes or so ...</review_text>
This stopwatch actually stops time, the way you would expect a stop watch to.  So all in all, stopping time, good.  A watch that helps you do it, even better</review_text>
The sword I purchased isn't the sharpest,But nothing a sharper couldn't fix. The item is good of quailty</review_text>
I purchased the "26" Ninja Sword with Sheath Sharp Stainless Steel Blade" on march 8 2007, and the service from Defenderblades was excellent, and the sword was good quality. In face i was impressed how nice the sword was.</review_text>
It is very nice, and everything about it is great, down to the pleather lined sheath, only fault is the blade, it isn't very sharp, but a knife sharpener could fix that in no time</review_text>
I've been riding wooden boards for over 2 years now. I saw this board for sale and thought it was way too cheap for a full fiberglass/foam board - but I decided to take a risk and give it a try. It's a major upgrade from my wooden boards. With this, I can waveskim or sandride. It's very light weighing only 5 lbs, has a mild rocker, and comes with a limited lifetime warranty. It's not going to perform as well as $200 - $300 namebrand boards like Victoria, Exile, Zap, etc.; but for the price I paid I'm very happy</review_text>
This is one of the best racquets I have played with. I am jsut a part time player who plays tennins for a past time and this racquet has lived up to the expectations....</review_text>
this is really a very good bat...it has very good control...I tried couple of others but this one is the best of all</review_text>
I am very satisfied with the quality and also supply chain management. Thanks</review_text>
The best racquet i have tried in years. Excellent groundstrokes and volleys, and true, no more elbow problems. Highly recomended for intermidiate to advanced players for all court position</review_text>
This is a very great racquet.  I always had tennis-elbow problem.  Not this one.  Not sure whether it has anything to do with the advertised nano technology but the frame has better feedback and control than most of the popular racquets that I have tried.  More power even with slow or medium stroke.  The look is also great.  Highly recommended</review_text>
Love the knife, it's just a little too large to carry in my pocket on a regular basis.  I returned it and bought the Chive..it's perfect</review_text>
Like the Chive, this knife is a nice small package that's deceptively stabby. Sure, it looks innocent, but how much of that blade do you want in your eye? Hypothetically speaking, of course. I would never indicate that you should stab people with this knife. Never ever.The high points are the sleek design, flawless assisted opening, and light weight. I have problems with thumb studs on assisted opening knives, so I am very pleased that this has an index opening. For the safety-conscious, there is a safety lock to keep the blade from opening in your pants. Not that it will, but just in case I guess.The Leek is a perfect knife for people with small hands; that i's assisted opening is a definite bonus. Too many assisted opening knives are too bulky for my hand, or too powerful when it snaps open (Kershaw Tactical Blur, for example). The Leek firmly snaps into place without "recoil" and is light and small enough for people with small hands to easily use. But don't be fooled by its innocent appearance. This knife can be a deadly little package and should not be underestimated</review_text>
I bought this for my boyfriend as an exact replacement knife. He had lost the original doing god knows what. :)He loves it, it's not too big but not too small, securely clips on your pocket and is so sharp its down right scary but I guess that's why it's a men's knife. Opens quickly and the serrated part is a nice addition.</review_text>
Maintains a decent edge, the opening/lock/closing mechanism is simple and smooth. The color is as intense as seen in the pic, and pretty resistant to wear. In general, happy with the knife</review_text>
I've had this knife and their rainbow leak model for few years. All I wanted was a thin, small and light knife and I got it. The blade material is hard enough to stay sharp for a while, soft enough to easily sharpen but not brittle like a ceramic or carbon steel knife for example. I have had the vary tip break a couple times but it's because I was doing something foolish with it (like using it as a throwing knife *wink wink* ;) ). It's not the best, it's not the worst but can compete with ether, witch is the best in my opinion. Shortly after I bought it the speed safe spring broke, eehhh who cares it opens fine without. It's vary well made it can take all of my fat butts weight easily when laying sideways on a hard surface. It's vary thin profile is comfortable and I sometimes can't tell if I have it with me or not. It has what looks like brass or copper washers/bushings instead of cheap thin steel/plastic ones (means no binding up, even when in need of oil). The frame lock is far stronger than a line lock and best of all it deforms and wares much slower meaning my knife will stay ridged when opened for a long time.My favorite thing about it is the fact you can position the clip henge up or down. I chose henge down so it's ready to open the second it comes out of my pocket.If you want nice quality and availability for the price, kershaw is worth looking at</review_text>
I'm not a huge outdoorsman but wanted a nice everyday pocket knife.  The Kershaw's Leek fits the bill.  I love the size, long enough to get your whole hand envolved with the task yet small enough to have clipped to your pocket and forget its there.I was planning on taking the clip off and just letting the knife "float" in my pocket but fell in love with the clip.  The only thing better than light weight in your pocket is no weight in your pocket.I find that the knife is well designed and I really like the Speed Safe opening action.  It has a solid "click" that lets you know that the knife is in a locked position.  Super sharp and the perfect drop point blade.</review_text>
The knife is sleek and has a great profile. I love the speedsafe function on it. The blade lock is a bit stiff, but I suppose that's just so it doesn't slide open on accident</review_text>
I purchased this knife at a gun & knife show three years ago and have carried it everyday since.  I've owned ($60.00) Spyderco and ($150.00) Benchmade (Automatic) knives, but this Stainless Leek model is slimmer, quicker to draw and has a better clip than both of these knives.  Because of the unique spring action mechanism, many think it's an "automatic" knife.  My only recommendation is to occasionally lubricate/clean the mechanism to keep the action quick.  I did have to tighen the allen screw to keep the safety from slipping "on" in my pocket.  I will be ordering a second one at this price.  This is a very well designed, well made pocket knife</review_text>
This product is very very nice. It came quite sharp, I figured it was dull, so I brushed it up against my skin lightly just to see, and I cut myself on accident. So, it's quite sharp. The sword is smaller than I thought it would be though. Width wise, I mean the bladed part is about an inch and a half in width, and like the titles says, the sword is 18" long. That's less than 2 feet, for you people that aren't that great at converting measurments. Anyway, the sword seems very durable, and the LED light is quite bright. The only problem is, is that the screws were loose on the light when I got it out of the package, and it was wobbling around and wouldn't stay in place. But a screwdriver fixed that in no time. I was shippeda black sword, actually, not a silver one. But that's a plus for me because I love black swords. the handle of the sword is wrapped in a green material, not black like the silver one. All in all, this is a very nice blade. I recommend it to anyone who collects different types of swords (and anyone who is looking for a nice weapon to keep under their pillow at night, especially since it has the LED light attatchment</review_text>
This is a great little sword. It is very sharp and the LED light is bright. I keep this sword next to my pillow in case of emergency or bad dreams. Good product at a low price. How can they sell it at 5 bucks, c'mon the LED light is probably half the price already. LOL</review_text>
This product along with all the products from X-BOWS are a very high quality.  The company overall makes there money fairly and the way money should be made.  Selling at very very cheap prices for extremely high quality products.  This particular sword is very sharp.  It comes with a cool light and sheath.  Its very sturdy and is stainless metal.  Overall in terms of cost, delivery, and quality, I give it like 18 out of 5.  If you like playing with swords like me, then X-BOWS is definitly the company you want to buy from.  There an awsome company that makes awsome swords</review_text>
The one I ordered seemed to be black so its a plus for me since I like black knives...I guess I cant really call it a knife or a sword it would stack up more as a small hunting machete. Very well build and light but strong.recomend it for camping</review_text>
This 5/8" mat is a pretty color and very comfortable but a bit heavy and bulky to carry.  I would recommend a mat no thicker than 1/4" to take to the gym</review_text>
I love this mat.  Because of it's thickness, it really helps to give me the support that I need to enjoy yoga poses and to say in the pose without feeling as if I'm on a hard floor!  It would be nice if it was available in more colors other than red</review_text>
I ordered this mat when I started a morning exercise class that includes yoga.  I like the size, but especially the thickness.  From past experience, I know how uncomfortable it can be doing sit-ups without sufficient padding.  This mat has plenty!  I couldn't be more satisfied</review_text>
I bought this mat for my wofe who is very petite. It is perfect for her. She does not feel the floor and can do all of her exercises. Very pleased with i</review_text>
This mat is so soft and comfortable.  The price is great and I highly recommend it</review_text>
This mat is great -- it's got nice padding and is very long.  Because it is long, it would work great for tall people and/or larger men.  Folds up well and stores well -- wonderful</review_text>
I use on a basement floor which is concrete, but there is carpet over padding. Really makes a difference using this mat. Very comfortable</review_text>
This putting mat is a winner. My three guys have been using it nonstop since I gave it to them on Christmas day, and it still looks like new...no curling edges or signs or wear yet. They are serious golfers and they give this a big thumbs up. They swear it has helped them perfect their shots</review_text>
I was expecting a roll of astro turf, but this turned out to be a shorter, thick felt kind of surface. The mat has three holes at one end and the "sand trap" "water hazard" and hole are actually pictures printed on the inside flap of the box that the mat comes in, you pop them out and wedge them into the foam. Not sure what I was expecting for 16.99, but I guess, aside from looking a little cheap, this will work</review_text>
Learning coach including in the Suunto T4 with pc-pod and foot pod reveal running strength is adequate or not.One of the impressive point is the coaching is not limitted to the data inputted into initial setting. The coaching is a self-learning teacher living in the watch.Of course, for a speciallist, there is no need to learn running strength for health promotion or improve his body.As to me who has not enough knowledge and experience, very usuful guide which is shown in the watch windows and PC-software</review_text>
I was a bit hesitate to purchase the marathon pack, I felt it was a bit more than I needed, but after utilizing all the accessories I deemed it the best training tool ever.  It is the simplest way to track overall all performance, effort, and training effect.  The Suunto marathon pack provides more than just a watch to keep track of laps, but if you want it to, it will also be a little coach letting you know to speed up, slow down, and relax.  If you are just looking for a watch this is not for you, but if you want the versatility of a complete training tool, partner, and coach, I suggest you get one yourself</review_text>
My daughter loves it to bits, and I love that's it's strong enough. I especially love the price I paid</review_text>
Very good product, especially for the price (Amazon had the lowest online price I could find).  Product delivers all advertised functionality, hip color scheme and comfortable shoulder straps.  Zippers can be a bit difficult when particularly when backpack is cinched</review_text>
My 8 yr old loves it!  Have had no problems with it (except it does take quite awhile to fill w/ the little manual pump)</review_text>
Good quality cooler at a good price, i am very happy with i</review_text>
Keeps food/drinks cold and ice did not melt during the 12 - 14 hrs we used it daily on a trip. Good capacity, sturdy construction with good handles. Only issue is that it is a bit hard to open, but perhaps the snug fit is what helps it work so well. I think it is a good product at a good price</review_text>
Easy to inflate and our guests have commented on how comfortable the air bed is - even better than our sofa bed.Very happy with this purchase</review_text>
I was skeptical at first but upon reading Empyreal's review I went ahead and bought it.  It provides a surprisingly comfortable surface and a great nights sleep.  I agree with Empyreal now and dont see the need for buying an actual bed and matress for quite some time.Oh, and maybe it was just me but I didnt realize this item required batteries.  The inflator requires 4 D batteries</review_text>
The mattress itself is fine, when i woke up on it, it had deflated some. I dont know if thats how the majority of air mattresses are, but it did do that. The infaltor works alright...id rate it a 4/10. I dont like that its battery operated</review_text>
I've had this unit for a couple of months now, w/o any complaints except for this one. The nozzle's allow for quite a bit of air volume leakage when you remove them & try to close off the valve. This is true with all three nozzles. The inflator (included) isn't really strong enough to "over-inflate" to allow for this air loss, so the mattress never seems fully inflated to me.As far as quality goes, this is a great made air mattress. Strong seams all around. The cover is almost like felt, and is textured as well. It feels good even w/o any covers on it. The corners tend to fold over when I lay next to them, but that goes back to the inflation problem IMO. I weigh 165, so my weight shouldn't be the cause..</review_text>
actually i had some problem for abt one week when i bought the air bed,the air was leaking,i thought of returning the product to the amazon,since i used it for two weeks i dint feel like returning.after the second week the air stopped leaking,suprisingly,now i just fill the air once in a week.i feel the air is great.problem with the air bed is that u get the d.c pump(u have to fit the battries) u dont get a a/c pump.....rest all things is fine about this product.i am enjoying it.</review_text>
Living on my own for the first time, I did not have my own bed. I decided to use an air mattress as a temporary solution while I saved up the money and shopped for normal beds.A year later, and I still used this Swiss air bed every night. There seemed no point in buying a normal bed when this one was so comfortable and durable. It didn't lose air, meaning I only had to fill it up with air maybe once or twice a month (yes, month). It was comfortable. And it was durable, lining on this thing is extremely thick. It spend several months propped against a metal heater with sharp edges, and the thing never got a hole.Unfortunately, after 13 months of nightly use, it developed a small hole along one of the seams in the top of the mattress. I couldn't find one at the store, having to settle with a Coleman... which is absolutely nothing like my Swiss. The Coleman  has a very thin lining, making me paranoid about what I set next to it. It loses air and requires refilling everyday. it's comfortable, but because it loses so much air it is not firm. So now I really do have to get a real bed</review_text>
I love this trailer.  When I started looking for a trailer, I saw how expensive some of the other brands were like Burley and Chariot.  I thought I would have to spend a lot of money to get a decent one.  But talking to women in my bike club, I got many recommendations for Instep because you can get them at a reasonable price and they are durable.  So I bought this one, and it was very easy to put together.  No tools are needed.  I love how it's not a pain in the rear to use! It attaches to the bike very easily.  I also bought a second coupler through instep for my husband's bike.  So we can easily switch trailer from bike to bike even mid-ride if we ever needed to.  It collapses almost completetely for storage which is another nice thing.  My son who is 15 months old and almost 30 lbs uses it and seems to be comfortable since he loves riding in it.</review_text>
I love our new bike trailer.  We try to take it out every weekend.  My daughter loves to ride in it on our rides.  It also holds so much in the storage compartment I was surprised.  This was a great investment!</review_text>
This particular knife has almost all the tools one can use, only missing the scissors.  Much thinner than the plastic scaled versions,the Alox versions are very strong but not quite as smooth opening due to the lack of stainless liners.The blade steel is a proprietary stainless that holds an edge pretty well and is easy to touch up with a ceramic stick</review_text>
Got the cadet pocket knife two weeks ago. I am really impressed by how thin it is. It is so thin that I could keep it in the pochet at the back of my jean and would not feel its existence, by contrast, the regular kind with plastic handle is at least 50% thicker. Another plus of the metal handle is that I will never need to worry about scratches. And the knife is really sharp. Overall a very nice pocket knife for everyday use</review_text>
This sword is an awesome replica in terms of actual size to that of Sephiroth's. Only thing that I think takes away from the sword is that the handle is a plastic wrapped in black cloth. When sword is held outstretched, it does become very heavy and a lot of pressure is put on handle. Despite the handle and cloth, the sword overall is massive and amazing to behold. Great collectible for any FF goru</review_text>
For 89.99 I think it was a great offer, i got it today and even though the handle is wrapped in plastic and the sheath is wood, the sword IS and I repeat, IS sharp, it really is a replica, but if you were to be in a battle, you could hypothetically could kill someone.  No one is expected to be able to weild it. In the game you never saw sephiroth's sheath anyways, he always had it out.  It makes me feel like sephiroth when i hold it</review_text>
This Blade is of superior quality and craftsmanship. I never beheld such a blade and knew that I owned it. Please before getting a knockoff, purchase this one</review_text>
I have this thing and personally I love it.  While its not a very pratical sword for actual fighting for a number of reasons, replicas like this aren't made for that anyway, but you just feel so powerful with it.  As far as weilding it, I found it's not as hard as everyone says.  I can weild it pretty well although I am a bigger guy.  Weight is not 29 lbs though...don't be alarmed it's more like 10 the length just makes it feel really heavy</review_text>
As much as I love anime, and stuff this sword actually isnt real enough to do any 'swordplay' with.  It's hard to accept it isnt TRULY real, but it isnt hard to accept after you get all the fanboy-ish fantasy nonsense arranged properly in your mind, albeit thats the only rather an obvious 'con' of it.  Other than that its a truly wicked artifact, and to FF7 fans its almost like having a piece of the game as memoriablia, and also the wonderful thoughts of weilding a blade similar to who could be quite possibly be the greatest villain of all time. BTW, Weilding the thing is quite a feat, as someone with short arms can struggle getting the sword out by themselves(but thats hardly my problem as my arms are sorta lanky) along with the rules of physics. Last but not least, as being your official piece of property (and after you drooled or allowed some other bodily fluid to somehow leak onto it ),just remember 2 important things.... #1) Take care of it, as rust is a constant threat to any metal or combination of metals, and #2) Don't let the size of it go to your head, and also try to keep it at home.  I dont think that the local authorities would like to pull someone over for a typical traffic violation only to discover that they are carrying a blade over 4 feet long in their vehicle. Just a word of advice</review_text>
I laugh at the people who think any Final Fantasy replica sword is wieldable.1)It has "CHINA" stamped on one side. And since really cheap things come from China, this is a piece of stainless steel. High carbon steel is more expensive than stainless steel. High carbon steel obviously has a lot of carbon which atracts moisture and causes rust, pitting, and corrosion. Stainless steel is softer because there is less carbon in it, thus preventing the rust, pitting, and corrosion.2) This sword is too massive to wield. Any skilled martial  artist can easily defeat someone who tries to wield it. Any hardwood weapon such as a bokken, tonfa, staff, and even nunchaku can break the weapon.3) Since this sword is long and heavy, it really only has two easy modes of slashing: vertical and horizontal. If someone tried to attack vertically, it can be blocked with a weapon, or doged either causing the sword to get stuck in the ground or damaged. That is when the opponent can move in and attack. If slashing horizontally, chances are it will be swung somewhat hard and fast. The opponent can easilly dodged it or block and attack.4) Even a high carbon "battle ready" sword will not last long if struck against another sword. If a hard sword is hit against something equal as hard or harder it will break. There is a reason why a sword is never slashed against a tree. Sword play seen in the movies is purely for show. The swords used are either: rubber, plastic, or thick stage steel. A samurai tried to never draw their sword unless it was absolutly nessacery. "To die when it is right to die, to strike when to strike is right." - Bushido, the Warrior's Code5) If you try to imitate something like swordsmanship, fighting, or anything else staged on anime and video games, go home and rethink your life. You are really dumb if you tried anything like that. Same with movies. You can learn very little martial arts from movies (Stephen Chow did). If you really want to learn swordsmanship, go find the nearest dojo, or at least find a book.I gave 5 stars because the sword is a nice replica</review_text>
i was just wondering the actual things about this sword. ever since i seen the game and played it iv wanted the sword of sephiroth. but i want to know actual information like even if the edge is beveled, can it be sharpend? is its steel 440 carbon? will it fall apart if its actualy used? is it full tang or half tang? whats the gaurd and pommel made of? that kinda thing. i just wanna make sure before i pay $100 for it that it can be used. please if anyone knows any of these questions answer them for me by replying to me at Envy_274@yahoo.co</review_text>
That's one long sword...I don't have it but my friend does. Looks good but you really shouldn't go around swinging that thing, it's not like you're going to expect fighting or practicing with a near 5'7 sword, but looks awesome, really worth the money</review_text>
Such detail, such fine work. This is a near exact replica, down to the tiniest details! It's a shame the blade isn't 7 or 8 feet long like the real thing, but that makes it all the more better! A weildable Masamune!!! This makes me wanna buy it!!</review_text>
The hitch is easy to assemble and easy to use.   We found it holds our bikes securely with out scratching the frames.   The straps are easy to fasten and we like the fact the straps are attached to the hitch so they do not get lost.  I also like the fact the bikes are easy to see in my rearview mirror, but they don't obstruct my view or my taillights.It is a well designed product, but we modified the holes on the hitch to match our receiver so that we could utilize a LOCKING hitch pin.  This is too nice a rack to leave unsecured on a vehicle.   If you're hauling bikes, you probably are going to leave the vehicle parked and ride the bikes.  Unless the hitch is locked or removed from the vehicle, it is open for an easy theft.The hitch is lightweight, but of very strudy design.   We also like that it can be tilted to gain access to the cargo area of the van.  We had a hard time finding a bike rack that would hold five bikes.  It is easy to fold up and store in the garage.  This is great.Well designed!  A great product</review_text>
I spent a great deal of time searching for a 5-bike rack. The greater challenge was to find one I could afford. This rack fit the bill. It was considerably less expensive than other 5-bike racks, yet it works rather well.Good points:- Easily adapts to various bike frame types. I carry one men's frame, one old women's 10-speed, a women's autobike, a 24-inch women's frame, and a 26-inch women's mountain bike with a large tube design. Each of them fit the rack without any additional parts or hardware.- Solid design. It doesn't rock, sway or rattle, nor do the bikes. Even at freeway speeds, everything stays put.Bad points:- Less-than-easy installation. It comes with a bolt and locking nut for mounting to the receiver instead of allowing the use of a regular pin. The hole is too small for a pin. This is supposedly to make it more solid (see good points above). However, I plan on buying a different collar-and-bolt style stabilizer, and drill out the hole so I can use my locking pin. Pulling out wrenches every time I want to put the rack on or off my truck is a PAIN.- Ok, I guess that is my only beef with it right now.Overall, you get more than you pay for with this rack. If you are on a budget, I highly recommend it</review_text>
If I could give this rack 4.5 stars I would! I have owned this rack for about a month. First off, it was easy to assemble and has a quality feel to it. Once attached to my hitch it is easy to load and unload.You load 1 bike from the backside of the rack and 4 from the front. I put 3 - 26" mountain bikes and 2 - 20" BMX style bikes on it with no problem. The tie downs are easy to use and the optional lower strap holds things in place nicely. I was skeptical that this rack would actually hold 5 bikes, but it does!My only complaint about this rack would be that the hole in the end of the rack that goes into your hitch receiver is only 1/2". So if you want to use your standard 5/8" receiver lock you are out of luck. The rack comes with a "no-wiggle" bolt that holds the rack to the hitch, BUT anyone could come along with a couple of wrenches and steal your rack. SO, I bought a 5/8" drill bit and made the holes bigger so I could use my standard hitch lock. Now I can easily take my rack on and off and not worry about the rack being stolen while out riding our bikes</review_text>
This glove fits very well and is comfortable to wear.  It seems to breathe relatively well and can be secured by the velcro straps.  I'm very happy with mine, for purposes of an everyday workout glove.  Would recommend</review_text>
I recently started casually lifting at the gym. After getting into heavier weights, I found that my limits were more based on what pain my hands could take from holding the metal weights and bars, instead of what my muscles could lift. So I bought these gloves and couldn't be happier. Now I can focus on lifting the weight rather than worrying about my hands getting torn up.I'm new to weight lifting, but even for light to moderate weights these gloves make a big difference.I'm sure other gloves would do the trick too, but these had a great price and look. They run small, so order a size up if you're uncertain</review_text>
I am satisified with these gloves.  However, I had to cut the area between the ring finger and index finger because it was sewn too closely.  When my hand was in the glove that area bit into my hand.  I am uploading a photo so can see what I am talking about because I may not be explaining myself very well :)Other than that I like the gloves.  They smelled of heavy chemicals when I got them.  Just FYI, you might want to wash them with your unimportant laundry to get the toxic smell out.  I did not wash mine.  And these gloves do not turn my hands black.  That's nice.Had I first tried them on at Sports Authority I may not have bought them.  But after making the small cuts in the gloves they perform fine</review_text>
I wear them riding my bike to work and back. I work out doors and handle alot of money, they are perfect for counting money, keeping my hands warm and riding my bike. They are well made and strong</review_text>
Surprised Hubby for his Birthday and he was amazed that very little assembly time was needed.  He enjoys pedaling around the neighborhood, acting like the little boy I know exists inside him</review_text>
Very nice bike. My wife and I each got one for afternoon rides. Easy on the old bones! Great price and free shipping</review_text>
I found the assembly for this bike to be very easy. You'll need a ratchet, 2 sockets. an open end wrench, 2 hex wrenches, and about 40 minutes. Handlebars, Seat, Front Tire, & Pedals. Air in the tires. Then final adjustments to the seat & handlebars. That's it. My brakes & gears needed no adjustments.The reviewer who had trouble must have truely gotten the oddball item. My guess is that his cycle was a returned item that was re-shipped with the parts thrown haphazardly back in the box.After 35 years of riding racers the upright riding position will take some getting used to for me. Still I found the bike's ride smooth & comfortable. with my Amazon gold box discount & the free Super Saver shipping this was a great bike at a great price.</review_text>
I printed the picture of the bike and assembled it in about 1 hour. Most of the time I had to search for tools. I took it for a ride and the bike was terrific. I priced similar bikes at bike shops on Cape Cod and they were asking more $$$ for beat uprental used junk. Buy this bike; you cannot find a better deal</review_text>
I grew up with a single speed bicycle and later purchased a 10 speed when they were all the craze and hated it.  It was so very uncomfortable, nothing worked well, and all those gears and levers made me nuts.  That put the end of my recreational bicycle riding until now.I like this bicycle.  This is my first bicycle in 20 years so I am amazed at the light weight of this machine.  The electric blue paint is briliant and exciting, and two of my adult neighbors have commented that they really like the style.  I do too!I am 5'8", 175 lbs and have found this bicycle to be a comfortable size for me.  The riding position is upright and comfortable, just like it was when I was a kid.  No stooping over into a racing position for me!  The 7 gears work easily and smoothly with an easy rotating motion on the right hand grip.  No more goofy levers for me!  The hand brakes work well and are quiet.  No more squealing brakes for me!  The seat is comfortable for a 2 hour ride along Chicago's Lake Michigan bicycle path.  No more skinny and painful seats for me!  The tires are fat and ride smooth like they were when I was a kid.  No more skinny and rough riding tires for me!  I find this bicycle to be an overall pleasureable riding experience.Before you get me wrong, I am not against speciality bicycles or technology in any way.  I'm just not a "technology victim".  I just want technology to work for me, and I don't want to pay for "capability" that I will never use.  I want a comfortable ride that can keep up with most of the pack, and this bicycle meets those requirements for me.The bicycle arrived in good condition and was secured in the shipping box very professionally.  It took me a while to assemble the machine (foot pedals, handle bar assembly, seat assembly, front wheel, inflate tires) and adjust the seat and handle bar height.  The bicycle comes with an owners manual with an overwhelming amount of assembly information that is mostly useless.  Most of it pertains to other models and assembly that has already been done at the factory.  If you have a few good tools, take your time, don't get overwhelmed by the printed material, and have a little mechanical ability you will get the assembly done in a few hours.  My tips:  Make sure that the front fork is facing in the correct direction!  I put it together backwards which made the front tire hit my foot every time I turned the handlebars.  Don't inflate the front tire until AFTER you install it on the frame.  The inflated tire will never clear the brake pads.  Inflate the tires fully before you check to see if the brakes need adjusting.  The wheel rims will shift slightly when the tires are inflated changing the alignment with the brake pads, and I did need to do some adjusting of the front brakes.  The front wheel has some wobble to it but nothing serious.  If you don't have any mechanical ability and some basic tools I would not recommend trying to assemble this bicycle.  You won't find this bicycle in a Schwinn store, and the closest Schwinn model that they have will cost you almost double.Four stars</review_text>
I purchased this child carrier seat for when we visit the grandparents.   At home a have a trailer that both of our kids ride in.  This little bike seat was perfect for the occastional use.  Some of the 'shields' that are meant to protect the child from the wheel are a little flimsy, so I would not want to take them on and off on a regular basis.  Once it's on the bike, it should probably stay there.  But for our purposes where I didn't want to spend hundreds of dollars on a second bike trailer to be used for maybe a month out of the year, that was great bang for the buck.  I had my 2 year old riding in the back and he was perfectly happy & safe</review_text>
I have used my 3bike xport FreeLoader Hitch rack on a 4000 mile trip this winter and it works beautifully is extremely stable and easy to use.  Highly recommended, especially at the great Amazon.com price.</review_text>
Much better than the conventional round mirrors which are only slightly larger than a dental mirror. In many cases I still needed to twist around to see - no pleasure with a bad back. It has not been an issue with this mirror.</review_text>
I purchased this after using a friends and it is fantastic! The quality is second to none. It attaches to you glasses easily and stays put. It is easy to adjust in just about any direction. I would highly recommend to anyone looking for a rearview mirrow for biking</review_text>
I had never used before a small mirror like this, however, it took me 1 minute getting used to it. Believe me, there's no better way to look behind you. The closeness of the mirror to your eye gives an incredibly big picture of things behind. By the way, one mirror is enough to look both to your left and right rears</review_text>
This mirror is great!  It is easy to attach to glasses and is very durable.  As it is somewhat larger than other mirrors it provides a very good field of view.  It was very easy to get used to and now I wouldn't ride in traffic without it.  One turn of the head and I can scan everything behind me - much more confidently than turning my head.The mirror is VERY durable.  It fell out of my pocket while attached to sunglasses and was run over by a car.  The glasses were ruined and the mirror was unscathed and I'm using it a year later.</review_text>
Our daughter loves this pizza set. It's wonderful for pretend play, as our daughter loves to pretend to take our orders and mix and match the toppings to create her own custom slices (pepperoni only for daddy, mushroom and broccoli for mommy, please).We're also using it to learn very basic math skills. It helps her visualize 1/2 and 1/4, and understand simple addition and subtraction ("If you have three broccoli florets and take one away, how many are left?").This is a nice, quiet travel toy. As it is made of fabric, it is soft and lightweight, and the velcro helps keep all of the pieces together. We just returned from a long road trip with this toy and didn't lose a single piece</review_text>
I must admit I like it.  The compass is very precise and the brass case feels nicer to hold than a plastic case.  Outside of that, the compass does and feels like it should.  I would, however, recommend a cheaper plastic cased compass for those who don't use a compass that often.  Enough said</review_text>
I took this for a weekend hiking/camping trip and was very pleased with it.  The comfort astounded me to be perfectly honest.  I was told beforehand that the self-inflatable mats usually needed some help blowing up(via mouth)the first time or so because of being packaged so tightly for a period of time.  This was true, but not a problem whatsoever.  It took only a couple of minutes to have it all set up and it stayed full and comfortable the entire weekend.  The mat compacts fairly well and is definitely light enough to take along on any hiking trip.  I think it is well worth the money.</review_text>
we are so looking forward to using this over the spring and summer this year. i have purchased bocce ball sets in the past and this one sure has the heft that will make it comparable to proper sets, but without the huge price.</review_text>
We purchased this particular model for weekend trips.  It fits a full size roller suitcase and another large duffle bag which for us, frees up the back space of our suv so our labrador can join us.Great item</review_text>
I love my Thule rack!  The sidekick is the perfect size its not too big and not too small.It is easy to install on top of the car and doesnt make a lot of noise</review_text>
I bought this with some skepticism, having read other reviews that gave it low marks, and also having bought Thule products in the past and cursed them as I tried assembling and installing them, what with missing pieces and the like.Happily, this box is fine.  It does seem flimsy when you're assembling it, and it even seems that way when it's open on top of the car.  It seems to be engineered to be as light as possible, which it is, and that can be unnerving until you get it fastened down and locked closed.Assembly:  It's awkward.  It took two of us, me and my 2 year old!  Seriously.  It's a bit hairy for one person to get it right, since you have to match the hinges with the sides of the "clam shell", and their fit doesn't seem quite right until you tighten them up well.  Still, it went OK, about 20 minutes for me to do, far better than a Thule roof racks I installed some years back, where I was dealing with bent and missing parts.  If you do this alone, you need to brace it well at an angle as you hook the top and bottom together.  Much easier with two people.Installation:  Dead easy on the factory roof rack.  (We have a Pontiac Aztek.)  THERE IS NO NEED TO BUY ADDITIONAL BRACKETS, though when viewing ads for this, you might think so at first glance.  The package includes 4 U-brackets which attach to your roof racks and are held inside by hand-swivel bolts (whatever they're called).  One thing I added while doing the installation was to put duct tape over the inside holes for the U-brackets.  There are several holes in each sequence, and you only use two out of 4 or 5; the others are exposed.  Covering with tape might help keep spray out.Performance:  Pretty good!  We drove 2300 miles with this unit, of which about 300 were in driving rain.  During the worst rain, we did have dampness and some droplets of water at the bottom front inside, but the gear was sitting up on ridges and was fine - bag in front was damp but not wet.  If you have cloth bags that press to the very bottom, I'd put them in plastic if you'll be hitting heavy rain (and ours was VERY heavy, and at 70 mph driving speed).We noticed an increase in wind noise at high speeds, and in our rough tests, it knocked about 2 mpg off our gas mileage at 75 mph, but on a 50 mph stretch of several hundred miles we couldn't tell a difference.Removal takes literally five minutes. You undo (by hand) four pairs of swivel bolts, and lift it right off the roof.  Reinstallation is about the same.Overall, we're extremely happy with it and very glad we bought it</review_text>
I have had several other trainers of this type that were used by my son and myself for training on Road, Mountain, and Recumbent. This one is the best. From the moment you heft it out of the shipping carton until you set it up you know this is quality and not like all the others. It is BUILT strong.I am 6'3" and 215 lbs. This trainer acts like I'm not there. The greatest feature is the quietness with which it operates. You can watch the Spinerval DVD or TV and not have to be blasted off the seat. Bike mounting on the trainer is straight and very simple while being very secure. I love it and use it regularly with great results</review_text>
I bought this for my husband to use and he LOVES it!  The only thing I can say negative is that it is quite noisy and he has to have the TV turned way up in order to hear the directions above the noise of his spinning.</review_text>
I got this trainer thinking that it would be a good workout for days when I was too lazy to carry my bike downstairs or go to the gym. I've taken spinning classes for a few years, and never thought that using a trainer would produce a workout as intense as my classes. This trainer definitely does.I've never used another one, so I have nothing to compare it to, but I LOVE this trainer. Keeping the resistance up will give you a great workout and you can use your gears modify the resistance while riding. It remains stable even when I stand up on it.Overall, I just love it. It's quiet, easy to use, and takes up minimal space.</review_text>
I've had my Kurt Kinetic Road Machine since 2001 and it has never leaked.  I put an average of 1200 miles per winter on it and it's always been reliable, relatively quiet, and has a better feel than any non-fluid trainer.  The Road Machine Pro has an even heavier flywheel so offers an even better feel, I'd say.  The best thing you could do is read the reviews on other sites.  Try a couple out at a local bike shop and then buy the best.  After all my initial reviews and ongoing knowledge of bike trainers, Kurt was and still is the best.</review_text>
Got this bike for my husband...and I put it together first as a surprise.  It would have been nice if it came with allen wrenches.  The instructions aren't the greatest either.  Once it was all together though...it works great and looks cool cruising down the beach road</review_text>
Bike delivered on time, was easy to assemble and is great for cruising around town. I use the bike for exercise and ride for an hour plus each day. A good choice</review_text>
Park Ave. is hip-hop cool. its a splash on campus. delivery was prompt. nothing broken. took about 15-20 min to assemble. just need a bell and basket now..</review_text>
This practice weapon handles very well and feels comfortable in my hands. Its weight in my hands is very comfortable. And I am able to execute all my movements easily with it.It is worth the price of purchase</review_text>
I have pretty soft skin, and these don't give me blisters after wearing for an hour or two.  They work ok in the rain, and with occasional washing have managed to not reek</review_text>
i used this chair in the north georgia woods for 3 months while i hiked and camped.  it is comfortable and easily carried.  it isn't a huge chair and it folds in half for many options on your pack.  however, i'm a taller guy and i needed a taller back b/c the support poles poked my back.  the chair is not water proof, so sitting on wet ground will usually result in a wet [...].</review_text>
We've only used these chairs once, but I can already see that they're going to save our backs!  I'll never sit in the bleachers without one again.  Highly recommended to fellow race car fans</review_text>
I bought my Xtreme 2 from Bowflex because at the time they offered free shiping. But since Amazon ships this item from Bowflex anyway its still a great deal here. Even after a month of using this machine I can't believe how well its made and how many exercises you can do. It does not take up much room either. I looked at home gyms far and wide and for me I could not find a better value for the price and quality. I also comes with instructions and a diet plan to help you to get a Bowflex Body.</review_text>
All five boxes arrived in relatively good shape... some punctures but not bad. The internal components are packaged in styrofoam so they are well protected. I decided on the Xtreme2 after trying out the Bowflex SE and the Xtreme(1). The Bowflex SE's seat was very uncomfortable for me and didn't have the multi-pulley system like the Xtreme2 so it would require a little more effort to move cables around. I would recommend the Xtreme2 over the SE for a few hundred dollars more. Setup took me about 4 hours, but I was moving at a slow pace so as not to miss any components. The instructions are pretty good. When assembled you can see that this is a real solid piece of workout equipment. Bowflex did a good job on it. Have been using it for approx a month and am amazed at the many positions that are available and probably lots more if you use your imagination. Highly recommend the Xtreme2 for those who know that this is the machine that they want. Serious bodybuilders should go elsewhere because the resistance is a totally different feel and I know the weights do not compare one to one for the Bowflex versus free weights. For anyone wanting to put on muscle and tone this is a great machine. If your sole purpose is to get "huge" you should get some type of power rack. I did call Bowflex three times with some minor questions/comments and they answered the phone within 15 seconds each and every time day or night. Great customer satisfaction.  One last thing, if you are serious about working out and are fairly strong, get the 310 upgrade because it will make changing out rods much easier for you. Look around for prices too.Also, one more comment... I purchased a 50"x60" rubber mat from Amazon for approx $49 and it is pretty nice but I don't really think you need one for the Bowflex since it sits only on the four corner legs and nothing else touches the floor anyway.  You probably could get by with some small size pads.-Try one out somewhere before you buy and Good luck</review_text>
This machine is very well put together, and Xtremely sturdy.  It took a friend and I two hours to put it together, so be prepared for that.  While assembly was a bit trying, the end results are worth it.  As a 40 year old man, I wanted to start working out again.  I hadn't worked out since my Memphis State days, and I didn't want to join a gym. I have the 410lb model, and it will be all the resistance that I'll ever need.  As I said earlier, the motion is smooth and challenging.  While the power rods do deliver tough resistance, it is not challenging as free weights.  For example I can bench press 300lbs on my X2, but on free weights I can do only about 240lb.  That is a big difference, and all the exercises are that way too.  That being said, I still find the bowflex to be a great homegym and I'm getting the results I desire.  I'm not trying to get as huge as a wrestler, but the bowflex is changing my body and adding mass.  Don't pay attention to the bowflex commercials, where the guys are ripped to the bone.  That just won't happen on a bowflex machine, and I'm glad they've started showcasing real people with real results.  For the average man or woman, this machine will deliver.  With around 100 different exercises and variations, you can target all your muscles:legs, chest, arms, abs, back, and shoulders.  I'm very please with the 10 months I've been on the machine.  Though its kinda pricey, its worth using my tax refund on it.  If you are thinking about a homegym, the I highly recommend this machine.  You should also upgrade to AT LEAST 310lb rods, because the leg exercises are pretty easy and you'll need the extra rods.  For guys, I think you should get the 410lb rods because you'll see rapid results.  I've gone from benching 220 to 300lb in less than a year.  There are cheaper machines, and free weights will give you much better results.  But if you're looking for  an all in one machine, that will last for years, then try the Xtreme2!</review_text>
So far, with two weeks and a handful of workouts under my belt, I'm pleased with the Xtreme 2. The unit is very well built, with heavy gauge steel tubing and platform, and the cables and pulley system appear to be very durable. It's very easy to adjust the pulleys and  install/remove accessories. Moving from one exercise to another is very quick once you get into the routine.I'm still using the basic 9-exercise routine, but the book shows a huge number of variations in the exercises. This should keep me from getting bored with the machine. I didn't like one of the exercises in the routine, and finding another that worked the same muscle group was no problem.I have found that some exercises require you to maintain a somewhat difficult balancing position. I suppose this will become easier as my conditioning improves, and again the variety of exercises available allow you to avoid those that are too difficult.Another minor gripe is that some exercises are a bit uncomfortable. The leg accessory, for example, puts stress on the back of my legs when doing extensions. The padding could be a little softer to reduce this discomfort.I've had gym memberships for many years prior to owning the Xtreme 2. This unit provides an excellent workout in the privacy of your own home. I'm sure I'll appreciate it even more in January when I don't have to bundle up and venture into 10 degree temperatures to drive to the gym. I'll just walk down into the basement in shorts and a t-shirt and get started</review_text>
I did a ton of research before buying the X2.  I run on a treadmill 3 or 4 days a week (about 12-15 miles a week) and work up a good sweat, and my lower body is pretty lean.  However, being almost 40, and not having trained with weights since high school, I felt I needed to start doing some weight/resistance training, particularly on my upper body.Well, after 3 weeks, I can tell a huge difference after using this machine.  I'm also glad I got the X2 instead of the X because of the ability to work out faster without pully changes.I also have been able to gradually increase the weight so that I'm going to buy the two 50 rod extensions.  I highly recommend this machine to anyone who doesn't feel comfortable in a gym, and/or just doesn't have the time to go.  I have small kids and being able to hit this machine at 5:30 am when everyone is still asleep is a huge benefit for me.As for assembly, it was fairly easy if you follow directions.  The only difficult part was the pully system - make sure you have it right as that is the backbone of the entire system.  The pics in the instructions could have been a little clearer.  Otherwise, bottom line is that this thing works and was a great purchase.</review_text>
I think the bowflex xtreme 2 is awesome. I now have had it for about 2 weeks and I can really feel a difference . I recommend this machine to the person serious about a good home work ou</review_text>
I wanted to write a review concerning the design flaw mentioned in the previous review.  I to had this issue when I first got my bowflex and was quite frustrated...particularly when I read the review on this site.  I decided to try turning the power rods around just to see if this worked and in my case it did.  I had to unscrew each power rod from the base, turn it, ensure it locked into place, and then rescrew it back to the base.  After doing this even the flimsy 5 pound rods no longer hit the cross bar.  After doing this I contacted bowflex to see what they had to say about this issue.  They informed me that they were working on a fix that would be sent out as soon as it was done.My main reason for writing this was to make sure anyone else that had this issue and found this review knew that the issue IS solvable at least for some cases.As to the bowflex itself I have only been using it for about a week now, but really enjoy the versatility as well as the action of the rods and pulleys.  It is very smooth and easy to use and I would definitely recommend it for the average user.  My roommate is a fitness guy (ex fitness trainier)....he worked out on it a few times and definitely felt that you could get pretty cut/toned with this machine...if you are looking for bulk look elsewhere</review_text>
I ordered two sets and use the balls on a daily basis for arm strengthening and toning.  I taught myself how to juggle when I was in graduate school...to release frustration when I was writing those long theses!  Anyway, now I juggle with the weighted balls and it has really helped tone my arms overall.  They are the perfect size and weight.  I keep them right by my bed so I don't miss a day.  10 minutes a day is all it takes</review_text>
Since assembling this product, we have had great fun playing against each other or individually. The assembly instructions were good up to the point of assembling the height-adjustment. It was easier to look at the picture on the box and figure it out, rather than use the instructions</review_text>
This is a really nice basketball system....but the instructions were very difficult to follow...it took 3 adults 3 hours to put it together.I would definately recommend this product just make sure you have plenty of patience when it is time to put it together</review_text>
Can find no fault in the product but had to spend two days on the phone to get DHL to deliver to rural address</review_text>
This is a very nice basketball system....and the instructions are a challenge.  But, the bottom line is this is very much worth the money and the time to put it together</review_text>
This basketball hoop is nice looking, sturdy and perfect for home use.  Someone else set it up for me and said it wasn't that complicated but it did take some time and work.  I did take notes from the other reviewers and passed them on to the person who put it together.  It arrived in perfect condition, with all the parts, and arrived on time.  Overall, we are very pleased</review_text>
Sturdy product.  Great value for the money.  Easier than expected to put together</review_text>
Bought this item to upgrade my daughter's starter hoop to something better.  It takes a little thought and review to decipher the instructions, but the final product is definitely worth the effort.  This is a good quality product and we're delighted with the both the looks and the features of this backboard</review_text>
This is an excellent product for the money.  We researched quite a bit before we bought it and read all the reviews on amazon.  We were a little worried about putting it together becasue of all the negitive reviews we read.  But, we didn't have any trouble.  It went together simply and easily.  We were careful to read all the instuctions before we began and kept ready a few steps ahead and it wasn't hard at all.  Our kids have been playing non stop ever since</review_text>
THE PORTABLE BASKETBALL SYSTEM I PURCHASED WAS THE THE BEST BUY I COULD HAVE EVER MADE. IT WAS BETTER THAN BETTER IT WAS GREAT.  MY GRANDSON WAS TO HAPPY.  THANKS AGAIN FOR ALL THE LOVE ON THIS PURCHASE.HAPPY NEW YEARGWEN JOHNSO</review_text>
Performs just as described. Excellent way to control drying of hydration bag. Shop around to get this below MSRP</review_text>
Before, I rarely used my CamelBak Zoid because it was insulated (so I could go skiing with it) because did not have a removable reservoir and therefore could not be cleaned well. Because it never got a good cleaning, it still had a plasticy aftertaste and one day I forgot to empty it and left water in it for a few days and some "funk" began to grow in it. Thats when I broke down and bought the cleaning kit. I did not get a lot of crud in the reservoir because I could clean it out with a regular brush, but I pulled out a lot of green gunk from the hose, thanks to the hose cleaning pipe. After that I ran the cleaning tab in there. This made such a difference. Not only was the mold and crap gone, but the plasticy aftertaste was gone too! Now I use my CamelBak for biking and all kinds of other outdoor activites. Also, the tabs didn't leave a bleachy aftertaste (I was worried, because they smell quite chemically when you put them in)</review_text>
does this gun have a charging rod and also how long does it tak e for it to chARge anhow many yards acan it shoot</review_text>
best gun ever. shoots hard and fast. i have two of them they are sweet. buy this gun</review_text>
i bought this gun for battles in the woods with my buddys and i works great pick off my friends for 50m away!!!!!!! this is a great gun for any one shoots hard, shoots fast,and best of all this is my most accurate gun i have and i own over 17!!!!! so all in all great gun, best machince gun i have if you want a machine gun buy this on</review_text>
my bro has one of these and it has had for half a year already u ppl just need to take better care of it im not kid i just do not have an acount he bought one off the site awhile agohello kitty mommy lol</review_text>
This gun (seen under a bunch of different names here at Amazon, if they look alike, chances are they're all the Double Eagle M83) really impressed me the day it came (only 4 business days to ship from LA to PA).  While I was waiting for the battery to charge, I toyed around with the gun.  The sight that comes standard on the gun is pretty handy, but it's almost required to remove the handle part of the sight nearest the trigger to but the electric sight on.  Even then, it's more of a showy accesory than anything because you have to aim higher than the crosshair shows.  The flashlight is a nice addition to everything as well.  You have to be careful when putting on the strap because my friend, who bought the same gun, put his on and the strap came off, resulting in the gun falling to the ground, the barrel hitting first, and the mock silencer broke off.  My strap hasn't failed me yet, just like every other part of the gun.  So now to the fun.  If you plan on using this gun during wars/capture the flag/etc., I strongly suggest you buy an extra magazine and speed loader and practice reloading.  The gun is accurate up to about 30 feet until it starts to curve a little, unless you use the useful hop up system.  By switching the lever from 'normal' to 'hop up' mode, your gun puts more of a backspin on the BBs, making them curve upwards and get more distance.  This is great for shooting people high up that are far away once you get the aiming down.  The automatic function is a lot of fun and great for taking out lots of people during gameplay.  The magazine runs out fast though, so use it sparingly.  I measured the FPS to range between 220-260, depending on battery power, type of BBs (.12 gram giving the highest FPS), and wind.  I've used it for 2 battles so far, both of which were about 4 hours long.  The battery didn't even show signs of slowing down, so just keep it charged and you'll be fine.  I highly recommend this gun to anyone looking to impress and have hours upon hours of fun with friends.PROS: -6 setting adjustable shoulder stock easily caters to your shooting style.-High battery life keeps you in the game all day long.-Gun hasn't jammed once in over 8 hours of use.-Hop up system is great for that extra distance.-Looks pretty sweet.-Accessories (Flashlight, Electronic Sight, Extra Barrel) are a fun addition the gun.-Powerful, but not too powerful for children of all ages.-Realistic look and weight gives you the feel of an actual M16.-------------------------------------------CONS: -Only accurate up to about 30 feet until BBs begin to curve.-Plastic screw-on barrel has a chance of breaking if dropped on barrel.-Sight can be complicated until you get used to the gun.-Reloading can be annoying, but not a problem if you practice</review_text>
I bought these gloves for my high school son.  He wanted a glove that would still allow for some dexterity.  He rides his bike daily to school, around town and on paper route.  He has worn these gloves daily since they arrived.  They are sufficient for most days in Northern Ohio and are thin and fitted enough to wear as a liner under another pair of warmer gloves for the coldest days(low teens and below).  They seem to be wearing well</review_text>
I can't speak highly enough of this product. Running is one of many physical activities I engage in throughout the year, but during the cold winter months, the skin on my hands gets dry and cracks from the icy cold. Wearing these gloves has virtually eliminated the need for moisturizing hand lotion and the band-aids I would have to wear over my cracked knuckles after a January or February jog. They're also surprisingly durable considering that they're fairly thin and made of the same material as the company's high-tech workout shirts.</review_text>
I just opened my Gazelle, after buying it for myself for Christmas (yes, I thought of every excuse in the book!)  I finally put it together and did my first workout (I also bought the tapes).  I highly recommend getting the tape because he teaches you all of the techniques and the time goes by very quickly.  I had the option of doing 10 minutes (beginner), 20 (intermediate) or 30 minutes (advanced).  I opted for the 20 minutes for my first time and it was great.  I really look forward to doing this tomorrow!  Again, the tape is great (it's a 3-pack, I did the lower body workout) because it's not all about just gliding back and forth, Tony teaches you that it's all different techniques!!!  It is also light and easy to fold up and put away which is a plus.  I look forward to doing this tomorrow!!!!</review_text>
Obviously this machine doesn't have a speed dial, so you control the speed. You have to direct your own workout and really have the drive to make your own workout. Other than that - it's easy to set up, fun to use, and does the job for the price. If you want something cheap because you can't afford the "real thing", this is a perfect buy</review_text>
What a great piece of exercise gym equipment. The overall body workout plus the non-impact regime is perfect for all. In just 10-20 minutes a day on the gazelle makes a significant difference in my general health. I love it</review_text>
I bought this because I was just looking for a low cost machine that I could use in my spare time.  I was not looking for a hard-core workout machine, so the Gazelle Edge is perfect.  There's not any resistance, but I found that if you buy some ankle weights and use them while on the machine, it works very good.  This machine is perfect to use while watching TV instead of just sitting on the couch.  I have stress fractures from running, and there's no impact, so this is a good machine to get the heart rate up and a good workout.</review_text>
The Little Gazelle Edge Fitness System is exactly what I was looking for. The workout is perfect for an older person like myself who is looking to put some exercise into thier life but are just getting started. I highly recommend this product to everyone</review_text>
I just finished my first workout on the Gazelle Edge.  I wanted something that would make aerobic excercise convenient (in my garage) when the weather is nasty -and I didn't want to spend alot of money.  Overall, it did a very good job for what I wanted.I had been using a very inexpensive machine with a similar motion for many years with great success.  My previous machine ran on a track with wheels, and like the Gazelle had handles for arm motion(although separate from the foot action), no tension adjustment and had a very basic computer. I literally wore this old machine out.I decided since I had stuck with this machine for so long, I could treat myself to something fancier - I knew it wouldn't become a clothes hanger. I started my hunt and tried several high end, fancy, expensive units, but kept saying to myself...."why do I need all this stuff?  Would I even use it?"  Most retail stores I checked only carried things with "bells and whistles", so, I searched yard sales and Goodwill for something simple, with no luck.  It was all too fancy (and still expensive) or too beat up and run down.Anyway, I did a search on Amazon thinking if I was going to spend a bunch of money, I better know what I was getting.  I found the Gazelle, read the reviews and decided to give it a try. It seemed like many different abiliity levels were happy with it, the price was fair and the motion similar to what I was used to.  Glad I did.  I think it's going to be great.As far as no tension adjustment, I don't have a problem with that, maybe because I'm used to it.  It also seems like you can get more tension in the arms by pulling against the motion of your feet.My only big complaint (why I gave 4 stars instead of 5) is that the speed calibration on the computer is very "choppy" (for lack of a better word).  I would be going at very fluid, steady pace and the speed reading would vary 2-3 mph in a period of just a few seconds.  I tried it at slow and fast speeds...always the same.  The only one that I think was accurate was 0. I have always used the speed (on my old unit) to help me regulate my interval training. If I can't figure out a "secret" to getting to to read consistently, I guess I'll have to guess at it.Also, I don't think you should rely on the calorie meter to be correct.  Like another reviewer mentioned, you can't be sure of that without knowing alot of other variables.  But, it is useful is comparing one workout with another. (If you write things like that down.) Not a complaint so much as an FYI.If you are looking for an aerobic workout machine to use at home this should do the trick.  Just remember, like any exercise program or machine, the results you get are going to be a direct result of the effort you put into it</review_text>
I've been using the Gazelle Edge for 9 weeks now. I've been using it every day since the day it arrived for between 45 and 60 minutes at a time.  It has a smooth and silent operation and folds away when I'm done using it. I like that you can choose to make the work out session as easy or as hard as you want. I wondered if it would be good quality and a pleasure to use and then easy to put away when I'm done for such a modest price and have found that it is on all three counts. Recently retired, I needed something that would replace the two 30 minute walks I used to make every day to and from work. This piece of equipment has done just that</review_text>
I have this unit, with a Pioneer AVIC-D2 headunit. I use it for both XM and NavTraffic. I have to admit that NavTraffic's incident report isn't always very up to date, and I really wish they would write WHEN the event occured. Now it just says "Accident, next quarter hour" but come back in 30 minutes and you still have the exact same message up on the screen. However, it is much better with the highway information. And also if highway traffic is slow, and you have a router programmed, the unit will ask if you wish to go around the traffic jam. Sometimes the alternative is worse, because the unit doesn't know "speeds" off the highway, so if you choose to avoid, you may get in a worse traffic jam.As far as the XM, reception is good, some channels at times sound like a 56kbps mp3, but most of the time it's good. Also, it sometimes doesn't get artist and song title information. I'm not sure if this is the unit's fault or xm's.I would definitly buy this unit again, especially with NavTraffic</review_text>
I bought my Whisperlite in 1996 and have yet to have a problem with it. (I think I may have cleaned it once) Simmering is a bit of a trick but if you use it several times before taking it into the woods you should be able to cook any food you can take in a back pack. There are stories about these stoves going into "meltdown" during light up on cold days but it is always because the user either over primed the stove or was using a damaged fuel line. If you accidentally over prime do not add more fuel. Just let what you have burn off.I have never had problems lighting the stove or keeping it going (although I did run out of fuel once). Light and VERY easy to use.Funny thing, it is a bit loud but you never notice until you turn it off.</review_text>
This is a fantastic concept. I am currently in the Bermuda Regiment. I am in the boat section of support company. During weekend camps that we have once a month we travel to an abandoned warehouse that we store our boats in and we sleep there throughout the weekend. The problem is that the warehouse, along with almost the entirety of the rest of the abandoned naval base that it's on, is in a state of disrepair. Every year we do a little bit to make it better but nobody has done any work to the roof in donkey's years. This makes for an interesting situation when it rains since the roof of the building is very leaky. I've been woken up in the middle of the night several times by rain water dripping on me in a steady stream. Also, there is the odd occasion where we have to create makeshift tents for ourselves when we sleep out on one of the islands.  Now I can stay warm and dry throughout my rest periods thanks to the tent cot. Definitely worth every penny.Though, I don't think that I'd want to have to go on a hike with it on my back along with the rest of my gear. Thankfully, my section doesn't have that issue.Also, I'd like to note that the size of the cot is great for me. I'm 5'11" tall and weight about 155 lbs. I fit inside the item with great ease. This cot is slightly longer than the standard military issued cots that we have.</review_text>
No it isn't horse proof! I think one horse thought it was a couple of hay bales beside one another ....... but I scared them off. That was fun! This thing is great! After a quick fold-up I started out storing it behind the passenger seat but couldn't easily reach though to the back seat well. I optioned later to store it above some added cargo straps that I draped across the front and back sets of entrance handles, sometimes provided in cars, that will fold down to aid a person entering the vehicle. So barely enough room for the top of my head and forget the interior ceiling light, really unneeded as I have front map lights that are brighter anyway. Get the rainfly, it can be quickly placed in a strong rain if needed and then secured better once back inside the tent. When I want to entertain a breeze, I keep it folded inside should a strong rain sneak up later and wake me after a peaceful driftin' off. The storage case is nice now that it is home, but seldom used it on the road. Being separated from the somtimes wet/insect-filled ground is great but after arriving in cooler climates I debated on just what I could use as extra needed insulation below me, as the provided foam pad insert works well for stability but does little to keep out the cold. As an extra foam pad just seemed to defeat the portablilty issue, I decided on just an extra regular sleeping bag. The current small "down" bag I was using would insulate fine from the top as it would stay fluffy, but as my weight would compress the "down" below me I found it did little to keep me warm from underneath, but was exceptional to team-up with the new one as an insert. I have yet to try the giant "down" bag that was later given to me by my older brother, as I proceeded along my journey. I should mention the screening is great, I doubt the almost microscopic "No-Seeums" could even pose a problem. Also I got the more expensive version with aluminum stucture which I would strongly advise from the standpoint of less weight and freedom from possible corrosion. I even bought some pvc pipe and cheap bungee cords and made a sort of canopy using the rainfly and its zipper-open entrance.[...]</review_text>
this is a very comfortable, easy to set up, sturdy product. it is a little big to carry on your back - we tried it. but good for camping near the car</review_text>
Well built mags, heavy weight, and durable.  I have dropped these a few times out of my gun and they survived.  They dissasemble very easily if needed, and they look good, to boot.  My only complaint is that they hold 40 or 45 rounds, but they're only 4 bucks each, so buy 3 or 4.  You're gonna need it.</review_text>
I kind of went overboard researching products in this category. Finally, I went straight to the person who'd be the first to sleep on it: my 21-year-old daughter.  It would be her bed during Christmas vacation. "Any recommendations?" I ask. Without hesitation, she recalled sleeping on the Wenger at a friend's apartment in NYC. She said it was a huge step above other inflatable mattresses. In my experience, here's why it's so good: it's big, it's really comfortable, it's super-easy to inflate and deflate, and it folds up nicely into the compact stowaway bag which is included. Verdict: I really cannot imagine a better value -- it's easily worth twice the price</review_text>
Shoes are great cannot faulter them. Am Hanging for the weather to cool a little to give them a propper flogging</review_text>
Does what it says it's supposed to do.  Difficult (if not impossible) to store it in its built-in zippered pack (unless you want to spend a long time doing it)</review_text>
We have a large high end bike collection.  We keep them in the garage, covered and on racks.  These covers were one of two solutions for keeping our bikes in perfect shape.  (the other was to put large sheds inside our garage -- that did not work because of space).  The covers fit the bikes well and are good quality.  The bikes are a little difficult to put onto the racks with the covers on them but overall we are satisfied with these covers.  We bought 8 covers and we use them all the time</review_text>
Nice addtion to your dart collection.  I have gotten better over time and I consistantly hit my flights now and these guys have done a great job of keeping my flights from getting mangled in just one night.  I haven't noticed any difference in my flight patterns so I guess the added weight at the end is nominal</review_text>
We purchased this for a hike that we were doing this year, and previously at this same area we had a serious problem with Ticks.  This year we didn't even see any ticks so I can't say if this product would have helped in that area.  But, we did see a lot of mosquitoes, and of the 5 of us that went there was a total of 1 bite, for both days we were in the woods.The spray doesn't seem to repel the mosquitoes, since we saw a lot of them, and had them buzzing around us.  I am not sure of its killing power since I didn't see any dead mosquitoes on my clothes.  But I didn't see any live mosquitoes on my clothes either.It was kind of a hassle treating the clothes prior to the trip, so I would only recommend this product if you knew you were going to a bug infested location for a few days.  Otherwise use a more convenient bug spray</review_text>
The Cardinals waste basket is a perfect fit in my son's room.  It is large enough to hold a week's worth of trash but small enough not to dominate the room.  And of course the brightly colored logo is perfect for the rabid Cardinals fan</review_text>
I bought this compass to use with my telescope and it is large enough to use and see with a red light at night</review_text>
This is the most adorable bike ever.  My granddaughter loves it.  We needed a replacement for a defective part and it was immediately sent to us from the manufacturer.  Great product...Great service...Great value</review_text>
My daughter is 3 and loves this bike.  Fits her just right and it was easy to assemble</review_text>
I bought this for my husband as a Christmas gift.  He was thrilled with it.  The knife is beautiful, well-balanced and has the basic function</review_text>
I use this product everyday!  It is great for sore muscles.  Especailly working out your quads and calfs after a marathon.</review_text>
The Schwinn 203 was rather easy to put together.  About an hour by myself.  The only thing not real mastered yet is the computer.  Wish it had more button options, but would rate it good for the price.  Easy delivery, no need to be home and sign for delivery. ***</review_text>
We love our new Schwinn exercise bike! I checked consumer reports and this one was the best for the price (340.00). We were extremely happy with the fast shipping of the bike- although the box was bashed in on the corners and box open!! The assembly was direct and not difficult except for the shoving of the back (seat) section into the front half of the bike. It took all of our strength, then we realized that the wiring was cramped up inside and we had to pull it apart again.The next time we shoved the two together,it slid easily and we watched for the wires.This caution is not in the instructions- you may even need to tape the wire to hold it in place- maybe not the best design. Everything else is an absolute peach! The seat is very comfortable, the monitor/display is easy to read, the seat is adjustable for two tall people- the bike is super comfortable. The warranty is at least a year. Thanks Schwinn, thanks Amazon for helping us get back in shape in time for Summer</review_text>
This is a great bike for the money!  It has a variety of programs and resistance levels.  The higher resistance levels are quite challenging, so I believe this bike would be great for all fitness levels.  This bike is extremely quiet during operation; it is virtually silent.I read a review on a different site before purchase, and the "expert" stated that if you are going to get a "low end" bike, that Schwinn was the only way to go.  Even though you could possibly save $100 and get a cheaper brand, it just isn't worth it.  I completely agree with this reviewer.  For an extra hundred dollars, you get so much more.  I am extremely happy with this purchase!Assembly was fairly easy and all of the necessary tools were included in the box.  I have had the bike for a little over a month, and I have not experienced a single problem with the performance or construction of the bike</review_text>
I am age 60,have plantar fasciitis (foot pain) and cannot leave my disabled husband alone, so needed a way to exercise indoors.  This 203 Schwinn recumbent has been excellent.  It is clearly a quality product, very quiet.  The seat is supportive and comfortable, so I do not need to use my hands to steady myself.  Thus I have begun doing arm lifts and such while I ride, for a more complete workout.  I am a short 5 foot 2 1/2 inches, but on the closest seat setting, I can reach the pedals fine.  Anyone much shorter or with very short legs might have problems reaching. Also, it is not the 'walk-through' kind, so you must be able to lift your leg over the center section to use it. I wish it had a brighter or lighted digital readout, and that it would read my pulse with only one hand on the side sensors, but those are small problems. I recommend it highly and would choose it again</review_text>
This is one of the few LED flashlight-things that I really like. It gives room-filling light and you can hold it in the palm of your hand. It is a dandy thing for camping and power outages, and has a low power 25% setting for longer battery life.It uses 4 AA batteries, but gives almost as much light as a full-size 4-D Coleman camping lantern with a krypton bulb. The size is surprising small: about the size of a regular 2-D flashlight minus the head.It also has 2 small, but nice features. The top has a small loop handle made of wire that can be used to hang or attach it to things; if you have small fingers, it will fit 2 fingers through. It also has small feet that you can slide out for greater stability.My only concern is the battery life: the package does not list it, but the manufacturer's website claims 80 hours. I am rather skeptical, so carry spares just in case.  Mine has new batteries, so I cannot tell.</review_text>
Just what I was looking for.  Thank you for the amazingly fast delivery</review_text>
I absolutely love my 2 lb weights.  They are easy to hold in my hand.  I use them for a specific exercise video where holding hand held weighs would not work.Thanks</review_text>
I have been using the rack for a couple of months, and I am very happy with it.  It is quite solid and convenient to use.  The strap does not hurt the car at all. It is slightly inconvenient to have to undo the strap to open the trunk of my car, but it really only takes a few seconds.  It carries my bikes very securely, and I can get them on and off the rack in no time.One thing that was a surprise to me was the rack is fastened into the received with a special "no-wobble" bolt rather than a standard pin. This takes some time to install, and you really need to torque the bolt if you want it to stay tight. I have had to set aside the right size wrench and socket just for use here so that I can install/uninstall the rack reasonably quickly.  I am also concerned that the first part to wear out is going to be that special bolt, so I wish it had come with a spare</review_text>
My future wife and I like to make a four hundred plus mile trip to visit friends on Mackinac Island in MI. After several years of walking the hills there I decided to spend the money and buy this hitch so that we could take our bikes and see more of the island. I was looking for a hitch specific attachment that would not rub or create scratches on the car. I attached this to my Dodge Stratus and made the trip to and back without and problems. The bike rack easily is mounted and unmounted to the car hitch with a bolt. The rack fit easily in the trunk of my car when I don't need it. The bikes fit securly in place. I also used some bungie straps just to help secure my bikes a little more for the trip. If I need to get something out of the trunk, there is a quick release that lowers the rack a few feet so that I can swing the trunk hood open. I am more then quite pleased with this bike rack and will continue using it for our camping and vacation trips to visit our friends.</review_text>
I've had mine for three years now and it works well.  The strap that another review complains about is necessary: It helps stabilize the rack in the 1 1/4 inch hitch.  If I had to do it over, I probably would purchase a receiver with a 2 inch hitch--they appear to be more stable for bike carriers.  But for those of us with the 1 1/4 inch receivers, this rack works great. The carrier is well made and keeps the bikes away from the car.  The strap does't harm the car--my wife would kill me if I damaged her Lexus RX300</review_text>
This is a wonderful workout from Cathe!  As a recent Cathe convert, I am just begining her workouts, and this one was so much fun.  The workout will make you sweat, and provides a great cardio as well as weight work.  Cathe is encouraging and cues very well.  Don't get me wrong, the workout is challenging, no doubt there!  This will will remain in my dvd rotation because I can't wait to do it again!</review_text>
I LOVE this workout. The choreography is simple, yet fun, and with the blasts you get an excellent low-impact yet high intensity workout. Many of the strength training moves are compound exercises, which makes the work out both effective and efficient. I wish I could say Cathe's low impact workouts are "easier" than her other workouts - but she finds a way to work you to the max and challenge you every time.</review_text>
This ball is the least expensive of all my exercise equipment and yet I use it more than all the others.  It is very durable and alot of fun to use.  The foot pump makes it extremely easy to air up.  I usually have to add a little air every couple of weeks.  I use the exercise chart that came with the ball, but I haven't viewed the DVD yet.  I highly recommend this kit</review_text>
The GoFit Burst Resistant Ball exceeded my expectation. The quality is worth the cost, which is extremely reasonable. This is my first purchase of a stability ball and I believe I made the right choice. The package for the GoFit Burst Resistant Ball came with a DVD. The instructor on the DVD is excellent and guides you smoothly through each exercise. There was also a poster showing the different exercises, for those who prefer this method.I encourage anyone who wants to start focus their training on core areas such as the abdominals to purchase a GoFit Burst Resistant Ball. The cost is reasonable and you get the added bonus of a DVD and a wall poster. Including instructions on how to piece together the pump for the ball would be helpful. But it is relatively ease to figure out. Go GoFit...great produc</review_text>
this sword i got for my mom for christmas she loved it so this sword is good for any collectio</review_text>
The sword looks better in reality than in the picture. It was suprisingly cool. It arrived on time. No problems here</review_text>
the product ordered arrived quickly, and packed cautiously. I was happy with dealing with this dealer, and the product was of better quality than I expected it would be. It is sturdy, well made, and actually quite heavy. It even looks better in person than on the pictures, which any buyer knows is usually the opposite way around. a good buy, worth the money. It slides easily out of the scabbard, and was also sharpened. My son likes it alot</review_text>
This lamp is worth the money, and then some.How often have you come up behind a bicycle at night on the street, and seen the rider before you saw the little bitty blinky light they had hanging on their back?That isn't going to happen here; this thing is Bright!  Don't look straight at it in the dark from close range, because it'll dazzle you pretty well.Each of the two rows of lights has three facing back and one on each side, and the two rows are switched independently, so you can have two different flash patterns running at the same time.  The options for each switch are:  all 5 flash together, steady, ripple side to side, and random.  I usually set the top row to flash together, and the bottom to ripple.Let me tell you, this is one kinetic and eye grabbing display.  You'll actually see objects to either side of you reflecting the side firing lights as you ride past.  No one is going to miss you when you're pulling this lamp.Yes it's pricey.  How much is it worth to you to have that bloody eight foot wide Hummer 2 see you in the dark?Thought so.Spend the cash; you won't be disappointed.Ride safe and enjoy.</review_text>
various independent testers have concluded this light to the best of the best.  i am completely satisfied.  if you want very bright, then this is the light for you.  2 rows of lights, independently controlled, allows you a myriad of lighting patterns and intensity.  the light is pricey, but this is one item i wouldn't suggest scrimping on.  designed and made in japan, it is, as expected, well done</review_text>
A friend got me one of these recently, and I have to say it is the best light I've ever used. I get a lot of biking in, especially in the early morning, sometimes at night. The light it emits is VERY bright - you WILL be seen. The lightbulbs on each SIDE of this thing add further visibility. So far, it is very sturdy and reliable. There are two rows of lights. You can illuminate one, or both for maximum luminescence. It offers several combinations of flash patterns, which is cool</review_text>
My daughter got this for Christmas and she loves it.  Its easy to set up and fill with air and hold the air.  She mostly plays on it but so far its held up to a 2 and 4 year old.  Great product and worth the money</review_text>
My wife left me and took all the furniture and the kids furniture so I needed some temporary replacements.  My 3 children told me that these air beds are more comfortable than there original beds.  Thanks for bailing me out of a bad situation</review_text>
I purchased the Wenzel Twin air bed in anticipation of a friend coming to visit, not for camping which was probably its intended purpose.The air bed is very nice for the price, very functional and easy to set up.  It took a few seconds to figure out the manual pump, and then a few minutes to fill it up (get ready to use a little elbow grease).The beds are pretty short when fully inflated, so I would agree with the "buy two" suggestion if you're using them at home.  If you're using them for camping and only need to get off the ground, then you're probably more than fine with a single</review_text>
I got this airbed thinking it was a double as it said TWIN on all the information...However...when I received it in the post, it turned out to be a single!!??  I'm still a little onfused but maybe it because I'm British and twin means single in the US (can anyone help me???)??  Twin in my opinion means double???  Or am I completely wrong???Apart from my confusion and disappointment that I didn't get a double (my poor dad had to sleep on the hard floor!!) the bed is good quality and pumps up easily.A good airbed but make sure when you buy the twin, you realise it's a single...or maybe I'm the only person in the World to make a silly mistake like this??</review_text>
The best deal on Air Beds with integrated pump, no batteries needed. You can use your hands or foot to pump it. I got 2 of them, so placed one on top of the other, they make normal hight bed for guests in the house or tent. They keep iflation well, the kids like to pump them without help, VERY GOOD BUY</review_text>
I have had one of these fans since year 2000. I found my first one at the Real Goods store. Used it in my truck instead of the air conditioner and in my trailer. Then I took it to Haiti and used it in my jeep. The A/C works in that, but is noisy and eats a lot of gasoline. Basically I prefer a fan rather than chilled air.The motor and wiring are still going strong, very well built. I had to replace the fan blade itself once. A replacement blade unit was available thru a Marine Supply store.Ca-fra-mo means Canadienne Fractional Motors. These units are actually built in North America. Northern North America. Canada. They still build things there.I need to get another as I am in Kalifornya now and left my fan with the Jeep in Hayti. I'll buy it thru Amazon as all other purchase methods require entering credit card data again</review_text>
After an extensive analysis of various battery and 12V fan options, I decided to purchase this product to facilitate my cardio workouts.  Instead of mounting the fan to the dash of an automobile or boat, I have attached it to one specific piece of equipment, the LifeFitness 9500HR elliptical machine. This is to aid cooling during my one hour/1,200 calorie workouts. For this purpose, it has done an excellent job.The Caframo Ultimate 12V fan is the most powerful compact fan I have identified thus far. With exceptionally solid construction, it is far sturdier than other 12V or battery fans I have tested. The quality components are evident throughout the design, highlighted by a large machined brass knob that controls the angle. Other design elements are questionable, however.The one feature of this fan that I dislike it's use of exposed, soft fan blades. In my particular application, this has led to a vibration problem.  To realize the power and life required, I have connected the fan to two (2) 9.8 volt RC batteries in series for a total of 19.6V.   In this arrangement, the fan develops an intense volume of air.  There is quite a bit of vibration that I assume is due to the flapping of the blades.The lack of a housing, which directs the airstream, creates another problem.  Any crosswind, however slight, severely limits the fan's effectiveness. It would seem almost impossible to use this in any outdoor application for this reason.In short, this is one of the best consumer 12V fans available.  However, you may want to consider alternatives if the fan will be subjected to any disruptive airflows.</review_text>
thank</review_text>
This cap arrived only a few days after placing my order. I was a little worried that the quality wouldn't be good since it only cost $3.99 but was pleasantly surprised at how great it looked and felt when it arrived. A great deal</review_text>
The new ball, soon to be the old ball, is a marvel of technology.  NBA players complained long enough and loud enough to the league to have it replaced.  Yet, the statistics do not support the complaints.  Shooting percentage is up slightly this year with the new ball, and does anyone believe that skills are up this year?  This ball will now become a collectors item.  Recreational players have a lot of options, including a new ball reputed to need less frequent filling.  Ball preference for most of us is just that, a preference.  Some prefer a tackier ball, some less.  Some balls are great when dry, less so when wet.  Like different shoes, I like to keep a variety of balls around and choose depending on mood and conditions.  This should be, as advertised, an indoor ball only.</review_text>
I have always been a nut for buying new products when it comes to basketball.I have tried several basketballs when it comes to the higher level end balls.  NCAA Solution, NAIA Rawlings Leather, NBA Leather Game, and now the NBA Composite Game ball.I will say that when it comes to grip, the NCAA Solution ball is still the tackiest of the basketballs, but the new NBA game ball has a much better initial grip than the old Leather ball.  This has some advantages and disadvantagesGripAdvantage - Players with smaller hands will be able to grip this ball better.  The ball seems to almost stick to your hands whereas the old leather game ball did not.Disadvantage - The ball seems to also stick to the backboard whereas the other ball would glide off of it.I did find that I was having problems bouncing the ball, it did not bounce properly, but this problem was fixed after a game of playing.  The old leather balls took months before they lost their plastic like feel.I do not feel that the ball gets slick when wet as was the complaint of NBA players who played with the ball.  Obviously I am not at the caliber that they are at, but I feel that the ball always had a constant grip whereas the old leather game balls would get slick when wet.The downside to this all is the price.  I feel that the 100 price tag that most retailers are charging for this ball is a bit high.  Hopefully this ball will go down in price.  I am hoping that Spalding will take their cross traction technology to their other composite balls that way other players will be able to take advantage of the new panels.PanelsI really did like the new panels that this ball has.  I do feel that the bounce is more consistent with this new design.OverallI still think i would prefer the NCAA Solution ball, but this ball has a very short life span.  The NBA composite game ball is a high quality ball, but if you enjoy the classic feel of leather, you should buy the old game balls before they entirely zone them out</review_text>
Helps put my son back to sleep!  He's used it since he was 8 months and has used it every night...he's now 2.5 yrs old!  LOVE IT</review_text>
If I had to choose only one toy for my baby from all that he had in the first three years, this would be it.  Hands down.  He was facinated by the sights and sounds and UNLIKE so many baby toys that have music, this music was actually pleasant and easy to listen too.  Beautiful classical music (Brahms Lullaby) and a very nice rendition of 'twinkle twinkle little star'  Twinkle Twinkle was so smooth and calming it took me awhile to realize what I was listening to because it wasn't blaringly annoying.  My sons crib was in our bedroom for the first 6 months and listening to this crib toy play music was so calming and pleasant,  even for me.  It is a definite must have for your little gem.  It is the gift I ALWAYS give at baby showers</review_text>
We received this acquarium at a baby shower.  At first I was concerned it was going to be too TV-like.  However, it's very interactive and is appropriate for a broad range of developmental levels.  My daughter is 8 months old and still enjoys pulling the lever and spinning the ball.As far as being a soothing instrument to aid in falling asleep, I can't say this provided anything like that.  However, often in the mornings she will wake up and play quietly for 5-10 minutes</review_text>
This is the second Ocean Wonders Aquarium I have bought. My son took the first one for his second child's crib. My first grandson won't go to sleep without the Ocean Wonders Aquarium playing its soothing music! It is the best!! I wish I had one for my four children in the '70's!</review_text>
This is the best.  My daughter is now 17 months old, & she still uses it every day. She has a hard time falling asleep, & the music & light seem to be soothing to her. I love it because she is able to turn it on when she's upset or is having a hard time falling asleep, & it turns off on its own. She enjoys spinning the starfish & turning the ball that opens & closes the clam's mouth. Now that she's tall enough, she also gets a kick out of being able to reach up & change the song herself by moving the switch at the top</review_text>
This is a great nighttime soother for my daughter.  She's now big enough to press the button to start it herself if she wakes up during the night and feels a little lonely.</review_text>
I love this basket.  I have wanted a removable basket for my crusier, but wicker looks best on it.  I like being able to put all my stuff in the basket and then carry it around with me.  The basket is bigger than I thought it would be, and it sets up high on my handlebars.  because of this I have had a hard time mounting a headlight, which is required by law (where I live) at night</review_text>
First of all, the thing to understand about this cable is how it is intended to be used.  You can use it as a low-security bike lock with a padlock of your choice.  Onguard's web site rates the security of their products and the rating on this one indicates the amount of security it provides.  You can also use it in tandem with a u-lock to secure your front wheel to the u-lock and the rest of your bike.  In this situation the security provided should be quite good.Secondly, the quality of this cable is outstanding for what it is.  All of the pieces fit together very nicely and the materials used are excellent.  This is a far nicer choice than many others out there.So if you are looking for a decent lock in low-crime areas or if you want something to use with your more protective u-lock this is a great choice.  On the other hand, if you think you can use this and some padlock you've got lying around then you are going to be disappointed</review_text>
Anyone interested in weight training without a lot of space at home to do it will love this small set.  The weights are easy to change</review_text>
I have this set, but not in the cool black color Amazon has. I got mine from walley mart for a few dollars less. They sell the dumbbells with 24 pounds weights for about sixty dollars and the add on 24 pound pack is another thirty. Mine is in blue and yellow so the color amazon has might be worth spending the few extra dollars for.(Amazon has since changed the picture to reflect what I have color wise.)With that said, I'm female, I was interested in the bow flex 552 set until I saw it at my local store. Good god they are HUGE! I thought about the 220 set which I'm sure is smaller but no one carried it in store. And since I didn't want to go through the hassle to ship it back if I didn't like them, I passed on the 220.The Sports blocks are far smaller then the bow flex set, perfect for women or teens and people with not much space. The weights themselves seem well made, my only concern is the changing pin for changing the weights. The hand is plastic with two metal pins and a small knock you turn. You turn the knob, pull the pin out and move it to another weight. The knob is what locks it in place. I believe the knob is metal but again, it sits in a plastic housing (the handle) and I have bad night mares of it breaking while over my head. So far though they have been fine, just plastic makes me nervous when its holding 20 pounds over my precious skull.The weights are very easy to change except for when you try to put all 48 pounds on them. For some reason it has a hard time lining up, and with the pins being on a plastic handle you really don't want to force it in. It would have been better to charge another 10 bucks and make the whole pin handle metal.Other then that, time will tell how long this pin handle will last. I hope Gofit sells replacements for it. Still if your short on cash but need a good adjustable set, that will grow with you, you really can't go wrong with this set.I would have given this set a 5 if not for the plastic pin handle</review_text>
This is a great pair of adjustable dumbbells at a fraction of the cost. It is very simple to use and takes the place of 8 sets of dumbells in a very small space. It has a great trey that everything fits in and besides it just looks cool.The DVD workout that comes with the GoFit Sportblock is incredible. It is produced by Mark Verstegen who is the owner of Athletes Performance and is considered the best trainer in the nation. Mark's workout is very simple and takes about 20 minutes to do the whole thing but I have seen incredible results in my arms,stomach, legs, and butt. It is awesome!Buy it you won't be sorry and you will see incredible results!</review_text>
We love this water bottle!  One thing we like that a previous poster did not is the fact that it's made with the hard polycarbonate plastic.  That means it doesn't leach plastic particles (and plastic taste) into your water. This water bottle is a real boon to lactating women--it may be TMI but when you're making milk you need to drink lots of water and this bottle makes it easily accessible and yet spill proof (which is helpful when you have a toddler on the loose).  LOVE the colors--only recommendations is that Camelbak come out w/some more colors in their largest bottle and that they create a 24 oz bottle that will fit in a bike bottle holder and most car cup holders.Wife of Willie Two Beards :-</review_text>
I am very happy with my purchase, the unique way that it allows you to drink without raising your head. I got it mainly for when I am on my motorcycle</review_text>
This is a great item. It looks awsome, feels awsome. But it's not strong at all. Use this only for working on your stance, swing, control...things like that. DO NOT...I REPEAT...DO NOT go around hitting things with this. It will break faster then you can say bull (You finish this lol). I got it in the mail today and by the end of the day i was taping it up with duck tape lol, because i was practicing and i hit my floor by mistake.But anyway, this is worth the price. I'll buy it again if i had the money</review_text>
excellent product, the envy of my kendo class...fast shipping good service, i'm happy all around...thanks again</review_text>
It's a nice boken, it feels nicely balanced, looks good, and has a nice price.The handle wrap was the main reason for my purchase of this item; it keeps the boken in your hands even if they are sweaty. I was a little wary of the wrapping to come undone, so I just placed a few drops of super glue on the ends and a few of the places in-between, just to make sure it stays in place. It's a good practice sword and it serves its purpose, worth the buy in my opinion.Another reviewer has stated that his boken broke when it was struck, this may very well be. However, it is not because of faulty craftsmanship, it is because the boken is not meant for contact. It is purely a device to help you hone your sword handling skills without chopping off your arm, which you could do with a real katana.If you want a contact sword to spar with friends, I suggest getting a shinai. Unlike the boken, a shinai is actually meant for sparring and will not break under normal use</review_text>
The cord-wrapped handle is a great idea, offering more of a real sword-like look as well as a firmer grip. My hands tend to get sweaty and slip around a bit with long practice, particularly with the sealed lacquered finish on most bokken. This wrap really helps (though it needed a touch of glue to get it to stay in place). The two-piece guard design is a nice enhancement too. Though you really don't need the guard at all for many applications it is nice looking and appears stronger than the original. It's still a fairly cheap piece of wood, compared to an ironwood version, but at this price (it was $9.99 when I bought it) you really can't go wrong. A nice enhancement over the basic bokken. Recommended</review_text>
I thought I had thoroughly researched the Kettlers, but I didn't get all the details on this one.  Unfortunately, Amazon got them wrong. They advertised this bike as having the "free wheeling" option, when it DOES NOT. I love the quality of the bike, have had no tipping problems, and the upgraded wheels are great. I'm giving it four stars because the pedals hit my daughter's feet when she doesn't keep them pedaling. I'd recommend spending more to get those free wheels</review_text>
This basket was exactly the size we were looking for and was easy to install.  Arrived promptl</review_text>
I bought this pogo for my oldest daughter 5 years ago.  It has been through 5 children, twice yearly block parties, being abandoned in the rain, and generally abused.  It was still in great shape right up until last week when my 7yo left it behind my car and I ran it over.  She is now saving her allowance to replace it with an identical pogo stick.  It's perfect for petite children...the only one they've ever tried that they can actually get to bounce.  One of the few toys they've used year after year.Update:The replacement pogo just came today.  Although I was expecting pink and purple, the color is actually deep red and blue.  This was neutral for me as we have girls and either color scheme works.  This one looks even sturdier than the one I ran over.  The frame is of larger diameter, it weighs a little more, and the tip is bigger and heavier.  Good thing because I have 3 more kids behind the older ones who haven't yet sampled the joys of pogo-sticking</review_text>
this pogo stick is well made.  that is the first thought that enters your head when you see and hold it for the first time.i bought this for my 6yr old.  she is small and does not weigh a whole lot.  she has a tough time getting the spring to compress.  she is somewhere between 45 to 50 lbs.i noticed a lot of reviews complaining that the tip wore down and kids were receiving head injures.  so i bought and recommend getting a helmet, elbow, and knee pads</review_text>
The service Amazon.com provided was absolutely outstanding. I had order aFoam Maverick Pogo stick on Dec 15, 2006 and I received it on Dec 18th.  Prior to ordering through Amazon, I tried to order the item from Target, Toys R Us and a couple of website and they all stated they were either out of stock or the item will not be shipped until mid January.  I totally freaked out and was about to panic because the pogo stick was the #1 item on my daughter's Christmas list. When I had tried the website again, Amazon prompted and I thought I'll check it out.  I couldn't believe the item was in stock, shipping was only 2-3 days and let alone on sale.   I was ecstatic.  I order it and got it within 3 days.  The pogo stick is very nice and my daughter is very happy.  Keep up the outstanding service Amazon.com!!!!</review_text>
I got my daughter this pogo stick for Christmas and she really loves it. It was a bit stiff at first, just like the enclosed directions indicated, but once I bounced it up and down a bit, it loosened up enough for her weight to have it go up and down a bit. Mine was red and blue - OK for a boy or a girl. She's have a great time learning how to use it and getting exercise at the same time.</review_text>
We got this pogo stick for our 5 year old son for Christmas.  At first, he couldn't do it.  But he kept trying it, and now has mastered it.  He loves it!  It's very well made and can go really high.  If you have a child that it fairly active and likes running and jumping, this is a great toy.  It also gets them outside and away from the tv</review_text>
Our 5 year old loves this pogo stick.  She can't do it by herself yet but she's having a blast trying.  If your child gets frustrated easy, it might not be the best since it takes a lot of practice.  Otherwise, it is one of those timeless toys that you might recall using as a child yourself.  It's very sturdy and has taken a while to break in but overall it was a great buy.  Looked great next to the Christmas tree, too, with just a bow.  Obviously, it's a better toy for the spring and summer--maybe by then she'll get the hang of it</review_text>
Purchased for my 6 year old and while she has not mastered it, she has a lot of fun trying and with it all padded it seem to be as safe as can be.  It was damaged when I received it, I called the company and they had a replacement part to me in just a couple days</review_text>
This mat is the best I have found.  Went to several local stores to buy a mat.  All were either the same price or more expensive, but terrible quality!  Pilates mats need to be non-slip and a bit cushy.  The Stott Pilates green mat is all of above and a great price too!  Mine came with a sunrise DVD that is fantastic as well!  Stott Pilates is the way to go</review_text>
I bought this toy for my 6 month old daughter and she likes it. Can't say she loves it though. She likes to chew on the key as a teether and she loves to pull the turtle hair (3 strings on its head). I really don't think it's a bad toy at all. Legs are a little hard to squeeze. but I figured if she likes musical toys, I'll buy her a real one. Not this turtle.</review_text>
We've debated getting my daughter Octotunes because we've played around with it in stores and it seems like a fun toy. Her father and I both have some musical background from being in band and want her to be engaged in music when she's older. We thought fo $5.29 this would be a bargain since Octotunes is about $25.When it came I thought it was cute but noticed immedietly that the legs don't honk as nicely as the octopus. Not only that but one of them doesn't honk at all unless you really squeeze it. I can't imagine a young child being able to do it. The shell which is supposed to be like a drum makes almost no noise. Would have been nicer if it was more hollow. Instead it sounds like the equivilent of banging on a wall. The head- which is a maraca- barely makes noise. The whole toy leaves much to be desired.Although I can't complain for the price we paid, it is a nice size toy even though it is rather large and bulky for a young baby, I was expecting a bit more. It's colorful and cute but that's about all it is.</review_text>
Your home gym won't be complete without these great workout bars.  They're sturdy and easy to transport.  The comfortable grips are built for tough workouts</review_text>
looks like cheap plastic but they are tough enough to handle hard exercise - suprised at the comfort level of these.  Much better than the ones I use at the Gym - nice handles and they can be stripped down to transport.  Seems to meet expectations for this type of equipment</review_text>
very nice. a must have for home workout. takes up no space, works very well, turning your hands at different angles ads versatilit</review_text>
Like other reviewers said these are made of plastic.  However that said it's high quality thick plastic, and they never feel weak at all.  I weigh more than the two reviewers before me (230lbs or so), but they still feel completely solid, so that shouldn't be any issue at all.I like these bars for a couple of reasons.  One you can lower your body below your hands, providing a workout for different muscles.  Second it's a lot easier to put your hand around a nicely padded bar then flat on the floor, so this makes the whole setup easier.They also break down so you can store them in smaller areas, or even travel with them.  You wouldn't think it makes much of a difference, but it does, well worth the money</review_text>
Although these push-up bars are made from plastic, they support my 185 lb frame just fine. They make push-ups more effective by allowing you to dip lower. Very comfortable. Great item</review_text>
IF you're buying ANY model with maximun weight less than 300lbs  you truly miss out on the benefits of "going heavy".  As long as you're serious about gaining muscle mass then you need to upgrade</review_text>
After you've surpassed the 210 pounds of resistance, you'll need this upgrade bar to keep increasing your weight.  This bar adds an additional hundred pounds of resistance</review_text>
I've had two different Bowflex versions over the course of about 10 years.  I've never had a problem with either of them.  These rods are upgrading the older model, and it is still going as strong as ever.</review_text>
For most of us who exercise regularly, the Bowflex Sport is a fine exercise machine. Unfortunately though, two hundred and ten pounds of resistance is not enough. The 310 lb. upgrade is a neccessity for serious workout. I found by upgrading to 310 lbs., I can't bench press the whole machine. I would recommend for any serious lifter, when you buy the the bowflex sport to immediately upgrade to 310 lbs</review_text>
If you want a good workout - you got it with this.  This is tough and challenging but WILL give you results for sure.There are three super challenging workouts here and each targets specific body area using heavier weights than normal, but slow repetitive movements.  This is done to really fatigue the muscles and make them work harder.  You aren't using momentum but instead concentrating on intensity and that's how you get the results.  There is a Legs and Shoulders workout, a Triceps and Biceps one and a Chest and Back.  There is no way possible you won't get results if you do this often.  It is tough but it's worth it and worth every penny spent.  She is an outgoing and motivating instructor and you are bound to love this dvd</review_text>
I am glad I purchased this dvd along with the Upper Body DVD.  Marjolein Brugman is a great teacher and it starts with warm ups for the lower body (in some ways similar to the Upper Body Workout.  I did feel the burn with the exercises.  The time passed quickly and there are alternate views of foot position using a mini picture screen in the top right hand corner of the screen.  There is faint classical music in the background.  I wish the music was more inspiring though.</review_text>
I searched for my wife a bike and everywhere I went, the price was way more than what I wanted to pay.  I wanted a bike that was well constructed, lite, and has high rated parts on it.  I found this bike and I compared the price with a comparable bike at a bike shop and it was nearly $100 cheaper, plus free shipping.  After we received the bike, we were very satisfied of the product except for the seat, but you can purchase a nice gel seat for around $15.  Great deal</review_text>
I really like this bike...it is a great little starter 'road' bike.  It can take some rougher terrain, but I wouldn't take it off roading constantly.  I don't think it's built to tolerate a whole lot of that.  After assembling the bike we did take it to our local bike shop and spent $10 on getting it adjusted just right...the gears weren't shifting right from lower 4th and 5th.  They were getting hung up a little, but the shop fixed that right up.  Seems something was bent a little.  I also had the brakes adjusted as they were riding the rims of the wheels and they definitely weren't supposed to be that close!  Nice bike for the price though and free shipping!  Can't beat it</review_text>
Amazon doesn't provide much detail about this mat.  Mine just arrived so here's some extra info.  It is 22" wide by 70" long and 3/8" thick.  The integrated velcro straps work very well, keeping it rolled neatly for storage</review_text>
This is the best thing I every bought!  I will never be without one again!This is a "must-have" for every womans purse</review_text>
I love this, it's the second one I have bought!  It's easy to put together, easy to move around, and it keeps the baby safe and entertained</review_text>
We purchased this item 2 months ago for our VERY active 1 year old. We found that it was nearly impossible to keep up with her all the time, however when we put her in the pack n' play she would scream. This is THE perfect alternative.  We did purchase two of them (she needs a lot of space). The assembly was easy, its easy to get in and out of, but she could not pull it apart- the gate is very secure and she loves the toys attached to the back of the pen.My only complaints are this: it's still relatively small- as i said we purchased two of them to make a large pen- the superyard XT comes with more panels but i felt that the edges were sharp, there's no gate, and it's hard to pull apart.Also the toys run out of battery so fast, and there is no on or off switch for them</review_text>
As a WAHM of 4 - including 11 month old twins - the only way I can ever get a lick of work done, is to corral my busy babies. They have had this playzone since they were old enough to sit up. I bought two extensions to start with, but have since upgraded to a total of 4. it is SO worth the money for the upgrade. I have set up "activity centers" of my own inside of it, with little people stations, stuffed animal stations, blocks stations, book stations, etc. And I change it up constantly so they don't get bored. Now that they are walking, they fight over the phone, but still love their playzone! I definitely recommend this for any busy mom</review_text>
This playpen is nice because you can get extensions (or, like we did just buy two of the full set) and configure it for your needs.  It is particularly useful because you can keep it on the smaller side for normal use, but add in extensions when other kids come over to make it larger.  Everything fits together well, is easy to assemble, and the battery-powered sections are amusing for the kids.  Some pieces are little rough, nothing alarming though</review_text>
Very nice doesn't look like a dog cage and Cyney loves the activity center and the bright collor</review_text>
My son loves it!  He enjoys playing inside the playzone area.  Not only that, it helps me a lot when I'm doing some house cleaning and able to finish my job.  This is a must have</review_text>
We got this to corral our twin sons and it works awesome. The colors and board entertain them and they have yet to figure a way out on there own. Sometimes we leave the door open and our older child likes to go in and play too. Its quite a hit with anyone who comes to visit with little ones</review_text>
The pogo stick is very well-built. We first bought one locally, but had some problems with the foam splitting. The second one we bought here on Amazon. It came quickly, it's had no problems and the kids have really been enjoying it.One thing to be careful about: there is no packing or space around the pogo stick (after all it IS already foam-wrapped). Since the ends of the box are heavily glued, you might be thinking about using a knife to open it. Since the pogo stick is just under the cardboard with no protection, and you use a knife...enough said.In fact, the packaging is the only reason I marked it down - it's just too easy to damage if you use any tools at all to open it. Just rip it apart, and you'll be fine.Highly recommended</review_text>
This is a fun throwback toy, but be aware that the child you are buying it for should be at least 100 lbs in order for it to be effective.  The 80 lbs that the company recommends is just a little too light to compress the spring in the pogo stick.  I would also recommend not using it on rougher asphalt, as that is what seems to wear down the tip the most.  Using it on smooth driveway concrete seems to be just fine, and all the neighborhood kids come around to take turns bouncing around on the pogo stick.Hey, its a fun toy for kids that encourages exercise (Having tried it out, it's quite the workout!)  There are the obvious safety issues that are part and parcel of a toy of this nature, but that is not just specific to this particular pogo stick, it's pogo sticks in general, so it is somewhat unfair to single out this paricular product as being "hazardous"</review_text>
This pogo stick is very well built and worth the money.  The handlebars seem a little close together  and I wish they were longer but my niece and her friends love it.  Not good for anyone under 70-80 lbs because of the heavy duty spring needing more weight to make it bounce.  The best pogo stick I found for the price</review_text>
My son got this for his birthday.  He LOVES it and uses it whenever the weather lets him.  After only 1 week of using it a plastic part broke on it. It still works, but not the exactly way it's supposed to.</review_text>
whoever claims they got hurt on this stick, just an fyi, its probably your own fault. it rocks for just jumping up and down, but it is even better for tricks. the only problem with it is that it wont stand up to much abuse, i tried to do a vert stall and ate it hard and the hanlebar bent. but yo can order replacement parts online so it okay. overall awesome stick</review_text>
My 9 1/2 yr. old son got his 1st pogo stick when he was 4 yrs.  Mastered it in a few days, jumped on it sooo much the metal of the jumping pole was paper thin. Since then he has owned a couple more.  Well he is now close to 90 lbs. 5 ft. tall, and it was hard to find a durable enough pogo.  Well, the Neon was a perfect match!  He can jump on it forever, and it still has plenty of spring, and allows him to reach incredible heights! Very sturdy.  A winner</review_text>
I got this about 5 months ago. When I first got it, it was the only thing I would be doing. At first, I had to get used to it being a little heavy,but after I got used to it it was really fun.All my friends learned how to do it. Of course, like every toy, it got old after awhile. So if you're not sure you will use it for a long time,don't by it yet. I have read that the tip has worn off on other people's pogo sticks, but I have been using this for along time and nothing happened yet. Overall, if you love the outdoors,this toy will keep you outside for a good amount of time</review_text>
Halex Cyclone 1 Star Table Tennis Balls are some of the BEST that I have used, they are a GOOD Value for the money</review_text>
Just what we were looking for, easy to assemble, quick delivery, qualityproduct, not overpriced; good value</review_text>
I've had several "fat" Swiss Army knives over the years, and this is my favorite.  The highlights for me were three things: The screwdriver socket set, the pliers, and the pull out pen.  (I also like the option to get this knife in blue.  I have been so used to the red ones I was glad for the change).First, regarding the screwdriver socket pieces, they are pretty well made, with a tiny spring loaded bearing in the middle.  This means that when you plug the pieces into the socket they sort of lock in, and won't drop out when you are trying to use them.  The 4 socket bits are double sided (with a separate driver head on each side).  They contains 3 different sizes of Phillips heads, 3 hex heads (weird, but useful on the off chance you need them), 1 octagon head (basically a "blank"), and 1 regular screwdriver head.  (Keep in mind that the knife set also contains the standard screwdriver options as well, so that explains why only 1 socket is a regular screwdriver.  You also get a tiny screwdriver which is stored within the corkscrew, and a larger one that flips out from the back of the knife).Second, is the cool set of pliers.  They are relatively thick, so can actually be of some use, and most Swiss Army knives don't come with this feature.Third, is the tiny pen which you can separate from the knife entirely.  I keep this knife in my car, and on many occasions I don't have a pen lying around, and I grab this one to help me out.Finally, I am quite pleased that this set did not contain a USB drive like some of the other new Swiss Army knives. This might be initially entertaining, but in 6 months it is going to be so outdated that you are going to wish you had a plain old knife! (Imagining trying to give this knife to your kid in 10 years.  Dad, what is this weird thing on the knife?)Great Stocking Stuffer</review_text>
I received one of these as a gift 3 years ago in sapphire, and I absolutely love it.  As a PC tech, its handy to have a screwdriver on hand, or a dip-switch setter (pen).  I've found myself utilizing every element on this knife at one time or another since I've owned it.  I definitely recommend it to any self-professed geek</review_text>
I got quite a few in 3 years and they are really durable, washable and are not ripped off yet. They're good wraps for heavy bags but get some gloves too</review_text>
I purchased this wraps for my Tae Bo classes. I use them to make sure that my hands are always closed when I'm punching. Mostly for good form. I used them to punch mitts. I absolutelly loved them! I read the reviews and some said that these were a bit short. It has been perfect for me, I have small hands but still the wraps are so long! I encourage these for everybody</review_text>
These wraps are comfortable and easy to clean.  I'd recommend them to anyone for training</review_text>
This product works great.  I love it.  I love swiss army materials.  Always a good durable product.  Doesn't dull very easily that is why I love it.  The scisscors and pliers come in handy a lot.  The saw did once two when a friend of mine couldn't fit his couch through the door so we sawed off a corner on the couch and bingo it was through</review_text>
We got this for our 3y/o son to have indoors during the winter.  We have a large outdoor one for the summer, that the kids love.  This is the perfect one to have for indoors to get some exercise.  It is not too big so there is less chance for injuries, and it is easy for my son to use</review_text>
This product is a bag of happiness.  I have 3 kids and an extended family that includes 17 children.  When we get together, which is often, Field in a Bag always makes its way out of the trunk.  Whether we are playing softball, Little League baseball or just running bases, this product is indispensable.  Imagine running bases with all those little kids sliding  and not have the base sliding halfway across the yard!And the best part, when the fun is over it all goes back in its bag and in the trunk of my car for next time.  Love it</review_text>
I purchased two sets of Field-in-a-Bag to give as gifts for two of my grandchildren.  Both of their parents told me that the kids loved to set-up the bases and then play baseball.  They would imitate the major league players by pitching, sliding and base running.  One of my sons said that he loved the fact that the bases were designed to help avoid foot injuries when a child would slide into the base with a lot of force.My other son is not very astute with following directions and he loved the simplicity of setting up the bases with the enclosed measuring strings and directions.Great gift for all kids who love to play baseball</review_text>
What more is there to say?  The National Pastime has never been more accessible.  It's about time someone thought of this</review_text>
I have 2 children each of who have lots of friends, and i can say that there are no more boring afternoons since we've become the owners of Field in a Bag!  Its a great way to break out with a baseball game anytime, anywhere.  The children are able to set up, have lots of fun playing, and clean up themselves!  It's easy to use and the bag keeps all the parts together.  Can it get any better than that</review_text>
Loved this product.  Found it child safe.  Easy to set up. Have used it many times - very durable.  Lightweight and easy to transport. As stated in the directions, it is not meant to be used with cleats.  Great gift for kids of all ages</review_text>
I am very happy with this product.  You can always count on Cateye and this Headlight is no exception.  It is well worth the price</review_text>
These come in 2000 piece bottles, and random color, so if you order two they will both be the same random colour</review_text>
Very smooth polished BBs.  Not orange though.  Bought two bottles, both green</review_text>
We bought this model for my husband so he could keep up with our kids who have the smaller Razor scooters.  The foot bed and handle bars are both a bit longer than the other model which is great for his size 12 feet and taller stature.  It rolls very smoothly as well</review_text>
I remember when the Razor scooters first came out and I have this idea they were fairly pricey at the time.  Well, they are very inexpensive now and if you weigh more than 143 lb you will need the Pro model.  Everyone in our family has one and we happily scoot all over the neighborhood on weekends!</review_text>
I bought this for my son and one for his friend and they are 14 years old.  They like to do tricks on them and jump high stairs.  The regular scooters would break in a couple of days but this pro model really lasts</review_text>
ive own this scooter and it has severd me well. if you are an advancing scooterer,like me, i would recomend this scooter or the A2 or A3 VERY sturdy. great scooter</review_text>
Our son hasn't stopped zipping around on his new scooter....it's very durable</review_text>
This is the best type of scooter. Definately worth the money. My sons ages 9 and 12 use these in the street and on the ramps.</review_text>
i bought this for my husband as a surprise xmas present. he was not expecting a razor scooter but since i bought the same thing for my kids i thought it'd be funny.  it was funny but it has also been great fun!  scooters are not hard to ride and it's a great way to be active with the kids. good family fun</review_text>
I love this thing. It hasn't failed to open anything that I've tried on it. My hands say thank you and when it bites the dust you can bet another one will be on it's way</review_text>
What can one really say about inflating needles?  They are well made and were exactly what I was expecting.  No surprises here</review_text>
Quality batting, a little larger than most (good for me I'm 6'3 )and a bit less expensive than others I looked at online</review_text>
These Are great wraps for little money. If you're just working the bags as a hobby or just for something to get the blood flowing these are great. If you're really getting into boxing or any sort of pugalistic sport, spend the extra money on some gloves</review_text>
although a little to big for me i still like them they are very good hand wraps and i think you sould buy them</review_text>
Purchasing from Amazon was much more convenient than going to my local sporting goods store.  No traffic, no lame excuses of why the product is not in stock, and no waiting in lines.  I received a good quality product that was hassle free</review_text>
Not much to say. if you are in the martial arts industry and need hand wraps - this is it. the price is right, and very high quality</review_text>
This is a well made tool that serves the most needed bike tool functions in a minimum of space and weight</review_text>
I bought this for my husband for Christmas and he loved it!  The colors look great at night.</review_text>
This is awesome!!  It is great to play ultimate, or just throwing around at night.  we had one a new years party and played with it in the dark house too!!  they keep up well too.  I've played with mine in the snow, in the water, in the sand.  just make sure to clean out the battery compartment!!  this is a great toy for any family or friends.  they are also fun to play with in dorms!</review_text>
My yellow Lab is crazy for Frisbee!  It's her favourite thing.  This one is briliiant.  The colors are bright and really pretty flying through the dark.  It's made playing with her even more fun.  She waits by the window for dark because she knows what comes as soon as the sun sets: night game!  The lights make it easy for her to see the disc flying (a help even during the day) and therefore easier for her to catch.  We have four of them so we always have one in the air for her to run for, which means she goes to bed exhausted and is an angel all night long.  (Beware, if you are shy or self-concious, you will inevitably have an audience if you pair these surpsingly pretty flying discs, with a dog who can catch them in her mouth--especially if you play near children!</review_text>
I picked up one of these flying discs just a couple of weeks ago. I have a green one, but they are available in red, blue, and multicolors as well. It's a well made American product---which makes this disc an easy choice over the competition---that flies straight and does not hurt to catch (at least with the hand).After a few missed catches, a few collisions with trees, and landing in the road, the Flashfligh never blinked. It seems sturdy, unlike some other light-up discs that didn't last through a weekend.The LED makes it easy to spot without being distracting, so catching the disc is easy and finding it, not a matter to be taken lightly during a late evening endeavor, is effortless (as long as the light is turned on).</review_text>
Our Familly recieved one of these discs for Christmasand we are amazed how well it works. Easy to fly andthe lights are incredible, making it a blast in the dark</review_text>
I got this for my wife to replace her Nike heart rate monitor. The features are great (time in zones is a very good feature addition), the display is easy to read while working out. My wife tells me that the chest strap is comfortable and that it 'looks nice'. What more do you need?She has had no issues with the buttons etc that other reviewers have previously mentioned and she uses it 5 days a week.</review_text>
The service was fast and the product is great.  thank</review_text>
Why do I say that? Because I have two Crosman airsoft guns: a P22 pistol and an S32P shotgun. Both are great, but both right now are using 0.12g rounds so they're not as accurate as I want. I tried these 0.20g rounds, and they jammed my shotgun on nearly every shot--and the rounds are made by the same manufacturer as the gun itself. When you look at them, you can even tell that they're not all perfect spheres and that some are slightly different sizes than others.I did not try them in the P22 as I bought that after these rounds.I would strongly avoid</review_text>
My daughter has the two wheeled Razor so I expected something more streamlined. That said, it's quite stable and my son's only complaint is that "it doesn't go superfast" like his big sister's Razor</review_text>
Got it for my 4 yr old but she isn't into sport activities so much. It just stayed there for a couple days when my three year old and she just LOVES it. She wants to take it everywhere we go. Good buyVery sturdy and stable. Easy for a little girl. So far we haven't had any accidents with it.I like that they have a spare wheel in the back and a small compartment for holding the tool for winding the screw. Good idea. I highly recommend it as a transition to a bike or a two wheel razor</review_text>
this scooter is great! all three kids loved it, especially the young one this was for. it's easy to use, easy to set up and hours of fun. thanks for a great price and a great scooter</review_text>
This scooter was a good buy.  It was inexpensive and meets our needs.  The three wheels allow my daughter to balance.  She doesn't hit her pushing foot with the back wheel as with some other scooters</review_text>
I bought this for my 3 year old.  She was able to get on and go right out of the box.  I love the three-wheel design because it really doesn't tip easily.  The pink is a bonus that compliments the little girl's love for that nasty color (I'm daddy, so don't tell her I said that).Definitely follow the recommended weight limits.  We went on a walk with the girls riding their scooters.  When my little one was too tired to continue, I 'scootered' her home by putting my foot on the back and pushing her, so we were both riding.  That tore up the plastic bearing on one of the rear wheels.  Luckily, there is a spare and the tools included to swap them out, which only took about 5 minutes.I definitely recommend this one for those that don't have the balance yet to ride the two-wheeled version.Just keep in mind the plastic bushings on the wheels</review_text>
Santa brought my daughters Pink scooters and they love them!  They are easy to adjust for height and I like that they come with an extra wheel.  Pretty easy assembly after you discover where the wrenches are</review_text>
My daughter received this gift for Christmas, and really enjoys riding around on it with the bigger kids.  She has no problem keeping her balance, and loves to ride.  I recommend this to anyone</review_text>
This is such a great scooter for a young child. My 2 year old is even able to use it. The back wheels give it more stability so they can learn with out falling. Kind of like training wheels on a bike.</review_text>
My middle school daughter was always struggling to fit her books in her old backpack which, up until this year worked fine.  I went on-line to find the roomiest one I could, and still get style, color choices and outside pockets. We were amazed at how much room this had inside.  Now all her books fit nicely, and she loves the extra pockets so she can easily find her lunch, pens & pencils, her cell phone and other 'extras'</review_text>
I just returned from a 20-day trip, and this new backpack went along. It is comfortable, commodious and just the ticket. I have a 25-year-old JanSport backback (still ticking, but a bit tattered) that I have used and used, and I expect this one will provide the same service. It's great</review_text>
I have ridiculously large books and a half hour walk to and from the train station each day.  Unlike every other backpack I've tried, the straps of this one have yet to start ripping or fraying apart from the bag.  The only feature I miss is a buckle connecting the two straps across the front of the chest, so they don't pull apart at the shoulders.  However, the bag is heavy-duty and roomy, and I'm easily able to fit my laptop, Con Law book (maybe the largest book ever made), Crim Law book (2nd largest ever), and pocket dictionary.  Overall, if you can get as good a price as I paid for it, I would recommend it to any student or other user..</review_text>
Great Price and Great Product.  Jansport has always had quality products. Can't go wrong.  Lots of space and compartments</review_text>
I got this for my 8-year-old son.  It is just the perfect size to carry all of his work and whatever other things he needs.  The pockets help him organize things so he knows where they are.  He has had problems with the straps of other backpacks breaking, but this one is very sturdy and has not had any problems</review_text>
This is a good backpack.  It is very sturdy.  I got it for my high school son because he ripped through his first backpack for the year in less than a week.  We paid about the same for that backpack as we did for this JanSport backpack.  He has had it now for a couple of months and his holding together just fine.  When he first got the backpack he said the shoulder pads were very hard but now he says they don't bother him anymore.  Maybe he has broken them in or just gotten use to them. If you are looking for a good and roomy no frills backpack for school, this one has worked out great for my son.  I had a JanSport years ago when I was in college and I remember it being a good choice back then too.  This Big Student Backpack is a great choice for the money.</review_text>
The Jansport Big Student Backpack we purchased has been utilized daily for 2 mths and is terrific!  It holds all of the books, musical supplies, and accessories any adult or teen would need on a daily basis</review_text>
backpack just what I expected, and I got it really quickly.  THanks</review_text>
I am very happy with my purchase of this backpack. The color is great, and it has plenty of compartments but not so many that you don't know what to put in them. I especially like the mesh holder on the side, I put my water bottle in there so I don't have to carry it around. I'm a graduate student so I have a lot of materials I have to lug around, and this backpack is perfect for it. The straps are very sturdy and don't cut into my shoulders. It is very comfortable to wear</review_text>
I purchased this item to have a water bottle that won't leach plasticizers. The sellers don't seem to really know about this issue. I think it's the right stuff though. It does not leak your drink, which is amazingly rare to find in purchasing bottles. Re-using water bottles is the cheapest way to go for no-leaks but they're supposed to begin leaching chemicals over time.The bottle is just the right size for me and it's attractive and nice to hold. My complaint is that I can barely open the pop-up drink spout (but my kid seems OK with it). I entirely can't open it if the lid is off of the bottle for cleaning. I just screw the top off to drink; I prefer it. I loaned one to another kid and saw him using his teeth to pull up the spout: yikes, don't tell his mom.Handy and worth the price</review_text>
I bought this bed as a literal "quickbed" for guests.  It inflates quickly, doesn't take up much room and is actually quite comfortable.  It does not come with an AC adapter, but I haven't found this to be a necessity.  I also thought it inflated quickly, I'm wondering if the one reviewer who had a problem had a defective pump.  For the money, I think this is a great bet and you can even reverse the direction of the pump to deflate the bed quickly</review_text>
Bought this a few months ago and have used it everytime I needed. The included air pump is very convenient and the bed itself is very comfortable. It has served me very well as an extra bed every time I needed it. And the way that it's transparent and you can see the inside looks cool too</review_text>
I have a hard kicking 11 year old soccer player and we tried 2 other soccer goals before getting this one.  The main difference is that the weight of the metal poles (which the net attaches to) allows it to stay in place when hit by a ball.....the others we tried that were made of PVC plastic pipe fell right over...this goal is worth the price.  Easy to set up and take down too</review_text>
This goal is perfect for backyard soccer games.  We keep the goal in the garage and out of the weather, and after three years of almost daily use, it still shows little wear</review_text>
This is the perfect size for small [sized] games...</review_text>
Obviously not the best, but for the price it does the job. I just got mine so Im not sure how long it will last. It looks cheaply made but still I think you can get a lot of use out of it, if you're not a serious boxer. Adjusts well to fit, and protects the face</review_text>
i have been riding since 1973. i bought a van dessel 2 years ago on a former national team members recomendation.  i was so impressed i now own two, and am looking to buy a track bike also.  i am over 200 lbs and find the van dessel stiff for sprints and climbs, it tracks like it is on rails, and is not real harsh as i just did a century in vt. on my van dessel.  best of all is the price, and an owner who stands behind the products that he also races. van dessel is a great bike and company. you will not be disappointed riding one... :</review_text>
The Van Dessel Kermis is easily one of the best, if not the best bike in this price range. Its weight along with its stiffness and price easily makes it one of the best bikes you can buy. I have ridden cannondales and treks, and this outperforms them both. Kudos to Van Dessel for making such an excellent bike! If you don't trust me, read the review in Bicycling magazine for more details, even they gave it an extremly positive review</review_text>
I have the older model of the Van Dessel road bike and I love it! It's very light, it handles well, and it's still comfortable after 4+ hours in the saddle. It's also kind of fun to have a bike that's different from all the treks and bianchis out there</review_text>
I have raced and trained on this bike for over a year and it has been great. Very responsive and stiff, yet still comfortable over the longer rides. It is speced very nicely while still being affordable, and has exceeded my expectations for a bike in that price range.</review_text>
I have been riding the older brother to the Kermis, the Campitello, for four years, and must sing this frame's praises.  After riding a Trek 5500, a CAAD 7, I had the name brands, but with the Van Dessel, I have had great durablity and speed.  The frame is strong and has a great feel with the carbon seat stays -- making is a comfy and responsive ride for the long days in the saddle or for the sprints out of the corners at the races.  I like my century rides at 18 mph+, and this frame absorbs the shocks of that much road.The bike is made by true cyclist, and the intimate relationship of maker to machine and his connection to the sport can be felt in the design.  I am truly impressed with this bike.This bike makes me want to get up in the morning.</review_text>
Cathe Friedrich is my absolute favorite for working out.  This workout is hard -- you feel it right away. It is put together very well, in that you can select the exercises yourself or just hit 'play' and do the entire video.  Her personality is great -- she is very motivating, without being "chatty." I discovered Cathe by watching FitTV, and now own many of her DVDs.  I just purchased this one as my problem areas are lower body.  You will need various equipment, though: a high step, dumbells, barbell, stretch band, and stability ball. Since I have been exercising to Cathe, I have eventually purchased all equipment and use them all regularly.  I highly recommend this DVD and any of the Cathe Friedrich items!!!</review_text>
WOW what a workout.. i have a lot of Cathe's workouts but this one really works the Butts and Guts.. i had to do this dvd 2x to really feel the burn.. the first time i was not concentrating on the target areas but when i did the next time, i couldnt walk right for 2 days.. this is truly an excellent dvd.. you will WORK your butt area and you will get that six pack, just eat clean for better results.. Enjoy</review_text>
This is an excellent exercise DVD.  I'm a beginner but I was able to follow all the exercises and I really felt my muscles working.  I highly recommend this DVD. There are several pieces of equipment demonstrated but I found I could get by with a balance ball and exercise bands.  As I get more advanced I will add the hand weights.  Don't let the equipment keep you from trying this exercise routine.  Cathe Friedrich really knows her stuff.</review_text>
If you have seen my other Cathe reviews, you'll know that I think she is fantastic and makes you work hard, yet she's motivating and keeps it interesting.  In this dvd, you will work your trouble spots very hard and it is tough (but well worth pushing through).  The results can be found if you do the workout often.There is a wide spectrum of exercises here.  Every possible movement is done (like your squats and lunges etc) and you will be feeling it in no time.  You start with standing workout that work the glutes and then classic floor moves like side leg lifts and inner thigh work.  You WILL fatigue your muscles (in a good way).  Following all of this, there is intense ab work and she uses hand weights and ankle weights to up the ante.The other thing you should know, is that there is a lot of equipment needed (one reason I dropped a star in the rating).  You need different amounts of weights, barbell, stability ball, resistance bands and a high step platform.  Personally for me, if I need this much equipment, I'd rather go to the gym.  Cathe is one tough trainer, but she will give you results.  After doing this workout for the first time, I didn't think I'd be able to make it out of bed the next morning.  It was a good sore, so you know you've worked out well.  I really recommend this, but not if you haven't used your glute or ab muscles in some time</review_text>
Manduka really knows how to please the yogis in everyone.  This mat is fantastic, I highly recommend this mat to friends.</review_text>
This mat is very firm and dense and will last for years.  Has excellent grip, but a little slippery when wet.  Note to travelers; much heavier than most other mats..</review_text>
I am very happy with my manduka purple lite mat...I had tried out a friend's original black manduka mat and was hoping to get the same quality with a little less weight to carry around in the travel purple lite mat...I wasn't dissapointed!Manduka mats are so great because of their density...they provide the thicker cushioning other 'thick' mats do, but unlike other mats, they are also dense enough to support the wrists, which take alot of stress with a regular yoga practice. I recommend this mat to anyone who is regularly practicing yoga...the investment is worth it</review_text>
What can you say about a Manduka?  They are the best mats, especially the full size and weight mats.  But they can be cumbersome.  The Purple Lite is the perfect compromise:  almost as cushy, almost as slip-proof, almost as roomy.  Just, not quite.  Alas, this makes the mat more portable!I am a yoga fanatic, and have put my Manduka purple thru its paces.  It is still in great shape, hundreds of classes later.  And only during the sweatiest of hot classes does this mat get slippery.  9 months out of the year, no ashtanga rug or Yogitoes is needed.  Brilliant</review_text>
I love the Manduka PurpleLite Mat. I debated between the thicker black Manduka mat (which is awesome) and the lighter purple one. I am happy with the purple one; it is much lighter and easier to carry to and from yoga. The purple mat is soft and comfy, I never need to use a towel to support my knees. It's great and I would highly recomend it</review_text>
My six year old just received this for his birthday and he loves it. This product is not necessarily marketed for kids though. There is a safety on it that has to be pressed when launching it, so it does require a little bit of coordination. It is a little difficult for him to do, but not as hard as casting a regular rod. I wouldn't recommend it for anyone younger than my son though, unless he or she was highly coordinated. Still a great product overall</review_text>
I was a little hesitant to spend around $30 for a fishing rod for my son, who is 8.  But he really wanted it...so we took the plunge.  It was well worth the money for us.  He was so excited.  He watched the instructional DVD with his dad, then we were off to the lake.  He used it for about a day and we had a little trouble with the capsule that goes into the barrel.  It went in a little crooked and got stuck.  I thought...oh boy this is broken already.  But we managed to get it out and reloaded.  It continued to work great!  He had a great time using it...although he thinks it is broken beacause....he didn't catch any fish with it!  (Guess they just weren't biting!) But he still had a good time!  I think it's a great product!!!</review_text>
I got 2 of these for my son and nephew.  They loved it.  My son's 5 my nephew is 8.  They had a ball with this.  Easy for them to use, and it made not cathing any fish still a very exciting and fun trip.  Not that the rod couldn't catch fish, it's just they wanted to reel it in as soon as it landed so they could launch it again</review_text>
bought the rod in the winter my nephew is excited to use it when it gets warm outside</review_text>
I bought this for my grandson. It took him about three minutes after receiving this to have a problem with the release latch. I was with him and saw he did nothing more then cast and retreive. I think it is a waste of money</review_text>
Bought this for our 4 year old son who saw it on an infomercial.  I wish I bought it from amazon cause I paid a lot more for shipping. (I also had to pay an extra 6 dollars in shipping added to regular shipping price to get it within two weeks for xmas)  Now that my neice and nephew (8 & 10years) saw it they want it for their b-days in febuary.  I will definately get them from amazon because it's cheaper here.  Anyways the product is pretty cool.  It shoots pretty far and you don't have fishing line issues that you have with regular fishing rods.  It will definately be more excited to fish with Dad this summer.  It's very easy to handle that my 4 year old can do it by himself and its cool enough that even a 10 year old enjoys it and wants it</review_text>
My 8 year old son loves this fishing rod.  Received as Christmas gift and not able to actually test it out fishing yet, but appears to work well.  Seems like a safe and more fun way for a child to cast out for fishing</review_text>
This bag seems to be well made.  It was very easy to install and it stays firmly in place under my seat even during rough riding.  The only improvement I could imagine is that the zipper could be a little easier to open and close, but it's not difficult and it appears that it would keep rain out if exposed</review_text>
Does what you need it to do. Installation is solid and the bar is a bar.</review_text>
Found this new Schwinn S-15 in box almost all put togher on Amazon for $119.00 less than at your local stores~!!! Shipping was with-in two days of order and I am very happy with it~</review_text>
I received the bike about two months ago and I can say I'm loving it. Though, the flaws lie in two things: the shipping and the gears.When I took it out of the package I noticed one thing, the rear wheel was warped ever so slightly. Now, just a slight warping can screw up the brakes, but I managed to adjust them fine. So problem solved there.I haven't been able to ride it as often as I'd like, but it's still smooth. I'd have to disagree with the guy that said you shouldn't ride it on trails as that's all I've been doing. I have a problem with the gears. I love the gear shifing system, easy to use. But the one thing that's upsetting me is the slippage on 1-7high on 1low. I may need to oil it a bit, so it may just be my fault.I'm glad with the purchase and my grandpa's glad to know I've got a Schwinn too</review_text>
This is not a mountain bike. Do not take this on serious trails. That said, this is a great commuter bike: Slap on some slicks, tighten the suspension, and tune the gearing, now you can tackle almost any set of stairs in any city.An aluminumn frame, full suspension bike for under $300 is unheard of.Set the bike up after you get it and you can ride the urban trails on a quality frame with easily upgradable components. Gears, Gears, Gears.And check the brakes.All in all this is a comfortable bike with teeth, and I recommend it to daily commuters and hard road riders.Just don't forget to fine tune this bike after you get it</review_text>
I love it. I go running with it every day and never have to worry about needing water. Just enough water all my needs while running, hiking, bike riding, or walking the dog. and barely weighs anything i never notice it there untill i'm thristy.</review_text>
I bought this for my sister-in-law in the hope that she would take a long walk.  It worked great</review_text>
I had this pedometer for a few days and returned it because it was so inaccurate.  I would walk like 10 steps and it would register at 20.  It was maybe too sensitive.....I don't recommend it</review_text>
IMHO, this is among the most accurate of the low cost pedometers.  It has a delay which minimizes the movement registered by some other pedometers.  This is my second one, the first lasted two year</review_text>
Inaccurately counts steps, useless</review_text>
awesome texture and design! i especially love the eagles' motif on the ball even though the broncos are my team. go get yours now</review_text>
Our 12 Year Old is branching out from our home NFL Team, to many others - San Diego being just one of many.  I also ordered one of the New Orleans Saints footballs for a Valentines Day gift, which we gave him early because I couldn't wait any longer.  They are in his room, under display cases, and as he told to his friends, "will never be taken outside!"  These are great items for kids or adults - especially if you enjoy collecting "simple" memorabilia for your favorite teams.  I plan to order more teams soon!  I was unable to find these anywhere but on Amazon.com.  They arrived quickly, and look AWESOME!  Thank you Amazon</review_text>
Love the ball's colors that represent the team logo we chose. Love the designs and the fact that it's a collector item. This football will help my child with memories of his hometown in the best year yet in the NFL.</review_text>
This product was a great find.  Looked better in person than on the website</review_text>
My son loved it. He is thirteen and loves the Broncos, so he was really excited to get this football. Thanks for the fast shipping and great product</review_text>
My grandson is a rabid Chicago Bears fan.  When he unwrapped the football he about went nuts with pleasure.  It has already received some rough use and is still in good shape and still being loved by the 10 year old</review_text>
My husband just loves the red skins and just loved this football I purchased for him for Christmas!! I was so grateful to find something so unique</review_text>
I just got this gun a couple days and am already loving it. It has pretty good accuracy for its range and givin the fact its an AEG, and its power is phonominal,although I havent hade a chance to skirmish with my friends I will bet it to do some serious damsge. there are some minor flaws but not with the gun its self just with the accessories; the first one is the sight dosent really aline true to the center (could just be a broblem with my gun) and the fact that my flashlight stoped working almost immediatly (also probobly just a problem with my gun) but in the longshot the gun is definately worth the money. And im not mary im her son</review_text>
I purchased this product at a local sports show, and paid $15 more for it than it is here. Price aside, it is a decent gun, much better than my first AEG. If you use .2 gram BBs, it is reasonably accurate, even with wind. It seems really sturdy, but I'll really find that out on my first op with my friends in the spring. There are problems, though: The mag capacity is small, especially on full auto. I would advise purchasing extra clips, which go from 3 to 10 bucks apiece and can be connected for easy reloading. Be careful when loading: there is a little switch by the feed for the ammo that will send your just-loaded bbs, all over the place. Also, the scope that came with mine is poor: the adjustments for the light do not affect the position of the light. Overall a great buy for those just getting into airsofting. Heck, at this price, why not buy two and go Rambo on your friends? :)PS-i'm not really Beth; I'm her 15-year-old son</review_text>
I bought the yellow resistance band and I found it challenging and very effective. I have used it mainly for leg exercises. I took off one star because there should at least be a sheet listing the various kinds of exercises that can be done with this band</review_text>
Good procuct that can be used in a variety of leg exercises without weights</review_text>
Medium resistance to work with.  Good place to start working the hips.  I have another I cut, so it's a line and not a ring, and use it to work my chest.  I wouldn't want one with less resistance</review_text>
Works so good in conjunction with weights.  Durable.  A definate must</review_text>
I checked around on the web, looking into the company, and comparing prices for the yoga wedge. The Amazon price was the best offer. I have used the Hugger Mugger Foam Yoga almost daily since I received it. It is sturdy enough to work well for a currently overweight (and shrinking) yoga student. It arrived earlier than I expected. The foam is high quality, and the color matched my mat, blocks and strap- a nice plus.</review_text>
I tried all of the sporting goods stores and could not find the yoga wedge. The only place I could find this item was on line.I ordered the item on a Thursday and it showed up at my house on a Monday, very fast service.It is a very handy item that helps you mantain proper form in several yoga poses . I even bought one for my daughter.</review_text>
This is just what I was looking for, and it was just the right price! Great for stretching</review_text>
*****This is an upscale designer water bottle, top of the line, and so much fun. The designs Of Sigg's water bottles are gorgeous, from the plain, solid color bottles, to the ones with intricate designs. They are simply beautiful! I switched from regular plastic water bottles because of health concerns, thinking it take more work to maintain. These do necessitate regular cleaning (I clean mine every day), but having something so beautiful to drink from makes the cleaning fun. Sort of like my rings, glasses, and watch, I now consider my Sigg personal water bottle a vital accessory, reminding me to drink more water, making a statement about my values, and expressing myself with a special design. Yes, all in a water bottle!Sigg of Switzerland water bottles are very high quality, made of light aluminum on the outside, slightly insulated, and covered with a special powder coat on the inside that prevents any leaching whatsoever, unlike plastic and polycarbonate water bottles. They are light, durable, and perfect for any activity. Well water tastes spectacular in these bottles, just like from the tap.I bought this particular top because I don't like sports tops, and I don't mind unscrewing the top when I want a drink. It is totally leakproof, which is important to me. The top is pretty and can be hooked onto a carabiner. I like carrying mine, though. I get comments on it all the time, "What's that? I love it!"Sigg makes their personal water bottle in .6L and 1L in this style. I have both. I use the .6L for sports activities because they are smaller. When I won't have to carry the container, I like the larger bottle.They are expensive, but they are so durable that you can plan on them lasting many years. I consider them both an accessory and an investment in my health, so they are well worth it value-wise for me.Highly recommended.****</review_text>
My son really enjoys this bike and it stays charged for a long period of time. It will go up to 15 miles per hour--COOL ITEMThanksD.Quall</review_text>
I purchased this for my 10 year old son.  He is totally satisfied with the bike.  It goes fast enough to be fun and not to fast to become dangerous. It operates quietly and the neighbors definitely appreciate that.</review_text>
We got this for my son and he has had a blast on it.</review_text>
I bought this bike for my 7 year old son for xmas.  he absolutely loves it.  although he still was driving a battery operated four-wheeler (you know, the power wheels kind of thing), he had really outgrown it.  the razor chopper has quite a bit more speed.  he can ride it around our long driveway and through the yard with no problems.  it will handle up to 200 lbs, so i bet we have a long time to enjoy.  the chopper has a very wide turning radius, a challenge in our driveway and doesn't make our skateboard ramp very well.  but, other than that, the bike has been a great selection for the price</review_text>
We were looking for this chopper for some time and I'm glad that we found it on Amazon for the price that was right.We bought the chopper for my son and he loves it.It was easy to put together and doesn't take long for the chopper to charge.The chopper can last quite a long time on one charge.We also bought a Dot motorcross Helment for my son to wear while riding his chopper from Amazon.Everything came on time with no promblems.</review_text>
I belong to a group who play a card game using 5 decks, this shuffler makes it much easier and faster to mix the cards.  So far it has performed very well, and is not as noisy as some I have used</review_text>
I HAD A SPEEDOMETER LIKE THIS ONE EXCEPT IT WAS SQUARE-SHAPED WHEN I WAS A KID AND I LOVED IT, SO WHEN I CAME ACROSS THIS ONE I PURCHASED IT FOR MY SON. HE LOVES IT, HE LIKES THE FACT THAT HE CAN SEE HOW FAST AND HOW FAR HE HAS GOME ON HIS BIKE</review_text>
Comfortable, durable, good-looking skates, but I would recommend upgrading the bearings.  They're a bit slow</review_text>
At a reasonable price,these indoor roller skates are durable, they have a smooth ride & are really trendy. The Black body of the skate teamed up with the Blue wheels with CHICAGO printed on them really turns heads at the rink. My son loves them</review_text>
These are a great pair of skates for the price.  I purchased these skates for my husband, and he loves them.  I would recommend these skates for either beginners or pros</review_text>
No more trips to buy bottled water.I might also suggest buying the Brita Pitcher</review_text>
These wrist weights are perfect for trail running.  Thumbholes help keep them in place.  You'll feel the difference after only a short distance</review_text>
This item was exactly what I wanted.  Light weight with the comfortable neoprene grip.  Also a very reasonable price and free shipping</review_text>
The stand assembles in around 10-15 minutes, depending on if you know which pre-drilled holes to use or not.  The build quality is reasonable, but the bolts for the casters don't all fit screw in evenly.  This doesn't affect the functionality, but seems like something that shouldn't be an issue w/ today's manufacturing technologies.The casters are great, allowing some movement of the bike and stand without removing the bike.The only areas of improvement are maybe some better design or feature that further prevents the wheel from tipping/leaning in either direction.  Preferably a simple machining or stamping solution as part of the regular manufacturing process that doesn't increase the price would be best.Compactness is good, too.  I have 6 bikes in the garage, and they all store neatly next to each other.Value, convenience, and size are this stand's strong points.</review_text>
I've been using this stepper for about a month now and I love it.  It is very portable and easy to store in my apartment and gives me a good workout.  The only problem is that the wheel does squeak a little bit.</review_text>
I was     somewhat please, but numbers are a little dificult to see in daylight. And you need to go to school to understand all its fiturees. And it came without a case</review_text>
Looks great, functions great.  Manual is a little daunting and a couple of the words on the display are very small.  I have 20/20 vision and I can't always read everything that is being displayed.  It is mostly in the Alt and Barometer functions where there is lots of info being shown.Highly recomended</review_text>
I recently ordered this watch from Amazon as a companion for a LTt Observer to wear in the field.  While the Observer is a more updated model they both share very similiar features and ease of operation.My first recommendation is that you do order this from amazon.com and be wary of the same item offered by "market place sellers".  At the time I initially placed the order amazon.com was out and the wait was estimated to be 3 to 5 weeks.  Since the item was also offered by another seller in amazon's referral system I placed an order and wound up with the wrong watch; turns out the market place seller didn't carry the black face model.  Fortunately amazon got a supply in and shipped my watch within 24 hours....good service.  The black face is a little hard to come by.Now then, to the watch itself.  First of all it IS big...but very light; almost as light as the titanium Observer I have.  The larger face makes it easier to read and Suunto has apparently gone back to the leather (waterproof) band, which I prefer.  Functionally, the watch is a full blown time keeper and (non GPS) navigation system including stop watch/chronometer functions, an accurate altimeter, a barometer and digital compass.  Both the compass and the altimeter are as accurate as I've found in analog portable units.  The alarms are sufficiently loud (unlike the only chink in the Observer) and my only criticism is that the back light is weak compared to the Observer, but that fault doesn't draw anything away from the 5 star rating.  Add the user replaceable battery (Suunto makes a kit that includes the battery, a water/dust seal and a new cap), the intuitive operating system and you have the ultimate back country time piece.Suunto was the first to offer this type of time piece and, in my opinion, still offers the best.  I've used their diving computers and field compasses for years and am a fan of the company's many products.  I don't think there's a clunker in the catalog</review_text>
For those who may be new to Suunto, they are wrist-top computers designed and manufactured in Finland and are in use all over the world by Hikers, Bikers and outdoor enthusiasts of all kinds.  What makes the X-Lander stand out are at first glance, obviously its sheer size.  Let there be NO illusions, the X-Lander is a mighty big watch.  Despite its size, it doesn't FEEL as big as it looks, though.  The aluminum case is VERY light and quite comfortable, too.  The next thing you notice would be the HUGE amount of bells and whistles packed into such a small device.#1. An accurate altimeter.  This is an invaluable tool for the avid hiker and biker.  One thing you MUST be ready to do is remember to adjust it DAILY.  Find out what the altitude is and set the watch before you begin your trip, and then at the end of the day you need to make note of where you stopped (which you can do with the internal recording function) and properly adjust it before setting out the next day.  This is NOT a flaw, every single altimeter watch I am aware of is exactly the same.#2. Barometer.  I found it correct at least 75% of the time, which is more than I can say for the local TV Weatherman.  This includes a thermometer as well, which in order to be accurate must be removed from your wrist for at least 15 minutes in order not to get a false reading due to lingering body heat.#3. Digital Compass.  This is truly one amazing feature, by the way.  Once you calibrate it (which you may need to do weekly) you will NEVER be lost -- especially if you know how to use a map.#4. It tells pretty accurate time, too believe it or not.  It also comes with an alarm, a countdown AND a stopwatch.  Suddenly its size now makes sense, huh?I happen to LIKE big watches.  I don't exactly know why, but I just do.  IF I were to have ANY complaint whatsoever, the one thing this watch is lacking is exactly what they have included in the much less expensive Vector: A tiny little bubble which helps you to level out the watch in the compass mode for a more precise reading.  The reason why may have to do with the fact that the X-Lander is mineral crystal and the Vector is plastic, but either way, it'd be nice to have.  I am VERY impressed with just about everything associated with Suunto and their fantastic line of what they call, Wristop Computers.  IF size really DOES matter to you, well you may wish to go with the Observer or maybe the X6HR (which does everything the X-Lander and Observer can do PLUS it has a built-in heart-rate-monitor) both are smaller than the X-Lander, Vector, Yachtsman and many other Suunto models yet still offers a LOT -- but keep in mind with the smaller size comes the bigger price.  Factor all that into your purchase plans and once again, if at ALL possible, do NOT buy until you have the chance to see some of these (or any) models IN PERSON.  That will make a HUGE difference in how happy your purchase will end up being...and good luck!</review_text>
This watch screams high-tech, and anyone venturing off to a comic book convention is bound to get a few nods from people dressed in Sith Lord garb and even a wicked witch or two.So it's big, real big, but cool.  If you want a little more discreet, go with the Observer.The new synthetic band that has replaced the leather is a real improvement.  After all, whoever heard of a sports watch with a leather band?  The idea is absolutely absurd.  HOWEVER, the back eyelit got chafed and worn away the first two weeks.  Of course, it doesn't show, but it's annoying, especially considering this isn't an el cheapo watch.If you're into mountain biking, running, swimming, hiking, or training of any sort, this is the watch for you.  It doesn't have super sports specific functionality, but in my experience I've never used stuff like that in any case, so this watch accomodates me perfectly.And women DROOL over it.  Well, sorta</review_text>
What you see is what your get:  huge numbers that are easy to read while counting down the start.  Light, comfortable to wear and nice looks.  Two defects: (1) no protection for the glass and (2) it is not as simple to use as its functions would imply which, together with a deficient manual, makes it hard to operate taking advantage of all its functions.If what you are looking for is a large number format countdown timer with nice looks this is it</review_text>
I bought this watch for one design sailboat racing, and it has many thoughful improvements over other watches/countdown timers.  It has a countdown timer with sync button and reminder beeps, a tack/gybe angle calculator benzel like a "one-wheel" Musto Compucourse or the Citizen Sailhawk or Navisail.  It fits a nice niche below the expensive full function regatta watches like the Citizen Sailhawk and Suunto Regatta that would be a shame to beat up while racing, and more features than the inexpensive Timex Ironman or Optimum Time series race watches.PROS:-Countdown timer with beeps on minute and on every 59 seconds, every ten seconds for last minute, and every second for last ten seconds.-Count up or repeat option after countdown is complete.  The repeat doesn't stop after seven times unlike the Casio watches.-Long hold required to stop the countdown timer.  An electronic lock for the sync button can be manually activated.-Countdown to a particular time so race committee can start the gun at an exact minute (like 11am promptly).-Tactical benzel has click stops every five degrees so less likely to drift and lose track of wind direction during a race.-Reasonable large numbers on the countdown timer-Nice Euro look isn't fugly IMHO unlike the old Musto Competition watch or the Ronstan Clear Start Watch so it can be worn outside the race course.-Left out silly sensors such as the electronic compass, barometer, altimeter that are useless for day racing and makes the watch more afforable than the Suunto sailing watches that have these functions.-One design class legal because it doesn't have a built in GPS.  Still love my Foretrex 201 in races which allow them, but this looks like a good pre-start timer for strict OD class regattas that don't allow GPS.CONS:-Benzel only has click stops but no lock so can drift during normal sailboat operations.-No 5-degree markers on the benzel interpolating between the 15 degree labels can result in errors.  Also no 70 degree or 80 degree tack angle marks on watch inside of benzel.  Why doesn't someone come out with a cheap digital tack angle computer on a watch to help us Joes with poor memory remember tack angles?  Calculation tack angles is easy.  Its hard recalculating the tack angles to detect headers/lifts because you forgot the numbers while steering the boat in puffy, choppy conditions while simultaneously looking for air, looking for the mark, and jostling between a dozen other boats going upwind.-Non-intuitive buttons and menus with strange short or long press of certain buttons having different functions requires time spent with the instruction manual and scratching one's head.-Not all functions documented in instructions such as the logbook.-Silly designers mixed up the starboard and port tack angle arrow colors.  The arrow pointing 45 degrees to the left of north would be in the port direction, but is starboard tack and should be green.  Gybe angle colors are correct.</review_text>
This basketball is so cool!  The dual action micro pump works. It is kind of hard to pop the micro pump out.  You have to push down on the pump,and while you push down on the pump you unscrew it.    It takes a long time to pump,though.  To deflate the ball,you push down on the pump.  The ball doesn't stay inflated for long.   The basketball feels good,and it has a good grip.  The silver paint fades away quickly.  I RECOMEND THAT YOU BUY THIS!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
i got this gun in 3 days and it came with everything it says it does plus a few more which is really impressive. it shoots around wat it says 280 to 300 fps. the clip hold around 20 bbs. its powerful, pertty actuate, and goes far. its a wonderful gun it have i love it and i recommand this gun for everyon</review_text>
This was my first gun I ever used. I dont knwo why the other guy said if you are new you wont be able to use it. Well this gun is reliable, I dropped it down my friends stairs on hardwood, picked it up, and it shot just as powerful as before. The power is pretty low actually, compared to a gun that actually shot 350fps, this was way slower than that. Using .2 bbs, I was able to reach about 50 feet before they hit the ground, and I did have to arc my shots to do this. Overall I say that this is a good beginners gun and would recommend it to anyone new or anyone who wants a backup gun if their primary fails on them</review_text>
i got in in 2 days, i pulled out of the package loaded it...and i didnt go to school the next becuase i had so much fun, amazon says 280 fps, i'd say more like 350 if u know how to use an airsoft gun. great for sniping the scope works great...NOT FOR BEGINNERS, if u are a begginer u will not be able to use this gun</review_text>
This pack appears to be of good quality, and is a good size for what I wanted.  It would be too big to jog, but it has enough room to disappear for the day with lunch, water, binoculars, basic first aid, poncho, and other essentials.  For hunting, it holds enough of my gear that I can get away from the truck all day.  Good adjustments, well-thought features</review_text>
This versatile workout bench is of commercial gym quality.  There are also numerous attachments available to help you get the most out of your new equipment</review_text>
I just got this bench with the pullup bar and the abs attachment. After shopping for a VKR and a BENCH for a month I stumbled onto this setup and WOW what a great product. The workmanship is first class it's packed well and it goes together in minutes! Best of all this bench can be every bench you'll ever need, flat, incline, decline, and the chinup bar is perfect. I bought this setup to hit the P90X work out program and it should work perfectly. If your looking for a bench this the one to buy you will definitley get your money's worth. They have many other great products to check out! [...</review_text>
I wasn't looking to buy a bench when I came across this gem. When I was ordering my IM2000 self-spotting weight lifting system I decided to stretch my budget and give this a try. It's versatily, stability, and usability were much better than what I was going to use. I glad I went for it. Since getting it, I've discovered the many attachments that are available for this bench as well.</review_text>
I have this bench and it is so dang solid and easy to use - I love it.  It feels like a commercial gym equipment.  I also have some attachments that I bought on the Ironmaster web site like the dip handles and crunch situp.  I also have the adjustble dumbbells which are awesome!</review_text>
This bike is so comfortable and well made.  I am glad I got it and would recomend it to anyone looking for a comfortable bike</review_text>
Very nice bike. My wife and I each got one for afternoon rides. Easy on the old bones! Great price and free shipping</review_text>
Great bike, great value, easy to assemble.  I actually like it better than my $800 Specialized Mountain Bike</review_text>
First bike bought online and though it took a bit to put it together, it is great! For cruising in town it's smooth, the handlebars are the right height, the seat is comfortable and it works great for someone who doesn't need a mountain bike</review_text>
I purchased this bike because of the great price.  It arrived within a few days, well packaged.  I had never worked on a bike before, but was able to put the entire bike together myself in a very short time.  Most everything was already assembled before shipping.  The bike rides well and shifts smoothly.  I would highly recommend this bike to any woman, who like myself, likes a comfortable upright-position bicycle for street riding</review_text>
We got 2 of these for our boys for Christmas, we are very happy with our purchase. highly recommen</review_text>
First off if you like things to come to you by mail quickly then don't buy from HIT. Now with the review. First this gun is awsome and shoots a good 330-400 fps. Second I would buy a lot of extra ammo with this thing. It eats ammo up fast. And third this gun is so powerful that my freinds are afraid of itSo I definately reccomend this gun</review_text>
Overall, this is a pretty good gun.  It shoots fast and hard as advertised, but its main drawback is the battery, which can take a long time to install the first time.  After a little practice however, it gets much easier.  When i first got my gun and tried to fire it, there was gear churning but no firing.  Thankfully there is a "hex" tool that can fix the gears easily.  My main disappointment was with the seller of this item.  I bought the gun when it was advertised for the current price, but the day after it arrived the information about it had changed and new parts were included making it now the RIS version. (I really wanted that flashlight...) In addition the flap gate over the hop up system, though not very important, was not working because the spring attaching it had come loose.  Despite this it is most definately the best Automatic Airsoft gun one canbuy for under $70 once the kinks are worked out (ie. Gearbox and Hop-up adjustment) I greatly recommend this gun to all those on a budget, or looking to just play woods-games with their friends</review_text>
Ordered this for my 15 year old son. The merchant offered a good price and it was received quickley. Upon receiving it the battery seemed to be "weeping" and would not hold any charge. Contacted the merchant by phone and they shipped another battery out right away. Very satisfied with the merchant standing behind their sale, and now that I have a good battery and happy with the gun also. Good power, etc. Rating for the gun package as received from the manufacturer a 4 out of 5. rating for the merchant a 5+.</review_text>
This cooler is a lot bigger than what I thought.  It's almost picnic size but it will be very useful for those long haul drives where I can store lots of food as well as cold drinks too</review_text>
I'm pleased with the quality of this lunch box. Having two separate insulated compartments is very nice. The salt & pepper shakers are a nifty extra. Just make sure and keep the box right side up or the shakers will pour out.I haven't owned this product very long, so I can't vouch for its durability. It appears to be very well made with quality materials.This box may be a bit pricier, but the quality, extra compartment and flatware/shaker pocket are worth it. Using this on a daily basis at work instead of eating out will pay for its self in a month or so.</review_text>
They handle, they wear like iron, and flats are gone(: What more can you as? Well, OK, so they're not free(</review_text>
I switched to these from my Continental semi-slicks after numerous punctures and a few near wipeouts on wet corners. The Continentals do not grip the road well enough when there's just a thin layer of water and I've had too many punctures.The Michelins, on the other hand, have proven to be plenty sticky and keep the rubber side firmly down.Puncture resistance has been great too, thanks to the protective liner. I don't think it's actually Kevlar (as many other brands/models have) but it's been fine for the last 1,000 miles.They have a very stiff bead and are a little tough to seat into tubeless-ready rims (Mavic Crosslands) but a little liquid soap wiped onto the bead really helps.The added bonus of a reflective sidewall is that you end up presenting two huge, lighted hoops to cars getting ready to T-bone you at night :)   [but officer, I didn't see him]Great buy, you won't regret it</review_text>
I purchased a Eureka Hex Screen House 3 years ago for my wife, we live in the country and the only way I could get her to be outside with me was to get her a screenhouse to sit in. She absolutely loves this screen house, I have been setting it up in the spring every season once the bugs start to appear and leaving it up all summer. The two doors allow easy access to either side and the interior is large enough that her A-Frame swing will fit inside, she relax's bug free and comfortable while I work in the garden. This is a very high quality screen house for the price, since I leave it up throughout the summer it has withstood many gusty storms and never had an issue!!</review_text>
The screen house worked as advertised. It was easy to set up and pretty easy to take down (I couldn't figure out how to get everything back into the box for winter storage, but that's a minor problem). I've had the screen house for less than a year, so I don't know about long term use. I see a bit of rust stain where the metal sub-poles come together (six poles composed of four sub-poles each make up the screen house's external framework. I set the screen house up under some pine trees, so it was never exposed to high winds, but I expect it would be pretty stable under most conditions.I recommend this product - it makes for a pleasant environment in the evening when the fireflies can fly around outside on a summer night while the mosquitos buzz helplessly, not getting to my exposed skin</review_text>
After having two or three other products of this type which did not last, we found the mini-jammer.  This will be the last one we will need to purchase</review_text>
I absolutely love this hydration pack. It has one large and two small pockets and two quick stash pockets with the bladder in its own seperate pocket on the back. The large pocket has a space for a discman and has a headphone port. Furthermore, the bladder is very high quality and I haven't had any problems with it. The bladder and hose are easy to remove so it is not hard to clean it. Also, this pack is offered for a much better price than the overpriced camelbaks. All in all, I think that this pack is definitely worth the money that I paid for it</review_text>
I am 7 1/2 months pregnant and this hydration pack is a lifesaver.  I am able to take long walks without having to carry bottles of water with me.The size of the pack is small enough, not to be a bother but large enough for my keys, ipod, cell phone and a snack.  This is a great deal for all of the features you get</review_text>
I find they fit well, with a good snug fit which can be adjusted to as tight as you like it using the Velcro straps.  They hold the wrists fairly well to avoid wrist injuries.  The fingers and thumb fit well.  Some individuals might want bigger, more padded gloves for sparring</review_text>
This was a present on our girls 3rd birthday... She rode off an on from 2 until 9 She loved it so much we couldn't wait for the battery to run out. For the rest of the day she would only stop long enough open another gift then back to the car.  Quick to learn how to drive it... Loud?? a little bit but hey, it's a kids toy.  If they didn't make noise, the kids wouldn't like it.Great Toy!! Great Value!</review_text>
Great product, fun for children, nicely designed, easy to operate.I purchased 3 of the razor bumper buggie (Ladybug) cars for 3 of my grandchildren age 4, 3, and 2.  The cars arrived promptly. At  Christmas  I charged the batteries and gave them to the children.  The cars work great! Even the 2 year old can work her car! Just like her big brothers. Although, one battery did not hold the charge correctly, a quick call to the company and a new part was sent immediately.  GrandmaLind</review_text>
This is the best toy I've spent money on in years! It's cute - my girls love them...I bought two!  They are great to ride in the garage or believe it or not....they go well on carpet!  They have laughed, bumped, even learned how to use the driving handles with their feet!  Great fun</review_text>
We bought these so the children could have something to play with during the winter.  We backed our vehicles out of the garage, and zoom....they were off having fun.The box says "Ages 3+" and up to 55 pounds.  The bumper buggie looks small, but it is roomy enough for my 5 1/2 year old.  He weighs 45 pounds and is 45 inches tall.  He can stretch his legs out in the car, but chooses to keep his knees bent while driving.  My two year old can also work the controls.It is easy to use and the kids can do a complete 360.  My only complaint is that it is a little bit noisy, but no more than other battery-operated vehicles.I highly recommend this item.  It is so much fun!  Best part is that there is little assembly required.  The only thing we had to do was screw the seat into the car</review_text>
We opened 2 Razor Bumper Buggy's for Hanukkah that we got as gifts from a family member.  Both of them were missing the charger for the battery (and other hardware), so our kids couldn't even play with them.  They were very disappointed.  What is worse, Razor's customer service is TERRIBLE!  They would not send us the missing chargers without a receipt.  Of course, since they were gifts, we didn't have the reciept.  Razor refused to help us until we could get proof of purchase from a credit card statement, which won't be for a couple of weeks.  Then of course it will take a couple more weeks to actually get the chargers.  All this hassle, all the hours on the phone, when they could have just sent us the missing chargers, like any decent company would for such a high price item!Our poor kids, just looking at their motionless bumper cars.Of course, we can't actually review whether the prodcut is any good or not until sometime in Februrary when we actually get to use it.Happy Hanukkah to you too, Razor</review_text>
I ordered this to take to Hawaii on vacation, and when we got there we discovered the inner tube had a slow leak, and wasn't able to use it.  We did find the exact same product in a dive shop for only a couple bucks more, which worked perfectly.  We had a good time using it, although it let my 6 month baby slouch more than sit up.</review_text>
This float was a vacation godsend! I had spent all kinds of money on fancy contraptions to introduce my 5 month old to the water on a recent vacation, but all the babies in the pool when we got there had "my baby float." Baby was a bit nervous her first time in the pool without a float, and I worried she wouldn't take to the water, but we put her in "my baby float" and she was so happy.... it seemed to make the pool feel less big and overwhelming for her. There is no doubt that any baby using this product should be watched at ALL times, but the criss-cross seat does a good job of supporting her in the water and still letting her legs be free. The other reviewer mentions that the inner-tube sits lower than the outer tube - it is designed to be that way, and wasn't a problem at all. I am not sure what the issue for that reviewer was, unless she was using it wrong. I highly recommend this as a cheap, fun thing to bring along on any pool trip. I appreciated that a small baby didn't get lost in it. And best part, when deflated it is flat and folds up really small. Best $5 I ever spent -- totally changed our vacation</review_text>
I used this stove this past week for the first time and it was great. I went backpacking for a whole week, and another group with us had the whisperlite, and the dragonfly was obviously so much easier to use than the whisperlite. It's heat is so much more adjustable, and therefore uses much less gas than most other stoves. Also, the stand is much easier to use, causing far less spills and more stability than the whisperlite. It heats water much faster and is more user-friendly. I definately recommend it</review_text>
Our son had some trouble learning to catch with traditional, inflatable balls. Some times the surface would be too slick or the ball itself would just be too big. We were introduced to this ball in our weekly class at the Little Gym. The surface has a texture which makes it easy to grip and you can easily deflate the ball a little. These two factors make the ball much easier to catch. It's a great confidence builder for little hands</review_text>
My 2 yr old son has played with these Slo-Mo Balls for about a year now.  The soft material and fact that he can easily grab hold of them makes it a fun ball to play with.HIGHLY RECOMMEND</review_text>
the package arrived damaged,and evidently pieces were lost during shipping, when they went to put it together they discovered the missing parts, my daughter called kettler,(not the internet company i bought it from) and they sent the parts out so she had them 3 days later, well somehow the instructions in the box that they ordered the replacement part from, was not the same model that was actually in the box, so the parts were not correct, well here we are 4 days before christmas, and the "show stopper" is not able to be put together, again my daughter called kettler and they shipped the parts out overnight, and the backhoe/digger was put together in time for santa to deliver it too a very construction orientated 4 year old,and i don't think he has been off it since he got it</review_text>
It's huge and a little difficult to put together.  The instructions were not very good.  My 6 year old grandson who I got it for loved it and was fighting with the 2 year old to ride it.  Even the girls wanted to ride it.  It is a great toy for the yard and I highly recommend this for all children under the age of 6</review_text>
This hammock is perfect. Light weight, easy to pack and virtually able to hang it anywhere. My wife and I have used this on the beach mexicao and while camping in Northern Wisconsin. We have tried a couple other hammocks, but none come close to the quality of this hammock. Highly recommended.</review_text>
Excellent accessory for kids' play in the snow.  Helps them construct something they can enjoy building and using</review_text>
Great poker chips, high quality and a low price. no defects. hardcore rock solid case that took an xbox falling from my closet top shelf on it without a scratch</review_text>
I bought the iGolf after watching a friend in my foursome use one. The most remarkable thing about it is how easy it is to operate. Basically you just pick it up and look at the screen and all the information is there, updated to your position on the course. One flick of the control knob and you are set for the next hole. Likewise, measuring the distance you hit is also easy...you tell it start measuring "here" (a flick of a button when you hit) and walk to where your ball got to and flick another button and your  hit distance is displayed.Actually though, the most impressive thing of all is the quality and speed of customer service. You phone and immediately talk to the technician. It really is magic, the computer companies could learn a lot from L1.Also has far more courses than the competition. I haven't found a local course that wasn't alreadiy mapped into the software. I love the unit and have no "cons</review_text>
When I bought the Igolf caddie I really had some questions as to how good it would be. Especially since it is so much cheaper than its highly advertised competitor.Before buying, I checked to be sure the courses I play the most were in the database, they were all there.I did have a problem, when I first turned the unit on I received an error message when trying to install the software. I uninstalled the software and reinstalled it a couple of times but could not get the unit to work so I sent an email to technical support on Saturday morning. I expected to have a reply by Monday afternoon. Well I received a response within a couple of hours with an explanation and a link to download the latest version of the software. I did and everything worked great.I used the igolf caddie for the first time the next day (Sunday). The course I played had recently swapped the front nine and the back nine and when I turned on the igolf caddie I noticed that it still had the old configuration. Since I could select the hole independently it was not much of a problem.When I got home Sunday afternoon I emailed them to let them know about the front and back nines being swapped. This is on a Sunday afternoon, and they responded within hours saying the problem had been corrected. I downloaded the new setup and everything worked great.Since then I have used the igolf caddie about 10 times and it has been perfect everytime. I use the 'hole marker' feature to note some 'layup' points and 'carry' points.It has performed flawlessly and I believe pulled at least two strokes average off each game. By being able to see the distance to the 'front', 'back' and 'center' of the green I find myself making sure I carry at least to the front of the green. This has really helped.I'm a pretty aggressive golfer by nature and this helps me make better course management decisions and remain fairly agressive.Bottom line is that the product works great and my experience with their technical support has been nothing short of remarkable. They give the type of support I wish I could find in other companies.I'm still in the process of marking different points on some of the holes, but overall I'm in the low 80's now and hoping for some high 70's here pretty soon.A few tips, first get yourself some rechargeable batteries since the batteries go down to about 50% after one round. I bought NmH batteries and they work great, just don't forget to put the switch to 'rechargeable' on the igolf unit.Second, since I tend to scratch the front screen on my cellphone I could see me doing the same thing here, so I put a piece of clear shipping tape over the screen and then used a razor knife to cut around it. That way I can replace the tape when it gets scratched without damaging the screen (I do the same thing on my cellphone).Bottom line, the unit delivers as promised and I would recommend it to anyone wanting to improve their game</review_text>
This device works great.  Load in the software, put in your batteries; turn on the unit; escape out to main menu, go to settings, go to battery type and tell it you're using rechargeable, and you're good to go.  The software uses "send" instead of download, to send a course from your computer to the unit.  Connect  computer to unit, software says connected.  Go to "sync handheld" on unit, enter, and unit says "waiting".  "Send" on your computer, and unit shows the download, as does computer.  About 90 seconds and you have a course.  If a course isn't on the igolf website, download the scorecard and use it to map your own.  If no scorecard, get one from the course or the internet, and type it in using igolf software at your computer (about 3-5 minutes), then send it to the unit, and map the next time you play that course.  Doing that at the course using unit is time consuming.  I bought a simple Duracell charger with 4AA NiMH batteries at Staples.  As for your golf, well knowing the distance is only part of the puzzle isn't it..</review_text>
I was looking at 3 different basketballs before purchasing.  I decided to buy this and we loved it so much we purchased another.  Amazon has the best and quickest shipping out there - THANKS!</review_text>
Work out while you're sitting in front of the television.  Though this piece of equipment is not for intensive workouts, it's a great workout for very little effort</review_text>
Very easy to use and adjustments to tension are made by just turning the handle. The abs 2 gives you are very good workout with minimum effort. Its a lot better than doing conventional crunches or situps.</review_text>
This case was ordered to hold some medical equipment that must travel with me on my about two-weeks-per-month business travel.  The good part is that this case will probably survive falling into a black hole.  The bad part is that it takes up half my carry-on suitcase.  But that's what you pay to have protection for expensive equipment</review_text>
I knew this scope wasn't made for airsoft rifles, but I mounted this baby on my UTG Master Sniper, and they seem to have been made for each other. They complement each other nicely in looks, feel, and operability. The scope comes with the necessary rings, two flip up lens covers, protective lens covers (which, unfortunately, drastically reduce visibility) and a sunshade that will practically eliminate glare unless you're looking straight at the sun itself. I've used this scope every other day for nearly 8 months and it does its job like its fresh out of the box. Only complaint I've got is that the mounting rings are rusting, which has me baffled because they haven't had any contact with water or any other sever element. The scope itself is fine though. Magnification is great, though detail is slightly blurred at high magnification. I back this one all the way</review_text>
This scope is a great buy for anyone looking for good optics as a low price.  I mounted this one on my Remington 700 in .308, and it works grea</review_text>
I have used the ring 3 - 4x/week since the purchase and very happy with it.  It has provided sufficient resistance and has not "broken down".  I do not use this ring with the dvd it came with.  I didn't like the dvd it came with but have used the ring with Winsor Pilates and Karen Voight workouts that use a pilates ring.  I've been satisified with the results</review_text>
Excellent product.  The video is easy to follow.  I like that I can take the Magic Circle on vacation.  You can really feel your muscles working against the resistance of the circle and the routine only takes a small amount of time to complete.  I would recommend the product to anyone</review_text>
I bought the "magic circle" in efforts to up the anty in my pilates routine.  I am glad I purchased it but I found the DVD to be about a 2 star out of 5 start rating.  Since I live far away from a Pilates studio I purchased other DVDs in efforts to learn about the magic circle.  the DVD from Classical Pilates Inc. called "The Complete Magic Cirlce Mat Series & Reformer Mat Workout" (also on Amazon.com)taught me more about the circle's use than the DVD that came with it.  It is a basic straight forward mat routine DVD but it was practical and I am well on my way to a more complete Pilates workout.I also use the magic circle to burn off extra energy while sitting and I find my boyfriend picks it up and uses it to get a few exercises in every day.  It can be used in many ways but it most certainly enhances a pilates work out</review_text>
I haven't used this product yet, though I have put it into the Nalgene 32oz wide mouth bottle and the fit is great.  It is a nice tight fit, these are pretty inexpensive and I think they will make hydrating while walking much more spill proof.  They fit it tight and pop out easy for refilling the bottle</review_text>
This lantern was used to replace my old pump-up liquid fuel Coleman lantern that used the cloth mantels.  While not as bright, it stays cool which allowed us to use it inside the tent as well as out side. It also worked very well during a recent night time power failure at home. The metal ring on the handle is a nice touch and allows the remote to be clipped to the lantern, so you don't loose it when stored.  When needed quickly, as in the case of the power failure, the controller is right there.  There is an override "On" position which is nice in case the remote isn't handy.  There are two down sides; first the 4 "D" cells make it a bit heavy to hang inside the tent.  Secondly, the florescent "U tube" has a special base which will limit availability to Coleman parts. I don't view these as problems, just inconveniences.  Over all I'm very pleased with the lantern and the ease of use. - HR</review_text>
I purchased this lantern for a different purpose than what it is advertised for.  I have a hall with no light and it is very dark at night.  Sitting on a shelf my little lantern gives exactly the right amount of light and I can cut it on before I enter the hall. Neat,huh?!</review_text>
*****This is an upscale designer water bottle, top of the line, and so much fun. The designs Of Sigg's water bottles are gorgeous, from the plain, solid color bottles, to the ones with intricate designs. They are simply beautiful! I switched from regular plastic water bottles because of health concerns, thinking it would take more work to maintain. These do necessitate regular cleaning (I clean mine every day), but having something so beautiful to drink from makes the cleaning fun. Sort of like my rings, glasses, and watch, I now consider my Sigg personal water bottle a vital accessory, reminding me to drink more water, making a statement about my values, and expressing myself with a special design. Yes, all in a water bottle!Sigg of Switzerland water bottles are very high quality, made of light aluminum on the outside, slightly insulated, and covered with a special powder coat on the inside that prevents any leaching whatsoever, unlike plastic and polycarbonate water bottles. They are light, durable, and perfect for any activity. Well water tastes spectacular in these bottles, just like from the tap.Sigg bottles come with several different types of tops.  I bought the screw top because I don't like sports tops, and I don't mind unscrewing the top when I want a drink. It is totally leakproof, which is important to me. The top is pretty and can be hooked onto a carabiner.  I get comments on it all the time, "What's that? I love it!"  The sports top version is ok; I just am not a fan, as I don't feel like I can get enough water from the little stream from the sports top. However, for convenience, you might prefer it. For children, there is a cap-type top. All are leak-proof. If you are ever unsatisfied with the top, you can buy a screw top separately to fit your Sigg bottle.Sigg makes their personal water bottle in .6L and 1L in this style. I have both. I use the .6L for sports activities because they are smaller. When I won't have to carry the container, I like the larger bottle. Sigg also makes a smaller .3L bottle for children that is a perfect size for young people. You can buy Siggs in alternative sizes too, such as .75L, .4L (for kids), .6L, .5L. You can occasionally find this bottle in the 1.5L size, also. Search Amazon for the perfect size.Pick a style and pattern you like, as this bottle is a personal accessory, and should reflect your style. The colors are vibrant and even prettier than they seem in the pictures on Amazon.They are expensive, but they are so durable that you can plan on them lasting many years. I consider them both an accessory and an investment in my health, so they are well worth it value-wise for me.Highly recommended.****</review_text>
I first purchased one of these for my older daughter in Germany. It's five years old and still looks great. My younger daughter loved hers - I purchased the twist top attachment (she's too young for a sport bottle top) and she drinks from the open bottle more easily than a cup. Perfect size for little mouths.I was concerned that these are not meant for the dishwasher, and I was skeptical of the claim that they only needed rinsing. It's absolutely true. I bought some special cleaning tabs and I've used them only a few times - always when traveling and some sort of juice has been forgotten for days. (It's so easy to clean them out this way - warm water plus cleaning tab, 30 minutes later it's brand new inside) Great for lunches or backpacks, no glass to shatter or plastic lining to transfer taste. Can't live without them now</review_text>
A total waste of money.  You can't hear the bell even if you have it clipped to your body, the vibration feature didn't work and the timer has a mind of its own.  I smashed it with a pipe wrench and felt good afterwards.</review_text>
This is a nice inexpensive alternative to a gym timer. Use it for jumping rope, hitting the bag, etc. Also great for Tabata Protocol workouts. Google that to learn about it.Nice and inexpensive and has a real bell sampled sound. Great</review_text>
The Saris Bones 805 2-bike trunk mount rack stylishly mounts on a cars trunk, securely holding two bikes. Made of curved adjustable plastic arms and legs, this rack will mount over most spoilers and holds each bike at slightly different levels. When not in use, the rack will fold up into a compact block.To secure the rack to the auto's trunk, position the arms and legs, and place the largest clip hooked around the top of the trunk. The medium sized clips hook along the sides and the smallest clips hook on the bottom of the trunk. Once in place tighten the straps to secure.Now the rack is ready for the bikes. Each bike is secured to the rack with three quick fasten ratcheting straps. One strap wraps around the seat tube while the other two secure the top tube. The next bike goes on in the opposite direction with the same fastening straps in reverse. Women's bikes may require a crossbar adapter for proper fastening.This sturdy bike rack is easy to use, stylish, and functional. Saris is so confident in the quality of this system, that they provide a lifetime warranty.PROS:Simple to install and removeDesigned for all weather useLifetime warrantyCONS:Front tire is permitted limited movementDoes not secure to the auto in a way that can deter thef</review_text>
We ordered this Speed Sensor Baseball as one of our Christmas gifts for our grandson living in California, and he has enjoyed playing with it</review_text>
I bought this pocketknife as a gift to replace my husband's smaller lighter Swiss Army pocketknife.  This version is a wonderful, heavyduty pocketknife, with practical utility purposes, but be prepared to receive a much larger and heavier version of its smaller lightweight relatives.  It is too heavy and bulky for my husband to carry in his pocket, he said that he would have to wear a sheath on his belt to hold it comfortably.  However, he loved it and wanted to keep it anyway.  He still has the smaller version that he has carried for years and still does in his pocket, and the new pocketknife has found a home in the glove compartment of his car.</review_text>
I think the wipes are a little small to clean an entire may but otherwise they seem to do what they are supposed to.  -1 star for size.  Pleasant smelling but not at all lingering or overpowering.  I suggest using this right before your practice as the aromatherapy dissapates pretty fast</review_text>
I bought this thinking I could cut it down and that it would fit my 6 year old son.  It does not fit even with cutting it like the instructions say.  You're going to have to look for a specific "childrens" mouth guard.  I'm looking into the Shock Doctor line of guards</review_text>
When I first started using this product the cord was very rigid and did not perform like the commercial showed; however, I contacted the manufacturer and it turned out that I just had a defective Hit-A-Way.  The manufactuer sent me a free replacement, and I noticed a huge difference!  This is a great training and warm-up tool, and I would recommend it to anyone who wants to improve their hand-eye coordination and swing.  The concept is basic, the price is reasonable, and it works</review_text>
I love Cathe Friedrich's workouts.  She's energetic and encouraging, but not too much so (think Denise Austin...I just can't take that level of perky).  Plus, her workouts don't pull any punches--they're designed to challenge you and push you to challenge yourself.I regularly do several other of Cathe Friedrich's workouts (Muscle Endurance, Pyramid Upper & Lower Body, Supersets). I love them all for variety, but I think Muscle Max is my favorite.  It is 68 minutes of a complete workout--upper body, lower body, and core, with barbell, dumbells, and resistance band.  You get it all.  (You don't need a barbell, however.  All exercises can be done with dumbells alone.)Better yet, you can choose what you want to do.  The DVD comes with "Premixed" workouts loaded.  If you don't have time for the 68-minute full workout, you can do the 42-minute upper body, the 23-minute lower body, or the 53-minute "time saver."  OR you can go to a "Mix & Match" section to choose your own specific exercises from the entire DVD.The "Mix and Match" section has its drawbacks--it takes a while for the DVD to switch out of the program, into the menu, and back into a program, which makes this the most inconvenient of the options.  However, it's great if you want to match up one of the premixed workouts with the core workout, or if you just have time for one small group of exercises (say, triceps.)I LOVE this DVD.  It is the most comprehensive and flexible strength training workout I've ever done, and I've done a bunch, including many from The Firm series.  I highly recommend this one.</review_text>
Since starting with the Gym Style series, I've become a big fan of Cathe's. Her workouts are unsurpassed -- they're the toughest around and results are guaranteed! Muscle Max is no exception. Other reviewers have already given the detailed breakdown of the workout, so I'll just add my praise for this tough and effective sweatfest! She hits the chest, back, biceps, triceps, shoulders, core, and legs - and hits 'em HARD. I find the chest & tri's especially challenging. Man, whatta burn! The only thing I'm not that crazy about is having to change the weight on the barbell multiple times. But I suppose I should just be happy I'm getting a breather. All in all, this workout ROCKS, and I love how it's transforming my body</review_text>
There isn't much to say about a medicine ball -- but this one arrived exactly as I had imagined and what I wanted.  This particular ball is just like the ones at my gym.  This ball's material is easy to grip and hold and doesn't slip out as you're doing sit-ups or other floor exercises with it</review_text>
This is my first propane stove and I will never go back to liquid fuel again! It lights very easily and stays lit very well with the wind guards in place correctly. Clean up is simple with the removable splash guard. It gets VERY hot VERY fast so keep an eye on your food the first time you use it. I boiled a large pot of water in about 5 min</review_text>
We just got it and it's perfect. Larger then we thought and plenty of space for large pots and skillets.  Ours will be hooked to a large propane tank and is perfect for our family. Well worth the money</review_text>
Great gift for you boy where he can play with the football and practice kicking</review_text>
I am using the Silica in my gun safe in Florida.  It went a little less than a month before needing to be rechareged.  Seems to be keeping the safe dry</review_text>
Great product. Easy set-up. Left two up all summer in a 10' tent. Storage bags are a nice extra</review_text>
This is the lightest, most reliable, most commonly used computer on the low end of the market (the $15-25 range).  You're buying what everyone else is (which is both good b/c tells you many consumers who did some research agree with your decision; and bad because, well, you're not hip and individualistic, oh well).  This cyclocomputer is great for what it is.  Installation is pretty dang easy even though the instructions are basic at best (really, just make sure the sensor is close enough to the magnet on your spokes and that the wires turn with the handlebars).  If you're in the market for a device to tell you how fast you've gone how far and for how long, this is it.The only negative comment I have is that operation is not intuitive, but the instructions make it clear.  Really, this is an issue common to all similar devices and cateye's mity 8 is no better or worse than others.The next step up is a similar model that also measures "cadence" (The speed at which the pedals turn, measured in Revolutions Per Minute. Inexperienced cyclists tend to ride in higher gears than they should, pedaling at a slower cadence; experienced riders in the 70rpm range). Again, Cateye is the way to go, and as expected, more features means a higher cost.Beyond that are devices that include heart rate monitors.  This is great, but there is a substantial extra cost and "gadget" factor.  A separate monitor may be better (like on the wrist)</review_text>
installation was easy. works well. does what it says it should.instructions were poor.it could have been easier to access infrequently used features (like reset odometer or change tire size) if it had another button.all in all, I'm happy with it</review_text>
We ordered this to help trim down and develop core strenth and the exercises that were also included have done wonders. We really do recommend it to our "senior" friends.</review_text>
I first came across the Acme Thunderer in England (I think they're based in Greenwich) a few years ago.  It is the most powerful whistle available... something to do with the size of the pea and the size of the chamber. It's fun to know you can get the best of something for such a modest price</review_text>
For the price you pay, it is a great buy. Works well and loud enough for a well attended soccer gam</review_text>
The original insta-bench and with the free shipping it's the best deal on the web</review_text>
Great product that is very easy to set up and take down.  What a great way to keep teams in a designated space.  The bench arrived at my house in 3 business day.  Good service and price</review_text>
Outstanding Product!!! We first saw it at a tee ball game and had to get one. We ended up buying two for our team. Easy to setup and put away. easy to carry, strong, lightweight. Everyone asks where we got it.</review_text>
I ordered this for our 6 yo soccer team and it is AWESOME. They love being able to cheer for their teammates and sit together as a team. Very easy setup and not too heavy. Highly recommende</review_text>
i am thrilled to have purchased the bench knowing that it is an excellent product and the best value for my money.  i am very happy that i now have my own bench equipment so my two boys and their teammates will have more fun and comfortably watching the soccer games while on the side. i am looking forward for the 2007-2008 soccer season to begin!</review_text>
I coach a 6 year old team and play in an adult soccer league. This bench is awesome for all ages! It is very convenient and easy to fold up and go. My teams love it and are spoiled waiting for me to get there with it every game.</review_text>
Purchased for Granddaughters soccer team.  The girls love sitting on it and between games it makes a nice place for them to stretch out and rest on it.  Only complaint is that after using for 2 months now (approx. 12 games) the bottom material is pulling away from the top and hanging down.Hopefully it will not affect the durability of the seat itself</review_text>
We ordered this six-seater folding bench for my son's soccer games and it works great. Folds very easily and compactly - and no problem getting it into the carrier bag.  With the endless fire ant problem in our area, it's nice to assure the boys aren't sitting on the ground while waiting to sub into the game</review_text>
Its nice and light weigt holds alot of weight  My wife and I sat on it with my 3 year old and 2 other adults were sitting on it at an indoor soccer field.  Everyone that walked by had something nice to say about the bench, I was the talk of the town for the day... I got it for my soccer team for the spring so that the plays didn't have to sit on the ground My daughters travel coach used it and now the kids watched the game is stead of horsing around or the side line.  He asked if he could buy mine, I said no way heres how to get one...</review_text>
My [...] year old son loves the Nascar Jeff Gordon Bed Tent he got for Christmas.  It is easy to assemble, even my son can do it.  He can also keep his bed made with the tent on it.  It is made of very light weight fabric, so it is not intended for rough play.  It is not going to keep anyone from rolling out of bed because the sides do not attatch to the bed.  One side has two flaps that can tie back for an easy tuck-in</review_text>
this gun is the best sniper rifle and has the best site that is adjustable for example my friend and i were having an airsoft war and he was 100 yards away and i shot him rite inbetween the eyes! and it has a scope attatchment! and hint the kind of scope you want is like the one on a bb gun. they sell one on amazon under airsoft. and there is only one minor prblem that the cock is real tough but you get used to it real easy and it does kind of loosen. plus i am trieng to find were to get a extra magazine even though it hold an awsone amount of capacity.</review_text>
This is a sniper rifle that comes in full black, hard strong plastic,and looks awesome. The package does not contain much(gun, jam pipe, speed loader, bb's and a track to hook on for the scope) It has perfect accuracy -only with .20g bb's- is ajustible up,down,left,right. Great for $52.00(shipping included) 1 problem. It does not come with a scope, and does not tell you what kind of scope is needed. It also seems when you put the scope track on, it would be too far up to see through a scope.But besides that, great gun.ACCURACY- 5/5WEIGHT- 6.5 pounds (feels very heavy, a bit too heavy to hold)PLASTIC STRENGTH- 5/5DAMAGE- 5/5 ( with 0.20 bb's)SIGHTING- 5/5LOOKS- 5/5TOTAL- 5/</review_text>
I got this gun a week late because when it arrived in Indianapolis, where I live, it somehow got shippied off to Seattle.Besides the terrible shipping, the gun is awesome.It is very sturdy plastic, and weighs around 6.5 pounds.This gun shoots really well and is ve accurate, and can shoot through one end of a soda can and out the other from at around 10-15 feet away.My only problem is is clip. If you overload it, it has the tendancy to explode all of the BBs out of the clip.And there is no way of knowing how full the clip is either. Well, there could be, maybe I haven't found it yet.Overall, if you are looking for a excellent airsoft rifle, big budget or small budget, this is one of the best rifles out there</review_text>
When I had first receved this gun I quicly opened It and I picked it up and the weight of the gun was very realistic. I went outside to shoot it and to load each bb in the chamber you actauly have to cock the gun eack time just like an origional sniper rifle. But the #1 ABSOLUTLY COOL THING about the gun is when you have some of the heavy white bb's they could shoot a hole in a tree about 11 inches you can make it in the hole from about 30ft away! this gun is one of the best purchases on an airsoft gun I have ever purchased.Ohh by the way if you buy the gun with the speed loader buy an extra one just for the battle feild. Its not a bad idea to be prepaired</review_text>
i got his gun off airsplat and it shoots extremely hard. it will break skin from about 20 feet away. the accuracy is really nice and fps is around 380. if u need a low budget sniper rifle this is a good one to get but i also recommned the UTG sniper rifles too. and as far as durability goes i had a big war in a creek and i was completely under water with nothing but my head and the muzzel of the gun showing and it still shoots fine. two thumps up 4 this M1</review_text>
At first I wasn't sure how this gun was going to be. I looked at the reviews and thought what the heck. For 40 bucks, this gun is a steal! It says on the box that it only shoots 275 fps, but it shoots more than that. overall, it's great for the money and if you're on a tight budget, this gun is for you</review_text>
For 40 dollars, you can get a decent gun. But this is by far the greatest gun you can get for forty bucks. It shoots dead on accurate from pretty far away. It also packs quite a punch, too. It weighs about 5-6 pounds, and has a very realistic feel</review_text>
Very satisfied with these- not only do they look great, but they're anti-fog, anti-uv, and latex free, and it comes with a secure double head-strap.  I also like how although there is a blue tint, from the interior everything is clear.Not only do you get to look cool, but you get a very functional pair from the best in the business</review_text>
I LOVE this Hammock, I bought it for 15bucks at gander mountain and It's REALLY REALLY comfortable. I cant believe the price of the other hammocks on this site, this is definatly a good buy, a great way to rela</review_text>
I have owned this item for about 5 years and it is still going strong.  I use it for about 20-45 mins/ day about 4-5 times per week.Bare knuckle or with gloves.  I primarily do boxing workouts but it has seen its fair share of kicks, knees and elbows and never seen a tear or a worn spot.The padding is about 4" thick and beneath is a solid plastic ring that alows you to adjust the height.  This is also what keeps it from getting worn spots like a regular punching bag.I used to work out at a friends house who had a 40lb everlast hanging bag and after a few months we tore it and had to hold it together with duct tape, which made us all sticky after every workout.You can fill the base with water or sand, i have never filled it up all the way, but its pretty stable.  If you cant use a hose and have it inside i made a funnel by cutting the bottom off of a 2 liter coke bottle and  running back and forth to the bath tub with milk jugs.Great product for anyone not wanting to drill holes in their ceiling to hang a regular punching bag</review_text>
This helmet is great, even for adults!  I bought it, after trying it on at a local sports store, and it actually fits better than the adults sizes, which tend to look a little too large for my small face (22 year old female).  It looks great (I bought the gray/black stars) and when I got home, my husband at first made fun of me for buying a youth helmet, but after trying it on, he decided that he liked it better than his current helmet and went out today to buy his own!  Great little helmet, if you feel like adults are a pinch too big</review_text>
I've never considered trading in my air mattress for a cot, But after reading all the product reviews, I took a chance.  I will never go back to air mattresses again! Air mattresses not only leak, but they do not keep the body warm. This cot is huge (like a twin-size bed) and works great for one big guy or even two children. I woke up toasty and rested using a sleeping bag.  And with its sturdy construction, this cot will last for years. I've never known an air mattress to last for more than a couple of months with regular use.  Yes, the cot is higher off the ground than other cots, which might be a hassle for people with shorter legs, but I had no problems (I'm 5'8). Be aware, it makes a funny creaking sound when you change positions.Idea:  I purchased a quilted twin-sized mattress cover and it fit perfectly over the cot. Nice and soft</review_text>
Extremely lightweight and easy to install; because it is pressure-mounted, you don't need to make any holes in the wall, floor, or ceiling. It's a little awkward to mount two bikes, though not impossible.  An excellent product</review_text>
I really like this bike trailer.  I am not a seasoned bicyclist (I really haven't rode much in the past three years.)  I did not find this hard to pull on the local trails.  I think it is a bit hard to pull on slight hills though.  My kids are 17 months and 3 years.  Their combined weight is about 65 lbs.  My daughter is tall and she seems a little crammed in the trailer, but she doesn't complain.  They both really like riding and my son usually falls asleep!  There are little pouches on the inside of the trailer for sippy cups or snacks.  The compartment behind the kids is roomy!  I can easily pack a diaper bag, and a lunch box in it.  It was very easy to set up and folds down.  I can fit it under the back seat of my minivan.  I usually don't have the third row seat in the van so I usually leave it set up and it fits in the van without being collapsed.  I am very happy that I bought this!  When my daughter doesn't fit with her brother anymore I might buy another one so me and my wife can take the kids in their own trailers.  Great product.**If you are thinking about buying the cheaper ones that they sell at Wal*mart please keep in mind that the storage compartment is smaller.  It also is a different brand.  My sister in law has it and I prefer mine to hers.</review_text>
We got this to use as both a bike carrier and a double stroller.  Putting it together was SUPER EASY since it comes mostly assembled.  It is bit tight for 2 kids though, a 4 year old and 2 year old. Because the seat is not firm they tend to slide together and then fight because they are pushed up against each other. It attaches easily to a bike but be warned there is alot of drag almost like pulling a parachute.  I am guessing every carrier would have this issue though.  As a stoller it is very easy to manuever and push. There is some storage behind the seat and that adds to its convenience.</review_text>
This trailer is absolutely perfect for my two-year-old daughter who is still a little young for her own bike, but wants to go on rides with Mom and Dad.  She has been enjoying it and even fell asleep in it a few times.  I recommend propping up pillows or towels next to your child if you think he/she may fall asleep.  If not, she's bent over in half!  I was surprised that I didn't really feel awkward or much extra weight behind me (and my daughter weighs at least 32 lbs.).  We live in a very flat area, so that must help.  We ordered an extra coupler from the company for Dad's bike, so it's easy for either of us to pull her.  We recently took our bikes and the trailer on a weekend trip, and I was pleased to see that set up and break down is pretty simple.  The trailer fit in the trunk easily.  I definitely recommend this trailer and am very happy I bought it</review_text>
We just got this 2 weeks ago to use with our almost 1 year old son.  He's already a walker & has great head control, so we had no qualms about using it earlier than 1 year old.  This was easy to assemble (even with the beagle & toddler helping out) and we were ready to roll.  Riding the bike, you barely notice the trailer is there.  My son weighs about 21 pounds, and the trailer is about the same, but only going uphill did it even affect my riding.  Otherwise the only time I noticed it was going on & off curbs that weren't quite wide enough.  My son enjoys the ride, but we put a small pillow behind him so that his helmet isn't pushed forward by being all the way against the back of the seat.  Now he can see what's going on and loves going faster than when we take the dog for walks.  It really is a great product</review_text>
Simple to put together and even easier to put on the bike.  We use ours for our dogs.We made some minor adjustments, but now I can exercise and not leave the dogs home!!</review_text>
I bought this model with the CR rating in mind. The box arrived early and in perfect condition. Only thing missing from the box was the water bottle. It was fairly easy to put together. I had two 23 month old assistants and had it up and running within 2 hours. The machine runs quiet and smooth. The screen is difficult to read. My husband and I both use it and is holding up wonderfully. We've had it for a little of a month now. It's great and even better for the price.</review_text>
It went together fairly easily and so far we are pleased with theproduct</review_text>
My shopping at amazon has been a good experience. Didn't want to wait for the delivery, but they got it here on time."actually early". The machine has been great thus far, but it has only been 3wks of using it. I wore out a horizon 618 Elliptical Trainer in 6wks. This is a lot better than that one</review_text>
We received our elliptical way before the expected delivery date which was great!  Assembled it in about 2 1/2 hours which was relatively easy.  However the monitor does not function properly.  It will turn off after 4 minutes.  Every time!  Very frustrating to have to reset it 10 times during a work out.  I have been in contact with customer service who gave me trouble shooting ideas to try and fix the problem .  After many attempts, the monitor still is not functioning as it should.  They tell me the cables have to be replaced and they have been ordered.  I will continue to use the machine because it is a great work out.  It is quiet and smooth. I will update this review when the monitor is in full working mode.  I am sure once that is fixed, it will be 5 stars!Theresa     Joppa, M</review_text>
I chose this machine after months of research.  I managed to put the entire machine together in under two hours with only a little lifting help from my husband.  The parts list was a bit confusing as they were not labeled but I laid out all parts and read the instructions before I began assembly.  There is a note in the parts listing that lets you know some of the parts are already attached.  The machine is incredibly quiet and gives me a great workout.  I have been using a gym elliptical for two years and notice very little difference in the performace of the 418 aside from the programs and placement of the cup holders.  I also appreciate that I can run the computer with batteries or the ac adapter.  The only complaint that I have is the machine is not quite as easy to move around as the information led me to believe.  It moves fine in a straight line but is difficult to turn.  Overall, I am very happy with our purchase</review_text>
Overall, I'm very happy with my purchase. My criticisms relate to the assembly manual, the so-called computer, and the instructions for using it.Had I not read the other reviews of the 418 here, I would have decided that two wave washers were missing. Instead, I expected them to be installed, and they were. It took me about an hour and a half. The installation manual barely meets the criteria of a manual.The "computer" is really a control panel that acts as a timer, a rheostat to set the resistance, and a calculator. The computer manual rates a 0 to 1 star. It doesn't even tell you how to change the user, which we found out by trial and error. "Push the USER button, followed by enter, up key the number to the one you want, then ENTER again. Simple once you figure it out.Once over these rough spots of assembly and setup, it's a good workout</review_text>
The Schwinn 418 Elliptical Trainer is solid and well built. It's operation is quiet and it makes exercising as painless as possible.  It is an excellent value for a consumer elliptical machine for home use.  The problem that I did have was with the assembly.  The instruction manual is very confusing since it does not clearly differentiate between the various sizes of parts and does not state that some parts are already attached to the pedals and are not in the hardware packets.  There were two washers missing and two plastic caps which were not labeled to determine left or right since they were two different parts but looked identical.  I also had difficulty getting one of the pedal assemblies to fit properly since one of the welded brackets was misaligned. I called customer service and they          quickly sent me a complete package of hardware to assure that I had all necessary parts. I highly recommend the 418 Elliptical Trainer, but make sure that you identify and sort all of the parts before you begin assembly so that you don't come up short.</review_text>
I bought the Suunto brand on the advice of a friend.  It was great advice.  The T3 monitor does and tracks EVERYTHING.  It takes a while to learn how everything works and to get it set up, but it's time well spent.  The foot pod is equally as good.  Once you set it up, you get very accurate tracking of your distance and speed.  Being able to track data over time on the watch is a huge plus and the multi-line display let's you see multiple reading at a glance.  Get one if you're considering it.  You won't be sorry</review_text>
I have had my Suunto T3 and footpod for over a month now, and have enjoyed it very much. The Training Effect feature has been particularly valuable in gauging my workouts and keeping myself from under/over training. The only downside to this device is the same for many like it... you have a tremendous amount of functions, and only five buttons to access them with! The basic functions were fairly simple to master, but I still find myself digging out the manual to use some of the other functions. That said, the watch is comfortable and moderately stylish, and the monitor strap fits well and doesn't slip easily. The footpod is pretty accurate, as long as you keep a regular stride. The pod gets in my way for cycling, so I take it off for those sessions, but thankfully it is easy to take on and off... All and all, an excellent product, recommend for everyone</review_text>
I can't not imagine having a great machete, and it's easy for me to imagine many things I would want one for. This one is cheap, not very big, and of good-enough quality and the kukri style is great for cutting brush, chopping, and would be fine of fighting too, if you had too. Truly, unless you have more money you want to spend on a machete, or really don't need one because you never leave your house out of fear and don't play Jumanji or perhaps you have no arms...this machete is for you!With care...chop on...chop on...SamKoche</review_text>
We have tried numerous flotation swimsuits, life jackets for our 3-year-old little boy. They were all a huge disappointment - either his mouth was under water or the flotation device overpowered him, bobbing him forward or backward into the water. This swim trainer by Swimline solved the problem, it does exactly what it's supposed to do - keep the child above water, either in an upright or swimming position. He can move freely and switch between swimming and upright floating effortlessly, never losing his balance or confidence.The vest style upper body goes on and off very easily. We also tried a similar swim trainer with attached shorts, and found that the crotch would just ride up, making it quite uncomfortable for little boys. We prefer this 'vest only' style, worn with regular swim shorts. It stays on him till an adult takes it off. Our son likes to be thrown up in the air, and then splash into the water - the swim trainer stays on him nicely, he cannot slip out of it, no matter how wiggly he gets.Wearing the swim trainer with regular shim shorts is also nice when we are at the beach or pool party - don't have to strip the child naked when he is ready to get out of the water. He can keep his swim shorts on and continue to play on dry land.It has a strong inner tube built-in (NOT like the cheap plastic rings that made of material like beach balls). You need a bike pump or air compressor to inflate - if you don't have one, you can take it to the gas station, and use the same pump that you use for your car tires. You cannot blow this up by mouth.It is truly a great item, looks nice, durable, affordable and most importantly, WORKS. We are very pleased.</review_text>
nice bag, keeps drinks cold all day, comes with a shoulder strap, and two external storage pockets, inside there is a removable divider, with a velcro lid on one side for easy access</review_text>
We used this cooler on a trip around California. Used to carry soft drinks, food and beer between motels and hotels, cooler was completely waterproof and kept all items cold for a full day with a bucket or 2 of ice.</review_text>
My husband and I love this stroller! We take a lot of walks- and this can handle any terrain. It is very smooth, and maneuvers well, even with one hand. We added a bundle me during the winter, and a ray shade for when it's really sunny. A con might be that the cup holders are shallow, so drinks often times spill when you go over a bump, and it is a little heavy for quick trips to the store- so I would suggest a cheap light weight stroller just to keep in the car. This is a great stroller- especially for the price</review_text>
jogging stroller that swivels in the front.. very fast!!! glides.. easy to manage even a 5 year old in it...</review_text>
This stroller has quickly replaced our travel system (stroller+car seat)for several reasons: 1. The ease of navigation with the swivel front wheel is great for those times you have to push one handed 2.  The wheels are sturdy (the wheels on our combo system snapped off) 3.  It folds to about the same size as the previous one and has just about the same amount of storage space.  If I had one area of improvement it would be the drink cup holders aren't deep enough.  When we are out jogging the roads are sometimes a little bumpy and the water bottle will bounce out, but you can get those drink holder adjusters at the auto store and that should solve this problem</review_text>
I love this stroller and it has been getting me off my butt to take walks with my son. The swivel wheel is a dream...it veers to the left a bit when walking, but you have an option to lock the wheel when going for walks or runs....I just choose not to and I'm sure it can be aligned. I was amazed at how easy it was to push this stroller and the handle height is perfect for my 5'10" husband and myself (5'7"). My son is 2.5 yrs and he loves the stroller. He even fell a sleep in it when we went for an evening stroll. The adjustable recline of the seat is great although I wish it could sit a bit more upright (I took off half a star for that). The bottle holder is a bit shallow (as one reviewer has also mentioned) and my water bottle falls out at every major bump (there goes the other half star), but there is a little pouch in the back. The stroller is a bit bulky (as expected) and we have to take off the wheels to fit in the back of my car (lexus sedan) and my husbands car (navigator), but the wheels easily come off on and on. Just expect to put in a little effort when trasporting this stroller to malls, recreation and amusement parks. But the effort is worth it once your all set. The stroller manuevers well in malls. It's nice that the front wheel is situated under the foot rest so it doesn't need extra clearing room when pushing through aisles and stored in the mall. I researched the heck out of all the swivel wheel jogging/walking strollers (thanks to all fellow amazon shopper for their reviews) and I must say for the price you get superb quality. Why pay more when this stroller has everything you'll ever need. I am very satisfied!</review_text>
I recently bought this stroller and I'm really happy with it.  My two year old son weighs almost 35 lbs., and didn't fit comfortably in his stroller anymore, and it was starting to fall apart. I didn't want to buy another flimsy stroller, so after doing some research online, decided on this stroller.  It is so easy to push, it glides along like it hardly weighs anything.  It aslo has a swivel wheel in the front, so it's easy to turn. I use it mostly for running errands.  It's great for going to the mall and I'm sure I'll use it all summer at the zoo, etc. I may even take up jogging now!</review_text>
We are very pleased with the performance of our safari stroller.  Set up was very easy and took only a few minutes. We're not joggers, but we use our stroller to go over all kinds of terrain, including snow and ice, with ease.  The large wheels make asphalt curbs especially easy to go over.  We've only encountered a few minor problems.  The foot brake sometimes drags unexpectedly, so you have to lift it up occasionally.  The stroller is a little wide for narrow store or bus aisles.  Also, folding the stroller takes some practice.   We bought the rain cover for $20 which also works effectively as a wind shield for those cold, but drafty days.  Our 10 month old often takes naps in the stroller, so I guess he must be pretty comfy.   The price is fantastic for the value.  Now if we could only find a nice ski pulk for the same price..</review_text>
This is a great stroller! It had nice sized tires for a smooth ride. Pushes well over any terrain. Child has ample room inside & padded seat for comfort. Handle adjusts to varying heights for adult pushing...GREAT feature. Only downs to the stroller are sometimes doesn't fit into tight store aisles well and the storage basket could be a bit larger.  Otherwise this is the BEST stroller we have purchased.  Would definitely recommend to others</review_text>
I was so frustrated with those so called "sticky mats" and skidless towels, I left everything to try a jade harmony mat.This product worked really well for my slipping issues. When my yoga classes get really hot however, i do notice I may slide a little in down dog but it is nothing like any other mat I've tried.Some people complain about the weight of the rubber mat, since it comes in 3 different thicknesses.  Since I have scoliosis and want to carry as little as possible on my back, I chose to get the thinnest rubber mat (1/8" travel mat).  While at the yoga studio, I place one of their common mats under my mat for added cushion.  I also recommend doing this since the rubber mat tends to be a dust magnet.  So if the floor isn't the cleanest (say if you practice at a gym studio), dust, hair and fuzz tends to attract to the mat.The smell of the harmony mat is overwhelming when you first get it.  It would make my entire room smell of rubber when I was trying to air it out.  The smell, however, fortunately goes away over time.  Just make sure you air it out for as much as possible.I've had my harmony mat for about 10 months now and I don't notice any wear on it</review_text>
I enjoyed using this Jade mat for the past 10 months or so. My only real gripe is that it wore out so quickly. To be fair, though, it didn't last any longer or shorter than my previous mats. But for the price, I had hoped that I could get more than a year of use out of it.The mat is heavier and thicker than most mats. It is also, at least initially, perhaps a little less sticky than some of the other mats I've used. Once in a while I did have some trouble slipping on the mat during my practice, but this was due to sweat, and I doubt any other mat would perform better in this respect.For the money, I would probably go for a Manduka mat. That's what I've switched to, and I have no complaints. The benefit of a Jade mat, however, is that it is more ecologically friendly since it is, I believe, constructed entirely out of biodegradable material, which is something you can't say for most mats, including the Manduka</review_text>
I had been on the lookout for a decent non-slip mat for some time.  Fortunately, not only did I find a good one, but it's environmentally friendly too!  And in colors (early rubber mats were in white...snore)!The cushion is nice too, especially if you attend classes at a studio with a hard floor surface (those thin, plastic mats just don't cut it on hardwood).  It *is* heavier than the average mat, so you'll feel the difference rolling it up and carrying it around.  Plus it doesn't slide in and out of my cloth yoga mat bag like the plastic mats, so I've given up the mat bag for velcro straps.  There's a heavy rubber smell in the beginning, but that goes away with time.Easy to clean too ~ I just rub down with anti-bacterial wipes.  I can't comment on durability yet, as I've only had this mat for about 3 months.  But I use it nearly every day and drag it back and forth to class, and it's as solid as the day I bought it</review_text>
Makes great coffee! We just ordered a second one from Coleman's on-line website for $24.00. Odd that amazon says the list price is $34.99, eh</review_text>
This enamel coffee percolator is a really well thought out and built item.  The pot and lid is constructed of enameled steel and the stem and basket is aluminium.  The perc knob is clear glass, sealed with a gasket in the lid allowing one to easily see the color of the coffee as it percs to determine when your perference of coffee strength is reached.  I have used mine for years with only one very minor problem.  The aluminium stem that holds the coffee grind basket got slightly bent, but I successfully bent it back into place without damage.  As noted by another reviewer... these aluminium items are weak.  However, what are these items designed to do, and what strength holding a basket of perking coffee grinds might be required?  I bent the stem trying to stuff a small bag of coffee grinds and the bag of filters into the pot with the stem in place, for storage.  That was 100% my fault, not that of the product.  I quickly learned that the coffee pot is NOT for storage, but for percolating coffee.  Go figure, uh?Aside from me slightly bending the perc stem, the coffee percolator has performed flawlessly and has produced quality tasting coffee.  The coffee easily loads into the coffee grind basket for perc-ing.  Being a 14 cup perc, it out produces other 12 cup percs.  The handle is large enough for a gloved hand or a pot holder to easily fit into so as to hold/pour the coffee.  The item is very easy to clean, including removing and reinstalling the glass knob and seal.  Have not had a problem with chipping the enamel under normal use, which chipping can easily happen via abuse.  Nor has the glass knob cracked or chipped, or any damage to the knob seal.  Both the knob and seal are readily available at sporting goods stores should they need replacement.Should you be searching for a coffee percolator that produces quality coffee, ease in use (large pot handle, clear glass knob, ease in loading coffee basket), ease in clean up, ease in storage, and manufactured of quality materials that will be around for years to come... then the Coleman 14-Cup Coffee Enamelware Perolator is the unit you're looking for.A few tips:  Do not fill the pot with water high enough to touch the coffee grind basket.  If you do, grinds will float out of the basket and you will end up with coffee full of coffee grinds.  Be sure that the water level is below the bottom of the coffee grind basket before you start to perc.  Secondly, slightly dampen the bottom of the basket with water prior to putting in the filter paper.  That way when the filter paper is placed in the basket it will immediatly stick/seal to the basket's bottom.  This way the filter paper can not slip or pull up allowing grinds to get inbetween the filter paper and the basket.  Should that happen, those coffee grinds will escape into the coffee</review_text>
This is a great workout! I needed something to give my knees a break from all of my other high impact step workouts. And this one definately succeeded! Cathe knows how to make you sweat with this one-- you have 7 intervals of different sculpting moves and the combinations are easy to follow before each "blast"I loved this workout! And I have been doing it once a week, on the day I need something not so "jumpy</review_text>
I was looking for a challenging low impact workout and couldn't find one until I found Low Max. This is a great workout and I raised my step to 8" and I feel the burn:) Cathe is a wonderful instructor and I have really become addicted to her workouts. My cardiovascular conditioning has been bumped up a notch thanks to all of her challenging yet fun workouts. Great Music, Great Instructor</review_text>
Don't let the name fool you.  Low Max is anything but low intensity.  As other reviewers have stated, this workout is not for beginners, it is truly for advanced exercisers.  With that being said, I thoroughly enjoy this DVD and it is currently the workout I do most often.  I love that the DVD has several "premixes" so you can choose to do just the step aerobic segments, just the power blasts, or two shortened versions of the aerobics & blasts combined when short on time (or less motivated.)  The choreography is a little tricky, but if you are familiar with other Cathe videos you can pick it up pretty quickly.  Unlike Imax 3, you get a chance to practice the moves a bit before you combine everything together- good for those days when I'm a little less graceful, shall we say.  I also love the fact that Cathe finally has a good lower impact workout that doesn't skimp on the calorie burning.  My knees are thankful & hopeful Cathe will do more DVDs of this type.  Definitely crank up the ceiling fan & have a towel handy for this workout</review_text>
I so love this dvd! It's a great, challenging workout.Simply put, Cathe is the best of the best! I wish there was the choice to just have vocals & no music. She did that on some of her older DVD's, so you don't have to get sick of the same songs.</review_text>
Finally, I was able to try one of Cathe Friedrich's new DVDs.  Her "Low Max" workout is intense, but fun.  I really enjoyed it and burned a TON of calories in the process.This workout is mostly a low impact step routine with intervals of floor toning, but it isn't easy by any means.  I don't recommend it for beginners or anyone with two left feet!  The music is great, but the fast tempo and intense pace will frustrate those new to step aerobics.  Cathe mixes a few dance moves, like the mambo and the chacha, so the choreography may require some amount of practice.  Still, if you're up for the challenge and looking to workup a SERIOUS sweat, this DVD is for you.  :-)I plan to order more DVDs from Cathe in the future.  She does a good job of cueing and looks great!Wow scale:  9 (out of 10)Difficulty:  AdvancedStudio setting:  A bit boring, but current for the times</review_text>
I am a beginner of tennis sports. With this light-weight racquet, I made some progress during this summer. I like it. One of my friends who is a very good tennis player has used this racquet for three years and he also likes it.</review_text>
I bought this one a month ago. I just started to play tennis for 2 months,  about 8 times. I had a cheap racket under $40. The TripleThreat really made quite a difference to me. It's a oversize one, has lots of power, much easier to hit at the sweet spot. The control could be a tricky, but still way better than my previous cheap one. I saw reviews complains that it gives elbow problem, not to me. I truly believe that this should be an ideal racket for all beginners. I am still learning, so couldn't comment on more advanced features</review_text>
I love this tennis racquet. It has a perfect blend of power and control. It is great for players that are able to generate their own power, but are looking for a little more control. The balance is a little head heavy, but its not so heavy that it tires out your arm. The oversized head (110 sq. in) gives this racquet more of a sweet spot area. This is a great racquet for groundstrokes and volleys. I had a little more trouble controlling my serves. Overall, I would recommend this racquet for any player at the recreational level or competative level.</review_text>
every person i communicated with was not only rude but were clearly annoyed by my need for help and completely unwilling to assist me . I returned the product that i was charged $103.10 for and was refunded $40.70 . thank</review_text>
I had this airbed shipped to my mother's house over the holidays for out-of-state family to sleep on.  Everyone commented how really comfortable and convenient it was.  It only takes minutes to inflate and deflate..the built-in pump works great. I was so happy that it didn't lose air after two weeks of use. After the New Year, it easily fit in the carrying case that comes with the mattress and packed it away in the closet for the next time</review_text>
This is a review of:MSR 30" Lightning Snow ShoesWeight: 3 lbs. 14 oz. (1759 g) per pairSize: 8 x 30 in. (20 x 76 cm)I weigh 180lbs.I own Sherpa, Tubbs (x2), Atlas, Salomon, MSR Denali and now these MSR Lightnings.  These are simply the best!  These have incredible non slip ability.  They are very  light and the bindings are OK - Salomon have the best bindings.  The crampons work just fine. Side slope stability is the usual problem for snow shoes.    These are the best on side slopes that I have used.  Total traction!  They have excellent flotation for my weight plus pack. A class product! Well done MSR</review_text>
My son and his friend enjoy this scooter very much. It handles very well</review_text>
The scooter is great.  My son loves it.  It does go faster that the regular scooters.  Highly recommended</review_text>
My son got this for his 8th birthday and is having a blast!  It is very easy to put together (took me less than 10 minutes).  It is like a combination of skateboard, scooter, mountain board, etc.  He has been on it every day since he got it.  Its also good exercise and can really pick up speed.  Definitely a good buy</review_text>
I am 16 and I tried this out at the park a few days ago. This thing is so fun to ride! It can lean side to side, and the front turns, all indenepently so you can choose how much to bank in a turn. I don't understand why this is being sold at Toys 'R' Us, considering it's something that would appeal more to adults. You can get into the high 30s if you found a big enough hill.The wheels are the only problem, whether to cut production costs or save kids lives by reducing speed, it does hamper it's abilities to carve since they are made of plastic.If you really plan to buy this, and want it to go as smooth and fast as possible, find a shop that sells Longboarding Wheels (prefferably Sector 9) that are 70mm or above, stick them on this thing and it will be a much smoother, faster, and grippier ride.I suggest no one under 12 ride this down any big hills. I seriously think they would kill themselves unless supervised by someone who could stop them</review_text>
Recieved in time for christmas.. excellent product.  High QUality.. very happy with purchase..</review_text>
We haven't had much snow yet but product arrived super fast and was half the price of any other store.  Daughter loves it, great seller</review_text>
We're anxious to use our cool new snow scooters. They look great but we just can't test them out until the Globe cools a bit more and we get some snow</review_text>
I have been using the T3 and GPS POD for few months right now and am very satisfied. The watch is great, slim design with lots of functions but might be tricky to remember how to access all. One flaw of the watch is the cheap plastic that is easily scratched.For the GPS POD, everything is fine (small, light) except that it can take some time to get a satelite signal and that the battery life is rather short (about 10h).Overall conclusion: great tools</review_text>
I have had this device for over a month now using it 4-6 times per week.  I have used the heart-rate monitor and the GPS together for cycling and running, and have used just the heart-rate monitor during weight training workouts. I use the interval timer a lot during my cardio workouts to raise and lower my intensity levels.That said, I am very impressed with the T3/GPS combo for the following reasons:X	Accurate heart rate measurementsX	Seemless connectivity between HR belt and T3X	Accurate speed and distance measurements with GPSX	Tracks and notifies HR zonesX	Tracks calories burnedX	Stopwatch and interval timerThe T3 has a lot of other features that I haven't used to great extent yet, but I have used the TE (training effect) feature, which helps you to measure the overall effect of your workout on your cardio vascular fitness, to measure and increase the intensity of my workouts when needed.  I've also used the logs on the unit to review the recorded workout data.  It stores a year's worth of workout data that you can view from the T3 or you can buy a PC pod and download it to your computer. The T3 also can be fine tuned to more effectively track and measure your workouts by entering your height, weight, max heart rate, and fitness level.Again I am very impressed with the T3 Multisport combo pack and would recommend it to anyone looking for a good HRM that can track speed and distance, and record your workout data.  You will be very happy with its functionality and performance</review_text>
I have had the bike for about 3 weeks and am happy overall.  It is very smooth and quiet even when the resistance is increased.  It also has a wide range of resistance with the highest resistance providing more than I would ever need.  But I do have a couple issues to mention.When the bike arrived, one of the plastic feet on the rear stabilizer bar was broken.  I called the manufacturer and they immediated sent me a replacement rear stabilizer bar.  When that arrived, one of the plastic feet was broken on it too.  So I unscrewed the good one and replaced my broken one.  Apparently there is a quality control problem with that part.  When working out I noticed a slight click on each revolution.  It turned out to be coming from one of the pedals.  I tightened it down extra hard and the click went away.  Now, despite a low frequency rumbling sound, it is very quiet.  I think the sound is normal, and it certainly does not interfere with the workout.  It is quiet enough that I forget about the sound once I get going.  The seat is hard and a little uncomfortable.  I can handle 30 minutes on it which is how long I am currently working out.  Maybe I will buy a new seat one of these days.  The seat post looks standard so any seat should fit.But I would still buy it again if I had the choice.  I paid $400</review_text>
this toy is awsome and crazy but it sucks that u can only get it online PUT IT IN STORES!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
I bought this ramp because im a skateboarder. I skate a lot. I am pretty good and one of my friends is a sponcered skateboarder and he loves riding it. I think it is kind of small but it is really good for a beginner. If your gonna buy a flybox stick with ten-eight not xfactor/</review_text>
I am a Downhill MTBiker and i bought this so i could use the 2 jumps-not the table top.IM not saying its bad its just i jump 10 feet so i amde a 10 foot double out of this-for those of you who dont know a double is a jump with a gap and then you land on a another jump/landing thing...anyways i used it and it works great! Its very durable so i could go fast enough on it without it breaking to do whips of the jump 5 starts its so cool</review_text>
This ramp is tight you will skate it all day long. Only problem would have to be the ramp sliding.Besides that it is aawesome</review_text>
I bought this ramp for myself when I first started getting really into skating. It has really helped me to become a better skater and it is fun too! When I bought this I could barely go down or up one side of the ramp without being to scared or falling off.  Then I progressed to being able to go down one side, then being able to go over the whole thing. I can now ollie off of it and do kickflips on the tabletop.  Now I don't use it as much anymore because we built a halfpipe in my back yard, but when I feel like street skating I can pull this out with my grind rails and set up a street course.  This ramp is perfect for beginners and it is fun to learn on. Once you get to a certain point where you are doing kickflips over the whole ramp, it's time to put it away in the garage.  This ramp is pretty durable and mine began to slip a little bit on the street after a year or so, but it has'nt really been a problem.  I would recomend this ramp as a nice starter, but only if you can find it for cheap. I got mine for fifty and it was worth that, but I don't think it is worth much more than that</review_text>
My order did not arrive by the expected date of deleivery. It took over one full month from the time i ordered to the time it reached. The protein wasnt sealed and it looked like it was half empty. What basement is this company operating from</review_text>
I am very pleased with the ease of assembly and quality of this treadmill. It is everything that I had hoped it would be. ie: easy to use, quiet yet challangeing.</review_text>
1. Eagle only sent one guy for the delivery. He couldn't move the huge box inside the house by himself. I had to help him a bit. (I'm 30 yr female).2. The assembling instruction is not hard to follow. But I would suggest 2 people do this. It took me a little bit over 1 hour to install.3. It looks very sturdy and heavy. The folding mechanism is easy, but I've yet to figure out how to move it by myself: it's just too heavy for me to tilt.4. I ran on it for 15 minutes as a test. A good buy with less than 1K price.</review_text>
Up to the threshold not over it. Since we are in our seventies, wemisunderstood the delivery rule and was shocked when the deliverymen explained that each company has it's own contracts for deliveryto it's customers. It was a bad weather day in Michigan, andleaving this huge and very heavy box outdoors to get all wet justseemed so incredable to say the least. Thankfully, seeing thatwe would be incapable of moving the box indoors the kind deliverymen pushed the box over the threshold and out of the weather.Bowflex, you need to make a more reasonable delivery contract.</review_text>
The only thing I wish this treadmill included was an option that would allow me to save MY settings for a workout. There are several pre-programmed workouts, and I've tried most or all of them. Over time, my speed is increasing, so I'm not using the pre-programmed settings as-is. I typically have to do one or more button presses each time the treadmill changes to another part of a program, in order to increase the speed to where I want it.Aside from that, however, this is a wonderful machine. Our old treadmill had finally died after 10 years or so. And I hadn't REALLY been doing enough of a workout on it. With the Bowflex Series 3, I set the treadmill for the program and time I want and start working out. By doing this every day, I've started to slowly lose a little weight, and more importantly, my HDL (the good cholesterol) has increased over the past few months from 38 to a current 54 (goal is at least HDL of 60). I absolutely credit this machine for the substantial improvement in my health</review_text>
I just recveived this treadmill after ordering on Amazon less than  w week ago. It is a solid piece of machinery and goes together really fast. It took me 30 min to put together. I did my research on treadmills and tested alot of them. This is a great treadmill for the price. No vibrations when running.You will be happy you bought this</review_text>
The Bowflex Series 7 is rated best by CR but was to much for me to spend.  I was unsure about purchasing the Series 3 but, it has more then preformed up to expectation.  This is a excellent treadmill and I would recommend it for anyone.  My wife walks one or two times a week about one mile and I run about two miles three times a week and it has done great for both of us.  It looks nice and folds up if needed</review_text>
This treadmill is a great product--very sturdy and runs smooth. It is better than the treadmills that I was using at the high-priced gym where I was a member. The only problem that I encountered was getting it into the house--it took 3 strong guys grunting pretty hard to get it in the house. Once inside, though, set-up was easy and took about 30 minutes. The only thing needed was a phillips screwdriver ( the one supplied could have done it-but it wasn't too easy with it.) All in all, I am really happy with this treadmill--it's a well made product</review_text>
I did a fair amount of looking before I bought this model and I am very happy with it.  I became interested in Bowflex treadmills after Consumer Reports rated the Bowflex 7 series as one if its best folding models.  Shopping on Amazon, I realized that Bowflex made 3 folding treadmills--the 3, the 5, and the 7 series.  Online, these look very similar, with the 5 and 7 series having longer tracks and a bigger motors.  Strangely, the best source of information on these was not the Bowflex website itself (it has *no* information on the 3 ,5 and 7 series treadmills--just those crazy tread climbers), but rather the specs from Amazon.Consumer Reports indicated that the best way to buy a treadmill was to actually see how the machine felt. I agree.   I managed to find a store that had a 7 series in stock.  I was impressed.  The 7 series was rock stable and has a very nice folding mechanism--it locks in the up position and drops down slowly when released (a great feature if you worry about your kids getting crushed by the track accidentally).  Unfortunately, I could not find a dealer that carried the 3 series to try in person, but it seemed like it would be optimal and very cost effective.I also tried several Nordic Track treadmills in person. These seemed to have very unappealing walking decks (sproingy!, in a bad way) and even on high hp power machines, the motor seemed to power the track very unevenly.I decided to take a chance that the 3 series would be as sturdy as the 7 series I tried---I am very happy.  Amazon shipped the thing super-saver in a relatively short period of time--very appealing! It was very straightforward to assemble once I got the thing in place--parts are labeled and the assembly pictures are really self explanatory.  It is also a quiet machine and the deck is *very* sturdy even for a big guy like me (200+ lbs).  One quibble--the grip heartrate monitor could work better--sometimes it does not give a reading after even 10 sec of holding.  Also, be aware the deck will not lock in the up position unless you reset the incline to 0 degrees.  The incline automatically resets to 0 every time the machine is powered on.I use the machine primarily for walking, for this application it is great, the machine handles inclines and relatively fast walking speeds with no problem.   I can't comment on how well this machine compares with others for running fast.  For jogging it seems just fine.A note on delivery and installation.  This thing is *very* heavy (~275 lbs).  The shipping company chosen by Amazon (Eagle) did a great job.  I called them prior to delivery to schedule when they would drop it off--thats the good news.The bad news, they would only bring it to the threshold (just inside the house).  I asked if they would bring it upstairs for an extra fee and they said--"no way."  Three calls to moving companies and an estimate of ~$250-300 to move it from my entry up a flight of stairs--this is not a two person job--the shipping box is enormous (80" x 35" x 16").  I solved this problem by recruiting my father-in-law (also a big guy).  We turned the box on its side, opened it, and moved the main piece (track and motor together) by itself. Make sure not to cut the restraining strap, this keeps the frame and the track held in place making moving *much* easier. Even then, the main piece weighs about 200 lbs and was serious work getting around corners.  Very glad at that point that I bought the shorter (56") track!Overall, a great mo-chine--equal to much more expensive models!   Glad I managed to avoid a hernia during installation.</review_text>
I lost 32 pounds in 3 months using this machine. I started off with 20 minute work outs then 30 now I'm up to 50. It is easy to use and quite fun with ways to modify the duration and complexity of the workout. My brother and i set it up in less than an hour. It is incredibley well made. strongly recommend it</review_text>
I'm very satisfied with my two "Hummer" radios as they are very sturdy and very high quality. I have no issue with the handle feeling "like it will break easily" and no big issue with the light button either however I do agree that the small analog tuning wheel is nearly impossible to read but I'm capable of finding the stations I listen to with minimal inconvenience. I didn't buy this as an everyday radio, only for emergencies. What I particularly like about the radio is it's smaller size compared to other similar wind-up radios. My wife and I both have small, go anywhere, fanny-pack style survival kits and these radios are the perfect fit with room to spare</review_text>
This is a well made product that met all of my expectations.  My only reason for giving a 4 star rating is that the analog tuner is very small and that makes it hard to tune in specific stations.  I am sure that I would be able to find a good station in an emergency, and just leave it tuned there.  The sound is very good and the charging dynamo works very well</review_text>
i received this mobile as a gift and i love it!!  Our daughter falls asleep every night watching all the pictures, all of which can be changed with replacement pictures, that come with the mobile.  I especially love the music and the remote control that you can use to start the music, which is great when you're in another room!!  This was a great gift</review_text>
It was tough trying to find a quality tricyle for my 2.5 year old.  This trike is extremely well made - as you would expect from Schwinn.  My son is on the short side so he can't completely reach the pedals (yet!) but he loves scooting around in it</review_text>
Having researched every trike known to Google, I decided to buy two of these for my twins' 3rd birthday presents.  My deciding factors were these have metal frames (most trikes now are plastic and lightweight), they are low to the ground so balance is hardly even an issue, and the wheels are proper wheels that inflate not plastic.  So comfort and movability are great.  The weight, size of tires and low profile makes tipping almost impossible.  Another nice thing is that the seat adjusts very easily and can accomodate our 5 year old who has asked for one for HIS birthday.  They look cool too.  They do need to be assembled but the instructions were good.  The first one took me about 10 minutes and the second one took me about 5 minutes.  The only negative is that both of the front wheels arrived flat so we had to pump them up before we could use them.  Not a big deal and given how cold it is, not surprising there were some flat tires</review_text>
I bought this trike for my niece for her 2nd birthday.  She LOVES it!  My sister and brother-in-law were so impressed by the durability and quality.  The seat adjusts so it will last her until she's ready for a bicycle.  It's heavy and sturdy so you don't have to worry about it tipping over.</review_text>
Everything about the ordering, shipping and receiving of this product was great. The trike arrived just in time for my grandson's 3rd birthday and it arrived in pristine condition</review_text>
Well, after getting this yesterday, and putting it together today, I must say this is a wonderful trike.  The weight on the trike is substantial, but not too much that my 20 month old girl couldn't move it easily around the room.  The assembly was much easier than I thought it would be, and it's very very stable.  The only thing was there is a couple small dents in the front fender, but since it's probably going to get several more, it really is a non-issue to me.  Now, I know that they say from 1 and 1/2 years, but my 20 month old (who has long legs and is tall for her age) barely reaches the pedals.  She's happy using her feet for now.  I would wager this will be in this family a long time.Sorch</review_text>
This machine while not expensive did just what I wanted it to. Does not take much room in the house either. A good addition to my workout</review_text>
My mini stepper arrived in new condition and on time.Thank youJod</review_text>
This machine is compact and easy to assemble and use. It is great for a quick workout</review_text>
This mini stepper is similar to the "Impex Easy Step Plus Mini-Stepper with Twist Board " except that the electronic counter is more basic (it gives time and counter only). The package arrived in pretty bad shape and one piece of plastic (where you put your feet) was broken. I didn't want to deal with replacing it so I use some epoxy and it works fine. The manual to assemble the whole thing is bad but it is pretty easy to assemble it. You can setup the height of the step very easily. If you want it to be more compact, you can remove the twister plate. I like the small weights coming with it. I recommend it !</review_text>
Very nice protection for heavy bags training. Nice grip also. There is one thing I have to say though - these gloves tend to run small, I mean, my hands are medium amongst Americans and I had to squeeze them into these gloves every time. I don't know what would happen to those who have bigger hands</review_text>
My son loved the blanket... it was one of his favorite gifts!</review_text>
These are really nice tires. I used them, and went more than 1000 miles on my rear tire, with NO flats and very little wear (I only changes it because I had a big race and was worried about number of miles on them).  Switched to Vredestein Fortezza tricomps, but still would recoment these to. They have a bit of a softer feel than the Tricomps, but can only be inflated to 120 psi (Tricomps give you 145)</review_text>
Now, you do have to have some common sense here. Pre-heat the thermos with hot water before you put the food inside. After the metal inside warms, it does a phenomenal job of insulating and keeping food hot!  Cold food, does well too.  And, it's as tough as advertised. If you've ever dropped a glass-insulated bottle you'll love this thermos</review_text>
I bought this water bottle to keep my water cold and after trying many other drinkers, I saw this Hydration Bottle by Thermos.  I was looking for a drinker or bottle that had a CHUG style opening, no baby rubber straws that flip up, or inside straws that fall off when you add ice, I wanted something that would give me water on the spot and was easy to load with regular sized ice cubes without cramming them down with the pick action of a spoon handle.  I also wanted something sturdy, a bottle that could withstand a direct drop onto a concrete driveway when my water bottle falls off the floor of my truck and out onto the concrete.  First, let me tell you...this gem keeps your water freezing cold more than a day long!  I still have ice cubes the next day!  Also, this awesome water bottle holds enough water to satisfy me much longer than those wimpy kindergarten 12 ouncers.  I don't like to run out of water, I live in the desert!  The bottom has a rubberized base to eliminate scooting and also offer some protection from drops.  Also, it's completely spill, drip, and leak proof, absolutely!  The super cool push button flip open lid gives you instant clearance to chug a gulp of water, this is particularly nice when you're driving and you don't have an extra hand!  The surface of this hydration bottle stays condensation free, no wet hands!  I fill this every morning and don't leave home without it, I like having water with me all the time but am picky about quality water, so I take my filtered water, no thanks Aquafina bottle water, I'll bottle my own for free.  I love this product, If it ever breaks, I'll buy this same one again!A NOTE:  This hydration bottle would be perfect for carrying baby formula in, especially if you're traveling, on vacation, on a plane trip, going to be away from home all day.  Your formula would be plenty warm and ready to fill more than one bottle.  The hydration bottle would relieve your worry of spoiling your formula or needing to find hot water quickly somewhere to mix your formula!  I wish I'd had this when I was a new mom!RECOMMENDE</review_text>
I purchased this ball several weeks ago and have been using it pretty much every day.  It has been working fine.  The pump that comes with it is a real positive as depending on your lower back strength, you can adjust the air in the ball.Also no issues on the packaging and delivery.  The ball and the pump came without any defect and in a reasonable amount of time.The price at $12.99 is hard to beat.Highly recommended..</review_text>
The quality and looks of this item are great.  I was amazed by it.  I ordered the black chair, the one without the logo.  Everything about it is quality and it's comfortable and light weight, too.  Can't wait to use it.  The umbrella is stable when inserted in the slots on the chair, unlike one that is clipped on.  The little table is nice and will easily hold my drink and a book. Also, it folds up very nicely to stick in the trunk of the car or back of our minivan.  I got my money's worth.  No regrets on this item.  Also, the delivery was quick.  The whole experience was great</review_text>
I am on the road a lot.  Sometimes I can't find the time to eat.  It tastes great, and gives me the energy I need when I need it.  This is so much better than those horrible energy bars.  It is small and convenient.  I have noticed better performance having some food in me when I just can't find the time to eat.  For the person on the road a lot, buy this and keep it in the car</review_text>
I love my Side Seat car Cover by Thule.  The Organizer fits very easily on my passenger seat side.  Its a perfect fit as it is the exact length between the top of the passenger seat and its armrest.  Thule has made it very clean looking and built it well.  It adds three pockets to stash your odds and ends.  It is very handy and mostly out of the way, even when I reach back behind the drivers seat.  I use my vehicle as a support station, and it helps hold stuff I need to get to quickly!The upside:  Small compact and out of the way.  Easy to get to while driving.  Adds storage without cluttering up the car.  Build to last and easy to install. Will work well with and will not interfere with other behind the seat storage devices or pockets.  Kids can't kick it from the booster seat.  And looks cool!The downside: It does not hold too much stuff and my passenger seat armrest cannot fold up while it is attached.  Not that it ever needed too anyway.Good product for the money</review_text>
I love this product. The only thing was that I believe it was smaller than what it said it was. Other than that I love it. It got to my home quickly</review_text>
this block is nice and sturdy, but not too heavy. much better than the foam blocks i have used.</review_text>
My boyfriend and I are active yogis, and attend class at every opportunity. I'm pretty flexible, and don't typically use blocks, but he... well, he uses them with some frequency. The foam blocks (typically from Gaiam) are inexpensive and so are propagated by yoga studios, however, they give very poor support, and don't feel at all secure to put your weight on. And the older and better-used they get, the more they give under you. So, I invested in these cork blocks as his valentine's day gift, and voila! Now we fight over who gets to use them! They're sturdy and solid, without being too heavy, and buying them through Amazon, the price was right; they cost a lot more on the Hugger Mugger website and other places. I highly recommend!</review_text>
I am very happy with my cork block.  It is a nice size and is heavy enough that it doesn't tip as easily when I use it to steady a pose</review_text>
I have the 65 cm model, and it came as described.  It is has more of a latex feel than some of the more rigid, plastic-feeling balls, and it is not as rigid as I have experienced in the past. Still rugged and very useful, but it is probably better suited for folks 6" shorter than advertised</review_text>
This scope is high quality for its price. The scope package comes with mounting rings and other tools to install this scope onto your weaver rail. The delivery was fast and I am satisfied. 5/5 Start + 2 Thumbs up to these guys. This scope is huge by the way and pretty heavy</review_text>
I recently purchased this to replace an older broken computer. The cadence helps significantly with training. Wireless is always nice, but considering price this computer is perfect. It was easy to install and is easy to use</review_text>
I purchased this computer to replace another Cateye that was a front-wheel sensor (speed/distance) because I recently started using a resistance trainer indoors and needed crank (cadence) and rear-wheel (speed/distance) sensors. Nice features and easy to mount and wire</review_text>
Come on people this item is a no brainer.  If you have any or all of the Legend of Zelda games and enjoyed them then this is a "must have it" item</review_text>
I really like the brightness of the light. The only thing I don't like is that it takes about 15 hours for it to charge, and you can't use it while it's charging, or you'll damage the unit. It has 1,000,000 candle power, which is excellent. The fluorescent light is very bright too. Besides it having to charge for 15 hours, I really like this product</review_text>
I had no such problems with my lantern.  I charged it for the recommended 15 hours, and the light was super bright.  It lasted on and off use for about 4-5 days.  The light is super sturdy and is great because it does not use up batteries like other lights</review_text>
These cars can be summed up in two words FUN and LOUD.  I have two and my four year old loves it and so do all his friends.  They work great throughout the house and hold their charge really well.  I am even thinking of getting a third.  They do leave little marks on the wood floors but it cleans easily.  Well worth it.</review_text>
When the buggie arrived, it didn't work. I had to call Razor's Customer Service Dept. Their service is awful. The Senior Agent was very rude. I managed to figure out the problem on my own. The electrical unit was not connected. Once it was connected, it worked fine. We have two of them. The kids love them. They are lightweight and ride well on carpet. Overall, the product is good.</review_text>
Great product, fun for children, nicely designed, easy to operate.I purchased 3 of the razor bumper buggie (Ladybug) cars for 3 of my grandchildren age 4, 3, and 2.  The cars arrived promptly. At  Christmas  I charged the batteries and gave them to the children.  The cars work great! Even the 2 year old can work her car! Just like her big brothers. Although, one battery did not hold the charge correctly, a quick call to the company and a new part was sent immediately.  GrandmaLind</review_text>
This is the best toy I've spent money on in years! It's cute - my girls love them...I bought two!  They are great to ride in the garage or believe it or not....they go well on carpet!  They have laughed, bumped, even learned how to use the driving handles with their feet!  Great fun</review_text>
We bought these so the children could have something to play with during the winter.  We backed our vehicles out of the garage, and zoom....they were off having fun.The box says "Ages 3+" and up to 55 pounds.  The bumper buggie looks small, but it is roomy enough for my 5 1/2 year old.  He weighs 45 pounds and is 45 inches tall.  He can stretch his legs out in the car, but chooses to keep his knees bent while driving.  My two year old can also work the controls.It is easy to use and the kids can do a complete 360.  My only complaint is that it is a little bit noisy, but no more than other battery-operated vehicles.I highly recommend this item.  It is so much fun!  Best part is that there is little assembly required.  The only thing we had to do was screw the seat into the car</review_text>
I received the Pyramid Pro Gel Seat Cruiser Cover in a timely manner.  The cover fits perfect on my stationary bike.  Great fit and perfect comfort. I would recommend this item to others!</review_text>
This is a pretty nice bike rack. It's sturdy enough to hold your bikes without worrying about them moving around and dislodging. The product manual is really difficult to understand, but the rack itself is simple enough that the manual isn't really needed. Overall, it's worth spending a little extra for this rack, as you don't have to worry about anything when using it! Plus, it's got a lifetime warrenty. Can't go wrong</review_text>
I recently purchased this ball for my pilates workout. So far so good,...the ball stays firm and the included pump is lightweight and convenient to use. My only complaint is that the 55cm ball is only available in white...I would have preferred a more vibrant color.</review_text>
I got this stopwatch as a gift from my grandmoher. It's very acurate and is the perfect tool for racing. I also use this stopwatch for recording the number of minutes I play the piano. I would'nt recommend it for that use because it moves exactly he way the clock moves. But overall, this is a great item and I highly recommend it to anybody</review_text>
This is good! Very tiring after the first 5 roll....but its worth it.Easy to assemble,simple price,and works!A must buy</review_text>
This device is exactly what I was looking for. Once you get comfortable enough on your knees, try starting from the standing position; very challanging.I have to disagree with the "not worth it" review. The whole POINT of this device is to force your body to WORK so a mechanism to make your workout easier would be counterproductive. Stop whinging and do the work</review_text>
This equipment is no joke and it deals out quite a lot of pain for 6 bucks. I decided that it wasn't that hard on the first day and did a couple more reps than a should have. Needless to say, I didn't work my abs for the next 3 days because I was too sore to move them around. Get this and let your friends try it. You'll love the great looks on their faces.</review_text>
I can't believe some companies will charge $86 for the same concept. This one cost $6! Possibly the cheapest in the US market.Performing this excercise is extremely hard. I first saw this done standing by jackie chan in the movie "gorgeous". You need strong abs and chest to start with, plus good arms to keep balance, if you want to perform at this level.when you start out on your knees. Be sure to wear gloves, the handles are stiff plastic. Then TRY JUST ONE complete rep and celebrate. If returning to the original position (pinching your abs together) is hard, then try resetting yourself and just concentrate on going down (stretching your back and abs out). Then the next day try 2 reps. Then take a day off. Overdoing will be painful the next morning.I really recommend doing this excercise as your FIRST workout before working other parts of your body. It would be tough to even hold the thing together after pumping your tri/bicepts or shoulders.TIP leave an inch gap between the wheels by wrapping some rope around the bar to make the balancing act a lot easier.Finally, i happy to say after a few months of doing this on my knees i was able to start off from a standing position jackie chan style.I have pretty strong six pack now, I can take blows from a 10 year old.  But i still have a nice sheet of flab over my abs from the lack of running this winter.Goodluck to those who dare this feat.</review_text>
I bet you have never felt your abs get demolished the way this will. If you have never used one and/or you are out of shape stay away. I tell my clients that if I am asking them to even do it once it is a compliment and testament to the fitness they have. These things rule, take up no space, are cheap and get you ripped!!! Enjoy!</review_text>
The Ab Wheel will strengthen your abdominals from top to bottom as well as your lower back.  It is a very intense exercise - you will not have to spend a lot of time doing the exercise in order to get excellent results.  For most individuals (myself included) I recommend starting slowly.   Do not try to do a full extension of the exercise.  Initially the full extensions put some undue stress on the lower back.  With each work out you can extend a little furthur and in no time you will likely build up to full extensions.</review_text>
This is a great little device to work your abs, but it's not going to give you a six pack all by itself...  you need to watch your diet as well. Two tips:1. make sure you stretch before use; especially your back and shoulders, since they will be getting a workout too.2. use it on a thick carpet or put a folded towel under your knees; you'll be a lot more comfortable.All in all, this is far superior to the more expensive ab devices you see on late night TV</review_text>
The Ironman Double Ab Wheel is the best way to get ripped, sexy abs without breaking your wallet. I've used the Ab Wheel for a month now and have lost 20 lbs. I admit that it was intense when I first used it because of the immediate burn that I felt but as soon as I got used to it, the fat just shed  right off</review_text>
As with all Pelican cases (I have a half-dozen) this case provides the ultimate in equipment protection from the elements. I just wanted to say that this case fits the Nikon D40 w/ standard kit lens (18-55mm) perfectly. According to my measurements, and eyeballing it, it should also have no problem accommodating the same body with an attached 18-200 mm VR lens once I get that upgrade</review_text>
This is the best air horn you can buy because, unlike aerosol air horn cans, it can never rust nor run out of freon.I like this model of this type because it's smaller and the membrane diaphragm is protected from accidental tears by a grid cover on the large end.  I keep one in my 16 ft. runabout boat.  And I take one with me when I'm diving.I would like to see the manufacturer make one half that size especially for scuba divers and snorklers.My only complaint is that the lanyard came off.  So I drilled a small hole just below the lip of the small end and inserted a new lanyard.This product works great!  Really LOUD!!!!It's quite durable, but, being plastic, it is breakable and it is subject to stress cracks and ageing from sun damage.  But if you maintain it by washing it occassionally and keeping it out of the sun and not knocking it around, it should last a long time.  And if it doesn't-- so what?  For $8 or so it's cheap enough to buy another</review_text>
Great for excercise or as an office chair!  The TKO Anti Burst Fitness Ball Set 75cm ROCKS! Cool color too!</review_text>
The footpump that comes with this ball is almost useless and very frustrating to use.My Fitness Ball would not fully inflate.I returned it</review_text>
I have many types and brands of snowshoes from traditional ash wood and rawhide to the new aluminum  style with synthetic decking. Crescent Moon makes the best of the modern design snowshoe. The binding system on the Gold series is very easy to adjust and use, when you have cold fingers. Your boot does not slip out of the binding like my Atlas and Tubbs snowshoes. They are well constructed with welded frames. Many of the lesser brands do not do this. The fit and finish shows their high quality standards. They provide good flotation on fluffy snow and the crampons bite well on hardpack.Another PLUS is that Crescent Moon snowshoes are made by an innovative company located in Colorado, USA. I also purchased a pair of Crescent Moon Gold 9s for my wife. She loves them. The Gold series snowshoes also have a lifetime warranty. I highly recommend their products!!</review_text>
I have used this regularlynot for Rehab but for routineexercise.  It is convenientto adjust the weight becausethe weight has been dividedinto 20 iron bars</review_text>
We purchased this bike for our 4yr old daughter. We chose a Schwinn because of its reputation and quality and we were not disappointed. The bike is extremly well built and sturdy (3" wheels) and will last for many years to come.  Our daughter loves the coloring, tassels and the zippered pouch to hold all of her knick-knacks.  The only thing that I did not pick-up on when ordering the bike is that it does not come with "BMX" tires... only smooth ones.  So heads up if you live in the country like we do. However, with 3" tires, this bike can go just about anywhere</review_text>
I purchased this bike as a first big girl bike for my daughter's 4th birthday, graduating from the tricycle.  She loved the color, and even the streamer handlebars, which were an extra pleasant surprise for her.  Stability is excellent; she successfully rode almost instantly.  Yes, you can save $[...] (or more) and purchase a less expensive bike, even with the Schwinn name, as I did for my older son, but the quality construction comparison is night and day.  The other bike is only two years old and has had reflectors brake off, connected by plastic instead of metal.  When he's ready for a bigger bike, I'll definitely spend the extra money.</review_text>
We purchased this bike for our four year old granddaughter.  We received prompt delivery, the bike was easy to assemble, and it is a joy being with her when she rides on her big girls bike</review_text>
our daughter loves her bike...it was alittle difficult to put the front wheel together with the frame,,,but when we figured it out it all went together ok.the bike is a solid frame,very sturdy and my daughter feels safe and loves the bike..this bike is well worth the money,,,definately recommend it</review_text>
Lose weight and tone your muscles with this home gym.  Anyone can get back into shape using this product.  The smooth motion of the workout is easy on the joints</review_text>
I purchased the Bowflex Conquest in late February.  I was looking for a machine that my wife and I could both use.  My intent is to tone muscle and lose some weight.  The Bowflex Conquest arrived in approximately one week (after ordering).  Eagle Global Logistics delivered it - no problems.  The machine comes in four boxes that are quite easy to move around your home (to wherever you decide to place this machine).  The heavist box is around 65 pounds.  Setup time from start to finish (i.e. from opening to boxes to throwing away the trash) was about 3 hours.  I was not missing any parts and the instructions are very easy to follow.  The machine seems to be very solid, stable and well built.  I've been using it every other day for about a week and am pleased with how it works.  The motion is quite smooth and it's easy to do a multitude of different workouts on this machine.  It takes a few times to learn the different ways of using this machine (the book and included DVD help).  Overall, this is a great item for the average homeowner.  It would probably not be the best choice for an avid bodybuilder or someone like that.  It's a perfect choice, however, for the "average Joe" just looking to get a good workout in his/her own home.  Just a side note - I had to call Bowflex Customer Service to ask a question.. they were extremely helpful and knowledgeable.  Overall, I'm very pleased with this purchase and am glad I bought it.</review_text>
I bought the Bowflex because I wanted an alternative to lifting heavy weights that from various injuries made my joints ache. After unloading  my basement full of gym equipment I searched for the best deal on a Bowflex that met my needs and price range. Amazon offered alot of choices at good prices so I settled on the Conquest. I opened a business CC and have six months interest free to pay for it and ordering was simple. The delivery went great and came in about a week or so. Since it comes in four boxes I strongly recomend taking everything out one box at a time and spread it out. Putting it together was fairly easy if you follow the directions and aren,t impatient you can do it by yourself but it may help to have a second person at times.My early thoughts are that I will love this product although it does take some time to learn all the exercises and the attachments. The video does the best job of showing various things the booklet lacks good pictures of certain attachments and their use. In the end I feel I made a great choice at 46 I enjoy an active lifestyle and this will help me keep it. Plus I feel it won,t effect my golf game in a negative way regular weight lifting did.DaveMichiga</review_text>
Over the last 2 years, I have been member of 4 different gyms.  I traveled a lot overseas during that time, so I juggled the memberships quite a bit and ended up paying way more than I wanted.  My usual trips to the gym took 2-4 hours including travel time, I'm a pretty motivated person, but after a while, it is just becomes too difficult to get myself in the gym because of the time and money involved.After coming back from a recent 1 year trip overseas, I've decided to look into home gyms to save both money and time.  After extensive research, I ended up purchase the Conquest here on Amazon.  Some other machines I looked at were the Platinum Crossbow, Total Gym, Bandflex.  After comparing all the machines and going to the local sporting store to try out the Bowflex, I had no doubt that Bowflex is well worth the money.Other machines might be cheaper, smaller and easier to assemble.  But I found that the Bowflex quality is difficult to match.Setup:I put together the machine in about 2 hours.  All you need is a couple of screw drivers, the everything else needed is in the package.  The instructions were easy to follow and makes logical sense.  However, my Bowflex, like many others, arrived missing a few parts.  In my case it was just a few washers and a couple of screws, nothing critical, but such problems seemed common from what I've read.Operation:If you have not used a Bowflex yet, you are in for a treat.  The Power Rods provide very smooth resistance and wonderful range of motion.  The resistance builds as you flex the power rods, very easy on the joints at the beginning of the motion, yet still provides enough to break down your muscles toward the end of the motion.  The DVD provides instruction for basic exercises (about 15), and the manual covers over 60 different exercises.  A lot of them are simply variations of another exercise, but I found myself creating new ways to exercise that is not covered in the included material.  The weight and type of exercises were easy to change, and will not interfere with your workout.  I found this to be a very good time saver vs waiting for machines at the gym.Size:No matter how many times you have seen the Bowflex on TV, you won't realize how big the machine truly is until you have put it together.  The conquest is easily 7ft tall, and takes a huge amount of space in my living room.  It has wheels, but you will not be able to fit it through most doors, so think long and hard before you decide which room you will place it.Value:I ordered here on Amazon because of the awesome discounted price they had, evident by the fact the machine sold out 2 days after I placed my order.  But after using the machine for a week, I can honestly say I would gladly pay full price for the machine.  Like any other piece of exercise equipment, if you make good use of it, and it is worth every penny.  I noticed that this machine is nearly identical to the more expensive Sport model, but is hundreds cheaper.Summary:This is the best item I have purchased in 2006, over the years I always ignored the Bowflex TV ads and considered it a fad.  But the Conquest proved its worth a dozen times over the last week; for once a machine that works better than advertised.Pros: solid construction, long warranty, exercise variety, smooth motion, easy operation, great long term value.Cons: Setup time, size, missing partsNeutral: Decent resale value</review_text>
I was surprised by how bright this LED flashlight is when used as a flashlight. They've got a nice mirror/lens for focusing the beam. When you pull it apart to make the lantern, it's ok - would probably light up a tent just fine. Would be a nice little light to take camping</review_text>
Gives alot of light,not like other lamps we've tried. Great to have on had during a power outage. Perfect for camping if you can recharge</review_text>
THESE LAMP IS REALLY USEFUL, COULD BE USE IN ANY PLACE, KIDS  COULD USE, EASY TO TURN ON DO NOT REFLECT HEAT.</review_text>
I just started taking Lipo 6 about five days ago and I've already lost five pounds.  I'm 6'1" and about 234 lbs.  My usual weight is between 190 and 200 lbs, but I've been having some rough times over the past few months so I kept packing on the pounds out of desperation.  Now, this supplement is keeping me happy and awake.  The only side effect I've noticed is an occasional case of the jitters, but hey. . . it keeps me awake!  I look and feel different already. . . and this is from a cynical point of view!  I highly recommend this product.  The only side effect I've noticed is an occasional case of the jitters, but hey. . . it keeps me awake!I don't know if it'll keep working after reading some reviews, but I'm happy with it now!  If any more progress. . . or anything negative. . . I'll just update this review</review_text>
Ok I must admit, you wll get a bit of stomach discomphort and READ THE LABEL do no take more than 4 caps a day... It'll freak you out!!If you are sort of dieting, and excercising THIS STUFF will work, and you will LITERALLY FLUSH THE FAT OUT OF YOUR BODY... (Maybe thats why  you get a bit of diaorhea at first).DO NOT TAKE IT FOR LOBGER THAN 8 WEEKS. I AM ON MY SECOND ONE AND I CAN SEE THE FAT GOING BUT IT WILL EVENTUALLY STOP WORKING... Its ok, 8 weeks is more than enough time to  loose it all IF YOU ARE EXCERCISING!!!!IT WORKS!!</review_text>
OK, I got suckered by reading good reviews on the net, and over hearing a trainer at the gym singing praises of Lipo6. So despite that I have never found a weight loss supplement that actually worked, I decided I'd give it a whirl.I was amused by a previous review which says DON'T TAKE IT IF YOU'RE ALREADY A HEALTHY WEIGHT! Well...she then goes on to mention she is a VERY healthy 5'1" and 115 lbs! But she took it??? Should have been a red flag to me.I must be the only one (don't see this side effect mentioned elsewhere), but this made me a total BEAR to live with (ok, not the B word I REALLY want to describe myself as, but it's the PG version). I was irritable, had daily headaches, and saw no movement on the scale whatsoever!Waste of money, waste of time, waste of quiet evenings at home ruined by my annoyed mood!</review_text>
This bottle is double in size from the one you can buy for the same exact price at Walmart.  I've used the product at a level that is less than it recommends on the bottle as I find I just don't need as much of it to achieve what seems to be a good affect.  I'm not looking to lose a huge amount of weight.  Honestly, I find that this works amazingly as a energy booster for me during the day, and I use it like most would a cup of coffee.  I get that awake, energetic feeling without any side effect of jitters, etc.  It's not upsetting to my stomach at all, regardless of if it's on an empty stomach.  It says not to use it late in the day, and I'd have to agree, if you don't want to be kept up, then keep it to the morning and afternoon, but I have actually taken it late in the day when I know I have to stay up late and stay awake, or am on a long drive.  It just makes me feel better overall, and when I go on my daily run, or get on the weights, I'm tuned in and have the energy to give it my best.  I did notice a slow decrease in weight loss all over my body.  I was fighting the bulge on my middle and I did notice it helped with that as well.  I have recommended this product to many of my friends if they ask me how I've slimmed down or they are complaining of a lack of energy.  When I quit taking it altogether, I do notice a pretty strong reduction of my energy and tiredness, and that is with only taking a total of one or 2 of them a day.  It states you should build up to 2 in the am and 2 in the afternoon.  I'm sure that would really add to a rapid weight loss, as it seems to curb your appetite.  I find when I take it, I really feel great and don't seem as hungry, so I don't really think about food since I don't feel like I'm dragging.  I've gone thru 2 bottles of it and am ready to buy my third.One downside:  It can have a tendency to give occasional heartburn.  If you are someone who suffers regularly from reflux, you might want to be careful with it, but I found that a few tums would neutralize that when it happened.  One capsule did leak in the bottle and had an odor like peanut butter</review_text>
My boyfriend took this last year for wrestling season and lost about fifteen pounds without at all altering his eating or exercise habits. As an athlete, he always gets a huge amound of exercise at practice, and by lifting weights and running daily but eats whatever and as much as he wants. He started the bottle weighing 195-200 at 6'1'' and ended weighing 178. He maintained this weight for about six months too, proving that it wasn't just water.He DID experience pretty bad side effects, however, to the point where he said he wouldn't take the product again or recomend it to anyone. Taking the suggested 4 pills a day, he felt constantly sick, like he had "all the life sucked out of him" and actually vomited twice- pretty gross.Anyways, because of the significant results he experienced, i've always been tempted to try the product myself and finally picked up a bottle last week, to my boyfriend's dismay.So far, I haven't felt sick or shaky at all, and I think this is because my daily dose of ritalin has all but completely numbed my body to the effects of weaker stimulants like the 200mg of caffeine contained in this product. I also unfortunately haven't noticed any weight loss, and this may be for the same reason :-(I'll report back when I finish the bottle</review_text>
Lipo 6 promises appetite suppression, increased weight loss, increased energy, increase metabolism and target problem areas.Does it work? Maybe. Heres my experience..Weight loss - I dont weigh myself often but I've been told I look thinner - I dont notice a radical change in my clothing, but I do realize the scale is telling me something I like alot better than It told me a month prior to today. But I dont have any official numbers on record. Did I lose weight? probably - but I worked out and losing any extra due to this product is questionable.Targeting problem areas - I feel more comfortable with my problem areas, but it could simply be more psychological. I dont measure inches and I dont dont weigh myself. Clothing doesnt fit much differently.Appetite Suppression - I should have focused more on this. I know one day, I hardly finished one serving of oatmeal, while other days im pigging out on fruit and sweet potatoes and turkey burgers.  I never really felt as if days I were light on the supplement my appetite decreased or my appetite decreasing at all for that matter.Metabolism/Energy - I'd have to give this a plus here. On days I so-happen to forget to take the supplement, I lacked the energy to pick up running and when I tried to force my way through it, I'd slow back down to a walk just a half mile into it. Plus, I lacked the horrible crash that I feared that taking this would give me when I stopped using it (had to stop taking it for a few days twice) Worst I had was a slight headache likely from the lack of caffeine.Ok - Negative side effects.This stuff goes straight through you! And the smell is horrible. Its just short of diahrrea. It wasnt something I was unable to work through - it didnt interrupt my day, but it was definetly a nuisance. Because of that, I cannot wait for this to finish and make its final course through my body. Your [...] will not like you because of this product, but if your willing to tolerate that - go for it. it likely wont hurt you - but keep in mind there are horror stories out there claiming heart palpitations, stroke, and death. I just had a firey [...]. So... take with caution - there are also some incredible stories of weight loss. go with whatever you want</review_text>
We purchased this for my son's 4th birthday.  He LOVES it!  After "camping" for almost a week in the basement we finally took the tent down to get him back in his bed.  This tent is perfect for inside.  We haven't had an opportunity to test it outside yet, but we will have a regular tent as a backup.</review_text>
i like all the items that come with the tent. my son is 15 months old and we play in it in the living room. he also uses the book bag and bottle on a daily basis as his baby bag.we also take naps in it.</review_text>
My 4-year old grandson hasn't slept without this sleeping bag since I got it for him.  It was to have stayed at my house, but he wanted to take it home.  Washed up great and colors stayed true.   Good value</review_text>
A product that is well worth the money, OnGuard makes the best bike locks that I have seen. Fast and easy to use, this lock is a nightmare would be thieves prefer not to think about it. I highly recommend this product to anyone who needs a good bike lock.</review_text>
In this case GIANT and COLOSAL are not just words, are facts. I have both the Colosal and the Giant versions. The Colosal which I have is dark blue, almost black actualy and is COLOSAL. Is the biggest Duffle which I have ever seen in my whole life. The Giant one is red and I must admit that I like the color.  This one is not smaller either. Both are simple, light, do not have a lot of compartments and Cordura is the best material. I have a pair of pants wich look like new after years and years</review_text>
This appears to be a well-made basic duffle which will withstand heavy duty. The addition of one or two zippered pockets would make it even better.</review_text>
I was looking for a good no frills duffle for camping gear, and this was just right.  It is strong and durable.  Only one compartment though.  I would have liked one small pocket for little items.  I have the medium-size duffle -- which holds a tent and gear -- and the small-size duffle -- which is very small.  It holds a fleece sleeping bag/blanket and a small camping pillow and that's about all.  Also, these bags include the shoulder strap.  Some gear duffles do not.</review_text>
I bought this to use with my Mr. Bento lunch kit, and I'm satisfied with it.  The spoon is deep enough to be useful (larger bowl than, for example, the average plastic spoon) and the fork simply does its job.  The knife edge is useful for foods that are already fairly tender (ie., tender enough to cut with the edge of a metal fork), but the limitation is that you have only a knife, not another utensil to hold the food in place (since the knife is actually the edge of the fork).Be sure to pack a napkin, though, since it'll need a wipe when you switch between spoon and fork.  The handle is a bit short, which is why I take off a star.All in all, though, it's exactly what I was hoping it would be, and I would recommend for lunch kits, etc.</review_text>
I like this balance board. I'm just starting out, and I like that the angle is not too steep and that there are bumpy treads on the surface. I also like that it is octagonal rather than round, so it makes it easier getting on and off for us beginners. One star removed for the enclosed exercises -- there are none.  Happy exercising</review_text>
I bought these pink tennis balls for my dog for Valentines day.  She loves them.  Besides that - I also gave some to a friend who is an avid tennis player and she said they were excellent.  They arrived two days before they were suppose to.  All in all I am very pleased</review_text>
The E-Z Foldz Step Stool is one of the handiest inventions in years.  No only for households with small children but for any household that needs that 'extra height' but doesn't want to keep a step ladder handy.  Certainly a help reaching those cabinets over the microwave and frig.,,,,, and it stores in the smallest space, even under the sink.</review_text>
We were looking for a step stool that would work to assist the ederly in and out of a van. When we seen this we knew we sould give it a try although we wondered if it would have enough stability. When it arived we were very impressed with the stability and so are the folks in the van pool!! A great product!</review_text>
Ingenious and practical. Does the job and then disappears. What more could you ask for ( from any contractor ).</review_text>
I wish they had a picture showing how this folds flat.  This makes it so easy to store.  We use it in our RV, as it takes absolutely minimal space.I find that my ankles don't swell if I put my feet up on a small stool like this on long trips.The plastic is very strong, making the step quite sturdy</review_text>
It easy to play tennis with it,confort and power at same time.So you most to have presicion it`s in ocation dificult to control it.But at time you do it</review_text>
I did a lot of research for a racket before purchasing this one. One of the reasons I got it is because of the very light weight of the racket. I have a sist which cuts circulation and strength in my swing wrist not allowing me to utilize the full force of my arm during the swings so I had to have a really light weight racket. The other detail to my story is that I am a weaklink and I need a light racket. I am also a beginner player and needed a racket that would bounce off any side of the racket I hit the ball with. This racket is truly a wonderful piece</review_text>
I was using forearm banding for tennis elbow for a long time.  When my old racquet broke, I did an extensive research for a new racquet that provided comfort and control rather than power.  I came across Head Ti.S5 and after trying a demo, the feel was so good that I took my banding off.  I bought a pair and for the past month I have not had elbow or wrist pain with this racquet.  (And I play tennis 4-5 times a week.)  The weight is light and the frame absorbs a lot of shock and vibration upon contact.  Besides comfort, the larger head size and wider string pattern allow you to generate topspin without much effort.  If you are a beginner-intermediate player with slow-to-medium swing, you'll find this a comfortable and easy to handle racquet.  Highly recommended</review_text>
well... i just got my clubs today and i have been to the driving range and golf course already. i must say... the clubs are the best i've used for a really good price.</review_text>
First let me state that I am a (far) below average golfer and am in no way qualified to debate the merits of different materials, designs, etc.  If you're seriously considering paying $100 for a full set of clubs, you probably aren't the most discerning customer, either.Having said that, the Hippo clubs are an outstanding value.  Bags alone run upwards of forty dollars at sporting goods stores.  The clubs are great quality for what they cost, and I couldn't be happier with the purchase.  If golf ever becomes a more serious obsession I'm sure I'll upgrade to a better set of clubs, but these are perfect for someone who gets out once in a blue moon to chase a ball all over the course.</review_text>
I was looking for an inexpensive set to have shipped to a relative's home out of my state where I visit occasionally.  Although I have not used them yet, my relative says they seem like good clubs except that there was a defect with the bag where the clubs are separated.  Even so I was pleased with my purchase at a price of 100.00 including shipping. I didn't find any other clubs, even used ones, that were priced that low.  Now I won't have to rent clubs for every round or haul my regular set through airport baggage terminals.</review_text>
The clubs are very good quality and are very forgiving on errant shots. The shafts give you plenty of power. My distance and accuracy both increased</review_text>
Hey, I wasn't looking for anything special but I'm tired of playing with seriously old clubs.  These aren't spectacular but I've played with them a few rounds and they play fine.  I'm sure if you're a low handicap you'd find fault, but for an average player they are fine and you can't beat the value.  I say get these and have some money left over for balls, globes, shoes, greens fees... and so forth</review_text>
I have now had these clubs for 3 weeks.  They replaced an old set I had been using for 30 years.  What a joy to move into the modern age.  The set was good for 6 strokes on my first game.  The sweet spot is marvelous and the slice and hook ratio is way down  The quality is much better than expected, especially for the money.  For the occasional amateur player like myself, they really fill the bill.  I would not hesitate to reccomend this set to others who would like to improve their game and only play occasionally</review_text>
I just purchased this board on sale for 44.99.  not at all worth the purchase.  board looks aged and faded.  would not recommend</review_text>
The pointed screws that are meant to screw into the brackets to provide a ground are terrible.  They are too small, what you need to do is go to the hardware store and pickup some longer pointed screws to provide the ground for the brackets, then the lights will work just fine.  Other than problem with the wrong size screws, the product was pretty easy to install and worth the whole 15 bucks I spent on it</review_text>
I was initially frustrated with this set, but at ~$10, I wasn't really complaining once I got it to work.  The key to getting it to work is screwing the bracket into the frame so it makes solid contact through paint for a good ground.  I basically read the directions to get the general idea, and then installed it myself based on what made sense.I would buy it again, but only for a cheaper bike, not my good one</review_text>
I used the towel last night in class and it worked great.  In the past I've struggled with downward facing dog, slipping on the mat and continually re-adjusting myself, a major distraction.  But with the towel on top of my regular mat I was solid and for the first time I was able to really focus on the stretch and my breathing.I was tempted to buy a yoga blanket online but my trainer mentioned that some of the blankets are rough against the skin and you have to find one that suites you.  The Yogitoes towel is more like a towel material and is smooth against the skin making both seated and standing poses very comfortable.The only downside so far is the total price, compared to blankets it's not that bad a price but with shipping it becomes an expensive item.  That said I have no regrets.</review_text>
Can't say enough about this product.  Suffer from sweaty palms with my yoga and this has stopped the slipping.  Love it</review_text>
I love the yoga towel. It is a bit slipery at first but once you sweat it gives good grip. Much better than using a towel. And it comes in so many color I wish I can get one of each but they are quite expensive. I found some on www.absoluteyogi.com for a much better price so now I can get some more for myself and my friends as birthday gifts.</review_text>
We first saw this tent on our vacation. I watched a dad set it up in seconds. It was a windy day and it didnt budge. Mom & baby were cozy inside.I thought it would be great for our next vacation bc I will have a 3 year old and infant. It is nice if you want to keep out of the sun, changer diapers & nurse your baby</review_text>
I purchased my Hugger Mugger yoga cushion about 3 months ago and have used it almost everyday since.  Since this is my first cushion, I have nothing to compare it to, but I have been happy with the overall durability.  My only complaint is that it is just a wee bit on the "too firm" side for me and occasionally causes some discomfort because it doesn't conform to my bottom quite as much as I would like.  But it does offer good support and hasn't "broken down" through use.  I do like the v-shape a lot and I think it would a good purchase for the money.  Overall, I'm pleased.</review_text>
This weight vest has about 35 weight pouches to allow lots of flexibility with how much weight you want to wear.</review_text>
While doing research online, I was intrigued that a 40 lb weight vest was priced at approx. $75, considering that the average retail price was closer to $200+. I was worried about some of the reviews posted but decided to give the product a shot. Needless to say, I have been pleasantly satisfied and would recommend this product.The vest itself has a number of positives: first, the fact that the weight is conveniently compartmentalized into 35 or so small weight bags offers me a lot of flexibility in terms of weight adjustment and configuration. I can put the weight high, center it on my breastbone, or place it low. I found that placing it in different configurations actually changes my workout approach. Second, I like the fact that I can adjust the vest solidly around my abdominal line, and not have to worry about the shoulder area, which is permanently stiched. Third, I also like the fact that it has broad shoulder straps, which has helped distribute the vest weight more comfortably. Apparently, this is a "product differentiator" with more expensive vests. The stiching has been solid so far...I was concerned because the vest is made of neoprene, but no problems so far.I feel it has only a few negatives: the material of neoprene takes a little bit of time to get used to, particularly its smell right out of the box. I am still concerned about using neoprene b/c of potential stich breaks...my experience with wetsuits makes me leery of stiching in neoprene, but fortunately there are no zipper area or cuff areas that may generate fraying. The vest covers a lot of area, and neoprene really makes you sweat when you work out. Be very careful using this product in warm rooms or outside in the sun: HYDRATE. Finally, since the vest covers most of my torso, I get strange looks at the gym when I come inside wearing the vest! Thankfully, there is a logo on the front, but in today's day and age, the average fellow gym rat would probably do a double take to make sure I'm not wearing some sort of bomb vest. Perhaps if they would offer a different color, such as grey or blue, it would make the product more friendly in public.Overall, I thank GoFit for a solid product at a very reasonable price point. I am a former military man, who takes his workouts seriously, and this item will definitely enhance any fitness regimen. Thanks for reading!</review_text>
Good service.   The product is slightly painful in the shoulders but other than that i love it</review_text>
This weight vest is exactly what I was looking for. I have lost 125#, and was not FEELING my workouts like I used to. This weight vest was the answer! It helps me to burn more calories and faster! I wear it running, walking, and biking! Please make sure that your legs can support it. I have had 2 knee surgeries, and at first they hurt, but now they are much stronger. Go slow, and then add more exercise</review_text>
THIS VEST HAS BEEN GREAT.  WEIGHT IS EASY TO ADJUST.  VEST IS COMFORTABLE SO FAR WITH UP TO 28LBS IN IT.  ALLOWS ME TO WALK AT LUNCH AND BURN SIMILAR CALORIES TO TAKING A RUN</review_text>
I wanted more of a workout while I walk my dogs so I wear the weight vest to add resistance.  I love it!  The little weights are easy to take out or add if you want to alter your weight.  It is comfortable too</review_text>
If you are really serious about hand grips, and you want something that is not your standard sport shop model, this is where to go. I got the Trainer, and for someone like myself that has been using hand grips since childhood, it was too easy. Then I got #1 and that was tuff; but I decided to get #2 and #3 as well. I have just recently graduated from #1 and using #2, and maybe in a year or more I can go to #3 and get certified.Let me tell you this, if you can squeeze #2 at least once all the way, you are good. You can't really understand what I am trying to tell unless you get one. So if you are person that has never used hand grips regularly if at all, then go with the Trainer. If you have been using hand grips for awhile, and looking for something harder, then get the #1.Remember to always squeeze hard!!!P.S.I guarantee you will not be able to squeeze the #4 gripper.</review_text>
I agree with the reviewer who said the shipping was pricey.  $7.10 is a lot for shipping a light-weight item in an unpadded envelope.  The price of the bag is steep, too, for a plain nylon bag with a handle and a drawstring.  HOWEVER, this is the ONLY bag I've found that fits my extra long Crescent Moon Pilates mat.  The usual yoga mat bags I've looked at have all been too small, even those described as "large."  The mat cost over $70, so I consider a suitable bag to protect it is well worth the cost</review_text>
My daughter has been scooting away on this. We had her use it inside the house during the winter on condition that once she starts using it outside, it is not coming back inside. It was put to some good use inside and it has moved out now.My daughter has become a master of it. The brake is very smooth. The scooter as a whole is very sturdy. Highly recommended</review_text>
Arrived very quickly in perfect condition.  Couldn't ask for more</review_text>
All the kids in our neighborhood have these and love them. This is really fun scooter.  Even mom wants a turn on it.</review_text>
Our daughter loved this thing and it was unbelievably easy to put together out of the box. I don't usually like to do this kind of stuff (building toys) because it often winds up being a huge headache. It's often frustrating, with hard to understand and/or incomplete directions...and, of course, you generally have the kid standing over you wondering why it's taking so long!The thing went together in minutes and she was out on the sidewalk playing less than 15 minutes after she'd opened it (she wanted to get out of her PJs)</review_text>
I am extremely happy with these bearings.  Smooth roll and not expensive.  Great choice for beginner/intermediate roller derby.  Be sure to buy 2 sets for skates since only 8 come in one package</review_text>
These bearings are an awesome deal for the price!  If you mention BONES RED BEARINGS to the kids/youth in the neighborhood they will immediately tell you all about the great performance, durability, reliability and quality to be expected when you own a set of Bones.  Just like with all bearings, they will last longer and perform better if you clean them properly and regularly, but I tend to believe BONES REDS will still outlast other bearing brands even if you don't service them as regularly as suggested. THEY ARE JUST SIMPLY AWESOME!</review_text>
I have these on my board now. They're cheap and they roll silky smooth, when you feel how your board rides with these you'll be amazed. If you need some extra incentive, the bearings have red sides that look cool and they come with a sticker :</review_text>
These bearings are so totally awsome.The price is cheap too if your looking for high quality affordable bearings.I took these bearings for a ride at the skatepark and could ride higher on ramps than ever before.these bearings are great</review_text>
i don't know why other companies even bother making cheap abec 5 bearings. everybody i know who can't afford swiss joints get these bearing. to be a competitor of bones in the cheap abec 5 bearings market is like fanta trying to get in on sunkist's orange soda game. it just aint' gonna happen dude. these things are so good and so cheap that I bought a bearings cleaner and cleaning solution, got home, looked a the receipt and realized that the money I spent on this cleaner and solution, I could've bought 2 new sets of bones reds. get these</review_text>
I just bought this stove tonight and absolutley love it!!! It fits in the palm of your hand and lights in about 10 secs. If you are looking for something light and small and don't want to carry around liquid fuel than this is the stove for you</review_text>
When I was 5 or 6 I liked to pretend I was an adult in a casino dealing cards.  I had a major obsession collecting playing cards.  I would ask my parents to buy me packs and packs of cards (each set with a different design).  I'd take the cards out of the box and place them all around my house.  All over the furniture, the TV set, EVERYWHERE!Of course that eventually led to me wanting to learn how to play card games.  I learned many.  I grew up looking forward to summer evenings where I'd play cards with my family outside (and who can forget all the fun times we'd have trying to keep the cards still, so the wind wouldn't blow them away!)  It was a fun way to spend time with the family.  You couldn't ASK for a better way to spend time with the family, in fact.One deck of cards can give you hours of fun because there's SO many games you can play.  I wouldn't pick up a deck of cards online because cards are cheap, so if you order playing cards online you're just going to end up paying money for shipping and handling which will jack the price up a lot when really, you can buy a deck somewhere close to your home for less than a dollar</review_text>
After sadly losing my favorite knife at the airport (you know the drill), I needed to replace it with one with the same features (no corkscrew, yes phillips head screwdriver). I love it and I will definitely be more careful next time I fly</review_text>
I own three Victorinox knives.  The blades on all of them are of the highest quality.  I also own a Wenger executive Swiss Army knife.  But if you are debating the difference between Wenger and this knife, the Victorinox is noticably superior for quality and construction.As the other reviewer has commented this does have the best mix of tools.  But unless you have a sheath on your belt it is unlikely you will be carrying this around with you.  It is just too bulky.  Highly useful as a knife to have in the kitchen drawer or glove box of your car.  The plastic handle material will wear and possibly crack over time, but if you are not a tradesman it would take a long time for that to happen.I will definitely purchase this knife for my nephew, who is interested in camping and hiking.  A handy item to keep in the house so you don't have to drag out the toolbox every time something needs tightening or cutting.  This is one tool I think everybody should have in the house or car, you will be suprized at how many times you will use it!</review_text>
This one has the perfect set of tools, in my opinion.  The scissors, most people will want.  The Victorinox saw is outstanding.  Be careful, as it will make quick work of your fingers; it is very sharp and cuts aggressively.  It is also good that the can opener and bottle opener are separate tools.  The Victorinox can opener works wonderfully, but the combo tool which is a can and bottle opener rolled into one doesn't work well on cans.  Also, the can opener has a handy little screwdriver tip which can be used as a Philips screwdriver sometimes.  The reamer is a lot more handy than you would think, though not as a reamer.  I use it to change watch bandes, as the sharp tip reaches in and releases the spring bars without too much fuss.  The most used tool for me though is the large screwdriver tip on the bottle opener.  The one disadvantage with this one is that it is starting to get a bit thick to carry in your pocket.  A belt sheath would be more appropriate, if you can pull that off without feeling too geeky.  (Personally, I don't care, hehehe</review_text>
This was a really cute item.  I purchased it for an 11 year old boy and he loved it.    Said it was  his favorite present so far.  The price was 1/3 of retail.  It has been in the sand dunes, wet pavement, you name it and it is holding up well.  Great fun for someone who wants a beginner board</review_text>
I gave this item as a Christmas gift to my best friend & fellow golfer. I received one of these earlier and really like it. The ultimate for your golf bag</review_text>
this was a great gift, the person i gave it to was so happy.  especially loved the swiss army insignia on the golf balls.  grea</review_text>
Got this for my husband and he loves the swiss army tool.It went straight into the golf bag & of course the golf balls were a great bonus</review_text>
I agree with others that say this bag will slide across your floor, especially if its wood.  However, A very inexpensive solution I found is to use grip liner (typically for lining kitchen shelves) underneath the base.  It wont slide around or even tip over.  I filled mine with water and have had no problems since lining the base</review_text>
I am very happy with my Everlast Freestanding Bag.  I keep the stand out in the yard and just remove the bag after using to store inside out of the elements.  I have no issue with the weight - it holds up to even kick boxing without tipping even in the slightest.  Its obviously well engineered.  If you are thinking of buying this product you won't be disappointed with your purchase.</review_text>
The Everlast Freestanding Heavy Bag is a great way to keep in shape while taking out your frustrations! It's a good alternative to traditional heavy bags, which tend to be expensive and require hardware for hanging.While it's a fun workout, it's definitely not for kids or those with any type of hand/arm injury or arthritis. Use of traditional heavy bag gloves is a must, and hand wraps are suggested. Even with gloves and wraps, my hands were pretty sore after my first few workouts.Overall, this is a great piece of gym equipment for those with limited space and resources, but still want to get a good workout</review_text>
I bought one of these to serve as a travel case for my Fujifilm A340 digital camera. It's a perfect fit! It will also fit the A330 camera. There's just enough room for it to shift slightly, but the soft elastomer lining will absorb all but the most violent of shocks. If you lay the A340's webbing hand strap across the top of the camera, it takes up all of the slack and there is no shifting at all.I didn't give it 5 stars only because I have yet to give it a submersion test. I have submerged my other, older Pelican cases with positive results, so I have no reason to believe this case will have a problem.Don Childrey, author of "STAR TRAILS: Navajo" and "Uwharrie Lakes Region Trail Guide</review_text>
Love this backpack, it's been with me to numerous cities and countries and survives the trips very well, while protecting the contents well, laptop included.  The outside large pocket is larger than you think when you realize just how much stuff you can fit in there, and still fit under an airplane seat.  Love the two water holders on the outside. Love the zippers are a loop so you can attach a carabiner, compass, or whatever. The support is great, you'll barely feel its there, and if you do, just use both straps, and then strap the front for great support. The pen storage area could be larger to accommodate larger pens, but thats quite minor.My only con is that the outside two pockets have gotten stuck twice already. I am now on my third backpack(gotta LOVE REI's return policy). Hopefully this one will last as I have yet to find a better more complete backpack.Update 1/30/2007 - Third backpack , third zipper to get caught, time to return, again. I wish I could change the scale down to 2 stars :</review_text>
I purchased this to help lower my back pain from lugging a laptop in a normal brief type case.It has far exceeded my expectations, I do wish that there was something just a bit bigger.  This bag is 3500 cubic inches, and really if you have tools, gear, books and a laptop to carry around, this bag just barely cuts the mustard, but it is the largest laptop protected case that I have found.The specialized pockets are great, even if you are unable to utilize them by designation.I found there not to be enough pen pockets, but I stored them other places as well.The book/file area could be larger, and when fully stuffed with support equipment for the laptop this space is full.I had hopped that I could find a case with support much like a overnight backpack, but this was as close as I could find.I have had this almost a year at this point (most cases only survive for about 4 months for me) and it is still holding strong.  Strong enough that 2 other guys I work with have purchased the same model.</review_text>
This is the ultimate geek backpack.  It was designed by a geek for a geek.  If you're a student and constantly carry around 10lbs of keys and gadgets in your pockets, this is the backpack for you.The laptop pouch is also sufficiently padded.  I happily carry my Thinkpad and a number of books and a binder and don't feel like I have to nurse the bag at all.  It feels very sturdy.The construction is good.  The zippers work well.  The inside is deceptively spacious.For those of you not sold by the millions of comparments for all the geek toys, or with any other "gadget" that this backpack might have, let me leave you with a final criteria I used when selecting this backpack: it looks good.  I can walk around with this and no one would know that it's a laptop backpack - it's not square, it doesn't have 15 million straps, it doesn't ahve 40 pockets on the outside.  In summary, it doesn't look like "Terminator" backpacks that I see people wearing.  And, frankly, for the price, you can't beat it</review_text>
I bought this backpack from Amazon last week and I can say it is the best one available, even much better than most of other top brands like targus, Samsonite or Kensington. Earlier I wasn't sure about the reviews about this product I saw on Amazon but still ordered it after reading and looking at its pics. I am 100% satisfied with the product and whatever they say in the product description, its all true.Its strong with many different compartments suitable for your school or business. I have HPDV4000 with 15.4 inch screen and it fits well. The mesh on sides can hold even big bottles, nice feature. I have bought it for school but it has enough room to accomodate ur shoes and some clothes also (along with books). I enjoy using this wonderful backpack. I would highly recommend it. So, go ahead friends</review_text>
I've bought three of these laptop backpacks and this is the best. Well-made, well organized, and lots of space. Seems durable, but haven't used it enough to vouch for it. Will protect my laptop physically with its padded pouch, but also from theft. How? The backpack doesn't yell out "I contain an expensive laptop" - it looks like a cheapo student bookbag. And you can't beat the price. Highly recommended</review_text>
This is an excellent laptop backpack.  It has plenty of pockets for all your electronic gear and cords.  There is also an abundance of room for files and other business items.  The section for your laptop is padded and convenient for easy access</review_text>
This is a great bag.  Very comfortable even with all the stuff I end up carrying around.  There is a pocket for just about anything you can thing of so it is easy to stay organized.  I love that it doesn't look like an expensive laptop bag, which i suppose makes theft a little less likely</review_text>
This chain lock is just amazing!  I was very impressed with how massive this thing is.  Nothing, I mean NOTHING is cutting this thing off.  You can read the details of the contruction on their web site.  The key lock is easy to operate, it does seem to get stuck a bit, but the intructions say to wiggle or jiggle the key in place.  So far, I have not have any problems.  Just be careful though, because even though it comes with a protective covering, it may still scratch your bike.  Not that it will, you just have to be careful with it because of its size and weight.  So far I'm very happy with it and I got it for less $$ than at local stores.  I'm also very happy I got the longer length, 64".  The 44" one would have been too short</review_text>
I use this in college pool for lap times and total time for swimming three-quarters of a mile (i.e., 1500 yards in oplymic style swimming). Dropped in water twice. Still works great. Easy to use; easy to read to pool light conditions</review_text>
I was very excited when I found this product because I had not seen one before.  However, I found the same product at Academy for $15.00 cheaper 2 days after I received the item</review_text>
A sleep pad is essential gear for backpacking, especially when backpacking in cold weather.  When you sleep in a sleeping bag, your body weight compresses the insulation on the bottom side of your bag which can lead to the hiker losing warmth to the ground below.  A sleep pad provides insulation from the cold ground as well as additional comfort on hard surfaces.  The Thermarest Ridge Rest Sleeping Pad does both of those jobs adequately but not exceptionally.  The insulation does an adequate job of keeping one warm, but the pad is too thin to provide much extra comfort.  Perhaps a bit of a weakness in terms of comfort, this attributes makes the pad extremely light which is great when you have to carry it with you.  If your primary concern is comfort, go with an inflatable pad.  If you're more concerned with weight, go with this pad</review_text>
This product, unlike many 'made for dogs' tennis balls, is actually a top-notch, high-quality product, standing up to many hours of play or chewing. My blue heeler dogamine is an aggressive chewer; every other such product was soon chewed to the point of breaking the rubber core. Not so with these tennis balls! Twelve balls last him about 18 months, but they take a real beating before succumbing to 'jaws.' Highly recommended, even though I neither play tennis nor know anything about it</review_text>
Just started golfing and did not want to lay out too much cash on a set. I first looked into buying a used set but was scared off with some of the things I read to beware of with pre-owned clubs. I only used them once but man... what a huge difference in performance compared to the club I rented from the driving range. Its early but I am definitely satisfied with my purchase</review_text>
I bought these clubs because I didn't know if I would like the game or be any good at it.  These are great clubs for first time players.  The softer flex of the clubs is good for beginners who swing at slower speeds.  The irons and hybrid are easy to swing and get the ball up in the air.  Distances will not be as long as if you buy a better set for all the clubs.  You will also not be able to shape shots, but they will go straight.  The lack of a Sand wedge is problematic.After playing for a year or more, you are likely to start outplaying these clubs.  They have not broken or been damaged for me during the time, but my skill has gotten too good for them.  With a higher swing speed and more control over my shots, it is time to buy some better clubs</review_text>
I got the product in timely manner only to see it drop $30 in the next 3months. Overall looks to a good starter set</review_text>
Which is the weight of the product? Or which is the diameter of the box</review_text>
this is the best starting set i have seen, and it has all the elements that prove it to be a great set to use regardless of skill level.  The set arrived in great condition and in a timely manner.</review_text>
Wow !!!!I am now shootin mid 80's with these babies.Maybe it was change of balls though</review_text>
Do you even know anything about high quality AEGs? And no your $30 AUG is not high quality, nor is it an AEG its an LPEG.This gun costs so much because it is made of almost 90% metal. Plus 350 FPS is nothing. Go to real battles where snipers reach 500 fps, and the average AEG shoots 400 fps.</review_text>
I do love this little metal bottle. It is light-weight, nasty-chemical flavor  free, and lovely.  It is quite small (what you'd expect for 20 oz), so I'd probably get a larger size next time. Also, keep in mind that steel is an excellent heat conductor; if you put in hot things the bottle gets just as hot to the touch and everything in it soon cools. Likewise, the thing is chilly on the hands if filled with icy water.</review_text>
We bought this as a Christmas gift for our 2.5yo daughter, who had told Santa he HAD to get her a pink trike.  She loved it, and the pink was deemed to be the right one, which was good.We loved the fact that the adjustable frame means it should last our ( very tall) girl for ages - she's only on the second setting, despite being as tall as the average 4yo.Fortunately, we decided to assemble the trike well in advance of Christmas, as the screws that hold the seat in place were so badly burred that they couldn't be used.  Two thumbs up to the Kettler spare parts division, who sent an emergency express package with replacements so that Santa could come through on the day.Apart from that issue, the assembly was ok but not great, and the instructions could have been clearer ( and we're both engineers so we're quite familiar with tools and building things!)</review_text>
I bought this for my 3 year old daughter 3 months ago and we love it.  I like the sensible safety features and sturdy workmanship.  She likes the bucket in back, lively colors and comfortable seat.  It is missing some features the other Kettler trikes have, but this one is available for half the cost of the more expensive Kettlers.It has the 45 degree turn restriction which helps prevent tipping over (As with any trike some spills can happen over months & years of active use - please use helmets!).  It is adjustable for rider size and is fairly easy to assemble despite slightly sloppy assembly instructions.  It doesn't have a bell, but my daughter enjoyed customizing her bike with a bell of her own choice (an extra $6 at a local bike shop).  The trike is sturdy but not too heavy like many trikes can be.  It "goes off road" on bare earth under the spruce trees in our yard, but we got it mostly for sidewalk use - where it does well.  My only other minor quibble is that the plastic tires skid on some dry smooth surfaces.I think any child would be delighted with this tricycle</review_text>
Excellent quality; much easier to put on than the cap I used before</review_text>
I have used this cap almost daily for over a year. It still fits snugly and is very comfortable. Writing this review has made me think to order another one now, for the inevitable day my old one wears out.I have a rather large head and found many caps didn't fit comfortably. This one is very elastic and is great</review_text>
This swim cap is easy to use and thick enough that I can't imagine it ever ripping or tearing</review_text>
I bought this swim cap for my wife for Christmas and she loves it</review_text>
I had trouble getting water in my ears before wearing this cap.  Now no problem!  It keeps my hair fairly dry, or at least drier than with other caps I've tried.  It's easy to put on and take off--no hair pulling.  It's lasted well so far.  Much better than wearing a cap with a chin strap.</review_text>
I wasn't expecting much when I first ordered the Tiger Tail, but at such a low price it was worth a shot to relieve my aching muscles.  As an endurance athlete I get my fair share of aches and pains.  There is nothing like an hour with a massage therapist to relieve the aches, but who can afford that everyday?  With the Tiger Tail you get deep tissue relief anytime you need it.  It helps with the pain, but it also helps your muscles recover much quicker than I had hoped--It's a great product and worth twice the price</review_text>
I recommend using this very effective yet very simple tool!  It helps work out trigger points (little muscle knots) and helps my recovery after a work-out.  The Tiger Tail will save you lots of money compared to other products or services on the market. You will not be disappointed</review_text>
This is a nice way to workout. The software program accompanying is like having a personal trainer</review_text>
So my wife had our second child, she got thin again, I did not. Christmas came and went and like all the lemmings in the united states, I vowed a new health routine for the new year. I am spending twice as much on groceries that contain half as much. I am riding the Ironman elliptical machine and this machine 3-4 times a week each. I am starting to feel good. This machine will give you a pretty precise workout. The price is right, it gives you a program, and it works. My wife and I assembled it in @ 1 1/2 hours. Over 60 real exersizes. I would only discourage first timers because this machine does involve changing the set up frequently. All the parts were in the box. The CD Rom shows you everything you could possibly want to know and designs a workout for specifically you. I spent $1400 on two machines after delivery. We cancelled our Gold's membership and saved $700 a year. If I lose the weight and sell this stuff for half of what it costs, it's a wash. I'm happy</review_text>
How much can one person say about an excercise mat?  Works very well, doesn't slip around, very good cushioning</review_text>
The box came in very good condition and the blade came with no damage and packaged very well.  The blade is very nice to look at with the Griever insignia on the sides of the blade and it's unique shape.  However, I must agree about the "gun" part of the gunblade.  It does look a bit grimy compared to the actual blade work.  However, the whole weapon itself completely overlooks that little flaw.  With the Griever chain, it will be a little hard to wield and swing since the chain will get some good momentum and hit your hand a lot.Overall, this was a good buy for me.  I am definitely a fan of weapons from the Final Fantasy series and this was one of the "must haves" of the series!  I will definitely enjoy practicing with this blade</review_text>
Excellent delivery time, and box arrived in excellent condition. Product was just like expected. I was very satisfied with this vendor</review_text>
I didn't buy this blade from Amazon but I bought the exact same one from an Anime Convention for 30 dollars more. So this is a good price for it. The blade lives up to the gun-blade reputation Yeah some of it is a little screwed up from the exact replica but it comes damn near close. The blade is beautiful and it is easy to weild. Only sword you'd have trouble weilding out of the FF Weaponry would be the ACUTAL replica of the Buster Sword (I have that on order..should be fun). I highly recommand this blade even if you don't like final fantasy</review_text>
We received this in the mail and it is much heavier than expected. The blade is stamped with "Made in Pakistan" and really looks excellent. The handle of the "gun" part of it is fairly shoddy, but it is only $39.99 so it's actually worth the price (even with the shipping costs).If you're a Final Fantasy fan and also into collecting objects for photography or even things you might just end up hanging on the wall, this is the perfect gift for yourself. Or for the person in your life who is as much of a geek as me and my husband.And while we're not ber geeky...we're up there on the Final Fantasy [..] geek ladder</review_text>
Considering it's less than $40 it's a good buy.  The blade and the handle are pretty good quality though the dimensions of the blade are slightly smaller than in the game.  The revolver design is nothing like the game but all in all its a good buy.  The stand is nice but you might have to cut the sheath to get the blade to sit properly.  It has the word pakistan in very small letters on the right side of the blade but you could probably use a stone and grease to make it look like battle damage.  If you perfer one with the Greiver on the blade then buy that one but if you dont mind a clean blade this ones a good choice</review_text>
yo dudes. this has to be the 2nd best blade on the site. (the best it the buster sword) It looks exactly like the gunblade and the sheath looks soo sweet. Peace</review_text>
We originally bought the one from costco.com which was fancy and costed $250. But when we got the package and when my husband read the manual, we returned that one right away coz just the installation part needed 10 tools (not included) and there are 50 steps to install. Ok, let's talk about this one. Very easy to install. It only took my husband maybe a whole afternoon! Remember my husband is not very handy at all. The only problem was it missed a piece. So we called the support which is very efficent. The support person just asked one quesiton--what was the model number; then she sent the missing piece right away. We got the missing piece in a week and filled sands into the base which cost around $20 ($3 a bag of sand from HomeDepot). The most painful part is filling the sand. Other than that, the basketball system looks good. 4 starts because it missed a piece which I suspect it falls out of the box when it was shipped to my home. The box was totally racked when it reached my home</review_text>
It's not as adjustable as I'd like, but it is durable.  The kids and wife love it.  No slamming cause there's no spring loading of the rim and the adjustments are in increments that don't make sense.  Good product for the price.</review_text>
For the price this unit works fine for what it is for.  I would not give this particular unit to anyone in their teens or older who was serious about the game.  But this purchase was made to introduce my 7 year old daughter to the game, and for that purpose, it does just fine.The over-all contruction of the unit when assembled seems a bit flimsy and would certainly not handle a "slam and Hang" that is so popular with todays youthful players.  I'm 47 and never could quite throw it down on a regulation rim even in my youth, but I still play and like having a rim to practice the shot when I get a chance.  For that, this system will do fine and I hope to be able to keep going long enough to teach my daughter a few things so that she can decide for herself if she wants to get serious about the game.  If she does, I will purchase a new goal system for her when she gets older and most likely build a real court in the backyard to put in on permenantly.  The portable goals in general all have some of the same drawbacks and when these are dealt with adequately, the goal itself looses its portability.</review_text>
This camping chair is just slightly heavier (10.5 lbs) that other models due to the stainless steel legs.  However it is very sturdy.  It's expensive for a camping chair but you're paying for the quality.  Also, the chair is compact (fits in 6x6x36 carry case), the fabric will not puddle water, the stainless steel legs are rust proof and the 400lb capacity is much higher than that of other chairs which range from 200-250 lb capacity.  Overall, I recommend the chair highly</review_text>
The sword was great--exactly what I was looking for. The only gripes were the strange gunk on the blade (mentioned in other reviews, so I knew to expect it) and the fact that the blades weren't the same length. Still, for what I was looking for, it was perfect</review_text>
Ok, Let me just off by informing you that this sword is for display and display only. Usually there is always that one dumb person that reads all of the other reviews that say dont mess with it because its not ful tang, it will brake in a fight, its strickly for display only but they test it out anyway and brake it. I noticed that Im the only one saying that for this one.The shipping was fast, It was wrapped nicely, I had to clean the blades a little and straighen them out some. Normally I dont buy Stainless steel swords but come on, look at the sword. I did sharpen them also. I knew I was gonna buy another one, thats why I did it in the first place. It cut through some tree branches pretty nicely. However, another sword, yeah right. It broke right around the middle of the handle. It didnt take no time at all to brake. Waaay tooo top heavy. From the top of the blade to past the gaurd to the bottom of you first hand is wear the blades end. The rest is wood.So, if you are looking for a very unique sword, one that is different from all other swords, a sword to show off and get attention and you are a FF fan, get this sword. Overall this sword i say is worth buying.---- (Again, for all of those including me that broke their's first one off of curiousity) But please listen closely when I say, (DISPLAY ONLY!!!) (DISPLAY ONLY!!!) DISPLAY ONLY!!!) Oh and (DISPLAY ONLY!!!) I hope this helps all of you curious people out. Curiousity killed the cat and in this case, my sword</review_text>
I picked this up for my buddy, whose a ff 7 nut. I new this sword is decorative, and he did to. It was well put together, well packaged. One minor complaint is that i had to clean the blades when they arrived. They had this goop on there. But it wiped right off, added some oil, it was shining. My buddy loved it. Couldn't have liked it more.</review_text>
I got this sword. And um, lets see,how can i put this, oh yes, IT KICKS ASS. Kadij  himself was cool but this sword is awsome</review_text>
I haven't been amazon very long, but i had no clue that they had swords from ff7 available. I haven't ordered one yet, but i plan on buying at least two. I found kadaj's sword cheaper at another site, but i'm loyal to amazon, so i'll prolly purchase it here, along with Sephiroth's masamune, too. Can't wait to get 'em</review_text>
I recently assembled this Gamenamics 8ft air hockey.When I opened the box I found the item to be packed well.The table had a plastic film to protect the panels and the rails.The item was easy to unpack for assembly.I found the directions clear and easy to follow.I was impressed with the fact that I was able to complete assembly in under a hour.Once up and running I was impressed with how quiet the two fans were.I found the puck action to be fast.I thought this unit was as fun to play as some tables ive seen in the arcades</review_text>
Not only is this a great item, but the price I got on Amazon was unreal.  Highly recommend</review_text>
I was very pleased with the quality of this product.  It was perfect for my 6 year old granddaughter.  I recommend this product very highly</review_text>
good item. wasn't as padded as i thought it would be but my niece still loved i</review_text>
I bought a corrective goggle locally for $50. Surprised for find it on Amazon for only $15, and the quality is better than my locally bought one.It fits well and never leaks. It is very durable; I have used it for 3 months and it is still like new. I guess I will somehow lose it before it is worn out</review_text>
The product performs well.  I can see in the water, has a comfortable fit around my head, and doesnt come loose to let water in.  As my nose is slim around the bridge, these goggles perform well, with little glare or fogging noted.</review_text>
They are a bit tight. I'm a competitive swimmer who originally depended on prescription goggles purchased in Taiwan, but when they broke, I went online to find other options. I found these goggles, and remembering the generally high quality goggles Speedo has (before my prescription goggles, I only wore Speedo's Women's Vanquisher goggles), I bought these. They fit rather well, and I guess the only qualm I have is how the goggles feel like they're sucking my eyeballs out. That's what I mean by tight; the straps are fine. I haven't yet tried these on in a pool, but from what I can tell now, they aren't going to be the most confortable goggles ever. If you've tried Speedo's Vanquisher goggles, you should know that the rubber lining forms a little air pocket for extra cushioning. These goggles, however, don't offer that. They just have one layer of rubber which, in my opinion, only helps to fend off the mold that grew in my Vanquishers. Bravo.If you swim a lot and think you can get use to slightly uncomfortable goggles, go for this pair.</review_text>
I bought these goggles a month ago. I was wearing normal goggles to swim every day before. After first try on these goggles, I really liked them and have not used my old goggles since. My old goggles will get foggy after 15 min swim. These new goggles did not get foggy after swimming for one hour. They are very comfortable too. The best thing is that I can see clearly while swimming because of the corrective lenses</review_text>
My son is a competitive swimmer. He likes the goggle very much. It's comfy and no leaking plus Amazon's good price. I'd recommended to several friends and them all like it</review_text>
I've been using these for a couple of months now. They are not an exact match to my prescription but they are excellent for swimming.  I spoke to my eye care professional about them and he said they were a great deal.  If you aren't sure what strength you need (if you have astigmatism, etc) your eye doc should be able to give you a recommendataion that doesn't always match your prescription #'s but will work for you.  Also, these DON't leak</review_text>
These goggles are just what they state, RACER goggles.  Do not expect a comfortable goggle for just lounging in the pool.  I have an average head and after loosening the strap a little bit they do fit, albeit quite tight.  I can see why some people with larger heads would have problems, the strap doesn't give much and is not very big.  They achieve a great seal that is watertight.</review_text>
Product is excellent!  Very easy to hang and each individual golf ball cell has an individual "seat", to prevent ball movement within the case.Great product!!!!</review_text>
While not made of the nicest materials, (I hate particle board), for the price, this product is amazing.  It's electronics are simple to assemble, and work well.  All the pieces are durable, and if properly mantained will last years.  I was lucky enough to find one for sale not through Amazon, so I saved on shipping</review_text>
I purchased this after seeing the ad on the Golf Channel in part because I like Nick Price and his endorsement was meaningful to me. The weakest part of my game has always been driving. I'm a solid iron player. But, not driving the ball well really hurts your score. After a little practice with the Swing Setter I really felt like I was getting the club back in a better position with good wrist cock. I am reasonably strong and can easily make the magnets click with both settings on 5. When striking an actual ball, my driving improved dramatically from the point to where I used to use a driving iron to today where I use a driver. The difference is hitting the ball 230 with a driving iron to hitting it 280 with a driver. In my last four rounds since using the Swing Setter over 25% of my drives have been over 300 yards. This makes the game substantially eaier for me since I now can hit driver 8 iron instead of driving iron, 5 iron to a par 4. As a result, I am in the high 70's to low 80's, a drop off of about 8-10 strokes. The difference to going lower is mostly short game as some poor putting rounds kept me out of the 70's. But, shooting in the 70's makes golf fun. There is no doubt that the Swing Setter helped my game quite a bit. I do not use the short routine they provide, but rather just swing it to get a feel for where my wrist cock should be. With both settings on 5, my tempo is quick, much like Nick Price's.  But, swinging fast but smooth is a key to hitting the ball squarely and far. Overall, I am very impressed because I had not been particularly impressed with Leadbetter in the past because he seemed so technical. I just get up and hit the ball and this aid helps in just swinging the club properly. If you do that, the ball flies pretty well. Five stars! -- John Del Vecchio, Dallas, TX</review_text>
This trainer helped me a lot to get my club speed up, as well as learn to uncock my wrists more near impact than throughout the entire swing.  It also helped my beginner son to better understand the crucial role of the wrist in getting a fast club speed.  However, one has to be cautious using this, as it can potentially promote some bad habits, including overswinging.  All in all, was a helpful tool.  The included video was also a good golf lesson</review_text>
I've been taking lessons now for about 4 years.  I had never played golf before, and my handicap is now a 12.  My best round is 76 (very recently).  Still, I've been struggling with a late setting of the club that my coach has been frustrated trying to figure a way to get me to set the club earlier.  It leads to my "lifting" at the top of my backswing.  A student bought him one of these devices.  After only 2 lessons with this, my sets are near perfect.  At first, I was a bit skeptical, as it really felt like I was being way to "wristy" to make the thing "clap" at the top.  But now, it feels very natural and I don't feel like I have to rush the backswing to make it clap.  I have come a long way in a short time, and this device has helped put another piece of my swing together.  It also helps with tempo and releasing of the club.  I am buying one so I can practice at home too.  I recommend this for golfers of any level.  But I think it is better for the beginner to get some instruction with it as well.  $400 in lessons is worth $1000 worth of training aids.</review_text>
This thing is worth twice what you will pay for it.  Like other reviewer's, I have purchased a ton of books, video's, and gizmos with little improvement to my game.  I did purchase the Refiner Swing Trainer and it did help me to some degree but did not cure my problems.  I was very flustrated and about to give up on golf when I bought the Swing Setter.  Now I am getting a lot more distance with almost no effort and great consistancy.  I sometimes pull a shot now but when I do I know why.  If you are a high handicapper you will see a huge improvement after the first training session if you use the drills that are provided with the Swing Setter.  Bottom Line.  Buy the Swing Setter before you waste a lot of money on other training aids</review_text>
When I purchased the Sing with me Magic Cube for my granddaughter I wondered if she would like it. No worries:  she loves it & it is great entertainment for us all!  She likes to dance to the music.  Since it doesn't sound tinny or too loud it is not annoying to hear it over & over again  -- & it continues to be a joy to see how happy it makes her.</review_text>
My daughter got both the Mozart Magic Cube and the Sing With Me Cube for Christmas this year, and we love them both!  I am a music teacher, and I think these are just really cool musical toys for young children.  The sound is much better than I expected, and my daughter loves them both.  I give this one 4 stars instead of 5 only because the songs can be kind of hard to sing with because the music is a little elaborate.  It's easier for kids to sing along with simple arrangements, and the cube's songs have lots of notes...which make them great to listen to, but maybe a little tough for a child to sing along with.  NOT a reason not to buy, though!  Lots of fun, and potential to be an interesting toy for a few years.</review_text>
My daughter has had this toy and the Mozart Cube since she was 6 months old, and at 4 1/2, both are still her favorites. She now sings Mozart! Sometimes she sings only the guitar part, next time, it's the french horn's part. Woah. It is so wonderful how you can pick and choose  which instrument or combo to listen to, and see how each sounds differently and together. Awesome, smart toy</review_text>
My son, now 20 months old, has loved his cube since the age of 6 months.  He has a very short attention span, but he can easily play with his cube 20 minutes at a time.  It has been dropped and he has thrown it too many times to count.  Today, the battery cover popped off and broke.  I am hoping I can glue it together and make it work again.  If not, I will be happily shelling out $29.99 to replace his cube.  It is well worth the money</review_text>
I've had this toy for years, and it still works great.  It has been dropped, too.  Great way to introduce your little one to nursery songs.  And, the little one can add instruments, take away instruments which makes it more fun.  Great for motor skills for the younger ones because they have to press each side of the square, etc.  Great invention</review_text>
We purchased this lunch bag for our 13 year old daughter.  She LOVES it. It is well-made, stylish and fun to use!  Price is a little high for a school lunch bag (the only reason I didn't give it 5 stars) but worth it when your teen likes it</review_text>
Great lunch bag and I love the style too. Not only have I gotten many compliments on this bag, but it really does keep your food nice and cold. It is a good size for a bottle of water, sandwich, apple and snack. I can even fit my frozen meals inside with a snack or too</review_text>
My kids (and I) loved, loved, loved this product for two days.  It was fairly safe, though did tip over if they were both on one side (together they were well under the weight limit).  However, the product came apart along a seam and the air came out after using it only under the manufacturers guidelines</review_text>
I needed a carrier to ride my baby on bumpy roads in the caribbean. I am from Canada but lived in the caribbean on a small island. I needed a carrier because of the fresh air I wanted my child to receive while I cycled and the ability to look around. I absolutely love this carrier for many reasons. I wanted a carrier that was only in front of me, in the event a car would hit, or fall for any reason. With my child being in front of me, and my body around to protect, I can see what is happening at all times to my child. I began to use this when my baby was 14 months old in Canada as a trial run. People were amazed at how small she was, confident, and a helmet on--loving to look all around as I cycled. Satisfied with the trial for 2 weeks in Canada along the trails, sidewalks, and residential streets, I then loaded it on the airplane (for no charge since it's for the child--I bought the helmet as an extra acces but threw it into the box, and taped it up to the caribbean) and had it put on the bicycle. It loads easily on & off with a strong bolt. I loved it so much that I sold it to a professor on the island for his child, and then bought another one to bring down again. I highly recommend this product! I wish I felt the same way about all the products I bought.We have now moved off the island to the US and Canada as of a Christmas 2006, and I will still use it this summer at summer. She will be 3 1/2 by that time. My daughter loves it as much as I do</review_text>
Sturdy, Huge, Friends Love It, great for any Final Fantasy 7 Fa</review_text>
I was probably the only adult to ever orderone of these items for their 14 year old son.It is a hunk of beautiful edged, professionallydesigned steel.  A sword only a Fantasy Busterwould enjoy.  It now hangs on the wall asa true reminder of hohoho,merry christma</review_text>
The buster sword is an amazing item to own.  If you are a FFVII fan then this is definitely a must own item.  I suggest it for anyone who loves the Final Fantasy series or loves to collect swords.</review_text>
The sword was delivered in a timely manner. It is quite beautiful. However, the blade was not set straight in relation to the hilt, and it has a couple parts of the blade that are slightly off color, probably due to an uneven application of the metal polish they used</review_text>
Overall, the sword is awesome, but it was very poorly packaged. There was very little protection for it, so it fell straight through the cardboard boxes during shipment and now the tip is bent. But, I would order another one in a heartbeat if only they beefed up the package protection</review_text>
It's a great match on scale and design. It's quite heavy, so the average sword stand won't work</review_text>
Even though the hand guard doesn't fit, it's an excellent training sword; I accidentally smashed my friend's training sword in half with this one ^__^;;;;It can take lots of abuse, but it starts to look sort of rough when the paint begins coming off with use and time.It's a great practice sword; it's heavy, about 5-7 pounds, so it's also good to learn to control a sword so you don't stab yourself mid-swing.</review_text>
I like this workout. I have a lot of firm dvds and I  like that you can squeeze resistance training in a short amount of time. I pair this workout with a cardio one or do it alone on a lazy day. This workout is not formatted like the traditional firm dvds the only person who will look familier is Ali. The only thing you will need are the cords that come with the dvd</review_text>
The Firm has produced quality videos and dvds for many years and this workout is no exception.  There's more toning than cardio but it's still a good workout</review_text>
I do enjoy this workout.  It is quick, efficient and different from previous Firm DVDs, most of which I have.  I consider myself an advanced exerciser however and must tell you that the heavy cords definitely take strength to work.  I was having a hard time with the biceps move and definitely the forward shoulder motions.  You can really hurt yourself if you're not careful so it may be a good idea to do the workout as suggested without the cord, learn the moves and then use the cord the second time around.  I have adjusted and modified my workout so that I use the heavy cord on moves I know I can achieve and can push myself towards and then I use a looser cord to do those forward shoulder motions until I am ready to take on the heavy cords again for that move.  Also, they do move pretty quickly in this DVD as if everyone knows how to loop the cord through quickly.  I had to rewind a couple of times to see what she was doing.  Overall, as I said, it is a solid, effective workout and definitely a nice break from the heavy weights and leg presses that I do every other day.  So if you're looking for something different but still under the Firm, this is a good one.  I also recommend the toning ball DVD and the aerobic one with Allison in the lead.  Those are great too.  Like I said, I have them all, and I love the results they give</review_text>
I love this program for traveling.  It's easy to carry and I can do it in a hotel room.  I bought the heavy cord but also use the medium cord that I already owned for some of the excercises</review_text>
These cords are a quick, simple and eay way to squeeze fitness into your daily routine. The workout is 30 mins with simple cardio, strength training and cool down.Be forewarned that the cords are at first, awkward to use, especially with the leg exercises. They may seem short or not as pliable but that changes the more you use them. They also work best with running shoes because there's an arch that keeps it from sliding...I tried the routine in some flat pumas and practically smacked myself in the face because the cords couldn't find a grip.Tina's coaching is clear and easy....and the entire routine is done to the mirror image...so you just go wherever she does... this DVD would def work well while traveling... this routine wont get you profusely sweating but is still a great buy nonetheless..</review_text>
I got this sleeping mat for about 1/2 year now.this thing is very comfortable, this mat include a self-inflatable mat, a foam pad, and a soft zipper cover.I have a Honda Element and I put this mat in the car with back seat fliped up.  I can have a great hours of sleep with this.  This is not really wide so don't expect you can roll yourself around.Besides use this in a car, I also take this with me to camping and stay over night at my friends place (I even prefer this thing than a sofa)The reason I gave it 4 stars mainly because the price is sitll a bit too high in my opinion... but I think this is the best self-inflation sleeping mat that's out there.  If you use this type of stuff alot, is well worth ur invesmen.This mat infate fairly fast, I never encounter any problem with it yet</review_text>
This light takes all the guess work out of riding in the dark. I previously relied on a cateye opticube LED ($45) which places a round spotlight of light ahead of you somewhere. This is fine if the streets have lights, but is not enough when it's completely dark. With the LED, you have to remember what you see ahead of you. With the LED, you have to maneuver the light spot around to where you need it on track corners. With the LED I found myself always concentrating to interpet what lay ahead. The HID solves these issues by bathing the entire area in light. It's lightweight (good because i have to lift my bike up stairs). The little dangly (red/yellow) thing is the switch and display. It has small red/yellow/green lights inside it to indicate battery status and you can mount this on the handlebars. The HID light can be detached from the mount which is good when i flip the bike over for maintenance. I get about 1.5 hours at full strengh and then it switches to the lower setting for another 30 minutes. I can't really tell the difference between the high/low settings anyway. Charge time is 2.5 hours. It first discharges the battery to keep it happy. The manual says you get 300-500 cycles/charges per battery before it's down to 80%, and the light lasts 1000 hours. It's a great light that allows me to ride faster, safer and daydream about being the green lantern without crashing</review_text>
Relieve your low back pain with this unique inversion table.  Its features include memory foam and lumbar support.  Assembly is a snap</review_text>
THE UNIQUE FEATURES (MEMORY FOAM TABLE & LUMBAR SUPPORT)OF THIS INVERSION TABLE MADE IT MY #1 CHOICE.AFTER SEEING THE QUALITY OF THE MATERIALS & WORKMANSHIP, THE EASE OF ASSEMBLY, THE EASE OF AJUSTMENTS, AND EASE & COMFORT USE, I NOW MAKE THIS MY #1 RECOMMENDATION !!!!!!ONE FEATURE I CONSIDER POSITIVE, WHICH SOME MAY CONSIDER NEGATIVE IS IT'S INABILITY TO FOLD AND STORE EASILY...IF YOU ARE GOING TO BUY SOMETHING TO USE ON A DAILY BASIS WHY FOLD IT UP !!!!!!!!FOR MY PURCHASE I CHOSE FREE SHIPPING.........IT ARRIVED THE NEXT DAY!!!!!!EXTREMELY PLEASED WITH THIS PURCHASE FROM AMAZON !!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
EASY SET UP.VARY HEAVY DUTY.LEG HOLDERS COULD BE BIGGER AND SOFTER.TOTALLY HAPPY WITH THIS UNIT! IT'S WORTH BUYING THIS ONE FOR THE EXTRA MONEY!I SAW THE $199  ONE AT ANOTHER STORE AND IT DOSN'T EVEN COMPARE!!!</review_text>
My day-to-day job has me sitting in a chair long periods at a time every day. I didn't realize how much it has affected my lower back, but every time I had to lift something or even stand at the sink for a short period of time, I would feel pain in my lower back, where-by I would have to stop what I was doing and stretch out on the couch or lay on the floor to relieve the pain.After reading numerous reviews for inversion tables, I figured I'd give this one a try.I used it for a few minutes every other day, at first it would make me dizzy and nauseous, and I had to invert myself slowly to avoid a head-rush. Now that I've been persistent with it, after a couple months of using for 5-10mins. every other day, my back pain has been reduced tremendously. I can endure more lifting and standing for periods of time that I wasn't able to do before using the inversion table. Also, when I am doing a strenuous activity and I feel my lower back aching, I immediately invert myself on the table, and the pain goes away in minutes.It really does work well. The quality and finish of the table is excellent and the assembly instructions were very easy to follow. The Memory foam is comfortable, but when fully upside down-you don't feel it as much because you're dangling by your ankles, but as you slowly invert yourself back to an upright position, the memory foam and lumbar pad feels good on the back. I was rather let down of exercise/fitness equipment I purchased in the past because it didn't always meet expectations, but this inversion table is a worthwhile investment in my health. If you purchase it, go easy at the beginning until your body gets use to being upside down and when turning back to an upright position-do it slowly to avoid getting a head rush</review_text>
I would actually give this product 4.5 stars since I am very happy with it.  The only negatives are that a small plastic piece was broken upon delivery and the actual instructions on use of the table are very brief.  Assembly was a breeze (the broken part aside), and the constuction of this table is very solid.In terms of use, I'm a little embarrassed to say that I burst a blood vessel under my eye the second day I used it, because I inverted too long in a relaxed position.  It hurt for a couple of days and was annoying, but not serious.  As a treatment for my neck and back pain, however, the table is great. Just 4 or 5 minutes a day really seems to help. The key is to watch how the pressure from the inversion feels and tense your facial muscles accordingly in concert with other movements to keep your circulation moving. Don't just hang there like a bat.</review_text>
I particularly like the ease of gently inverting and coming up again with the help of the angled hand rails.  I feel safe with the stop strap so the table will not invert beyond a comfortable position.  The ankle locking bar and straps are a snap and comfortable too</review_text>
I've been using this for about a week now.  I'll make 10 points.1.  I have lower back pain (from a car accident two years ago) that is pretty much constant.  It gets worse after any exercising (running, treadmill, eliptical, etc.)2.  I have been taking ibuprofen for years to reduce the inflammation.3. The INVERSION table was something I saw and thought what the heck let's try it out.4. It is a GREAT tool in pain management - it will help relieve pain (obviously not permanent)5. I think it's working for me because it helps decompress my lower discs: specifically the L3/L4/L5/S1/S2 AND I feel less "clicks" during the normal business day.6. Use it 2-3 times a day, for short periods (about 1-3 minutes and really try to "let loose")7. I can exercise and not feel the sharp pain afterward - my range of motion has increased8. I've noticed better posture9. More range of motion10. My expectations were met.  This table is very comfortable and not woobly like other I've heard about</review_text>
We set up the table easily, with careful reading of the directions.  It is particularly important to get the height set correctly.  In general, plan to set the height as if you are taller than you are, which make the initial balancing easier to achieve and the first inversion more controlled.  If you like the feeling of being upside down, this is a great way to achieve that.  The table is heavy duty and very stable.  One of the users in this houseold has balance issues associated with MS.  The stability of the table is reassuring and the back muscle stretch seems very therapeutic. We highly recommend this product.</review_text>
I bought this rack with a Topeak trunk bag. Once adjusted, the rack is easily installed and removed from the bicycle. The rack can be used without the bag -- using the rack's bungee cords. The bag securely slides on the rack. I also bought a Topeak fender that simply attaches to the rack. It's been a good combination for road and trail riding</review_text>
I have bought all three models of MTX racks. This is not a replacement for the tublar racks for touring. This is a great rack that fits a valuble nitch. I commute to work but I bought a carbon road bike. No mounts on the drop outs for a rack and not a good idea to clamp things to the carbon. I travel with about 10 lb of stuff so the 20lb limit is fine. I like that I can pop it off quickly and ride with out extra weight. I have a mountain bike I often end up using with a trail-a-bike. It is great the hitch arm attaches to the seat post right under the rack. The hitch arm has full movement to swing and move under the rack. This would not be posible with a frame mount rack.Great for carring snacks. I like the bags and the mount plate. This is so easy to mount and unmount your bag to go into a store. The mount also prevents the bag from sagging to one side. If you use the shims and set the quick release tight it does not move. I have banged and fallen with this rack loaded and it will shift in that case but no big deal just pick the bike up unclamp and reclamp and your off.</review_text>
Hello, I just got this rack for my mountain bike.  At first I didn't think I made a good decision.  But, after I properly secured it to the bike and saw how good it went with the lines of the bike, as well as how sturdy it was I knew that this rack wasn't going any where (accept, every where I went on my bike) but on my bike for good.  Even though it has a quick release "QR" system that works great.The way that Topeak has designed this system is great.  If you get the rack as a stand alone for your bike or get with it one Topeaks bags (which I did) you won't be disappointed.The only thing I think would improve this rack is directions.  Not only for the rack it self but, I think that the piece of plastic that comes with the rack that looks like a clip, is a rear L.E.D. holder.  This holder is most likely for lights like the Cateye TL-LD1000.  I'm not sure of that but it sure looks that way.I have heard of people saying that they have had a problem with the rack swaying back and fourth while riding but the only way I have gotten it to move is if my seat clamp isn't tight enough and it would then move my seat (post).  But that is a simple fix by tightening the seat post clamp.Bottom line: if you have a full suspension bike and are looking for a good solid rack, look no farther.  :</review_text>
Bought this board with a cabinet.  This is one great dartboard.  99% of the soft-tip darts stick in the board no problem - if they don't, you usually missed the dartboard.  The games included are enough for most players.  My wife and I have played on this board numerous times since we bought it, and she's become a master.  I'm still trying to catch up to her skill level.My only complaint is that the LED's for the 3 statuses for Cricket are sometimes confusing.  Green and Yellow can look somewhat similar 8 feet away from the dartboard.  I would have liked to have the X and O like the Arachnid 800, but this is probably the best bang for the buck dartboard out there if you want high quality (not kiddie), and enough features for everyone but the most die-hard professional.PS - the darts can be somewhat difficult to remove from the dartboard, as my wife has experienced.  If you get the right type of darts (shorter tips & fatter bodies. . .I think the 1/4" are better), it becomes easier to remove</review_text>
The product received was much better than I was expecting.  The quality of the purchase exceeded my expectations</review_text>
Excellent product.  I was looking for a stadium seat just like this one and couldn't believe I found it in our college team</review_text>
I bought this after having my foot reconstructed. I noticed a physio using one and noted the name then ordered one. I've been using mine for a few months and my foot is getting much stronger and my calf muscle has grown back to normal. Just follow the instructions and save on co - pays</review_text>
Tennis balls are tennis balls.  There is no such thing as a tennis ball that costs 1.33 cents (three in a can makes four cents per can).  Any of you who thinks that this company should go out of business honoring an obvious pricing error should own your own company some day to see how it feels</review_text>
Not greasy, no odor.  It was recommended for my baby by a pediatrician who said the slow-release formula DEET does not penetrate the skin as much as other formulas so it's safer.  Kept all the bugs away in SE Asia, which is a very buggy place</review_text>
I used this product for myself and my 2 years old daughter when we were visiting India. I must say that it worked like magic. Kept all those bugs away from bugging us!! One night, I forgot to apply on my daughter and next day, she had 20 mosquito bites to be precise</review_text>
This is a good holster for the price.  But, to fit well, personal height must be considered.  I would say it's for someone 5'8 or taller.  If you're short like me this holster will not stay on your thigh. It fits most medium guns.mgso</review_text>
This holster hangs from your belt, with two straps that buckle around your thigh to keep it in place.  In hindsight, I should've purchased a belt holster that is at hip level.  Anyhow, this holster, once adjusted, does a remarkably good job of staying in position while running, and I have never had a gun or magazine fall out while running.  I can even fit my M92 gas blowback pistol with laser sight in this holster, and it still fits</review_text>
I like it pretty good but i recommend it for people with biglegs its a little too small for me but its sturdy sometimes it slides over my knee and its hard to run but i still always use i</review_text>
This swimming glasses is very good. Good price,Good product. I can swim long time</review_text>
These goggles are fantastic. Not only do they look nice, but they work great. They seal up to the eyes and do not leave marks around them. They also allow for some peripheral vision.</review_text>
I purchased this as a gift for my parents. The only disappointing feature is the flashlight. You have to hold the button for it to stay on. Other than that, it's great. I would recommend it. Very light weight</review_text>
The compass is a little skittish, but you get used to it. And the small storage compartment is perfect for matches. The thermometer is of questionable use, except to quantify how fast you are freezing or frying</review_text>
We purchased this desktop punching bag for a Technology Department office.  We put it on a table by the door so Techs can punch it when they come in or go out - to relieve stress.  Amazingly it lifts up everyone in the room when someone punches the bag because we all understand the pressure and frustration that the work place produces and now we have a fun venting mechanism.I was afraid that the suction cup bottom would not hold the bag in place - but the cup securly holds the bag on the table top even with excessive and forceful punches.When and "if" this one wears out - we will definitely order another one.  No office should be without one</review_text>
I have always wanted a speed bag, despite not knowing anything about boxing. Since I live in apartments and tend to move quite a bit, I did not feel like buying a professional one that required making holes in the wall. When I saw this I bought it right away, as I have a chest-high counter that seemed to be made specifically for this. It seems to work pretty well, but the suction is not very good. Once I managed to smash a dish when the thing simply took off after a punch, but that was a rare event. What happens on a regular basis is that the thing moves while you use it. However, I could have received one with a defective suction cap, so do not be discouraged. If you avoid putting breakable objects on the other side of the speed bag, you should do fine. Even if it takes off, it is not heavy and thus it is unlilkely to do much damage. Would buy it again despite this defect..</review_text>
Wow.  Her workouts are tough but I love them all and they get you working.  She is always no-nonsense and motivating and you need it to get through them.  It's a great feeling when you are done because you know you've worked hard and burned a lot of calories and fat.This workout is another great one from Cathe.  It's two separate workouts; the first being aerobics with toning intervals and the second being high-rep body sculpting routines.  The first workout (Boot Camp) is broken up into eight cycles each with four one-minute intervals that include floor aerobics, core workout, upper and lower body workouts.  It's tough at times but stick to it and it does get easier.  Then you do the second workout which is the muscle toning and body sculpting.  You need a step and barbells for that challenging section, as well as a medicine ball and hand weights.  It's also tough but the results are great.  At the end of that, is a tough ab workout.  This really does give you a full body workout and I highly recommend it to everyone whether you need to lose weight or you just want to mantain and keep your fitness up and muscles toned.  It's a lot of fun and well worth working your way to the level you need to complete it in one full go</review_text>
My daughter is three and she loves this tricycle.  It has everything she needs.  She puts her water bottle in the front basket and her two stuffed animals in the back.  The seat is adjustable and she likes it low.  It was a great buy and it's a sturdy bike.  We are very happy with it</review_text>
Nice first bike for my grandson. Easy to put together. Good buy for the money</review_text>
Item was received in a timely manner.  Haven't actually used it yet, waiting for birthday to come around</review_text>
I bought this off of Amazon for Christmas.  I got it for their hot deal price of $19.99 (it promptly went back up the next day to its current price).  This was an excellent buy.  My daughter absolutely loves it.  It did not take long at all for my husband to assemble the bike and it is extremely sturdy.  I would highly recommend it to anyone.  And with the adjustable seat and handle bars, my daughter should be able to ride it for a couple of years</review_text>
Exceptional build quality.  Lightweight for its size.Golfing in the rain?  No problem!  Handle fits into the Sun Mountain Speed Cart (push cart) umbrella holder.Would recommend the 68" version for golf</review_text>
It might be a bit big, but if you're over 6 feet tall, you need a big umbrella.  Works great in gusts.  Had it for over a year now on the east coast and it still works great</review_text>
Firm & Sturdy.  I own one of these for about seven years now, and the umbrella is still going strong...This is a true GustBuster..</review_text>
I don't play golf, but that didn't stop me from picking this umbrella up, as I was sick and tired of cheap 99 cent store umbrellas that would break so easily.This umbrella is indeed huge, but since I carry a laptop backpack with me almost everywhere I go, I wanted something that would keep it dry during the rain, even though the backpack is water resistant.I've been outside in rainstorms with this and it just laughs at the rain and wind. I see other people's umbrellas buckle under storm gusts, even flipping inside out, and yet this thing, with its amazing flap system, stays intact, and I just hear the wind rustle through the flaps.My only complaints are that the handle isn't as comfortable as it could be, and since it's a 62-inch umbrella, it's very tall, and can't fit in a backpack like a mini-umbrella.Otherwise, I love this thing, and its lifetime warranty, and I should've bought this sooner. Well worth the extra upfront cost to save in the long-run, and I won't be smashing any umbrellas against the side of a highway overpass in the rain after it keeps inverting due to high winds. (yes, this happened to me, and yes, drivers started looking at me strangely</review_text>
Besides using during rain storms, it works nicely blocking wind on cold days watching outdoor sporting events</review_text>
This is an excellent product. It is a family size umbrella (it covers my wife, the baby stroller and me), and the build quality is very good</review_text>
This is truly the best umbrella that I have purchased.  It was worth every $ spent</review_text>
This umbrella really lives up to its name...GUST BUSTER!!!  I bought a black one from skymall.com (around $40) a couple years ago and used it while I was down in the caribbean going to school.  The strong winds down there would invert most other umbrellas but this one wasn't even phased by the wind.  The flap system they have on this thing is genius...all umbrellas should have that.  Hope this review helps, ChrisUpdate: get the same gust busting effect for much cheaper at Wal-Mart</review_text>
I originally got this for the golf course.  It's size helps to  keep me and my equipment dry.  What makes it great is that it hasn't inverted once in high winds.  When others I've owned have, this one keeps working.I also use this when I'm at college.  Like the golf course, I do a lot of walking.  This umbrella does a wonderful job and also keeps my backpack dry.  Its size may make it a bit big for one person, but it is worth it for what it does (and it usually gets someone to ask me if I can share it with them)</review_text>
I ordered the 112 because the $349 price was right, especially after factoring in the free shipping and no sales tax. My 112 was shipped by Bring's Cyclery in Wisconsin.  They did an amazing job of securing the rather flimsy Schwinn cardboard box by reinforcing each corner with stiff boards, and on top of that they wrapped several high-strength bands around the reinforced box...ensuring that it maintained its rectangular shape and correct upright position. The box  was shipped by FedEx and arrived at my front door in 8 days.  There was one puncture in the box, but otherwise it was in great shape.  There was no damage to the contents of the box. It took me two hours to assemble and works flawlessly. Amazon needs to correct their product description of the 112: a) it has no louvered fan, and b) the electronic display is not backlit</review_text>
I looked and looked for a bike that had a great digital screen with all the things I wanted (calories burned, RPMS, distance, heart rate and time), one with a lot of different resistance levels and one that was going to be quiet. I got everything plus more with this bike! I'm so glad I spent the extra $100 or so for this one instead of the 200$ ones I was looking at. Worth every penny! I would recommend this bike for any at home exerciser looking for a great workout on a daily basis</review_text>
We LOVE this bike, it's great!!!!!!!!! The assembly was very easy and it came with all the tools needed. the bike has great proggrams to get into shape and work up to more difficult programs. This is a very samll footprint and has been great for the RV. I would buy this bike again</review_text>
The bike works great. It is a great workout.It also arrived quicker than the original estimate.I am completely satisfied</review_text>
Upon arrival the computer was screwed up and wouldn't work.  Called Schwinn and they wanted me to go out and buy an expensive set of specialized tools and fix it myself.  Yeah, right!  I made them send out a repairman.  Three weeks later, I had a working bike.  While working, this bike is excellent, I must admit.  However, less than two months later while riding, all resistance disapperared and  I got the same error sign on the console.  I never took the bike over level three and rode three times a week for 30 minutes, not exactly a heavy workload for an exercise bike.  Back came the repairman, who promised it back to me in a week.  It is now six weeks later, and still no bike.  $349. is a lot to pay for a bike that only works for two months</review_text>
I love this stationary bike!  It was actually delivered EARLY, and very simple to put together using the small toolkit that was included.  It is very sturdy, good programs, and "feels" like the ones in the gym.  I was surprised to get such a quality product for such a reasonable price, considering the cost of the commercial bikes that I looked into.  You won't be disappointed with this Shwinn</review_text>
After two weeks, I'm very pleased. As noted elsewhere, the packaging isn't very good. The box in which it was shipped had a gaping hole and there was a small crack in the plastic housing. Nevertheless, I'm very happy with the bike. It took about an hour to assemble. Read the directions carefully and take your time - you'll be alright.It is a very solidly built piece of equipment. I weight 250 pounds and I find it very stabile and comfortable. The electronics are easy to use and understand. Also easy to read. The seat and handlebars are adjustable, moving forward and back as well as up and down. I appreciate the postings noting the difference between the 112 and 113. I'm happy without the fan and like saving the $50.Given my experience to date, I would do it again</review_text>
I just recently purchased this bike, first I must say that it is very comfortable.  My husband did not have any difficulty putting it together at all.  It does not take up much space and I enjoy the different programs.  It does provide you with a very good workout.  20 minutes at level 6 the first day, really surprised me.My only complaint is that the pedal makes a knocking sound.  Hopefully this can be fixed easily, as I really enjoy all other components of this bike</review_text>
Overall I like this sweat protector but I wish that it was a bit wider in the middle.  If I ride and am not completly bent over, sweat falls and misses the thong.  Other than that, I like it and feels that it does keep a lot of sweat from landing on my frame</review_text>
I wanted this item to hold the remote, phone etc...while I road my trainer and it does that as I hoped.  It does make getting on and off the bike a bit more of a hassle (not much).  It is what is advertised and does what it claims to do.  Not a necessity, but serves a purpose if you need to hold items.  As far as protecting the bike, any cloth or towel would seem to do as well or better-- if you don't care to use the pockets</review_text>
wonderful gift.  top swords is an excellent place to get gifts for people who collect items like thi</review_text>
Pros:  Good value for the price, Awesome Amazon service.Cons:  NoneFor the right user, this is a great bike.  (I can just see the bicycle snobs rolling their eyes...)  In this case, the right user - me - is in his early 40's & recovering from a knee surgery.  I am not yet able to jog & was tired of the elliptical machine at the gym.  I wanted a bike for sort of rehab on wheels.  I wanted a heavy fixed gear bike to push my legs & knees for strength & flexibility.I know that there are some amazing bikes in the market.  I am not one of these people who has to have the best of "whatever."  Nor am I looking to impress anyone with the bike.  Between work & family obligations, I would be lucky to ride the bike once a week.I checked out the bikes at Target & Walmart, but purchased it on Amazon for one reason only - color.  Although I am not fashion conscious, I just can't do the purple or lime green bikes with obnoxious stickers with images of skull, flames or the word "EXTREME" on it.  I realize that all of us want to look & appear younger, but at some point, it gets ridiculous.  Huffy Cranbrook for men came in black, which is always cool in my book.I did check out the local independent bike shops, but I couldn't justify paying premium price for the same simple bike.  However, they do provide full service & carry bikes incorporating latest in technology.  When I am ready for one of those technological marvels, I will certainly give them my business.Anyway, I placed the order from Amazon.  When the bike arrived, it was very easy to assemble.  It took no more than 20 minutes with few simple tools, which everyone should in their home.  I did notice that some parts such as the seat & the fenders were not made of the best material, but for the price, I can live with it.The bike did have a bent front wheel rim, and I called Amazon customer service about a replacement.  To my surprise, Amazon sent a whole new bike, which arrived in 2 days.  I simply replaced the front wheel & UPS took the spare bike back to Amazon.  Additional cost to me: $0.  I wish all my business transactions were that smooth.I had the bike for few weeks now.  I met some neighbors, while getting some exercise.  My legs & the knee feel better.  My son joins me from time to time.  For the casual rider, this is a perfect bike</review_text>
The material seems and durable.  15 pounds is ostensibly too light for ki training.  The medicine ball is also rather large and thus takes away from the succient and pinpointed targeting.  Good for beginners</review_text>
That brand of Medicine Ball is good, but the price is too high. We are living in a fat nation. For people to get fit, fitness equipments and accessories ought to be more accessible in terms of variety and price</review_text>
These bands provide a great workout and so convenient!  I love the strength and stretching exercises made possible with the bands.  Plus it is so easy to do a set or two before work, after work, before bed - any time really!  A door that has good clearance in front of it is a must.  I like that the DVD is not in your face and it provides good direction and reminders about form.  I was surprised how well I liked the book!  It was a bit overwhelming when I first flipped through it, but once you do a few exercise and get use setting up the bands, the exercises become distinguishable and the illustrations helpful - though not 100% accurate in my case</review_text>
This was sort of an impulse buy for me. I have a set of dumbbells, an adjustable bench, a Crossbow that's gathering dust, a treadmill.. you name it I seem to have it. Other then the dumbbells, all my fitness equipment is gathering dust.The reason I bought the set, I wanted to do lat pull downs for my back. I saw on the Power 90x cd that you could substitute chin ups (which I can't do) with a resistance band and do lat pull downs instead. I then ran up on this set, and based on the reviews I bought it.From there it began to get more interesting. Blake, the president of Bodylastic's sent me an email thanking me and giving me the info on how to get into their fitness university. I decided to check it out while I was waiting for my bands to come. What I saw just floored me. With these bands you can mimic ANY exercises you might see in the gym. From the circuit training machines to dumbbells. There are exercises and lots of them for every single muscle. Inner thighs, outer, obliques, Abs, forearms, Triceps.. you name it, the university tells you how to do it.These exercises were so diverse from what I was already doing that I became excited and couldn't wait for the shipment to arrive.That said, the order was shipped out right away. In the mean time I sent the company a letter asking more questions and within 24 hours Blake, the company president answered all of them which impressed me as well.My order finally arrived on Wednesday, I had just completed upper body Monday so I thought, well I'll give these bands a run for the money and do both upper and lower body today. Let me tell you, I started with lower body and by the time I was done, my legs were like jelly, my Buns (yes even an exercises that targets that and its not a lunge!) had a burn I had never felt before and I sweat buckets within the first 5 minutes.Lower body wiped me out. I took a 20 minute break and finally finished off with a great ab workout. Especially my obliques really felt the burn. The range of motion, the ability to change weights quickly and mimic any gym machine is just completely fantastic. The resistance is challenging and extremely smooth.(Beats my Crossbow hands down) And if your not comfortable doing one type of exercise, (like I couldn't do chin ups) there are several more to choose from that works the same body part. I never expected all of this for my small 50 dollar purchase and it was worth every cent if not more.You cannot go wrong with this set</review_text>
I've been using the bodylastics for about two weeks and i'm blown away that a product that is so simple and inexpensive can be so effective.I'm 54 years old and have been working out regularly for 25 years. I have a complete set of free weights and a weight stack home gym.  this simple product can duplicate almost every exercise as well as my heavy, expensive equiptment.In a number of areas bodylastics are superior.  The potential for injury is much less and it is easier and faster to switch between exercises. Finally, the best exercise is the one you actually do on a regular basis. I enjoy the bodylastic work out much more than using my old equiptment- I'm getting addicted and can already feel better muscle tone than i was able to achieved before.  These bands will work your muscles every bit as much as a weight set- i'm sore after every session.The DVD that comes with the set is ok for a beginner but if you search the web you can find some sites with better info.Look on ebay- you'll find endless listings for bowflexes and total gyms that are being dumped after collecting dust from non use.  You won't find anyone selling a used bodylastic set.</review_text>
First of all shipping time was very speedy; three and a half days. The bands are extremely well designed and constructed. I've only had them about a week so I can't say how they'll hold up over time, but they are high quality and seem very durable. The clip system and door anchor are both brilliant designs. The handles and ankle straps are both comfortable to use. You do need a decent amount of room in front of and to the side of the door you're using, about six feet in front and a few feet on the side. The online resource center that you get a year's subscription to is very thorough and professionally done. The short videos for each exercise are extremely helpful in achieving good form. The high number of different exercises allow for a great variation of workout routines. Though I'm fairly strong the set allows for much growth in increasing resistance levels. Overall this is a great travel friendly complete system for under sixty bucks with shipping</review_text>
I was impressed with the sturdiness and construction of this equipment, and also in the variety of ways it can be utilzed during a workout.  The handgrips are very comfortable during use.  The set comes in a little bag to make it extremely portable.  The only drawback is that I normally work out with a friend, and the kit only includes one set of grips/handles, though I believe you can order an additional set of handles without ordering another complete set.</review_text>
One of my personal training clients showed me her Bodylastics set, and I immediately bought one, to use at home myself, and to use with clients.  It's certainly the best set of exercise bands I've ever seen, and in fact, it's one of the best fitness products I've ever seen: modestly priced, infinitely versatile, well-constructed (very durable materials), and very cleverly designed with the foam door attachment and interchangeable handles.  One set of handles is for your hands, and the others are ankle straps for leg and butt work.  This set is like having a cable crossover machine at home. You can do anything with these bands that you can do on that machine at the gym. I didn't care much for the routine they teach on the DVD and in their booklet, but I loved the website.  I found many exercises there that I have never seen before, including some that combine the bands with a stability ball. I use the bands, a ball, and a jumprope to do my own functional, challenging workout when I can't get to the gym.  Several other reviewers thought that serious weight-lifters wouldn't like the bands or be challenged by them, but I'm a trainer, and I love them</review_text>
I wholeheartedly recommend the company and the product.I have been buying online for 10 years, the current purchase qualifies as my best customer service experience ever</review_text>
I bought this system from bodylastics and let me tell ya....this will kick your buttocks...(and get them in shape).  Even though I have gotten out of shape over the years I thought for sure I could jump in and do the intermediate work out with the young lady in the included DVD disk during the circut training part of the program.  WRONG ANSWER.  I was thourghly humiliated at myself and gasping for air,  and if you don't think some rubber bands (well surgical tubing on steroids) can't give you a work out you would be wrong again.  If you want to get in shape on the cheap you have to buy this product...very high quality and more than you would ever need.  Unless your a body builder.  Honest.  I have owned the total gym, and I did love it but they now cost almost a grand or so for the better models and attachments, which cost extra and the body lastics set will do the same thing for you.  I was really suprised and pleased.  Oh and I am now relegated to the all American Cubicle forest at work and you can use the device that attaches the bands to the door between the top of the desk and the space where the back wall of your cubicle attaches and get quite a few of the specified exercises done shown in the included manual.  Enjoy!!!</review_text>
I just received my Bodylastics Maximun tension set and absolutely love it!! First, you should know from reading this page that the item ships from the Bodylastics warehouse. It took just 2 days to get it to me from their warehouse after I placed my order, superfast shipping. After opening it up, I immediately put it to the test. My problem area is my shoulder, specifically my left, and I have a hard time working it our properly with dumbbells. The Bodylastics tubes gave incredible tension and allowed me to comfortably work my shoulder out. After a few sets, my shoulder had that healthy burn like I had just done my sets on a cable machine. I then put it through every conceivalbe test I could think of. Legs..abs..biceps..triceps,... everything was given a thorough work out. I want to make special mention that the door anchor did not do so much as put a mark on the door; and I was using it on a hollow in-door door not a solid outside door. The tubes allowed me to perform each exercise slowly and deliberately, while focusing on the muscle I was trying to work without having to worry about dropping a free weight on my foot. The maximum tension set can produce up to 150lbs of tension if you use all of the tubes at once and use only one handle; Plenty for me.I would definetly recommend this purchase for a whole range of people; Everyone from a complete beginer up to the most expereinced weight lifter. I would especially recommend that people in physical therapy or anyone recovering from an injury consult their therapist or doctor and consider this product for use during their therapy workouts because the exercises using this set require slow, deliberate, and smooth movements without the hazard posed by free-weights</review_text>
Great outdoor fireplace.  It's compact enough that it does not take up too much room in the courtyard.  You can have seating all around so everyone can enjoy the fire.  I had been looking for about 4 months to find something but would never buy anything, until I found this one.  My sister had bought one and once I saw hers, I knew this is what I was looking for</review_text>
I feel this product provides excellent Value for the occasional biker or hiker. While cycling I had filled the hydration bladder with water and ice. I also carried a 32oz bottle of gatorade in the the storage area. There was still plenty of room for snacks, keys, clothes etc. I purchased a Sony portable CD player/radio. It fits nicely in a special compartment with the headphone wires coming out of a slot in the top of the pack. My radio also has a remote which is great when you don't want to stop.The chest and waist straps hold the pack comfortably yet snugly to your body so it is not bouncing around.The one negative that would report is the bladder hook. Rhis is what the bladder suspends from inside the pack. I think it should have a latch or something to hold it more securely. What I found is that when you take it off, it may slip off and then it pinches the hose which prevents drinking. I try to keep the velcro that closes that part of the pack close to the hook. This seems to help.Overall though I am very pleased with my purchase.</review_text>
I absolutely love this hydration pack. It has one large and two small pockets and two quick stash pockets with the bladder in its own seperate pocket on the back. The large pocket has a space for a discman and has a headphone port. Furthermore, the bladder is very high quality and I haven't had any problems with it. The bladder and hose are easy to remove so it is not hard to clean it. Also, this pack is offered for a much better price than the overpriced camelbaks. All in all, I think that this pack is definitely worth the money that I paid for it</review_text>
I am 7 1/2 months pregnant and this hydration pack is a lifesaver.  I am able to take long walks without having to carry bottles of water with me.The size of the pack is small enough, not to be a bother but large enough for my keys, ipod, cell phone and a snack.  This is a great deal for all of the features you get</review_text>
Very comfortable and versatile air mattress for camping, or water sports. Heavy duty construction and durable material with attached pillow, at a reasonalble price, make this a good bargain</review_text>
I play frisbee once every other week with a bunch of military guys that really can't throw anything but a cross-body throw, but it takes a beating as it gets ripped out of hands and people spike it.  Still works, the battery has come on 2 occasions in 3 months of play, but it alwyas works afterwards and i've been happy with buying both the red and the blue, shoudl have bought the green for a complete set.  Would be nice if it came with a spare battery, but there's no complaints there.  Would recommend for even rough pla</review_text>
We've played for hours with these discs, (as we now have every color) and have had the most fun in the most random of places. It's easy to pull out a disc from the car, the house, backpack or suitcase and light up some faces with fun. I read another review here and want to say that we've not lost any parts to our discs and have had some pretty serious impacts; a semi truck ran over one and the light stayed on and it works fine today... My favorite feature is how bright the disc is ALL OVER. It's not LEDs on the rim, it's the whole disc lit up. Our whole family is a fan and loves to play. We are much more active because of a silly light up flying disc. Crazy things happen, this is one of them</review_text>
I got this frisbee about two years ago, and I love it.  I play pretty seriously about 3 times a week and i really enjoy playing at night with this frisbee.  It is about 185 grams so it soars pretty well without being affected by the wind.The only problem I have with it is that after a couple years of continuous use the part that holds the batteries inside the frisbee comes out and the light turns off when that part becomes loose (which happens alot now), but it is easily fixable by putting duct tape over it before playing.  The problem with the duct tape is that it makes it not as aerodynamic and it weighs it down, but I am happy that I have gotten a good 2 years of  use out of it.  I highly reccomend it to people wanting to play frisbee at night</review_text>
I bought this on a whim from a local store. At the store, it was hard to tell how bright the frisbee really was. But once it gets dark, this thing glows BRIGHT! I got the red one.The first time I used it was with some friends playing Ultimate Frisbee on a pitch black night. It flies like a regular frisbee and has good solid feel to it. It was pure fun. We played for hours.The fun factor I got from this frisbee doubled when I found it also floated and was waterproof. So we had a blast with it while on a camping trip along a lake. For those of you with swimming pools, it should be a fun thing to play with at night.Then one night at a friend's party someone came across a paintball gun. Naturally we started looking for things to shoot at. He had a huge field behind his house but no targets. So out came my trusty frisbee, which I always carry in my trunk for unexpected occasions such as these. It glowed bright while we spent the night pelting it with shots.Since it is lit up by an LED, the battery will last for hours. Mine is still working after many hours of use. I highly recommend it. From what I understand the red LED will have a longer battery life than the other colors or the multicolored ones.</review_text>
I picked up one of these flying discs just a couple of weeks ago. I have a green one, but they are available in red, blue, and multicolors as well. It's a well made American product---which makes this disc an easy choice over the competition---that flies straight and does not hurt to catch (at least with the hand).After a few missed catches, a few collisions with trees, and landing in the road, the Flashfligh never blinked. It seems sturdy, unlike some other light-up discs that didn't last through a weekend.The LED makes it easy to spot without being distracting, so catching the disc is easy and finding it, not a matter to be taken lightly during a late evening endeavor, is effortless (as long as the light is turned on).</review_text>
Our first evening out, we had no idea that this disc could give us such pleasure. We ran, laughed and played for hours. Now we schedule our night time raves in the park! I'm amazed at the abuse our discs have taken and they keep flying. It is fun to have all the colors in the air at once.Great product and more fun than you can imagine</review_text>
We purchased this kayak a few weeks ago and have enjoyed using it in our nearby lake.Initial use is very easy.  We had it set up and inflated within fifteen minutes, using a hand pump for inflation.  Note, the kayak does not include paddles, so remember to purchase them as well.The kayak comfortably seats two people, with room for storage in the front and rear of the kayak.  We're using this to stow lifejackets for our boys.  The kayak includes two inflatable, removable seats which can be moved around or removed.  We've found that they are very comfortable and actually make rowing and maneuvering easier.  The kayak also has an easy to open and close drain for letting water out of the boat.The size of this kayak makes it so easy for using and transporting.  Our 11 year old can carry it on his own and it actually fit inside our van fully inflated.I don't plan on taking the kayak on any rapids, but for use on local lakes and calm rivers, it seems to be the perfect solution</review_text>
I have been using this as part of a rehab program so I haven't put it to any rigorous use, but it is sturdy and seems to do what it says it will do</review_text>
These are very good quality BBs.  Don't use these in cheap guns!  They are heavier than .20g and .12g used in regular guns, but they work great in guns that are supposed to fire .25g.  I use them in my Tokyo Marui VSR 10 GSpec, and I have no problems</review_text>
Product, response, shipping, packaging - all superb service.  I would definitely purchase here again.</review_text>
This is a great workout tool for every body. It is total customizable for easy to hard. I recommend it to any one looking for a no hassle workout that can be done almost anywhere</review_text>
Preparing a disaster kit was made easier, ordering and adding the compact ark to it. The price was one of the best for similar kits on other sites. The contents of water, emergency blanket and emergency food rations (good till 2011) fit neatly into my duffel of flashlights, personal items and tools. The only thing that could have been better is the Super Ark but I had most of the additional items in the upgrade. I will note that the additional items cost me more time and money to collect than the price of the Super Ark. (buying them indiviually things expire at different times also) Once I found how much this product fullfilled the need, I gave the ark III out as presents, to encourage others to be more prepared for the unexpected.</review_text>
This is a great headlight for biking at night. It is surprisingly bright, has a flashing mode which gets the attention of cars and saves battery life, attaches to my helmet so I dont' have to worry about it get stolen...I don't know if I would feel comfortable offroading with this light, but it's definitely great for biking around the dark neighborhoods at night.I recommend it. :</review_text>
keeping in mind i ride in nyc, (so the light is less to see the road, more for others to see me), the 410 has kept me visible and has at least psychologically kept me safe. i keep it on blink mode most of the time, but the steady-on does make potholes and other road "hazards" more obvious down darker streets. i have mounted the 410 upside down on my handlebar to keep it low profile, the downside to that being i sometimes turn the light on with my knee when using more body english.it's a great, small, powerful, lightweight, good-looking light. i am very happy with it and highly recommend it</review_text>
Very please. My two boys and I went backpacking the end of December.  It was the first time for my 12 year old. This tent worked very well.  Good construction.  Not too heavy for this type of trip. I would recommend the next size down, if you only have one other person, but it's great for 3.</review_text>
It didn't just rain... it POURED!  And guess what?  We stayed dry as can be.  I defnitely recommend this one if you think you might be heading into some wet weather on your trip</review_text>
I don't own this tent, but I have owned other Eureka tents in the past. As with many good tents, the seams are sewn together with thread, but they are not "sealed." Sealing means applying a sort of thick glue to coat the threads and seams so water won't come through.Some tents have some sort of seam sealer applyed at the factory, they say. I usually apply some of my own, too. Read the instructions; it will tell whether the seams or sealed, and recommend a seam sealer if not. You can buy a tube at most sporting goods stores. Ask a salesperson for advice on applying it.There are sometimes a lot of seams that have to be coated: top cover rainfly, floor, door, etc. - anything exposed to the outside. Especially the floor, cause you can end up in a big puddle if it rains enough.Sometimes you need to reapply sealer after several years. If the fabric, itself, starts to leak, something like Thompson's Water Sealer with make it waterproof again. But it will also make it stiffer and change the color slightly.Eureka makes good tents. If prepared properly, they don't leak. Heck, even cheapo tents don't leak if the seams are sealed. About the only way you would get leaks is if there were holes in the fabric. And then you would need to patch them. If you take care of a tent when handling it, holes are rare. But careless use of lighters or cigarettes will do it</review_text>
I don't own this tent, but...Consumer Reports ranked it as "Excellent" in set up test criterium in the Small Sized Family Camping Tent Comparison.  Also was a "Quick Picks" tent identified by them.I saw this tent in person, and I think it's a pretty good deal for the occassional to heavy camper.</review_text>
Although time will be the true test of this product, they certainly appear and feel very durable.  The screw tops go on easily and tighten securely.  I am very pleased at this point with this product.  I purchased six of these container bottles and have refilled them five times.  We get our drinking water from municipal wells, the rest of our water comes from catchment.Thank you for what appears to be a very quality product</review_text>
These bottles are very sturdy, and the built-in handles allow anyone to get a solid grip.  I expect they will last for a long time.  They were well-worth their price</review_text>
This kit is full of good stuff for an emergency kit. I picked one up at costco, and it's the perfect size to just leave in the car</review_text>
I have tried almost all bike hoists on the market. The Racor is the cheapest at $21 and it works fine, but feels and looks budget.  The other brands have similar design to the Racor but cost more and really don't work any better (some say they can lift more weight, but they have the same mechanical advantage as the Racor at 4:1 -- so anything more than about 80lb is really too hard to lift anyway). The Kettler Spezi has a unique design. It is around $50 but it feels good, works smoothly, and has the best locking mechanism. If you must have quality, buy the Kettler</review_text>
I don't like wearing a wristwatch, but want to know the time. The Timex Grip Clip is a very handy alternative. It easily fits in a pocket or attaches to anything (belt loop, messenger bag, etc.). It's also a great value</review_text>
I needed a watch that would stay with me all the time but not on my wrist, since a watch on my wrist tends to bother my typing.  I tried a pocket watch, which is decent, but I wanted to have something on the outside.  This watch is the best I found so far!  It is rugged and convenient.  It has useful functions such as a down counter, a timer, and an alarm.  The display has two positions, the reverse vertical position good for hanging on your belt hook (which is what I do) or the vertical position for hanging on other things (like bags, I suppose).  It's also inexpensive.  The only thing may be that this thing is not exactly beautiful, but on casual clothing I think it looks just fine</review_text>
My grandsons go through helmets about once a year so I've been replacing them at Christmastime. I have trouble with sizes every year. This one was a perfect and comfortable fit with the additional pads for my soon-to-be nine year old. I also bought the Bell Blade Youth Bike Helmet for my soon-to-be six year old and the Bell Child Bike Helmet and Elbow/Knee Pad Value Pack for my soon-to-be four year old and they also were perfect fits</review_text>
Thos is a great stove .  I bought it for my boat and saw a very similar one in the West marine catalog for 65 bucks</review_text>
a basic foam roller.. nothing much to say about it.. if you think you will use it, buy it.</review_text>
Maybe a little pricey for what it is, but it sure works for me. Just a couple of minutes 2 or 3 times a day and it releives all of the stress in my lower back. It is instant, albeit temporary relief from my lower back strain and posture issues</review_text>
Good quality product that came very quickly with standard delivery. A great heart rate monitor with a bunch of other good features</review_text>
I really like the heart rate monitor on this T3. The heart rate keeps me informed just how hard or easy I am riding my bike. The Training Effect function is also a very useful feature. The T3 is a little complicated at first, but with constant use it becomes easier to use. I like the bike POD also as I can enter all the data off the T3 as I sit in front of my computer</review_text>
I really enjoy the T3.  The training effect is a new concept to me but seems to generally measure the intensity of my workout.  It is nice to have a single measure to summarize my workouts.  The watch has very nice log features as well.  The Bike POD works great.  Very nice to have speed, distance and all recorded along with heart rate.  I have no complaints with the watch</review_text>
the stand is rather weak and wont hold the swords very well but im sure i can glue it down to keept it from falling.the blades were very well sharpened, they appear to be stainless steel. The sheathes are very nice and well decorated as are the hilts</review_text>
Okay, so I am not an airsoft expert and can't really go into much detail about this gun. First and foremost this is a toy and nothing more. It has no need to go fast or hard but believe its not fun to get hit by it. Compared to my Ak-47 it shots fast and very accurate. I kept to short round burst and found the 'drum' clip more useful. The siliencer, scope, and orange tip extention are completly useless, don't need them. The strap hold on really well and the gun has a great weight. What I like about this gun compared to my Ak-47 is its size and adjustability. I barely charged it and my friend got some pretty nice welts on his back. Also I have been using .12mm bullets on this gun and will be try .2mm soon. I don't think the difference will be great but the adjustable hop makes up for it.</review_text>
Really a suprise,very good quality ,shoots straight and hard,very sturdy,realistic looking.A really good buy at that price,everybody else sells it for much more money.A steal</review_text>
When i got this gun it looked really cool. The assembaly is easy, but the laser scope thing is the only thing hard to assemble. I tried it and i would say it had 200+ FPS. The only thing bad about this gun is that it takes some time to reload the magazine. Also the gun says it comes w/ a flashlight. It doesn't have it. Also, if you're looking for a good size gun, this would b good 4 u. Also IT'S ALOT OF FUN DUDE</review_text>
This gun has a pretty high rate of fire, and as long as you give the magazine a good shove when you put it in, then you won't have any bb's jam.  This gun is worth every penny (but not much more than that).  it is great for indoor battles or small scale outdoor battles.  The hop-up is very effective and the gun can take any type of bb you put in there.  To truly get the best effect from the hop-up, though, you should probably use high-polished .12 gram bb's</review_text>
I've been doing air soft parties with my Air Force buddies for quite some time so I get to try out a diverse selection of air soft weapons from the cheapo single-shot handguns to the full-auto SAW weapons.  The CYMA MP5 was a cheap alternative to purchasing over $100 rifles since you are then entering the price range of real rifles that I find more fun to shoot.The CYMA MP5 did not take all that long to charge and depsite constant target practice (and constant harassment to my unsuspecting neighbors when they're not looking) and outside usage I have yet worn down the battery to necessitate a recharge.  Despite prior reviews I have yet to experience a problem with the stock 30-round magazine; the drum however, not quite so successful.As for the power, it's 200+ FPS may not seem like much but that may indicate your battery is low.  I 'tested' the FPS out on my unsuspecting brother from 20 feet away and the lasting whelps on his arms suggest a rather unpleasant that WILL get your attention; for this reason I strongly suggest taking safety precautions to avoid injury.  The rate of fire is consistant, but with any full-auto weapon it is vital to realize there is a difference between sustained fire and continuous fire.  Since air soft guns cannot easily be tweaked to lower the firing rate full-auto airsoft guns are prone to jam unless CO2 powered due to the firing mechanism.It is vital to understand that you cannot, and should not, just go Rambo and unload like there's no tomorrow.  You run the risk of throwing the firing mechanism out of whack and then you have a busted weapon.  2-3 round bursts are the way of the day even when conducting supressive fire.  BEAR THIS IN MIND when using the CYMA MP5, especially if you're purchasing this for a younger user that may not be familiar with close combat beyond Counter-Strike.Now, to name some cons; this weapon is cheaply made.  The scope cannot be accurately mounted unless mine came broken.  It seems to makeshift snap on to the upper receiver and easily wabbles.  I compensated by screwing in (with a power tool) a weaver rail and mounted one of my actual red dot scopes.  Now it's semi-accurate up to 30 yards.  My flash light attachment simply does not work and no matter what I tried I couldn't get it to work.  Oh well, never gonna use the thing anyway.  Many people have noted the weapon is prone to jam on the first round and this is true and there's a way to prevent it; pull the cocking hammer back and then slap in the magazine.  Once in, slap down the hammer or you can insert the magazine then pull and release the cocking hammer.Sometimes the full-auto also jams on the first shot.  To get around this I switched to single-shot, fired, then switched back to full auto since it already primed the next shot.  Then there's the instructions... written VERY poorly.  I've read garage door opener manuals with better translations.  It's almost to the point where I have to read the instructions soley from the pictures.Other than this, it's a good cheap starter weapon for younger, or novice shooters.  It's also a great product to teach new shooters firearm safety since the basic safety principles still apply (finger off trigger, point in same direction etc).  There are better alternatives for more advanced players but this one is good for beginners and those (like me) that just want a beater</review_text>
This gun is great, but the instructions are hard to understand unless you understand Chinese, also the scope is hard to use but you can unload the smaller mag in under a second and the big on in about three so it fires very fast and at a pretty fast speed, also many parts of this gun are meta</review_text>
The product works well on my cannondale and is made nicely. However I wish it was real glass. All in all a good product. Thank</review_text>
I used it twice each week, it is pretty good. Easy to use, easy to store.Satisfied with it so far</review_text>
this is a good mat to exercise. it's not very big, so it fits in most place</review_text>
I take a Pilates/conditioning class and I bought the mat to have one of my own instead of using a 'community gym' one.  I love the way that it never slips when doing any sort of workout and the feeling of it is just wonderful!!  I highly suggest you try this mat--it even comes with it's own velcro straps--others make you buy them.</review_text>
This is the second Vector I have purchased.  My first six year old one has gotten beat up and the compass no longer works.  The watch has a large dial and is a little bulky, but you get used to it.  You trade that for a large easy to read dial.  The watch has more features than you can use and a large instruction manual to go with it. It has the compass, barometer, temperature, and altimeter.  The 6 hour barametric pressure history box is nice to warn you of incoming bad weather.  The watch is a nice instrument, but I would warn against abusing it. It is shock resistant, not shock proof</review_text>
I got my first Vector about three years ago, from REI. Yes, it is large. Not a problem for me as I am large.I am on my third Vector; the first two, for some strange reason, leaked water, the first during an incredible monsoon rainstorm in the mountains of Arizona, the second while taking a shower. No, I did not submerse the watch, nor push any buttons while the water was 'on'. Fortunately, REI accepts returns with no questions. It is a testament to how nice this watch is that I continued to replace the watch. Perhaps I had models from a bad production run, as my present Vector has lasted for over two years with nary a leak.The good: I have found the digital compass to be very accurate and useful. Remember that it must be calibrated from time to time, and don't forget about declination.The barometer is VERY useful. The barometer function is constantly operating, and accounts for a nice little symbol in the upper left of the display showing pressure trends over the past few hours. This is very useful if you understand barometric pressure trends and their likely results. If you do not, look it up and learn, as you will find it to be very useful if you spend a lot of time in the brush. Remember that the barometric pressure must be calibrated against absolute sea-level readings from time to time, especially during rapidly changing weather conditions. Once you understand the relationship between altitude/changing weather, you will master the complexities of both the barometer and the altimeter, and understand just how simple they are, and how reliable this device really is. I have checked it against my high-end GPS and other barometers many times, and it is very accurate indeed.The temp is useful if you need to know the temperature; like all such devices, it will have to be taken off of your body for about ten minutes before you will get an accurate reading.The bad: the lens is plastic. If you have any experience with fine coated-glass, you will do fine with this: DO NOT, EVER, wipe any dust or dirt off of the face. Use a lens-pen, with a fine blower-brush. Or wait until you've stepped under water with it. Put simply, it has been my experience that if you keep your grubby paws off of it, and don't try to 'clean' it with your cotton t-shirt/flannel shirt/etc, and instead use methods used for fine coated glass elements, it will look like new forever. Mine does, and it has been in desert dust and swamp mud.The battery does, in fact, eventually lose energy! In normal use, you can expect a year or more from the battery. If you are one of those fellas that shows everyone that he meets his "neat digital compass", or actually rely on this as your primary compass in the brush, it won't last nearly so long. The digital compass is the primary energy-sucker, likely as much as the backlight. Use the compass only when needed (you should have a base-plate compass anyway...Suunto also makes some of the best of these as well).As for the review stating the watchbands give out, I find that remarkable as I have never had a problem with mine, and I wear it constantly, day in and day out.All in all, and in spite of the fact that I had to return my first two, I heartily recommend the Vector. Tough and useful</review_text>
I gave this watch to my fiance & he has really enjoyed tracking our altitude gain on bike rides.  I've appreciated knowing the temperature.  Can't wait for ski season</review_text>
This may be the 'outdoorsy' ubergeek watch. It's big, it's ugly, but has functions to make the fattest Swiss Army Knife sit in the corner sobbing in jealousy. Overall, I like it but there are a couple of things that sound better than they are.The timepiece: Outstanding. It has HH:MM:SS DD:MMM, of course, with a year setting to avoid leap year issues. This should go without saying in a modern digital watch. Stopwatch with lap function (not that I ever use the lap function, but I'm sure someone is interested). Countdown timer that can run up to a 24 hour countdown (very easy to set). Three daily alarms. Special kudos for the alarms, this is one of the loudest watch alarms I've heard, and I've missed too many watch alarms to not appreciate this.The Altimeter: largely eye candy, but kind of neat. Over four days, my bedroom went from 100m above sea level to 25 m below sea level (by the maps, about 40m ASL). Not surprising because it is driven by the barometer, and I never recalibrated it, but a graphic demonstration of the importance of calibrating it when you want/need it.The Barometer: Yup, it's a barometer. The part I like is the little display that shows the rising/falling trend, especially as this is always active (even in normal 'time' mode).The Thermometer: Take the watch off to get an accurate reading as the sensor is too close to the wrist.The compass: Easily the best 'special' feature. Accurate, precise (enough for orienteering, not for surveying), easy to use. It can be programmed for a declination, but knowing me, I'd forget to reset it, so I do declination the hard way. The sighting notches are small but servicable. The spirit level bubble is unique among digital watch compasses to Suunto, and greatly enhances accuracy and confidence in the compass. An outstanding wrist compass.The package: Big. Really, really big. But the controls are very easy to use and seem fairly resistant to accidental button pressing (a problem for me with other watches). The battery has a shortish (12-18 month) life, but has a hatch, so you don't need to take it to a jeweller to get it replaced without ruining the water resistance. The display has large characters and high contrast to the back ground, and the display light is just right, readible, even, and glare free, but not an emergency flashlight. Personally, I'm going to swap the resin band for a velcro strap, but the stock strap isn't bad, just not great.Overall, not a watch for the office or a suit but very good as a watch, compass and barometer, and about what you could expect as a thermometer and altimeter. Well designed, thought-out, and manufactured, but really big</review_text>
This may be the 'outdoorsy' ubergeek watch. It's big, it's ugly, but has functions to make the fattest Swiss Army Knife sit in the corner sobbing in jealousy. Overall, I like it but there are a couple of things that sound better than they are.The timepiece: Outstanding. It has HH:MM:SS DD:MMM, of course, with a year setting to avoid leap year issues. This should go without saying in a modern digital watch. Stopwatch with lap function (not that I ever use the lap function, but I'm sure someone is interested). Countdown timer that can run up to a 24 hour countdown (very easy to set). Three daily alarms. Special kudos for the alarms, this is one of the loudest watch alarms I've heard, and I've missed too many watch alarms to not appreciate this.The Altimeter: largely eye candy, but kind of neat. Over four days, my bedroom went from 100m above sea level to 25 m below sea level (by the maps, about 40m ASL). Not surprising because it is driven by the barometer, and I never recalibrated it, but a graphic demonstration of the importance of calibrating it when you want/need it.The Barometer: Yup, it's a barometer. The part I like is the little display that shows the rising/falling trend, especially as this is always active (even in normal 'time' mode).The Thermometer: Take the watch off to get an accurate reading as the sensor is too close to the wrist.The compass: Easily the best 'special' feature. Accurate, precise (enough for orienteering, not for surveying), easy to use. It can be programmed for a declination, but knowing me, I'd forget to reset it, so I do declination the hard way. The sighting notches are small but servicable. The spirit level bubble is unique among digital watch compasses to Suunto, and greatly enhances accuracy and confidence in the compass. An outstanding wrist compass.The package: Big. Really, really big. But the controls are very easy to use and seem fairly resistant to accidental button pressing (a problem for me with other watches). The battery has a shortish (12-18 month) life, but has a hatch, so you don't need to take it to a jeweller to get it replaced without ruining the water resistance. The display has large characters and high contrast to the back ground, and the display light is just right, readible, even, and glare free, but not an emergency flashlight. Personally, I'm going to swap the resin band for a velcro strap, but the stock strap isn't bad, just not great.Overall, not a watch for the office or a suit but very good as a watch, compass and barometer, and about what you could expect as a thermometer and altimeter. Well designed, thought-out, and manufactured, but really big.</review_text>
This may be the 'outdoorsy' ubergeek watch.  It's big, it's ugly, but has functions to make the fattest Swiss Army Knife sit in the corner sobbing in jealousy.  Overall, I like it but there are a couple of things that sound better than they are.The timepiece:  Outstanding.  It has HH:MM:SS DD:MMM, of course, with a year setting to avoid leap year issues.  This should go without saying in a modern digital watch.  Stopwatch with lap function (not that I ever use the lap function, but I'm sure someone is interested).  Countdown timer that can run up to a 24 hour countdown (very easy to set).  Three daily alarms.  Special kudos for the alarms, this is one of the loudest watch alarms I've heard, and I've missed too many watch alarms to not appreciate this.The Altimeter:  largely eye candy, but kind of neat.  Over four days, my bedroom went from 100m above sea level to 25 m below sea level (by the maps, about 40m ASL).  Not surprising because it is driven by the barometer, and I never recalibrated it, but a graphic demonstration of the importance of calibrating it when you want/need it.The Barometer:  Yup, it's a barometer.  The part I like is the little display that shows the rising/falling trend, especially as this is always active (even in normal 'time' mode).The Thermometer:  Take the watch off to get an accurate reading as the sensor is too close to the wrist.The compass:  Easily the best 'special' feature.  Accurate, precise (enough for orienteering, not for surveying), easy to use.  It can be programmed for a declination, but knowing me, I'd forget to reset it, so I do declination the hard way.  The sighting notches are small but servicable.  The spirit level bubble is unique among digital watch compasses to Suunto, and greatly enhances accuracy and confidence in the compass.  An outstanding wrist compass.The package:  Big.  Really, really big.  But the controls are very easy to use and seem fairly resistant to accidental button pressing (a problem for me with other watches).  The battery has a shortish (12-18 month) life, but has a hatch, so you don't need to take it to a jeweller to get it replaced without ruining the water resistance.  The display has large characters and high contrast to the back ground, and the display light is just right, readible, even, and glare free, but not an emergency flashlight.  Personally, I'm going to swap the resin band for a velcro strap, but the stock strap isn't bad, just not great.Overall, not a watch for the office or a suit but very good as a watch, compass and barometer, and about what you could expect as a thermometer and altimeter.  Well designed, thought-out, and manufactured, but really big.</review_text>
I'm very hard on my gear and this watch has withstood it all. It has all the features you could ask for in a watch plus a few you would never expect. Large easy to read numbers for when your in difficult situations or akward positions and even while scuba diving (note: it says not to press buttons underwater, but its still readable without the backlight...usually) are a great feature and although it's a large watch, it has a certain style all its own.  I think the compass is my favorite feature great while orienting yourself with a trail map. Also a great conversational piece while breaking the ice in the board room..."my watch helps me predict the weather":-D...ok maybe not the best thing to tell your boss, but still an amazing watch:-)</review_text>
excellent product, shipping, and service, could not have asked for more...thank you so much!</review_text>
A great bokken at a good price.  I do both Ninjutsu and Toyamma Ryu, a katana martial art new to the U.S. that is a combination of Iaido and kenjutsu with a strong emphasis on iaido(drawing and sheathing of the sword) and on the perfection of the cut.  It is heavier than most bokken, which I think is a good thing because its closer to the weight of a real katana, and it builds strength in the forearms while practicing.  For Toyamma Ryu I use mostly my carbon steel Iaito(unsharpened katana) but still use it when we do kenjutsu techniques like blocking drills bokken to bokken.  It doesn't come with a saya(sheath), but I just made one out of thick black plastic from my water well tubing and heated to mold it into more of an oval instead of being circular.  I needed a saya, because it is important for drawing in Iaido techniques.  For most bokkens you can use those old plastic black golf club tubes  that they sell at Dick's Sporting Goods or wherever you can find them, but you have to ask for them.  The handle-wrap is durable and a really nice feature. In Ninjutsu all we use is the bokken because we do body movement to avoid the blade which is obv much safer than a metal sword.  I've wacked it pretty hard in practice and by accident a few times and it has held up really well and the handle-wrap hasn't moved at all, so I think it is a really nice practice tool that everyone will love. P.S. If you are using this item for Iaido and you decide to make your own saya the paint is gonna scratch off a little bit from rubbing against the saya so you may want to get the natural wood color, not a big deal either way.</review_text>
i bought two of them so that i could mess around with one of them. for instance i have a giant wild cactus field up in this lot by my house, so i use it to slice through them so i know its realy sturdy, because the cactus has broken a pvc pipe before. so my point is buy it!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
The cord-wrapped handle is a great idea, offering more of a real sword-like look as well as a firmer grip. My hands tend to get sweaty and slip around a bit with long practice, particularly with the sealed lacquered finish on most bokken. This wrap really helps (though it needed a touch of glue to get it to stay in place). The two-piece guard design is a nice enhancement too. Though you really don't need the guard at all for many applications it is nice looking and appears stronger than the original.It's still a fairly cheap piece of wood, compared to an ironwood version, but at this price (it was $9.99 when I bought it) you really can't go wrong. A nice enhancement over the basic bokken. I do, however, prefer the natural wood version to this one as it looks pretty bad once you start using it and the color scrapes off. Nevertheless, if you want an inexpensive practice sword this one is recommended...</review_text>
I THOUGHT THE COLEMAN FOLDING TABLE WAS VERY EXCELLENT FOR MY NEEDS---I'M USING IT AS A COMPUTER TABLE AND FOR MY PRINTER.     IT IS JUST THE RIGHT SIZE AND FOLDS IN HALF WITH A HANDLE FOR EASY CARRYING</review_text>
the table has Aluminum legs, but the plat form is made of some kind of paper board. but if you don't put too much weight on it, it's pretty good</review_text>
We are very happy with our Coleman Dynasty Folding Table.  The construction of the table is  very solid and it takes up little space when not in use.  It's strength and comfort are uppermost to us</review_text>
We got four of these tables last year for our Summer Party and have been using them regularly.  None of them arrived damaged and all had functioned well.  We weren't expecting stainless steel sturdiness (on the contrary they are light and easy to transport, set-up) so we were not disappointed by their "filmsiness". This year's party will be bigger, so we are purchasing four more</review_text>
Bought this table for camping but use it for parties and get-togethers at home as well. Love it due to its easy transportability. Folds up and sets up quickly, unlike those cumbersome folding card tables. Highly recommend for the value</review_text>
The first thing I was struck by was how well made this lantern is made. It even has rubber footing so it won't slide around. Others have noted the low light output, but I bet they tested it by just closing room lights. When you do that, the light output is similar to a good candle. However, when one's eyes are adjusted to the dark (i.e., getting up at night) the light output is impressive. It lights up a small room sufficiently to be able to get about. You can even read by it. I think it's an outstanding emergency light for one's home and for use on a boat as well. We've purchased a few more for those purposes</review_text>
Just received the unit.  Manufacturing quality is very good.  Small, light compact design is excellent.  Installing batteries is a snap; unscrew retaining knob and twist bottom cover 5 degrees to align the  arrows and off it comes.  Wire carry handle folds down flush with the lantern body.  Very slick.  Unfortunately, the brightness leaves a lot to be desired.  I was looking for something I could bring up into our unfinished attic but this unit is too dim.  For reading you have to have the lantern right next to the book and even then it's not really enough.  This makes the high/medium/low light feature kind of gimmicky.  The only use for medium/low would be as a temporary night light in the kids room.  The blinking light feature is ok but the 2 second interval seems kind of long.  Great lantern for very light duty camping use, blackouts or other emergencies</review_text>
I bought this light as a night light / light for my tent .seeing how candles are NOT a good idea and other lanterns i have drink batteries. i friend turned me on to it and you can also tell with the flashing battery indicator when the batteries need changing in advance. to me it is more than bright enough for camping and emergencies and it has 3 light levels.(I FORGOT TO SAY I ALMOST HAD A FIRE WITH A CANDLE) letting it run for 6-10 hours a day for a week i replaced the batteris once and that was only when the battery light just started to turn to medium life</review_text>
I love my Fuel Belt. It's light and flexible. If I have one complaint it's that the belt tends to fit snuggly. The small is REALLY small, so order up one size. The velcro belt will ensure a snug fit. The bottles tends to slip from your hands when you perspire, but overall it's a great training tool.</review_text>
My daughter got this one for Christmas.  She wanted this one in particular so Santa Claus brought it for her.  It is lightweight so it's very easy for her to peddle and steer.  She is on the small side for her age (she's 5 and weighs about 40 lbs) but she has no problem peddling this car (she can even pick it up to turn it around).  We have the larger one for our 10 year old and it is very heavy (too heavy to pick up and turn around).  Our son doesn't ride the big one too much so our daughter will have one to move up into when she outgrows the little one!  I got it quite a bit cheaper through a different company</review_text>
I've been working as a lifeguard on the beach for many years, I don't know what I would do without this whistle.It's the best!</review_text>
I have 2 children, ages 2 and 4 and they fit well inside this trailer.  They have space for their shoulders, heads and legs as well as a space for waterbottles, etc.  We especially like the hitch.  It actually hooks around the bike instead of just needing to be tightened around a bar, so there is no chance of it coming loose and falling off.  We had a lots of problems with this in our previous bike trailer.  It doesn't have lots of frills, but we use it at least a few times a week and have loved it.  We also have 2 jogging strollers from Instep and they are great.  I trained for a whole year for a marathon while pushing 2 kids in it and it's still going strong!  Instep is a good quality brand with great prices</review_text>
This is one of the most wonderful products I have purchased.  It is easy to set up and it is very roomy.  I love the drink and snack holders for each kid.  The only thing is it does not have good shade when the sun is shining right in front.  The kids need hats or shades.  Otherwise I love it.  I haven't had the chance to use it with the kids in on the bike, but I know it will word great.  I plan to use it when they outgrow it to tote my grocies around</review_text>
I've had one of these on my mountain bike for over 2 years and 400 miles. It survived the woods of Virginia and Maryland, the streets of Washington, DC and the mountains of Southern California. Just recently the wire broke that goes from the sensor on the forks to the display on the handle bars. The wire came lose and got caught in the tread on the tire is the only reason it broke. It seems pretty accurate. The installation was easy and the placement was easy to see while still unobtrusive on my handle bars.Very durable and a good value for the money</review_text>
My first bicycle computer had half of the features this one has and cost me twice the price. This little guy is a great value. Although it doesn't have wireless connectivity, it still has just about all the features you would find in a high-end model.Easy to install. Easy to use. Easy to detach when parking your bike or just to review recorded readings from your last ride</review_text>
My Wilson F1100 Official NFL Game Football arrived days before it was scheduled to and in excellent condition.  I would like to thank you for the fast shipping and the good quality of this product.I would, also, like to see you open up a line of hand-sewn NFL team logo patches.  I think that would be a good collector's item.Your satisfied customer,David Ewing</review_text>
Game Day Pro Ball - The best ball for recreating awesome plays in your backyard or better yet in your living room!!! This ball rocks!</review_text>
As described, awesome football!  Son is very happy to have a decent football to play with.  Great feel, grip and quality!Highly Recommend</review_text>
I just got it today and I must say it was worth the money. It is very sharp. The only problem with it was that when you put it back in its sheath and take it out it has this white wax film in spots. Its easy enough to clean off and it will go away after a while. Another problem was that the stand gave me splinters. This sword is ment for some use, but dont try to go whacking away at things for hours. I sugest this for any collector out there, or even a kill bill fan</review_text>
I can't believe I was going to buy the crappy plastic foldup Radio Flyer tricycle.  Fortunately, I noticed before purchasing that it was for 1.5 yrs-3 yrs olds and as I was buying this for my daughter who was turning 3, I turned to Amazon to find something bigger.  When I saw this, I fell in love with it and BONUS! it was on clearance for $69.99!  It's even more gorgeous in person--when she took it to the local playground for its first spin, the kids there actually chased her around the park because it was so stunning!  The only minor drawback is that because she's still learning the physics of pedaling, she pushes the pedals and pulls on the handlebars so hard to get leverage that the handlebars go a little crooked, even after tightening them as much as we can.  But I can easily fix it by twisting them back and I figure it won't happen as much once she grows taller and gets the hang of riding it</review_text>
I can't say enough GREAT things about this trike.  My 2 year old LOVES it!  It is very well made, as are Schwinn Bikes.  It has so much style, yet it is actually very well made.  We gave it to her today at her birthday party, and I think the adults were just as impressed by it as the little kids.  Plus, the seat is adjustable so it can grow with the child.  It is also very easy to assemble.  This is a must have for any pink loving, active, little princess</review_text>
I ordered two pink trikes for my granddaughters, their birthdays are 21 days apart. They love them!! I could not beleive the shipping time for these trikes, I think we had them within 48 hours after we ordered them. Nothing but good things to say about this order and the products</review_text>
My 3 year old daughter just got this trike for her birthday. Besides being so cute, it is extremely well made and durable. Very worth the money, she and her 5 and a half year old brother actually fight over it, even though he has a cool big boy blue bike of his own! You know it must be fun if a 5 year old boy is willing to ride a PINK bike! I am thrilled and couldn't recommend anything else if this is what you are in the market for.</review_text>
We got this trike for my daughter as a Christmas gift last year.  She is almost 2 yrs old and I wasn't sure if this trike might be too big for her.  When she first saw it, she loved it!  Even though she could barely ride it, she would push herself around the house ringing the bell.  The seat is adjustable so her feet were actually able to touch the pedals with no problem, now she just needs to learn how to pedal.  The assembly of this trike was very easy, requiring only some adjustable wrenches and a screwdriver and took only about 15 minutes.  The build quality of this trike is first rate-it feels solid and weighs it too!  What impressed me most about it was the fact that the tires were real rubber needing to be inflated just like the big bikes.  My daughter absolutely loves her schwinn and my wife and I could not be happier with the quality and construction of it.  If you have a girl between 2 and 4 yrs of age that wants a bike, THIS IS THE ONE</review_text>
The trike is very well made. It appears to be safer than some of the other tries I've looked at because of the low center of gravity and wide base. My daughter has not had any incidents (or near incidents) of tiping over. It seems to be securely planted on the ground</review_text>
I found this trike to be easy to put together.  Fit and finish was beautiful.  Child loves it.  Low center of gravity reduces (but does not eliminate) tip-overs</review_text>
the pedals.  They are broken already.  We bought this for our younger daughter's 3rd birthday.  They are plastic and broke INSIDE, so I'm not sure there is any way to fix them.  Generally speaking it's easy for her to ride and it's very cute</review_text>
We gave this to our daughter for her third birthday. It was easy to assemble and has room for growth.Our daughter absolutely loves it! She must feel very secure because she rides rather fast on it. We love the fact she cannot fall backwards because of the high back seat. We also love the fact if she were to fall sideways off, it is low to the ground so there is less chance of injury</review_text>
Bought for 2yr. birthday, Looked everywhere. Store's hardly carry quality bikes. (or anything quality for that matter)Found doing a web search. She loves it! I love the quality. Seems like it may last for a heirloom. It's sets low, great for safety! And the 2yr. old says it's beautiful!</review_text>
I love it, its comfortable, and the fabric is sturdy. It is practically weightless hen carrying it as a backpack and the bog pocket in the back fits a towel and all the other small gadgets that you want at the beach with you!I like it, I have been through many neach charis but this one has everything one</review_text>
I searched all over looking for a good but cheap rack, you cannot beat this product for the price and how well it's built. It has a little hidden tray for a wallet or something, comes with reflector and you can remove it and it's ready to recieve blinking lights,clip ons. Perfect for running to the store, comes with two adjustable rubber straps. Had it on in minutes, comes with different size rubber shims to fit seat post size if you need them and best of all it doubles as a fender and keeps the water from shooting on me. I have 26 inch wheels and I finished it off  by getting the little extended fender that Topeak makes for it. (MTX DeFender Bicycle Fender-$5.00) The threaded holes are already in the rack and with the 2 screws that came with the fender, had it on. It sticks out past the rack another 5 inches and total length, Rack and fender from the center of the seat post is 23 1/4 inches. I am very happy with it and it really looks good.</review_text>
OK this is what is up with this gun.. the .012s are powerful at about 290-310 FPS they may not be the most accurate but they do some damage. now the best BBs to use in this gun are the .20g BBs they are pretty powerful at 260 fps or so and are very accurate. so this gun over all is good if you know how to use a sniper rifl</review_text>
this guy is amazing for hitting the target in a good amount of time!!i think that if theres a person who is good at sniping then u should buy this gu</review_text>
This gun is amazing.it's speed is awesome.you could hit hit people with good force from a good distance. its a little heavy at 6-7lbs. it has decent aim and great power. the bipod works great. i would definitly reccomend this gun</review_text>
.... under the carry handle, and it swivels left or right according to your hand. simple.its big, plastic, and the mags are ugly. other than that, decent.the speed loader sucks thoug</review_text>
First of all, this gun is pretty good. It's decently powerful and has pretty good range most of the time. unlike a lot of other spring rifles it can shoot ALL the BB's in the magazine. The only problem I had is that kinda randomly when i was cocking it the handle for cocking mechanism just broke off. It's probably a fluke and the people at DealnSteal replaced it for me. I would recommend getting a better red dot sight or maybe a small scope for the gun, since the  "iron" sights are kinda hard to set and the red dot sight that comes with the gun distorts the view a lo</review_text>
i just got this gun and it is amazing. this is an awsome gun for this price and period. i like the bipod that sweet. i like the double magazines that help. I am still trying to figure out how those dumba$$es think that you can waste a whole fifty round mag in like five seconds since its a spring gun. its pretty good weight and its powerful. overall this is worth the price</review_text>
this gun is amazing.it probably has over 300fps and dead accurate. this gun could probably peirce the skin at a close distance.the only bad thing is that it runs out of bullets easily.thats why it comes with 2 magz. this gun also features a switch that you can customise on how straight the bullet shoot..plz people buy this gun..its unreal..its worth the wait and worth the money i recomend this gun by fa</review_text>
These wraps are allright. They wrap around the hand and between the knuckles without leaving too much extra. They seem to over stretch and deform after moderate use. I'm not too sure on the overall durability</review_text>
108" hand wraps (such as the Everlast 4455s) are too short for most people to properly wrap their hands, unless they have very small hands such as some females or juniors.  If you have normal or large-size hands or use any wrapping technique that uses a lot of cloth, like one that wraps between each finger, I strongly recommend going with a 180" wrap such as these.  It may seem like a long piece of cloth, but you'll quickly use it up protecting your knuckles and wrist.  Remember, don't hit a punching bag or anything else without properly protecting your hands with wraps and gloves.  These Everlast wraps are cheap and basic protection</review_text>
I am just a beginner to tennis and took lessons with this racquet for a few months so far.  My instructor even commented on the quality of the racquet.  It is very light weight and comfortable to use, although I did get a blister the first time I played.  I do not feel this was due to the racquet, but more the fact that I needed to toughen up my skin.  I have seen this same exact item in stores, and it does not come with the vinyl cover, as the one I purchased here online came with.  I would definitely purchase this item again</review_text>
I just recieved this product Monday April 16 on my Birthday. the instructions are simple. I have used this for 10 to 20 minutes a day, it is quiet, only a lite swoosh, barely noticable. the meter works accurately ,but the generic batteries need to be replace by fresh new batteries. The first day I used The Fitness Quest XL Stepper, I felt a burn in my thighs and calves, so, I know it is working. I also add ankle weights (2) 1.5LB each and (2) 3Lb each dumbells.The tension can be adjusted for long slow strides or short quick strides.It is an easy storage, and That is what I like about this stepper since I live in a small Apt., with my husband, daughter, and a cat with very little or no storage.</review_text>
this thing works great have had no problems. Does squeak but a little oil stops that.yes its heavy so what big deal it works good counter works good also.I Like it I give it 5 stars</review_text>
I have been using my XL Stepper for a month or so. I am pleased that it is very solid, sturdier than the mini stepper it replaced. That stepper had a cable that broke; this stepper is designed without a cable, so it does not have that "weak link." The step and calorie counter has worked fine from day one.The only complaint I have is that this stepper has squeaked badly since soon after I got it. I have sprayed it liberally with WD-40, but the problem persists. Occasionally it goes through a few minutes without squeaking, but most of the time it makes noise.Overall I am happy with this device. It helps me get regular exercise, improving my heart's health and keeping my waistline under control</review_text>
First thought, when I took it out of the box, was how sturdy it felt. After the easy instructions were followed it was put together in a flash (not that there is much to do at all). In all fairness, I don't use the counter at all. I just use it for a timed cardio device, I am not looking at the numbers.I use it everyday and it works. Would recommend</review_text>
The machine is very quiet and the construction is solid so it should last for many years.  I like the fact that it also tells you how many calories you burn -- the calory-burned count is more motivating than the number of steps taken</review_text>
The product fit my bike perfectly. Did not enjoy how it was shipped, package damaged, quality excellant</review_text>
I received the knife a few days after the order, which I think is very commendable, considering the Christmas rush.  However, the pen on the knife didn't work, which mustr be a quality problem with the mfr.  I assume they don't check every one</review_text>
As an engineer this item is quite simply a requirement. The pen is the feature that makes this one special. So many times I am somewhere and want to make some notes. I reach for this knife and its handy pen. Much easier than trying to remember the price of something in the store to compare it to the price on Amazon. Of course the knife and scissors come in handy often also. The light is dim but works well in near total darkness. I have used it to work on the computer and read a star map on a dark night. This knife is highly recommended. I used the screw driver the other day to help a woman who had broken her glasses -she was more than impressed that I had a screwdriver handy.The only problem is that I want to take it with me all the time and you can't fly with it. The one I have now is my second. I lost the first to TSA at the airport after having mailed it back once for $10. You must rememeber to leave it home when you fly or you will be sad when turning to over to the Feds.</review_text>
As one of the reviewers notes below, the light is dim and red.  This is not necessarily a disadvantage.  Campers, night hikers, and stargazers may appreciate a light that doesn't disturb the eyes' dark adaptation.  Moonlight or even starlight is more than bright enough to see by once you have given your eyes a few minutes to adjust ... but you will never get there if you, or others around you, are using bright flashlights.  A low-level red light is ideal for illuminating a star chart, the inside of a backpack, or a footpath shadowed by trees.  It's also totally invisible to many nocturnal animals, an advantage if you're hoping to see them.The rest is just what it should be:  a Swiss Army knife with everything I need, including a really excellent pair of scissors, in a keychain-size tool</review_text>
This is the best version of this little knife. The flashlight is useful (especially for us old folks who are losing vision in dim places) and a conversation piece. The pen is always there when you need it, unlike other pens I've had (and invariably lose). Alas, I forgot to put this knife in my checked bags, and it has gone to the big security office in the sky. I'm buying another asap. Maybe two, one for a spare</review_text>
I've had one these puppies hanging on my keychain for about 1 year now and it's been a lifesaver at times. The light comes in handy when you're stuck in a dark spot and I can't tell you how many times I've been stuck without a pen and then suddenly remembered that I did have one, on my knife! The pen hasn't run out yet and always writes great. The scissors cut with the precision you'd expect from a Victorinox knife and the nailfile and knife are always useful whoever you may be. All in all, a great companion to any keychain</review_text>
Swiss Army has always produced great knives and this one is no exception.  The light is a great add on</review_text>
great service and seems to be of good qualit</review_text>
This bell is a nice little addition to anyone's bike. I have one on my road bike and like it very much. Its not very aerodynamic with its 1 3/4" diameter but it is however light and capabe of fitting on any standard handlebars. It comes in various colors so one is able to match it to their bike's color scheme and most importantly it gives off a nice and clear ring by the simple action of twisting the colored cap. Its also a a wonderful thing if you have kids. I got 2 more for my 5 year olds, one for my daughter and son whom both absolutely crazy over this little jellibell.</review_text>
BERKELEY Portable line spooling machineI bought this item last year,  and it sure makes spooling line onto a reel a much easier proposition when adding 250 yards of line to open faced spinning reels. It is also useful for Fly fishing reels.   I used to have to use pencils for spools,  or tie line to some tree....it was always a hassle. This works fine right on the kitchen table.You put the reel on the spooler,   add the spool of line and adjust it for the tension you need,  and start winding.  It's great</review_text>
Once you ditch the fenders, decals, kickstand and cheap plastic grips this is a pretty cool looking cruiser. The frame is a nice glossy black and seems solid but the rest of the parts are low quality. My front wheel arrived "tweaked" for instance, but I'm sure this can be corrected. The wheels look like really cheap chrome. The seat bracket is lousy, too. No matter how hard you tighten it, the seat moves from side to side. This will have to be replaced. The seat is wide and comfortable, though. Would've liked a matching black stem, black handlebars & black rims but hey you can't have everything. Look elsewhere if you're a stickler for quality, but this bike should suit most people's needs</review_text>
I really like these gloves. They provide good protection, they go on easily and wrap tight.They provide faster and better protection than conventional wraps.It is easy to learn how to get them off and on quickly. Follow the instructions that comes with them and it becomes second nature in no time at all.I think that the velco "cross wraps" on the back of the glove could be designed better. They don't add a lot to the glove support and they don't connect very well. But even without them this is a great product that I can readily recommend</review_text>
This is certainly a convenient alternative to wraps, but the neoprene seems to break down too quickly.  As a level of support and protection under speed bag gloves, I think they're great; but as a layer under full, 12 oz bag gloves, I prefer wraps--these make the whole show too bulky and uncomforatble.  Recommended for a good, quick workout, but I think they also run a bit small--I have average to small hands, and the Mediums are too tight for me</review_text>
These poles are great.  The carbide tips grip rocks and slippery surfaces surprisingly well.  The shock absorbers work very nicely, and you can tell they help with the wear and tear on my body.The monopod function is very nice.  I've gotten some great group photos with it, and I don't have to carry a separate tripod.Get these when they go on sale</review_text>
I use a nose clip for swimming, and this one is the only that doesn`t came off in the first three or four strokes like the the other ones i`ve tried, unfortunately they don`t sell it in my country anymore, so i have to use amazon.</review_text>
I used these nose clips when diving for sponges off the coast of Belize. I was able to wear them for over two hours without discomfort. Not a drop of water in my nose. My only complaint is that the color is unattractive.</review_text>
For reasons that are obscure, a fair number of people lose weight if they use nose clips.  No one is sure why, but for the people who are using SLD methods, including nose clips, this brand of nose clip is the nose clip of choice.  So far there are about forty people experimenting with nose clips, and for what it is worth, they seem to be losing weight best with speedo.I'm nonplussed by it, but if you are browsing around for SLD method weight loss and have come to this advertisement, you've found the nose clips on Amazon that everyone else bought</review_text>
As a syncronized swimmer, I have used almost all of the brands of noseplugs out there.  These are the best that I have found.  They stay on when your upside-down, jumping in and out of the water, and even usually stay on when i get hit in the face.I've never had a problem with these, they keep the water out very well and stay on tight.  If they are too tight or too lose, just bend it a little bit to fit</review_text>
It is very useful for new learners like me. But I feel it may get loose with time going on</review_text>
this is my first bike mount rack. I was a bit 'worry' about the strength and the installation. But it's quite easy to install and it's seem very sturdy.  It doesn't bounce at all.  Highly Recommended!</review_text>
When you consider all the steps to assemble it, it's actually very simple.  I get easily frustrated with instructions, and these were pretty good.The product is solid.  I use it on a 2001 Chrysler Town and Country and have no problems.  Even though it says not to do so, I'm able to open my tailgate with it attached.  I use it with 2 adult bikes, 1 kid's bike, and 1 bike trailer (the 1-wheel type that hook on the back of an adult bike).I looked hard for the right 4-bike mount rack, and I'm overjoyed with this one.  Now if I can just move from LA to a safer place before someone steals my bikes from my rack while we're in In-n-Out..</review_text>
This product is ok if you do not mind what the color is, because I had thought it was going to be bright orange, but it turns out to be dark green/black. Also hope you won't get bad luck as I did, because when my package came the BB's were everywhere in the box</review_text>
This is a great buy for the price. It is a great deal. It shipped well and came in nice bottles without any scrathches or signs of wear and tear. I will definitely buy again</review_text>
These are some nice bb's from CYMA. They are nicely polished and have a neon yellow look to them rather than the dull golden yellow bb's found other places. This is a great price, but after shipping it's not so great. Definitly get these if you are already making a puchase from hotimporttoys anyway</review_text>
These pellets shot really good. They don't jam your gun. This is great gift for low price or just if you need awesome bb's buy these.</review_text>
I purchased this cycleops a few months back and just love it.  It is perfect for winter bike riding and fits right in my bedroom.  It is not heavy nor is it hard to put together.  I am not a professional biker I just do it for a little exercise.  This is as good as going out and buying a exercise bike but much cheaper</review_text>
I just got my CycleOps Mag indoor trainer this week and got my first ride in tonight.  I have only been riding for about 6 months but I am at a point where when I dont ride I just dont feel good.  With the days getting shorter and cooler getting time to ride after work was becoming impossible.  Add to that after school activities for the kids and there just wasnt enough time in the day.  I figure this will allow me to get some ride time in during the evenings without having to rush other activities.  Plus I can still ride on the weekends if the weather is bad.Setup was easy.  The bike fits well (I have a Bianchi road bike) and feels stable.  The adjustable resisitance allows me to ride at a good pace and get a good ride in while watching my favorite shows on the Tivo.All in all I am completely satisfied with the trainer and recommend it as a way to stay in shape during the cold weather months</review_text>
This is an awesome football for a 6 to 12 year old. Smaller than a "junior" ball so little hands can hold on to it and throw it.My only gripe is that it is "Blemished".  I had no indication from the seller that it would be (similar to an "X-OUT" golf ball).  Of course my kid doesn't know the difference, so no big deal</review_text>
Footballs were usable and in excellent condition. They were used in our Superbowl in which our 9 yr old team won 20 - 0 and finished the season 12 - 0. The footballs were blemished and were not advertised that way. The balls were a value at the price.</review_text>
When the claws arrived I was speachless.  They are even better in person than by photo.  They arrived sharp enough to barely cut butter, but some time with a good sharpener will solve that.  I'm so glad I got them</review_text>
I use the mattress on a Camp Time roll-a-cot which is the best cot around because it doesn't have end bars. This mattress makes the whole setup like floating on a cloud. I think I'll spend most of my time while camping in bed instead of fishing!! It rolls up pretty big though. The straps work well to make a good bedroll. I bought som 30 inch duffels to use as a storage sack for extra protection</review_text>
My wife and I have a problem. We both like camping, but we both have back problems. This product allows us to get a decent night's sleep in a tent, which means we can camp more. Yeah, it's one more thing to have to pack, but it rolls up nice and fits just fine in the back of our jeep with our tent and sleeping bags.I wouldn't get this product if you are a minimalist, it's pretty bulky and it's too big to hike with. However, if you go camping like we do, then why settle for the smaller and slimmer Therm-a-Rest models?If you have a bad back and like to go camping, it is the only way to go outside of getting an inflatable mattress (too bulky, needs electricity) or just buying an RV (which isn't camping at all)</review_text>
I teach group exerciese and in my opinion these are the better type of bands to use. They are flexible and they dont hurt when you tie them around body parts like the tubing does.Mar</review_text>
I was introduced to Theraband by a physical therapist as a way to strengthen my back muscles.  Six months later I'm still doing the exercises and have found more by visiting the Theraband website.  The exercises have helped my back pain, and they seem to be helping core strength as well.  They're easy to do and the bands are completely portable.  They come in graduated stiffness so you can increase the resistance as you get stronger</review_text>
I got this band to add to my strength routine and have been very pleased with it.  The band came quickly and has proved very durable (so far).  It is very versatile allowing you to add a lot of different moves.  It is so small and lightweight I can pack it and be ready to do some strength training whenever and wherever I travel.  I thought when I bought the band it said it would come with some recommended exercises, however no instructions were included.  That is only a small negative (knocked off the 5th star) as you can easily look up exercises on-line or in exercise books and DVDs.</review_text>
This is what it says it is and at a good price, free shipping to boot</review_text>
The Bell Triton is the first helmet that I've owned that truly fits me.  For 25 years in the Air Force I had to special  order uniform hats. The base clothing sales never carried my size.  I consider the Triton to be the best fitting head cover I've ever owned.  Thanks much</review_text>
I have a very large head, so buying hats and helmets is nearly impossible. (FYI- "One size fits all" is a line that has taunted me my whole adolescent/adult life). This helmet, though, fits great and was about a third the price of the other "oversized" helmets I found in the bike shops around Boston. I'd recommend it to all of my friends out there with embarrassingly large heads</review_text>
Package arrived in good condition and timley.  Everything was as advertised.  The bag works well and is easy to use.  I am sure there are better simliar products but at a much higher cost</review_text>
I am totally happy with this rack.  I have a nice lightweight road bike that I don't want to clutter with a fixed rack but I wanted to have the capability to carry some extra gear or run some errands when I felt like it.  This rack is PERFECT for that.  I am impressed with the high quality material and welds, and the quick release function works great.  I just did a 40-mile ride to Costco and stocked up with a rack trunk (fits perfectly on the Delta rack under my saddle) full of vitamins etc.  The rack was rock-solid and vibration free.  The tag that comes with the rack actually states a carry capacity of 40 lbs vs. the 25 mentioned here but I would be a bit wary of that much load.  Very high quality, nice lightweight rack with super-easy on and off mounting.  Five stars all the way for  my purposes</review_text>
All that I can say about this product is wow.  I go to the gym 4 times a week, but I know that everyone out there has those days when they just don't want to work out, or are too lazy to get over to the gym.  With this product all wories are scratched out, because you can get a good simple workout at home in minutes.  The resistance on something of this size is absolutely incredible.  I use the heavy tube, and it feels as if there is at least 25-30 pounds of resistance.  You can increase this by standing on the tube closer to yourself, and the weight practically doubles.  You can modify it, and put it in different places, in order to get different workouts.  This is one of the best choices I have made in the fitness category in a very long time.  I recommend this to everyone out there who is looking to keep their pockets full, and have an alternative for going to the gym on those lazy days.  This is all together a great buy</review_text>
Don't pay any more or any less for a mat.   This is all the comfort you need right here, I'm 6'4" and have no problem using this mat</review_text>
We've had this mat for over six years and we have a big family so it has stood up to a lot of use and abuse! From somersaults  and much jumping to use as a mattress for sleepovers, the mat still looks good and performs great. We received our mat as a gift from Grandma who thought it would come in handy for our homeschool physical education program and she was right. For years it fit under our couch when folded until needed (and until we changed couches). We strongly recommend this hardy mat</review_text>
This is by far my favorite water bottle.  I love the choices of color, the ease with which you can drink (without spilling anything  on yourself!), and the size is perfect.  Even when it's full, this bottle isn't too heavy, which has been my problem with other bottles.  The little handle makes it easy to carry, and I definately recommend this.  In fact, since I recieved it for my birthday at the end of July, three of my friends have decided to get their own, and they are all equally pleased</review_text>
Although Cathe Friedrich is well-known for her more challenging, advanced workouts, "Stretch Max" is equally suited for both beginners and the advanced, and very easy to follow along.Divided into three roughly 20-minute stretch sessions, the workouts can either be combined, divided on seperate days after a cardio or strength training session, or done on 'rest' days. The first part uses only a mat, while the second part uses a stability ball, and the third uses a resistance band. The third session is probably my favorite because using the resistance band further helps in achieving range-of-motion and increasing flexibility.The workout itself is a fluid and seemless interweaving of athletic stretches and basic yoga poses, which allow the exerciser to modify according to their own range-of-motion and level of flexibility. The music also wonderfully compliments the workout, which is mostly a mix of new age, neo-classical and light 'chill'. I also thought the pastel pink-and-brown outfits that Cathe and the other girls were wearing were so cute and feminine - now I need to find me one!While frequent and thorough stretching is often overlooked, it is an essential part of fitness which aids the muscles in faster recovery, helps to protect from injury and in maintaining a youthful body. "Stretch Max" is one of the best stretch programs I've done and I'd highly recommend it to anyone of all fitness levels. You can watch a preview of it at collagevideo dot com.Rating: Excellen</review_text>
Very surprised at the quality and finish of bike. After a little tuning the bike is a perfect mate for my grandson and has saved me quite a bit of money. In two or three years if he will ride I'll invest in a top line road bike for him. Thanks Amazon & GMC</review_text>
My son really likes it, it's a good starter bike for him to road ride, though it is a bit heavy by road bike standards (again, starter bike pricing was key here).  I wanted him to be able to "try" road biking, as it's not that popular, and bikes for his size (4'10" or so) that are under $500- are hard to find.  I wish the tires were a tiny bit more slick, they're hybrid road tires which means they have more grip than road tires but not as much as Mountain bike tires. the gears made it look cool to him, it's got a water bottle cage and handlebar mounted brakes & shifting, which made him feel like he had a cool bike like my more expensive road bike</review_text>
Can not beat the value of this starter road bike for kids. Being a new bike I expected it to be better set up - but the brakes and wheels need attention prior to riding it.Better bikes out there, but for 2-3 times as much</review_text>
We ordered this bike for our son, not sure of his committment level to riding.After spending thousands on our road bikes, we were very impressed with the quality of this bike. It looks like we spent alot and the it rides great.If you are thinking about biking this is a great start</review_text>
The CD shows how to easily sharpen just about everything with an edge. I've just begun with my very dull knives and found they will need a bit of work with the medium sharpening stone. I thought about getting a coarse stone to make things go quicker, but after I get them sharp I'm never going to let them get this dull again! For a moderately dull knife, this simple device will make it razor-sharp with just a little effort. I'm excited to get my scissors in shape and never thought i'd be able to put an new edge on my potato peeler</review_text>
I am a knife collector, even bought several sharpening systems.  This is the best.  Drawing the blade at the proper angle across the sharpening surface is the first important thing.  Spyderco makes that easy because the holder sets the stones at the proper angle and all you do is hold the blade vertical and draw it down across the two sides.Once you realize how easy getting the edge you learn to feel the edge with your finger to tell which side the edge has a minute burre overhang.  Then one gentle draw down that side to straighten the burre and you have a blade that is really sharp.Cheaper steel knives will not hold their edge as long as better ones.  With this sharpener it is so easy that even your cheaper knives will be almost as useful, say in the kitchen because it is so easy to resharpen.  This sharpener will make you an expert if you give it a little practice.  I even under sharpen some knives because they hold their edge better when it is a little thicker rather than "razor sharp" which has a thinner edge.Thorough instructions explain how to sharpen many different edges too like bread knives (serrated), scissors, Japanese blades (one sided), fish hooks, etc.</review_text>
Spyderco sharpener and hone is a wonderful tool.  I own several stones and a couple of other sharpening gadgets but nothing has put an edge on my knives like the Spyderco.  Like many I am sure, I was a skeptic, but after following the instructional video my fishing and kitchen knives are now razor sharp, much sharper than new.   Thanks so much.</review_text>
i just got that yesterday .....i sharppened my Ka-Bar D2 knife and used it to shave the hair of my face literally ...if it can do that with D2 steel so ...... enough sai</review_text>
The Spyderco Tri-Angle sharpener is the best I've owned.  It is thoughfully designed, with all components storing neatly in the carrying case.  It is essentially a crock stick sharpener on steroids.  No clamping of blades, no holding blades at odd angles.  If you can hold a knife blade vertical you can put a sharp edge on any knife.  It will also do scissors and other tools but for most people it will primarily be used on knives.  Although the manufacturer recommends using the flat side of the stones, I am always in a hurry and so prefer the more agressive cutting of the edge.  There are lots of cheaper sharpeners, but this is a quality product built to last a lifetime.  One word of advice- when you are finished sharpening all the kitchen knives, put a note on the counter cautioning your spouse. It might prevent needless nicks or worse.</review_text>
All my knives used to be in various levels of "dull." Hopelessly dull knives were left sitting in a drawer. After doing a little bit of research, I decided to give the Spyderco a shot. I'm very satisfied with the results. I am not trying to compare my knife sharpening skills to that of a professionals results, but I can say that my knives are much sharper and cut very well now.The DVD and instructions were very helpful and got me up to speed quickly. The Spyderco is easy to use and it sets up quickly. I no longer have an excuse to have a dull knife.</review_text>
First off, let me say that I was a little skeptical of the performance of this set.  Every review I read was near perfect, if not perfect.  My mother has a $150 electric sharpener, and I didn't feel that a $45 sharpener could be that good...I got it today.  My coveted Wusthof blades were losing their edge, and suddenly they seemed less attractive.  I am not a pro, nor have I spent a significant amount of time sharpening anything substancial.  My knives are now sharper than when I purchased them.  No kidding!  I'm running around the house looking for things to sharpen.From what I can tell, this is almost a perfect system (for what it does).  It sharpens just about everything that doesn't have a blunt end or major nick/gouge.  The thing I loved most was the control of the system (which you just don't get from electric sharpeners).  You can put as sharp or as 'dull' an edge you'd like on your blade, depending on the task, and depending on what type of cutting tool it is.  You can tell it works (as in any other sharpening activity) because there is less frictional noise and resistance as you increase the amount of sharpening strokes.The dvd and manual make learning the whole process really easy if you aren't already in the know...  My mother's $150 electric sharpener never put an edge on my knives or her knives like the one I have now.  In fact, I'm confident that if you were to give me a blind test (a pepsi challenge, if you will) between two knives with my mom's sharpener and the spyderco, I would bet anyone that I could pick the spyderco every single time.The stones appear to be very high quality, and seem to be extremely hard.   I don't foresee needing new stones for quite a while, but even if I did, I can buy them separately.  I'm cutting my vegetables, and almost forgot how dull most people, including myself allow their allow their knives to get before sharpening them, having them sharpened, or throwing them away.  I wish knives really never did lose their edge (like in those cheesy knife cutting can infomercials)... but the reality is, unless you like throwing away money, you're gonna have to sharpen them sooner or later.  Buy this sharpener. Buy this sharpener... do yourself a favor.... buy this sharpener.</review_text>
I ordered these skates for myself and I love them.  Chicago still maintains the good name they had some 5 years ago when I use to skate.  Thanks</review_text>
Pain in your heel when you wake up?  Fix it with this product.  It worked for me</review_text>
I had most of Leaderbetter's golf videos in VHS but I still think it's worth it. The reason is that some computer animation or graphics help me to understand the difference which is better than his old videos</review_text>
This is the best heavy grip series I've used.I'm a college weightlifter and tennis player. My coach from both teams have strongly recoomended them to me. I'm really happy now, I can crush your hand right away</review_text>
I was pleased with how promptly the jo arrived after I ordered it.The finish on the staff was not something I desired, plus it was a little rough, so I sanded the staff down and oiled it. It is heavier than the practice staffs at my dojo, and I enjoy that. When I brought in my staff everyone remarked what a great staff it was, where I bought it and how much it was. Best purchase I've made in a while, just needs some sanding</review_text>
I recently got this gun for Christmas and I liked it a lot. There was only a couple things that I didn't like about this gun:1. It doesn't shoot that fast and it doesn't hurt if you're trying to have an airsoft war.2. You have to press down the safety every time you want to shoot it.3. It's pretty bulky.I really liked this gun as a first airsoft gun and I hope you will too.</review_text>
i am not familiar with this desert eagle but a friend of mine purchased a spring loaded 1. I was able to shoot him in the face from about 30ft away(unintentionally). The gun is a little big n bulky but is pretty accurate.</review_text>
I've had this gun for a while now and i am very happy with it. It is worth the money and I'll tell you the pros and cons.Pros-1. It is electric, so it good for shooting fast, my cousin pulls the trigger fast enough to make it like a fully automatic macheine gun.2. It doesnt hurt so bad, so if ur younger it is better.3. It never once jammed on me.4. Is accurate to about 40feet.5. It is on sale for onl $20!!!!6. I've beaten my friends with only this against a fully automatic m16Cons-1. Takes a long time to charge2. Battery runs out in about 2-3 hours, where a spring has no battery3. flashlight is pointless and hard to get oni would get this as a first gu</review_text>
this gun doesnt hurt at all. its a pain to load unless you get a speed loader then it takes 5 seconds. this is a perfect backup wepon when your reloding your gun. it shoots fast but curves a lot. overall this is a good gu</review_text>
I like it. Nice.  Hold 19 more golf balls than my old one</review_text>
The product is great as well as the service. My shipment came very quickly and I was tremendously pleased all the way aroun</review_text>
As a football referee, I needed a whistle that will cut through the loudest crowd noise. No other whistle does it quite like the Fox 40. It has a shrill, piercing sound at 115 decibels. The problem came with me chewing through my whistles. When Fox 40 came out with their CMG whistle this problem was corrected. This is the most comfortable whistle I've used. I wouldn't use anything else</review_text>
How many times have you crunched thru your whistle and played the game wondering if you swallowed the little pieces that broke off, let alone if you are going to chip a tooth... This is the most comfortable whistle going</review_text>
PlayCoed is the largest network of sports organizers and provides a free service that allows people to plan less and play more.The Mikasa 10" Playground Ball is used by PlayCoed clients such as Auraria Campus, Western Alternative Sports Association, Denver Sport and Social Club, Big Brothers Big Sisters, Miami Sport and Social Club and more!This ball is great quality. Do not leave it in the sun as it has a tendency to warp, however is still an excellent product.</review_text>
I had it assemble in about 20 min. Took  another 20 min more to adjust the door to open square. I had broken two clips that hold the shelves trying to assemble it. Call coustomer serves who found the clip mail them over night for me........ great job Golfsmith. I am very happy with the golf rack. Now I never loose all my golf equiment</review_text>
We used this for the first time this summer.  The bag held up well during 600+ miles of interstate driving.  It did let some water through during the rain, but not real bad.  Be sure to pack your items in plastic bags if they're predicting rain or go for the more expensive waterproof Thule bags.This is much more convenient than the big plastic cargo boxes since it folds up so small, goes in it's own carry bag, and fits on the closet shelf.  It also goes on the vehicle quickly with four straps.  Very easy to use</review_text>
In my lifetime, I have probably built about 14 halfpipes and at least 25 quarterpipes.  The problem is that I live in Ohio and the weather ruins them every year.  I prefer a quarterpipe because it is not too obtrusive and you have more time to prepare for tricks.  One of the biggest challenges of making a good quarterpipe is getting the bottom sheet to lie flat on the riding surface...especially after a few rainfalls has warped the wood!I was hesistant to buy this ramp because I had never physically seen it. I had watched videos and read some reviews, but the reviews did not really give mouch specific info...hopefully, this one will!The ramp is a 9 foot radius and is a bit under 3 feet high.  Although this sounds kind of weak, it actually is a fun ramp.  The curve is deceptive.  If you look at each panel, they almost look flat, but when you ride it, you get a nice lift.  Its not vertical, but you can do airs.  The transisition gets you to about 70 degrees and the coping is excellent.  It is metal and fairly burly. Lip tricks are very fun on this ramp.  The material of the ramp is an ABS type plastic...it will not rot.  I leave my ramp out in the rain.  No issues at all on the ramp, although there is some rust on the coping...I may need to rpaint it, but if you grind daily, it takes care of it.I am a big skater...I am 6'1" and over 220lbs.   This ramp holds me with ease.  It has never slid and I can drop it, do rock n rolls, 50/50s and ollies.   The ramp does give a bit on landing, but has not changed its original form.  The top deck is rather small, but it can support 500 lbs and allows for lap over grinds.  The bottom of the ramp is a formed piece of metal which allows for a smooth start to the ramp...I love that.  The ramps seems a bit abrupt at first, but you get use to it.So...here are the pluses and minuses!PLUS- Can be easily taken down and folded away in winter...or set up in basement!- The riding surfcae is fast and smooth.- You can link more than 1 ramp together...fairly seamlessly.- Metal support is top notch and all connections are welded on.  So much nicer than wood transitions with screws!-  The surface to ramp piece is excellent...very smooth.-  It loks professional.  I live in a nice neighborhood.  I peeled off the FRESHPARK logo and it looks a lot less obtrusive from the road.MINUS- expensive.  I bought 2...- not very wide.  One unit is only 4 feet wide.  I bought two and hooked them together to form an 8 foot wide ramp.  When I just rode the 4 footer, it was not so fun...not a lot of room.  Adding the second ramp made it a who new experience..more room and rock solid.-  the wheels it rolls on are complete garbage.  I cannot believe how they skimped on this.   I will be looking to replace them.  They are plastic and have no bearings...will not take any abuse.  For $400 a piece, you think they would give you quality wheels.-  The ramp is loud.  As much as I love the bottom piece of metal that allows for a smooth transition, it can make a LOUD clanging noise after repeated rides.  I don't really mind it, but I am not sure if my neighbors are thrilled by it!-  Heavy.  This is good and bad.  It is very solid, which is awesome, but when it is folded up and on its wheels, it is very heavy..150lbs (?)  It tips easier than it should.  If a child had this fall on him, it would not be good.  Unlikeley, but I had it tilt a few times as I moved it.  I was strong enough to correct it, but a kid could have problems.-  Potential theft.   I think they should provide a bar that you can attach and lock so that nobody can fold it up and take it from your driveway.  I have to bolted together with 3 major bolts, so a theif would have to work to get it...but if you only have a 4 footer and leave it outside, it would take minutes to steal.I love the ramp.  I looked for a LONG time for a ramp that would allow me to skate whenever I wanted, but would not require me to rebuild every year.  A good quarterpipe costs about $200 to make.  You have to relaminate every year and paint etc...  This was by far the best solution once I rationalized I would skate it for many years.  Those plastic ramps are total garbage...I never even considered them.I hope that answers any questions about the ramp.  Bottom line is that it costs a lot of money, but it is the best value if you want this type of ramp.</review_text>
I am the mother of a 13-year-old boy skater. The quarter pipe from FreshPark works great! He loves it, and so do all of his skater friends! I was hesitant to spend so much money, but so far it has been worth every cent. The quarter pipe is made very well--it is sturdy and safe. Although it is heavy, it is not too heavy to drag out of  my garage, onto my driveway, and then back into my garage every day. Although my son loves the city skatepark, this has proven to be a good substitute when I cannot drive him there. I highly recommend this.(I have never tried to fold it up, so I cannot comment on the ease of that.</review_text>
I am 11 years old and a hardcore skater. I have been begging my parents to buy me this for quite some time, and they finally said that if I do good in my spanish lessons, then I can get it. I have seen their video on their website and it works great. Plus, the fact that it has detachable wheels and it folds up makes it probably the best quarter pipe on the market. The only drawback is the cost... I can understand why it is that much, but if you buy 2 and make a half pipe, that's [...]bucks. I highly reccomend this, but ONLY for skaters who have been to an actual skatepark, and have experienced a quarter pipe AND a half pipe.P.S. I dont think this is made for BMX, so you probably shouldn't try going on it with your BXM bike.</review_text>
i was worried because it was cheap, but it works well. i did jumprope last night to</review_text>
I bought this 2-man tent to use while backpacking.It sets up in a hurry, is very durable, and is very light for a 2-man tent.I generally backpack with one of my kids, and this will hold two of us, plus a change of clothes and our small gear with no problem.  There are two doors, which is great, so that we don't have to climb over each other to get out of the tent.  Outside each door is a small vestibule, which is a great place to put your shoes to keep them dry.  The tent poles (2) are aluminum, and they are very strong and light.  I also like the fact that this tent is free standing.  Once you get it set up, you can move it around easily if you're not happy with the location.This is a great backpacking tent for the money.  It will hold two people with just a few things comfortably, or one person with all your gear comfortably.  There are lighter tents out there, but you'll pay for them</review_text>
I always get a blister on my thumb if I paddle over an hour.  These gloves solve the problem.  The one thing I didn't like was that the fingers were a little long and stiff.  They do the job</review_text>
Great gloves.  Never lose my hold on the paddle, even when my hands are wet.  Comfortable, too; not too warm.  And a great deal</review_text>
We ordered our rack for a Pathfinder but it works great on our Miata too.  That's really close to being universal.  Easy to mount, easy to load & unload bikes, easy to take off.  The no-sway brackets do their job well and everything sits secure and safe.Half the price of hitch mounts without the cost of the hitch.I just have to figure a lock system so they can't "rip and run" with the whole rack.</review_text>
Recently decided to replace my old Rhode Gear rack (clasps were rusted). Tried the Saris Bones 3 - horrible. Returned it to the store the next day. Very difficult to get the bikes on and off. Now purchased the Thule 962XT from Eastern Mountain Sports ($104 on a 20% discount special). This is a beautiful piece of equipment. Well made, solid, easy to set up and holds three bikes very securely. The no-sway mechanism works well (this seems to be the primary upgrade from the earlier 962 version which now retails for about $105 without discount) and keeps the bikes at a slight angle away from the car. The bikes sit very firmly in place. Still need to secure the front wheels of the bikes with the supplied cynch cord (I prefer to use long pieces of velcro). Great product. A definite buy</review_text>
After much research, we purchased the Jeep Commando TJ12 for our soon-to-be four year old son. Well worth every penny! We wanted a well-made bike that would last and found it! Our son loves his new 'big boy' bike and we love it's safety features ex: the padding on the bar as well as the weight of the bike. A good choice!</review_text>
This is a great bike for our 3.5 year old son. Just a word of warning: make sure you have lots of thin wrenches (bike tools) otherwise this will need to be assembled at a bike shop. My husband thankfully kept all his tools from his bike shop days, otherwise it would have cost us a bunch to have it put together. A great bike, not at all cheap looking or feeling, my son loves it</review_text>
For the price this is a good carrier. It fits snugly and comfortably on my arm, and the adjustable elastic strap is well padded, so the player will stay tight and comfortable on your arm without being shaken around a lot even if you are running or doing other vigorous aerobic activities. I use it at the gym for both weightlifting and cardio exercises, and have had no problems with it slipping off or being uncomfortable. It has a little side flap that lets you coil up the earphone cord when not in use and secure it beneath the flap with a velcro fastener, which is very convenient.Another plus is that I have used it with both the iPod and a Creative Zen Micro (which is slightly larger), and it fits both fine.One significant drawback, as another reviewer noted, is that the plastic cover over the player is thick and not held tightly against the player, so adjusting the controls on your MP3 player is difficult. If I want to switch tracks or playlists or adjust the volume, I often end up having to pull the player out of the carrier to do so, before sticking it back in</review_text>
While this pump may be heavier than you want if you are a weight-weenie, it is a great performer perfectly suited for long tours and tandems. It is a little large to mount on some frames, but great when you need it. It works so well you'll be tempted to stop and help others that may be struggling by the side of the road</review_text>
Pros: RELIABLE floor pump features in a frame pump size, hose relieves stem snappingCons: potential over pressure due to ease of use (but hurt me with this one)This Thanksgiving I rode the 75 miles to the relatives. Six flats later and four stops for filing slow leakers, I was only an hour late. The Topeak Road Morph was the only reason I made it at all.I have tried and tested almost all the small frame pumps on the market. Some don't work at all when you need them and some are best at snapping stems. Few get the high pressure in the tire. The Topeak Road Morph clearly is the winner in my book. The Topeak RM is the perfect blend of floor pump and light frame pump. Where I ride I have to have the reliability of a good pump and the Topeak RM is the only one I will use.Tip: Before your next long distance or solo ride, get a Topeak RM. If you don't get one for Christmas, go buy one. You will thank your lucky stars when it performs when you need it</review_text>
I purchased Big Bobber Coolers as gifts for two fisherman and they both loved them.  They were a hit!  And they REALLY float!  Great gift idea for the fishermen/boaters in your life!</review_text>
This FLOATING cooler that looks like a fishing bobber is durable.  It's made out of high impact plastic and it's insulation keeps your beverages cold.  I mostly have used mine in the lake during the Summer as well as barbeques</review_text>
wireless for $20+,its a wow, working fine w/ no problem, im not just sure how long the battery on the wireless xmitter will las</review_text>
I am still learning swimming now. I do not like water entering my ears. I like this product</review_text>
this light is expensive even when bought at a discount but is worth it for the opportunity it provides to ride (relatively) safely at night.i also use it for working beneath my cars although it's much better suited for the bike.i have had no problems whatsoever with the light so far. i initiallythought i had a defective battery but that was not the case. you need to carefully follow the instructions on charging as you may have to unplug the charger and plug it back in occasionally.</review_text>
I bought this little tyke for my little brother for Christmas and he loves it.  It's Glock 26 compact design allows for easy use for people of smaller hands, which is the case for my little brother, not so much in my case since I'm over 6'5.The red dot on top is, for the most part, pure asthetics although it can be tweaked to be fairly accurate up to 30 feet (the common effective/accurate range of airsoft pistols IMO) although it's FPS is not entirely impression.  Don't get me wrong, it'll still get your attention if you get hit but it's range is limited compared to others.  The silencer/supressor is pure asthetics but it actually serves as a stabilizer/rifling for the rounds.  I tried 10 shots with the supressor on and off and found I was more accurate with it on; could be personal preference or not but it is worth exploring.As for the magazine capacity, most state regulations on real sidearms place it at 10 rounds so this actually serves two purposes.  A) it promotes accuracy and making-them-count shots as opposed to random Rambo shooting that many weekend warriors adhere to and B) allows adults to teach novices and children firearm safety.  I would recomend using this airsoft pistol as a trainer for children hoping to use real firearms, especially for parents.As for it breaking easily, my little brother takes it out, bashes it around and shoots it frequently and so far, no problems.  Perhaps I'm just extremely lucky.  A few words of caution though; do not go rambo with this and keep shooting and shooting.  All firearms, not just airsoft, have limits of how much strain the internal mechanisms can take.  If you continually shoot it without stopping don't be surprised if the internal parts break.  Make your shots count, be concise.  If you want an airsoft handgun that has a better continuous firing rate, get a CO2 powered sidearm but be ready to shell out more coin.All in all, a dandy weapon for the price but if you want quality, be ready to get what you pay for</review_text>
slow,not cool as shown but its good for little kids that are starters to use, by the way great serice recomended grea</review_text>
For the price its the best pistol i ever boughtpros- good fps,nice laser,cool scilencer and also a good guncons- flash lite sucks!!!It is over all the best gun for the pric</review_text>
HA. This is the most disgraceful weapon I have yet to encounter. Sure the mock suppressor and the sight and the laser are good features, but the gun is weak, and the magazine holds a meager 10 BBs. I have very high standards, and this gun met none of them. It broke within 3 weeks of purchase. But, it is a pretty good backyard gun, but it is nothing compared to the pro-level airsoft pistols. Should not be used as a side arm in pro-level airsoft battles... Good for backyard fights though</review_text>
I got these for our game down at the VFW and I'm delightfully surprised at the quality and feel of these chips.  They are not cheaply made as I suspected.  The design is very basic...you are not going to WOW anyone with these.  However, if you are looking for a great poker chip that has the right weight and feel, then these are a must buy!  They hold up well under high usage and they make the great clinking sound of higher end poker chips.  The only flaw I have found is the case.  It is a very very cheap case.  I will probably buy a better case and give this one to my 5 year old son to play with</review_text>
Good overall, took quite a while to put together and needed two people. Getting enough sand to make it stable took a long time with a funnel</review_text>
i thought this product was very good but i think it is way too expensive. people who would like to hav this product cant hav it coz it costs more money than they hav to spend. i think it would sell better if it costed less and if this website was advertised more as i only recently found out that it exists.bye!</review_text>
Although I don't own this specific hoop, I have owned a lifetime hoop just like this one for over ten years and there's nothing rusting or breaking off. The only thing I had to replace is the net. Even though it's not the biggest hoop with a breakaway rim, it would last much longer and withstand decades of use. If you're looking for an economic hoop for the beginner basketball player buy this hoop</review_text>
This basketball goal is a good value for the money.  It is sturdy and relatively easy to put together (my wife did it in under 2 hours, though I should mention she is mechanically inclined).  With nothing in the base, I can carry it.  It also has wheels on the base for portability. I filled the base up with a hose to anchor it. It was very easy to fill with a hose.So far, the goal has stood up well to some rough play, including lots of dunks.  Here are the three negatives:1) the backboard is a little small.2) As mentioned in the product description, the base takes up a lot of area.  There is no getting around this.  It's a tradeoff for making it portable.3) Even at the lowest setting (7 ft), it's too high for my 7-year old daughter (even with one of the smaller basketballs). It takes almost all her strength to make a basket. I plan to get around the height problem by getting a soccer ball or something lighter for her to shoot with.  She is not very strong so if you have a strong 7-year old, it should be fine.If I had it to do over again, I would probably get one of the cheaper, smaller goals, but this one is made well enough so it will still be around when my daughter is strong enough to easily shoot at a 7 ft. goal</review_text>
This is my second Blackburn Delphi 5.0 Bicycle Cyclometer. I liked so much the first one which I purchased in summer 2006 that I got a second one. So far it has been easy to install, to use, and has been reliable. My only critique would be that the part that goes on the spoke could be improved, so that it would be more solid</review_text>
The Delphi 5.0 is an excellent overall cyclocomputer. I found that the heart rate monitor functions more reliably that the Polar that I replaced, and the cadence function is a nice addition (although the cord to the cadence sensor takes some pursuasion to string it to its destination on the chain stay). The indicator is VERY easy to read, and has plenty of functionality. I've used mine for about a year and have been quite pleased</review_text>
This well-priced 3-wheeler is excellent on pavement, grass, and gravel.  It takes potholes well, and seems quite sturdy.  It's not for use in stores or tight spaces, as the turning radius is quite wide.  The harness is the only thing I don't like about this stroller: it's very difficult to fasten around a squirmy baby, and the straps are not particularly adjustable</review_text>
The Heavy Bag/Speed Bag stand is a good piece of equipment. The heavy bag part of it definitely requires add'l weight (hint: bags of sand are much cheaper than the amount of barbell plates you'll need to keep this thing from moving - I use 200 pounds of bags of sand to keep it in place.  I was able to get these for about $2.50 a piece from Home Depot.  Also be sure you get a double end heavy bag too (i.e. one with a bottom D-ring), otherwise you'll get too much bag swing.  Try to get a heavy bag with a foam liner.  Some of the cheaper bags are like punching a rock, which won't do wonders for your workout enthusiasm.You can also put a true double end light bag on this portion of the unit, which is a nice change of pace from the heavy bag. (The light double end bag is the small inflatable that has two bungees holding it at about chest level and reverberates like mad when you hit it.)  It will occasionally smack the center support, which makes a lot of noise, but otherwise has no ill effects.The speed bag platform is a bit flimsy, especially on the earlier versions of this model where the "drum" or rebound board is two pieces (the latest versions of this model use a single piece drum). If you become moderately proficient at the speed bag in any amount of time you'll outgrow this aspect of the unit. Part of the problem is that the single vertical pole to which the speedbag drum attaches will flex when you get the bag moving really fast, and that can throw off your timing. Use the smallest size speed bag possible to minimize this inertia. Lastly, the speed bag platform doesn't really adjust high enough for people over 6'2" in height, and if you're over 6'1" or so you're going to need to use a small or xtra small speed bag to have it hang at the correct height (i.e. belly of bag at mouth/chin level).</review_text>
I'm 6'1'' and this jump rope was too long for me to use. It was easily shortened by popping off the end cap on one handle,removing a few beads, then cutting and re-knotting the rope. My only complaint is that it's a little too light for me. If the beads were a little heavier, it would be perfect. It does seem well made, and well worth the price.</review_text>
I use stability ball training on a daily basis, but I'm rather petite so finding a stability ball that is small enough to be comfortable is kind of hard sometimes. The GoFit Exercise ball comes in the size I need and it is strong enough that it won't wear out after six months of use like previous stability balls have. I love it</review_text>
I've been using this product for nearly 1 month now, and I absolutely love it!  Along with healthful eating, this DVD is great for losing weight. I have already lost about 7 lbs.  I recommend this product to everyone</review_text>
I love my Koosh ball, I use it as stress relief at work. This is a must have for the office. I got 2 of them in fact but my GF stoll the other one</review_text>
Recommend for all kind of ages...Really buy it and enjoy i</review_text>
After going through a number of cheaply made batting Ts, I stumbled across this one.  This is the one sanctioned version by the T-ball Assn of American and it's sturdy and well-built(Our T-ball team uses this version it games).  It may cost a few pennies more than cheep WalMart versions, but it is well worth the price.  You'll be handing this down to cousins and friends - that's how well it's built.  The friction fit rubber pipes are perfect for adjusting to different little batters swings.Go ahead and swing at this pitch, you won't regret it.</review_text>
This is a good find for $15 and free shipping!  Also got the helmet and pads for the same price.  Will make a great birthday present for my 7 yr old grandson in March</review_text>
Doesn't break the bank. I have bought three over the years and they are all from Wai Lana. Her workout, is a different thing. :-</review_text>
I've had this mat for about 6 months and I'm very pleased with it.  As soon as I got the mat, I washed it with cold water and soap, and dried it out by rolling a towel in it to soak up the extra moisture, then hanging it on a towel rack for a day.  Because my palms tend to get sweaty during practice, I used this mat under another mat the first few times.  After a week or so, I used this mat by itself.  The grip was great - the mat stayed firmly to my palms and to the floor.  Make sure that the label side is up!  After about 6 months the mat has only gotten better - it makes that sticking sound when I walk on it - a sign that it's doing its job.The dimensions of this mat are pretty standard.  68 x 24 x 1/8.  Unless you're much taller than the average person, or feel that you need more support, this should be fine for most people.  The mat also comes in a lot of great bright colors - I have a light blue one that I love.  I highly recommend this mat to start off with, for anyone who practices yoga.  Even if you don't go regularly, it's nice to have a mat at home.  And it's also a good idea to bring your own mat to class, even if they provide ones for you and tell you that they clean them regularly.  I mean come on, you've seen some of those people in your yoga class - do you really want your face to be where their sweaty feet were yesterday</review_text>
I love this mat!  It is very portable and easy to carry while walking between classes or travelling because it rolls up so compactly.  Just the right amount of padding and offers excellent grip</review_text>
I really enjoy my new yoga mat and the price was so very economical. I recommend this seller and the mat!!!</review_text>
First I will admit I am not all that knowledgeable about yoga mats. This is the first one I have bought but it seems to be really good for the price. It is comfortable and you won't have to worry about slipping while using this mat. No complaints here</review_text>
Yoga mats come in three basic thicknesses. At 1/8" this mat is of average thickness. At 24" x 68" it is also the standard width and length. Mats that are about half a thick as this one are good for travel or placing under a thicker mat to provide more traction. The thick mats (3/16") are about 50% thicker than this one and are designed for those who need or want extra cushion.There are two sides to this and nearly all yoga mats. Look carefully at the 'bumps' on each side of the mat. The larger bumps are designed to face upwards to cushion your hands, feet, and knees during poses while keeping your body from dangerously slipping out of alignment. The smaller bumps are designed to face downwards to grip the floor and keep the yoga mat from sliding. Many mats have a label on one end with the name of the brand. This is typically, but not always, located on the 'up' side. The bumps will tell you for sure.This yoga mat will increase in softness and stickiness with use. (So do most mats.) They start out mildly sticky and increase in stickiness the more they are used. You will want to wash your mat when it first arrives so as to remove the thin film they get on their surface during the manufacturing process. Instructions for washing the mat are included. Once you've washed and dried your mat you're ready to begin! After using it for a while, if you find the mat decreasing in stickiness each time you pull it out, this is the typical sign that a light coating of dust or too much body sweat has accumulated on your mat and it needs a light hand washing with very diluted soap and water. After washing, roll your mat in a thick towel to squeeze out the excess water, otherwise it will take forever to dry in the air. Then, air dry your mat unrolled, inside, and away from sunlight. (Hanging over the shower bar works nicely.)When you first unroll your mat you will find one end to be a bit curled. Simply alternate the direction you roll your mat (top outside once, then bottom outside next) or the end you start from (curled end once, flat end next time) and you'll find it straightening out more or less over time.I recommend buying your own yoga mat even if your yoga studio or gym provides them for you. I've worked in many studios and gyms over the years. Sometimes management has mats cleaned often, sometimes not. If you bring your own mat you always know where it's been. :o) Plus, owning your own mat may encourage you to begin valuable practice at home.For my students who have trouble with their knees in some of the poses requiring the body weight to rest on a knee, I recommend temporarily folding over one end of the mat to get double cushion under the knee while still leaving one layer under the rest of the body. This saves you having to haul more than one mat out each time you practice which can be discouraging especially to the beginner.</review_text>
This fits my Scion xB perfectly, it is a very challenging vehicle design (think box), and I didn't want to go with a roof rack. Putting a dirty mountain bike on the roof of my (nice paint job) car just hurts.The only con for this rack is that there is really no way to lock it to your car. If someone unhooks the straps they can take your rack and bike (with the bike locked to the rack)</review_text>
Works great and is easy to put on and take off.  Exactly what is needed</review_text>
Not a ton of features like higher-priced models, but gets the job done.  As easy to set up as others, and not too loud either.  A good trainer for those starting out or looking to save a few bucks.  No problems to speak of.</review_text>
I gotta tell ya, I was a little hesitant about buying the bike trainer. Would I actualy use it or would it end up in the closet?  Would it be TOO loud like everyone is saying?  Well, I threw caution to the wind and bought it...it didn't hurt that it was under a 100 bucks too!  I received the Bike Trainer in about four days, had it out of the box and assembled in 8 minutes and was working up a sweat 15 minutes later.  I LOVE THIS THING!!  The reviews were correct, if you've got a mountain bike with knobby tread tires, it IS loud!  I had my Ipod maxed out and could still hear the tire spinning.  I was determined though.  I put a street tire on and it's like a whole different machine - quiet and smooth...and what a workout!  This Trainer is awesome.  Money well spent</review_text>
I bought this trainer to use indoors during the San Francisco rainy winter season.  I thought it might be nice to just mount my own bike rather than driving to a gym somewhere and paying membership fees, waiting for an available spincycle, etc.  I am most impressed with the quality of construction and ease of use.  It even comes with it's own skewer so I don't have to scuff up my expensive skewer during the mounting process.  It's very attractive, very well made, and seems to work great after the first one-hour test ride at least.  I bought a front-tire leveling block as well and the combination makes a very stable platform on which to ride my own bike in my own room while watching a movie, reading, or listening to music.  What could be better, and all for a measly 80 bucks.  I have a regular rear road tire that contacts the resistance roller and the noise factor is quite low - nothing that should disturb anyone in my opinion.  The only improvement I could suggest would be one or two more levels of resistance - this unit set at the highest level doesn't really give resistance close to what you would get climbing a hill, but I got a good heart rate going and was dripping sweat. It certainly will get me through those rainy days where I simply wouldn't get my bike out on the road.  For 80 bucks I am highly pleased.</review_text>
I was concerned that I would regret spending less for Ascent's model, as the only other bike trainer I'd seen was a cheap, flimsy thing that belonged to a friend.My fears were misplaced.  The device is very solid and the noise level is less than I expected.  I have to raise the TV volume only a click or two above its usual level when exercising.I can see no reason why one should want a more expensive trainer</review_text>
This thing was pretty inexpensive for what I got.  It's easy to put together and every piece was included!  "Wow!", I thought when I saw that they didn't forget a couple screws or bolts.  This often happens to me when I buy things I need to put together.  Anyways, after doing everything I could on this thing for the past couple weeks it is still completely intact.  It doesn't mind when I do pull-ups, chin-ups, leg lifts, push-ups or when I hold onto the bottom legs when I do leg lifts on the floor.  It does move slightly when I do dips but it's not going anywhere.  I weigh 155 lbs., so this thing can take some weight.  I think the limit is 250 lbs.Other than the product being tip-top I want to mention Amazon's shipping.  I ordered this early in April, around the 3rd if I remember correctly.  I was supposed to get it tomorrow, the 16th.  I got it two days after I ordered it!  My dog started barking and I was thinking, "What's wrong with her?".  The last thing I expected to see when I looked out the window was my Ironman Power Tower.  Thanks Amazon, for ruling</review_text>
We recently ordered this product - for the price I wasn't sure if it would be sturdy or not, but it is very heavy and stable - the instructions were some of the best we have seen - clear and understandable for putting it together correctly!  A great buy for the reliability and versatility of this product</review_text>
Easy to assemble and sturdy.  Don't waste your money on any of the higher priced models.  This is all you need.</review_text>
The Power Tower is a pretty straight forward piece of equipment. There are so many variations on the activities you can do on it that it's fairly easy to keep it interesting and challenging.It's a pretty light weight piece, I can move it around on my own with ease. I am also over 220 and though the unit does flex when I use the pull-up bar, it only does so ever so slightly and after the initial experience and checking the unit out, it is obvious the maker designed it this way. The bracing is strategically placed to allow for this instead of using much heavier materials. I appreciate this concept since it allows me to move the unit at will when necessary and still gives me complete confidence in the integrity of the piece. Just check your bolts periodically, as with any piece of fitness equipment.The push-up handles are the only drawback on this and the sole reason I give it 4 instead 5 stars. The only usable position for me is at the bend where there is no padding. This places you at a fairly extreme angle and although it is still a functional position, it is obvious these were not well thought out. Any attempt to even remotely place your hands where the padding is or in any normal position and you are banging your head on the lower center brace. Separate push-up bars are better anyway. Check out the "perfect push-up" by BodyRev here on Amazon if you're looking.All said, this is an infinitely usable piece of equipment bringing some "big" exercises to your home in a very reasonably sized package. It is easy to incorporate into your work-out routine and even my wife has taken a liking to it. She uses it to work out her lower back and loves the strength/relief it gives her.Bottom line, $100 for this highly functional piece is an absolute bargain and pretty much a no brainer. GET IT.</review_text>
Very well constructed and solid; realtively easy and straight forward assembly.  Comfortable to use.  ONLY criticism is the mild imbalance of Tower when using 'chair-assisted' pull-ups.  Just watch for it tilting forward and there is no threat.</review_text>
This came promptly in a large and heavy box.  The instructions could have been better as there were a few things that were not clear, but I was able to assemble it without much problem in about an hour.  In general everything was in good shape, but as another reviewer noted, there were small tears on the arm pads.  It is very sturdy, but after a few weeks of use I need to go back and retighten some of the bolts in the base.  I mostly use it for the dips and pullups and have had no problems.  The handbars for doing pushups are a good idea but not very useful, if you are not careful about your position you will hit your head on the cross beam - some other reviewers have noted this.  Even when I am positioned correctly my hair brushes against the bar so I rarely use it for pushups</review_text>
I checked out a few similar items at sporting goods stores and decided that a model around $100-$150 would suit me.  This was the best looking tower for the price, and luckily I kept checking in and out and actually got this thing when the price was lowered to $80 for a few days.  So with shipping this thing cost me about $115.  I don't have time for a gym membership and had room in my garage for this--between it and my elliptical machine I can do pretty well.The packaging was fine and I'm sorry to hear that others had received it torn up.  But mine was fine, all the parts were there, and assembly took about an hour.  A socket wrench is a must.  The directions are slightly confusing, but I can't fathom what the one reviewer is talking about where they say the holes were drilled on the wrong side.  Study the directions, look at the pics on the box, and you should be able to figure it out.I weigh 170 pounds.  For me, this tower is very sturdy, very solid.  I use it for chin ups, dips and leg lifts--it performs extremely well.  There is no rocking and it is SOLID.  I figured the push up bars would be useless given the other reviews so I've never bothered--I just do push ups on the floor anyway.As far as chin ups go, yes you can bang your legs on the support bars--if you have awful form.  Properly executed chin-ups work great.I am VERY happy with this purchase--it was just what I was looking for and the price was right.  Even at its current price it is still a great item.  I love it</review_text>
1-10 Scale 1= lowest 10= higestDurablility= 10Quality= 9Design= 7Attractiveness= 5  Color was dimStablility= 7 Kind of wobblesPrice= ExcellentOverall= 8</review_text>
Just got my sword today, and it's very nice. No damage or problems with the sword and it feels very well made. This is one huge sword though so don't expect to be swinging it around one handed. But in short if you're a fan of Bleach you'll be happy with this purchase, and it's sure to provoke some questions from anyone you show it to.P.S. I was really surprised to see how fast it showed up, only 4 business days</review_text>
whole sword is very nice. if your a bleach fan you will love it. even if you arnt this sword is awesome. the sheeth has this little dot design on it though that you cant see in the picture though</review_text>
Though I can not say I am an avid sword collector, I can say this sword not only met, but surpassed my expectations - especially for the price.  The shipping was top-notch, and expedient.  One question I had was if the hand guard was also metal, and it is.  The blade is standard steel, and painted black.  It's weight is 4.5 lbs, and the handle is well-wrapped, as playing around with it has not affected the wrapping in the slightest.  The chain in the back also does not feel like a "cheap imitation."  If you're a fan of bleach as I am, and you're even contemplating this sword, you really should give it a shot.  It's a great buy for the money, and it's guaranteed to wow your friends, especially if they are under 5'8" (the length of the sword).  Hope this review helps</review_text>
I assume the item is fine, but why would it take more than a month to arrive?</review_text>
Its a good scope, dont buy the $6 or $10 scopes, your better off buying this scope.NOTE: If you are buying an airsoft sniper off this site(amazon)-- none of the scopes will work or attach on the sniper/rifile you buy accept this one.I highly recommend it</review_text>
*****This is an upscale designer water bottle, top of the line, and so much fun. The designs Of Sigg's water bottles are gorgeous, from the plain, solid color bottles, to the ones with intricate designs. They are simply beautiful! I switched from regular plastic water bottles because of health concerns, thinking it would take more work to maintain. These do necessitate regular cleaning (I clean mine every day), but having something so beautiful to drink from makes the cleaning fun. Sort of like my rings, glasses, and watch, I now consider my Sigg personal water bottle a vital accessory, reminding me to drink more water, making a statement about my values, and expressing myself with a special design. Yes, all in a water bottle!Sigg of Switzerland water bottles are very high quality, made of light aluminum on the outside, slightly insulated, and covered with a special powder coat on the inside that prevents any leaching whatsoever, unlike plastic and polycarbonate water bottles. They are light, durable, and perfect for any activity. Well water tastes spectacular in these bottles, just like from the tap.Sigg bottles come with several different types of tops. I bought the screw top because I don't like sports tops, and I don't mind unscrewing the top when I want a drink. It is totally leakproof, which is important to me. The top is pretty and can be hooked onto a carabiner. I get comments on it all the time, "What's that? I love it!" The sports top version is ok; I just am not a fan, as I don't feel like I can get enough water from the little stream from the sports top. However, for convenience, you might prefer it. For children, there is a cap-type top. All are leak-proof. If you are ever unsatisfied with the top, you can buy a screw top separately to fit your Sigg bottle.Sigg makes their personal water bottle in .6L and 1L in this style. I have both. I use the .6L for sports activities because they are smaller. When I won't have to carry the container, I like the larger bottle. Sigg also makes a smaller .3L bottle for children that is a perfect size for young people. You can buy Siggs in alternative sizes too, such as .75L, .4L (for kids), .6L, .5L. You can occasionally find this bottle in the 1.5L size, also. Search Amazon for the perfect size.Pick a style and pattern you like, as this bottle is a personal accessory, and should reflect your style. The colors are vibrant and even prettier than they seem in the pictures on Amazon.They are expensive, but they are so durable that you can plan on them lasting many years. I consider them both an accessory and an investment in my health, so they are well worth it value-wise for me.Highly recommended.****</review_text>
Not much variation with these things.  It's sturdy and durable and does what it's supposed to well.</review_text>
Compact device. Easy to use. You can feel your muscles respond</review_text>
This wheel was very easy to assemble. It is important to use some type of lubricant to slide the hand grips on. At first, I tried to slide one on without it because I was afraid the lubricant would make the hand grips slide around during use after I put it together. The hand grip would only go part of the way on and I had difficulty getting it back off. So, I followed the advice of another reviewer and used a tiny bit of petroleum jelly. The hand grips slid right on and the wheel has worked great.The wheel is very stable and works as it should. What more could you ask for? This is a very well-made exercise wheel for a great price</review_text>
I just got this nifty device and I am very pleased. It really works all your upper body in just one moves. I have feel the exercise on my arms, back, and especially the abs. No complaints</review_text>
great workout, does exactly what it claims to do. easy to put together and sturdy because it has two wheels</review_text>
This stuff is really good for the upper abs. At first it was unbearably hard but with time i got used to it and now do it every morning. Its cheap and easy to use anywhere. All you need is a floor. One more thing, my gf was unable to do more than one because of lack of upper body strength. Other than that, its awesome!</review_text>
If you have never tried this little wheel and you feel like you have strong core, try it but be ready for some surprise... It's very hard.After 3 months of daily training, I still could not do standing version (but I'm improving :o).So if there is no other exercise that could give your core a workout give "Evil Wheel" a try !</review_text>
I've used this product for 4 months.Very cheap price, good quality, no problems, and it does the job well.  I don't have any complaints</review_text>
This product is great.  I love it.  It's easy to put together initially and it really targets the areas that I wanted to work out.  A+ from me</review_text>
I purchased a ripstik and let me tell you, THE BEST THING TO RIDE! Whenever I go down the street everyone stares and ask what is it. They all say they want one too. The best thing of all is riding hills! I can even go up them but when you go down its like snowboarding. I recommend this 100</review_text>
Owning 2 ripsticks for the kids in our household is not enough:  My husband and I are also hooked~~ Looks like we'll need 2 more.  Fun, fun, fun.  Best on a smooth surface- indoor tile or concrete, not black asphault.  Highly recommended for ages 10-100</review_text>
I ordered the Ski Grip and it exceeded my expectations. The design is simple but very functional and attaches in seconds. Go for it</review_text>
WOW... This racquet really improved my swing. Great product, for a great price!It is head heavy and it does the work... Also greatly improved my tennis elbow.</review_text>
I bought this pack to use on the MS 150 bike ride.  It did not let me down.  Comfortable, roomy for all my stuff and durable.  I even used it to ride to work and had a change of clothes in it as well as toiletries.  No complaints from me.  Thought the price might be too low initially, but turned out to be a good buy.</review_text>
My daughter loves her Dora Skootskate - and the non-marking wheels are great since it's winter time and she's riding the skootskate in my house;o</review_text>
This is a great first scooter.  Non-skid surface makes it hard for little ones to slip while they are scooting, but if they do it will surely scrape knees as it is very rough. It is very quick and easy to assemble.  It comes with some stickers on it that don't stick very well but still an unbeatable value at $7.99</review_text>
Pretty sturdy scooter, doesn't turn but great for both indoors and outdoors, nonskid board surface, great for the reduced price of $7.99</review_text>
Since it has been opened, my kids have played on it daily. They love to scoot through the kitchen/bathroom on it. Even my 3 year old enjoys it. It doesn't roll too fast, so it is very unlikely to slip out from underneath a child. As far as skateboards go, this is a great (safe) route to go to teach balance.</review_text>
Bought this on Amazon for our two girls.Got it at a great price with free shipping.I don't believe there's actually any bearings in the wheels,but they do turn ;) The style is very cute & nice built-in grip.The girls got our money's worth the first day riding it</review_text>
Great scooter for the price! Gave it to my "angel" for Christmas and she seems to really enjoy. Appeared to be good quality and sturdy</review_text>
Bought two Sweetwater filter pumps to take on a 4-day float trip (one as a backup).  I didn't need the backup, but the filter I did use was obviously getting close to stopped-up by the end of the float.  I probably could have gotten more use from it by using the enclosed brush to clean it; I didn't because the float ended before I quite needed to.  Summary: I'd recommend this product.  I'd also recommend carrying a backup.</review_text>
I've been using this water filter system for three years now.  It's light and easy to use.  Including setup, I can fill 4-5 Nalgene bottles in 10 minutes or so, without my arms getting fed up with the repetitive motion of pumping.  It attaches easily to a wide-mouth Nalgene bottle, so I'd recommend a couple of those if you don't have them already.Like any other filter, it gets slower with use, so take care of it.  Do get the silt stopper and be sure to carry a replacement filter for any extended trip.  I have found that in some locations (Isle Royale for example) I spent a lot more time backwashing the silt stopper and the filter took a beating.  Our camp neighbors were having even more trouble with their filters (different brand), so I didn't feel too bad about my minor troubles.Replacement filters aren't cheap, but then neither are any of the alternative filters out there.  The cleaning brush is easy to use but doesn't seem to help that much in improving flow speed as the filter slows down.  The unit responds well to being cleaned up when you get home and stored broken down.</review_text>
My daughter is a fanatic Princess Jasmine lover. Unfortunately, Jasmine is one of the less frequently featured princesses. My daughter was very specific about wanting a bike with Jasmine on it. Since they don't seem to make one I am hoping that she will be just thrilled that she can at least have knee pads, elbow pads, gloves, and a back pack with her favorite princess on it. I am going to find a nice Jasmine sticker to put on her new little princess bike and hope between this and the sticker my Jasmine fan will be happy!Come On Disney! Mix it up a little! Enough with Cinderella already!!!</review_text>
The main advantage of this over other units that work with Suunto is that this is the only one that will actually work with all bicycles because it simply zip ties to the front fork. The other two units that work with Suunto are more elegant but do not work with all bike set ups.The only concern is that the plastic looks brittle, but I have it on a mountain bike and have not had a problem with durability yet</review_text>
I purchased this wheeled duffle bag as a gift for a friend.  So I personally cannot review its use.  However, I did have a chance to look at it before wrapping it.  This appears to be quality made.  The bag is defintely heavier than it appears.  Not to the point that it would be difficult to use, but rather to last longer.  The bottom of the bag is not collapsible, which would give it more strength to carry soda cans.  I bought this item on sale, and I felt that I got a really good bargain.  It was well worth the money.  My friend has not given any complaints about its use so far</review_text>
My son will be so excited - he loves the Power Rangers and this bike is the coolest. The graphics are spectacular and it seems very sturdy. I can't wait to give it to him</review_text>
The bike is really cool, well built. Too bad we had to assemble it though. There are no sounds as indicated in the description (I believe). But, my son loved it, b/c he is a Power Ranger freak! Overall, good purchase</review_text>
good service,fast in perfect condition amazing i love this product.THANK YOU,THANK YOU</review_text>
My Christmas shopping was done early.My Grandson said he wanted a Power Ranger Bike.Couldn't find any in stores. Found one at Amazon,ordered it and recieved it within 3 days. The bike looked great,sturdy,easy to assemble.It doesn't look like your ordinary bike.The fenders,seat,emblem on the handlbars make's it a bike like no other.</review_text>
This bike is well built, easy to ride and a hugh hit with all the Power Ranger kids in the neighborhood.Would recomend highly</review_text>
Yoga mats come in three basic thicknesses. At 3/16" this mat is one of the thicker ones designed for those who need or want extra cushion. Mats that are about one third as thick as this one (1/16") are good for travel or placing under a thicker mat to provide more traction. The average mats are about 1/8." At 24" x 68" it's of standard width and length.There are two sides to this and nearly all yoga mats. Look carefully at the 'bumps' on each side of the mat. The larger bumps are designed to face upwards to cushion your hands, feet, and knees during poses while keeping your body from dangerously slipping out of alignment. The smaller bumps are designed to face downwards to grip the floor and keep the yoga mat from sliding. Many mats have a label on one end with the name of the brand. This is typically, but not always, located on the 'up' side. The bumps will tell you for sure.This yoga mat will increase in softness and stickiness with use. (So do most mats.) They start out mildly sticky and increase in stickiness the more they are used. You will want to wash your mat when it first arrives so as to remove the thin film they get on their surface during the manufacturing process. Instructions for washing the mat are included. Once you've washed and dried your mat you're ready to begin! After using it for a while, if you find the mat decreasing in stickiness each time you pull it out, this is the typical sign that a light coating of dust or too much body sweat has accumulated on your mat and it needs a light hand washing with very diluted soap and water. After washing, roll your mat in a thick towel to squeeze out the excess water, otherwise it will take forever to dry in the air. Then, air dry your mat unrolled, inside, and away from sunlight. (Hanging over the shower bar works nicely.)When you first unroll your mat you will find one end to be a bit curled. Simply alternate the direction you roll your mat (top outside once, then bottom outside next) or the end you start from (curled end once, flat end next time) and you'll find it straightening out more or less over time.I recommend buying your own yoga mat even if your yoga studio or gym provides them for you. I've worked in many studios and gyms over the years. Sometimes management has mats cleaned often, sometimes not. If you bring your own mat you always know where it's been. :o) Plus, owning your own mat may encourage you to begin valuable practice at home.For my students who have trouble with their knees in some of the poses requiring the body weight to rest on a knee, I recommend temporarily folding over one end of the mat to get double cushion under the knee while still leaving one layer under the rest of the body. This saves you having to haul more than one mat out each time you practice which can be discouraging especially to the beginner.</review_text>
I got this on a Friday sale and it's nice to know that it is there in case something happens!!</review_text>
Although the food quality is decent - and the packages should last for a while, it's a bit deceptive to say that a TOTAL of about 2500 calories is adequate for a person for three days.  Unless you're on a really tight diet.  For a short term like 72 hours simply keep some canned food around (or some MRE's) and you'd do much better.  If you insist on camping (dehydrated) food - simply buy a few of the real meals from this company.  At least you'll be eating enough to keep the stomach rumbles down</review_text>
I spend a lot of time in front of the computer doing this & that and I'll just grab this up every so often and toss it back between my hands or do the exercises that come in the box.  I've had this a little over a week and I can definitely tell it's working already.  It's weighted just right and it doesn't even feel like I'm actually exercising at all which makes it more fun.</review_text>
Ahhh, the ridicule I get for writing a few pogo stick reviews...  but these things really are fun.I find that the best pogo stick reviews and discussions can be found at the xpogo website forum. You'll find comments from people who have tested all the pogo sticks and provided honest, critical feedback.  So take a look at recent reviews at xpogo before buying any pogo stick.I own a Flybar 1200, which I love (See my review).  If I was in the market for another pogo stick, I'd check out Vurtego, Motostik, and Power Pogo products, among others.At xpogo, there's a long thread on the Flybar 800, with reasonable reviews starting around Sept 20, 2006.  The 800 seems to be great if you are under 120-135 Lbs. I'm a bit over that, which means that it isn't for me, unfortunately.  The 800 is smaller and lighter than the Flybar 1200, which reportedly makes it more controllable.  There was a problem with surgical-tubing-like bands ("thrusters") breaking which may be under control.  Flybar (SBI) offers remarkably good customer service, so they are likely to address any problems you have.Keep in mind that pogo sticks have changed since the old days.  The new technologies are actually kind've interesting. The Motostik has a spring, and is reminiscent of the Master and GG sticks of the old days. It is pretty quiet, which might be a plus.  The FB 1200 and 800 use elastomere "thrusters" that provide a sling-shot like bounce.  The Vurtego and Power Pogo products feel a bit like a rubber ball bouncing.  You adjust them as if you were inflating a ball.   So if you want to drop big $$ on a pogo stick, take a look at what is out there.  There's a very, very good chance you'll choose a Flybar, but be aware of your options.I think that a pogo stick renaissance is just around the corner. And, I think it might be good for kids to bounce around on these things because all those heel strikes might affect calcium levels and actually strengthen bones.  There's research linking heel strikes to calcium levels and bone strength. If these results hold up, then the pogo sticking as a child and teen may offer lifelong health benefits.</review_text>
Great pogo stick. bought for child that is 14.  Lots of fun and great workout.  Goes about 4 feet so need to be careful they will get hurt at times but no more than bike or skateboard.  company customer service is great.  Called up because rubber cap on pogo stick was coming apart.  They sent me overnight new cap and nice t shirt for the trouble.  Cannot beat that.  Most warranty places put you through the ringer.  Great stick and a lot of fun.  By the way it looks good to</review_text>
i just got the flybar 800 for christmas yesterday and let me tell you it is amazing! i aminto xpogo and i learned almost all of my tricks on it the first day. i just jumped over a trashcan and over a 7 foot gap. i would reccomend this pogo stick to anyone people into xpogo and not into xpogo because if you are still learning to jump you can set the piston to be smaller so its easier to bottem out and regain control</review_text>
I recently purchased the flybar 800 and was blown away by its durability and its strength. I"ll admit that i handle products very roughly however, i haven't had a single problem. I am a skateboarder so naturally i want to do tricks on it. From backflips to barspins you name it. The flybar 800 can do it all. In fact i like the flybar 800 even more than it's companion the flybar 1200. The flybar 800 is lighter, smaller, and quieter. But dont get me wrong i reccomend both. Do not get this product for children under the age of 10 because it can be quite dangerous. SO use it respectfully and responsibly</review_text>
State-of-the-art technology and years of research have led to the Flybar 800, an ultra-high performance pogo stick / trampoline hybrid.Having managed the Flybar Demo Team for the past year, I thought I would give you a preview of the newly released Flybar 800. Our team has gotten to know the product line and its potential very well, as we have been bouncing on the Flybar 1200 for almost two years now and have had the opportunity to test the Flybar 800 over the past few months. The team loves the 1200 for its smooth bounce and big air potential, so we were excited to see the same technology made available for our smaller, younger team members.When Flybar handed us the first product sample of the Flybar 800, we were blown away. Not only did the Flybar 800 bring the smooth bounce and durability we loved in the Flybar 1200, its reduced form factor allowed younger and smaller riders to `enjoy the view'. The flagship Flybar 1200 will still be the preferred stick for adults and advanced jumpers, with a suggested weight range of 120 - 250 lbs. But the Flybar 800 is smaller than the 1200, and has the same adjustability features of its predecessor (the spring tension and the pedal height are easily adjustable to accommodate rider weight and skill level) This makes it the ideal entry-level high-performance pogo for younger male riders and women of all ages. We have had 12 year old kids and their parents bouncing side by side on the Flybar 800, which has a weight capacity of 80-180 pounds.Ever since the release of the Flybar 1200, the most common request was for a Flybar that would be better suited for riders that weighed less than 120 lbs., which is exactly what the 800 delivers. It has been great to see the Flybar 800 reach new people. Grinds, drops, and backflips are becoming routine for our most advanced jumpers, but even novices are taking to the 800. The fitness arena has embraced the Flybar 800 as a novel way of getting in shape. The approachability and low impact jump make the Flybar 800 an addictive cardio or aerobic workout, available now for the first time to women who were too small to effectively operate the Flybar 1200.What impresses me is that the Flybar 800 exceeds all expectations and abuse from our demo team, yet is so user friendly that a 12 year old and their parent can pick it up and be bouncing together in minutes. The Flybar 800 lives up to the high standard set by the Flybar 1200, packing innovative technology into a smaller unit. A versatile toy that the whole family can enjoy- you won't be disappointed.</review_text>
This thing is awesome, I was concerned about it being big enough and it is perfect. I thought about using a duffle bag for my tackle but i thought a duffle bag would be too big in the boat but this is more vertical so it is perfect. I absolutely love it. I don't know why Plano has stopped producing them. The only reason I can think of is that it costs them too much money to produce. I'm tempted to buy another one! The only complaint I have is the wraps really arent wraps. they are side pockets with rings attached to the bottom of the pockets but thats a small price to pay for such a nice tackle bag. Plus the 8 3700 series boxes are worth half the value themselves</review_text>
This was purchased as a birthday gift for my father-in-law.  We were very happy with the quality and size of the mat.  We feel we got quite a bargain to be honest!  My father-in-law seemed quite pleased and genuinely surprised upon receiving the mat for his birthday (it was on his Amazon wish list).  Our order was filled and shipped very quickly.  I have no problem recomending this mat to others.</review_text>
We searched for days for a birthday bike to fit my 9 yr old daughter and this was the only one that would give her room to grow.  She adored it and we had it for all of 18 days before it was stolen off our back deck. It broke her heart, but when I save up the money again, I will buy this same bike.  It is well made and comfortable and fits the "in-between" kids who are too big for the Baby-ish decals of the 20 inch bikes! I only wish the person who stole it would have a change of heart before I buy it again..</review_text>
This bike is great for pleasure riding. My wife is around 5-2 and this is a great fit. She loves it and put streamers on the handgrips right away :-) A lot of non-rusting aluminum and alloys for low maintenance. Lots of gears. We are very impressed by the quality for the relatively low price. If you are just riding the neighborhood for fun, try a cruiser movel... this is more of a fun bike for young & young at heart..</review_text>
I purchased this bike for my 9 year daughter who was ready for something a little more mature than the pink bike with the wicker basket on the front. She loves this bike! She and her dad ride long distances and this bike makes the ride very enjoyable. Recommend.</review_text>
I bought these skates for my four year old son.  Good skates for the price.  He absolutely loves them</review_text>
So I own a few Cathe's workouts and she is my favorite instructor, and her workouts are my favorite because they are always advanced, and I know I always get a GOOD workout when I do them. This workout had so many of the things I love! DRILLS! No dancey moves, very basic step segments, but mostly plyo drills and lunges... high intensity for sure--so be sure to leave a few days in between this workout. The weight segments were good, but if you are wanting a full body weight routine, I suggest Jari Love. But this is good for cardio and weights mixed...and using the ball, my first time, I have to say it is pretty fun! Wall squats are pretty challenging for me, since I have not done them before- but I love a challenge! This is a hard core workout, and you will be pleased! But if you are a beginner, I do not recommend this workout. This is definately for the advanced</review_text>
This is my first Cathe Friedrich dvd and I love it! It provides a great boost to my workout schedule and is very challenging. If you're feeling overly energetic you can run the workout straight through (over 60 mins) or choose one of the shorter premixed workouts for different areas of concentration.Great workout for intermediates who are looking for a push up to advanced</review_text>
I loved it, however keep in mind, this workout is for someone who wants High intensity workouts and does not like alot of breaks.  She does give ample recovery for the muscle by switching back in forth non-stop.</review_text>
This DVD is awesome!!! It tests my endurance like no other. I'm in better shape because of this workout and many other Cathe's DVDs. This is workout is definitely for advance exercisers. It's very athletic and not dancy at all... be ready to sweat. This DVD is like no other Cathe DVD...she includes lots of functional exercises. Great Job Cathe!!</review_text>
I really like this workout.  If you are a Cathe fan, it is pretty different from any other workout that she had done.  The closest thing to it is Boot Camp.  Both videos are good in separate ways.  Boot Camp is only one hour and seems to concentrate more on strength work.  Drill Max has a lot more cardio in it.  And I found it to be a pretty tough go, but mixed up enough where it was enjoyable.  I intend to do this one regularly.  I would say however that this is a pretty advanced workout</review_text>
I usually love Cathe's workouts.  I like this, but not as much as her others.  This is quite effective (if you can make it through to the end), but usually with interval training, you pick up the intensity and lower it only to pick it up again.  Here you are pretty much going full tilt the entire way.  I don't really classify this as interval training.Having said that, you will get a great workout from this.  In the six circuits (that each have three segments), you will work on balance, agility and functional fitness.  You will need to be somewhat fit already in order to do this because otherwise you will find it very discouraging and may quit.  Each of the segments within the circuits do step aerobics, floorwork and standing toning.  Even she will tell you that if you don't have a lot of space to work in (cause you'll do football drills) then 'take it higher'.  So she is one tough cookie, but she will give you results if you do this consistantly.You are looking at a workout well over an hour.  But while it's tough and makes you sweat, I just wouldn't call it interval training.  Her instruction and cuing are as good as ever and I think that if you are fit or somewhat fit already, you will have lot's to gain from this.  I really like it</review_text>
this is great to get if your not old enough to buy ammo in stores and it lasts you forever</review_text>
Got them thinnking there were plentiful and cheap.Pros: Alot of Balls, hurt pretty bad.Cons: Jam in Barrel of all of my guns, my friend has one gun they work in, the seems stick out a bit.Not for me, I reccommend buying them at your local store</review_text>
I dont care whatever any of you guys say but these bb's are awesome!!!!!!!!!!!If you want to solve the problem of them spilling everywhere you can just put them in a zip lock bag you knuckle heads and if you want to pour them put them in a speed loader you you guys would probably have laying around your house anyway. All in all these are good high quality bb's that you should buy and if you dont your just dumb</review_text>
On opening this bag, my initial impression was "Dear lord! no burrs!" this is because there were no burrs on any of the BBs. this was a huge change from my last bag, which could only be better then a melted blob of plastic. For all that say you can't reclose the bag, PUT THEM ALL IN A ZIP-LOCK BAG!!!!! PROBLEM SOLVED!!!!! I will accept my Nobel Prize after i pwn my freinds...</review_text>
They're nice, seamless, and yes you can use them in AEGs.  I have and nothing bad has happened. The only reason why i didnt give it a 5 is because the picture shows blue BBs and I got yellow! WTF! o well, it is a good but, will last you a long...And also, I am not Michelle, thats my mom, i am Joe..</review_text>
Do not use these bb's with AEG's.  Only use them with spring pistols</review_text>
item is great, as advertised, easy to mount to wallshipping was fast also...thank</review_text>
This is a good product, when you use it you can fell it working in your legs. It is good to be able to ride your bike in the comfort of your living room when you can't ride outside. The only bad points of the trainer would be it is a bit noisy and the instructions are hard to understand. It is good value for money and has a strong support stand</review_text>
It is Very good Product to maintain all cold, like meals and drinks and very easy to clean, really he is too useful</review_text>
Comparing these snowshoes to much more expensive ones in local stores leaves my very pleased.  Also, all else with the purchase was very professional including shipment info and delivery.</review_text>
Or anything else, really.  I have a few hundred miles on the tires.  They roll and handle just fine.  Much better than the knobbies that came on the bike.  If you have a MTB and find yourself riding it on the street all of the time, these tires will serve you well..</review_text>
Very cool.  So far so good, have not used it long, will see how it holds up to use in a mountain cabin where the power goes out all the time</review_text>
We have found this light to be of very good quality.  When purchasing, we also considered a similar light by Black & Decker.  This light seemed to have sturdier and tighter construction.  We bought locally, so we have the option of testing these in the store, before we bought (they all come in packages which allow the crank to be free, so you can try them.  For both models, we discovered that some work better than others.  What I mean is some B&D work better than other B&D and some Iluminators work better than others.  This may be due to the way they are treated in the store - some being used over and over again before purchase.  It took a while, but we found one that held a charge for a long time.  In fact, when I charged it at home, it lasted with bright light (three leds) for about 1.5 hours and kept emitting dim light for 12 hours.  One B&D we purchased (and returned) stayed on for only 10 seconds after being charged for two munutes (not useful).Advice: These as internet-ordered are probably more likely to be free from in-store over-use (repeat - probably). However, you also can't try them before buying. So, like many things you'll need to weigh those pros and cons.  If you get a good one, you'll probably agree that it is a very good little flashlight</review_text>
My son has had this trike since last summer. It is a heavy, study bike that he rides every day. We have to keep it in the house all winter so he can ride around the house. It doesn't tip over easily (but it does tip over if my son is messing around). I put it together myself and it was pretty easy to assemble. I recommend this trike for bigger toddlers (age 2 and up) since it's pretty heavy and even at the most compact setting most kids under 2 won't be able to reach the pedals. My son is almost 3 and still doesn't pedal consistently because of the weight of the bike</review_text>
My 19 month old boy can't reach the pedals yet but loves to ride it anyway.  My 5 year old boy always wants to ride the trike - around the house.  They both love riding the trike</review_text>
So far so good.  My son is only 15months, but loves to sit and play on this bike.  It seems really well made and it was easy to put together.  Well worth the price.</review_text>
We enjoyed using this lantern (red one) on our deck during the summer.  We'd use it on the patio table at meals and set it on the deck for ambient light.  Very enjoyable and you get lots of mileage on a set of batteries</review_text>
Love it! I use it when I am at the stop light to get a few quick reps in. Great for travel too</review_text>
Awesome sword.  Looks and feels like the real thing but at a cost anyone can afford.  Great converstaion piece.</review_text>
If you can find a better scope for 14 dollars, let me know. This scope is amazing and super easy to fine tune. If you're on a tight budget, or if you just want a good scope, this is it. WARNING: you need to buy scope rings to mount it</review_text>
This is a well built scope. Pretty good past 100 yards and a nice reticle to measure distance with. I dont think anyone can find a 4x30 scope for less than 20 bucks, haha. I recommend this product.</review_text>
Good package, and the Air travel includes a soft to login and access to information.</review_text>
If you are into your outdoor lifestyle, and enjoy getting away for a few days into the bush, the IGLOO cooler box is a much needed necessity.I have used them in the Zambezi Valley Zimbabwe, and they have performed brilliantly, keeping ice intact for several days, despite temperatures in the shade of over 40 deg cent.Work very well with dry ice, recommend putting a wet towel over the coolerbox and wetting this regularly, can assist with keeping the temp down.At the end of the day, you cant go wrong with good kit, well worth every cent paid!!</review_text>
THIS COOLER WORKED VERY, VERY WELL.  IT WAS TAKEN ON A HUNTING TRIP TO KEEP THE MEAT COLD AND IT DID A GOOD JOB.  HOURS LATER THE ICE HADN'T EVEN MELTED IN 80-90 DEGREE HEAT.  SIZE WAS VERY IMPORTANT TOO.  EXCELLENT COOLER</review_text>
This was perfect for our 4 day 8 person hike.  No pumping required, just someplace to hang it.  (We took turns holding it up in some cases).  The filter lasts for a long time, the water tasted great, it was light, and compact.  I love this product.</review_text>
This backpack, in khaki & dark pink, has been perfect for my young middleschooler. She wanted something hip & trendy and got that but also got a pack with several pockets, well constructed, & of great quality</review_text>
Love my black backpack. I'm only 5'1" and I wanted a backpack that doesn't look bulky on my small frame. I found it. The pouch in front pouch is just big enough to fit my Ipod and pencils. I carry my binder and two text books around all the time and I still have room for my laptop if I wanted.</review_text>
If you want to impress others, have more money than you know what to do with, or are skilled enough that you know for a fact that you will play better with a racquet that has specific characteristics that this one lacks, buy another racquet.  If you just want a decent racquet that reliably does what a raquet should do, you don't need to pay more than this. Because of advances in technology, this plays better than most of the racquets that were available, regardless of price, ten years ago, so if you're not happy with your game, you won't be able to blame this racquet</review_text>
I bought this recently and already I think this racquet is great. The main reason I bought this is because this is light and oversized, great for beginners like me (plus this racquet isn't so expensive). But I think this racquet is good any level player. Highly recommend it!</review_text>
I bought this at Wal-Mart today for $16 and this my first real tennis raquet (before I was playing with a badmitten raquet!) I am very satified with it. It's lightweight, big head, and also has soft shock absorbers which is really nice, not to mention a great deal! As being a person who hasn't played on a real tennis court yet, I am quite hapy with it</review_text>
I could not get the sound to stop, just wanted the ligh</review_text>
This is my first review so you know this product is great.  I own my own business and park my 14 foot box truck in my driveway.  I recently orderded this product and recieved it but it took me a couple of days to find the time to install it.  Meanwhile someone broke in my truck and stole all my tools.  So I decided to install my new motion sensor and it works great.  It has about a 7 second delay to allow you to shut it off once it detects motion, and i have no use for the strobe light but for the money im sure this product will stop the next would be theives</review_text>
This alarm is higher quality (but more expensive) than most other small battery-operated apartment/home burglary alarms, and can sense movement quite well. To me, it was a big plus that not only does it have a loud audible alarm when tripped, but also a small strobe-like pulsing light, as well as the ability to turn the unit on and off with the single (included) remote control (FYI: In fact, the remote is the only way the unit *can* be turned on or off). It also looks somewhat imposing, as if it were part of a "real", hard-core wired alarm system. The only slightly negative issue is that the remote control only works from a range of about five feet (the alarm's motion sensing capability, however, is far longer than that -- but this is not a problem because the alarm is delayed for about 12 seconds to allow you to get close enough to turn the unit off before the alarm/strobe activates). You may also want to purchase another remote (which Amazon also sells) if you have a spouse or a child.</review_text>
I had this for about a month now.The GoodIts nice and loud. My ears will ring all day if I set it off. Also it can stand of a table or you could mount it on a wall. It is very easy to arm and disarm. I have had it not go off wrongly once. Cheap but works good.The BadThere is no off button on the unit but that might be for protection. You know so a bad guy can not turn it off. It will turn itself off after a few minutes with nothing moving. They could have put a push button code on it though to protect it. The biggest problem with it is you have to get up close to arm and disarm it. However, you have plenty of time to do so before the alarm goes off.All in all a good product. Main use would be to protect smaller rooms. You don't want this if you have pets or kids that walk around all hours of the night.</review_text>
The picture makes this cover look transparent, but it is actually very heavy-duty. I recommend this cover especially if your bike is exposed to wind and dust where it is stored, as mine is</review_text>
It's a common scenario.  You haven't taken your raft out in a year or more because you've just been too busy to be bothered with it.  Finally, you're camping at a lake for the weekend and you excitedly bring your raft out.  It was great last time you inflated it, so there should be no problems, right?  You get to the lake, bring out your boat, and pump it up real tight.  You place it on the water and go.  Ten minutes out, your raft isn't quite as solid, but you dismiss it as the cold water causing the air inside to slow down - lower pressure.  Another ten minutes and your raft is practically bending in half.The Seahawk 200 will not give you this problem.  The PVC is clearly sturdier than a typical cheap raft.  $25 is a cheap two person raft.  I don't get the raft out that often, but in five years, it has always been reliable.  You won't fit two large people in it, but my wife and I fit okay.  The only downside is the pump.  It sucks.  It is too little and will take a while to fill up.  Get either a big foot pump or an electric one and you'll be much happier.</review_text>
Perfect for 1-2 people. Excellent build quality. Wood handle feels very comfortable. Even an umbrella this large holds up well in windy conditions. 62" is a bit deceptive, since it measures the circumference. I was told by Gustbuster this is the standard for measurement in the industry. Actual size is 51" across from the tip of the ribs, and 47" across from the fabric between ribs</review_text>
I live on the stormy coast of northern California and bought this umbrella to keep me dry during my 1.25 mile walk to and from my bus stop. I am very happy with this product. The only quibble I have is that it's a tad too big sometimes to squeeze between the power poles and some overgrown bushes. But that says more about peoples ability to control their shrubery than it does about the umbrella. I'm glad I chose the GustBuster model with the curved handle instead of the straight one. The handle fits my hand perfectly and is easy to control in sudden wind gusts. The center support is long enough so my arms can maintain a relaxed and natural position. I wholeheartedly recommend this umbrella</review_text>
Umbrella is great minus the fact that there was a small plastic cap that gets glued/nailed into the top portion of the umbrella. The small nail seemed to split the plastic cap and it fell off. Cant say I think this is the best method to secure the top but I dont make umbrellas.Doesnt seem to affect the umbrella and I didnt feel like dealing with shipping etc again so I just kept it</review_text>
I bought this umbrella for my mom for christmas a couple of years ago. We live in Los Angeles and don't get much rain, but when it does rain, it pours and is windy. Every time I go over to her house and rain or umbrellas are brought up, she says that this is the best umbrella she has ever had. She loves it and it is sturdy and holds up. I am very happy with my purchase and so is she.</review_text>
Excelent product, keeps wrists protected and makes grip comfortable for lifting, defenetly a must have item for those ho work ou</review_text>
I am very pleased with my purchase of the Valeo Wrist Wrap Lifting gloves - though I do not use them for lifting.  Rather, I am in a manual wheelchair and these gloves, with the full 3/4 length on the fingers and the incredible soft, "sticky" leather helps me to move my wheelchair with ease and comfort - and the double thick leather in the palm and "thumb cradle" makes for long lasting performance.  I have, and still do, recommend these gloves to other wheelchair bound people who use manual chairs.Furthermore, the service I recieved from Amazon was first rate.  Fair pricing, quick shipping and on-time delivery made this a most enjoyable experience</review_text>
this pot is perfect for cooking hot meals.  I can use it when going to sports games or just  for soup at home.  the keep-cool handles acctually always keep cool, which is so important for someone who is always on the go.  this is an easy to clean pot which is great for someone like me who hates to wash dishes</review_text>
I'm a yoga teacher, and I love these bolsters.  I ordered both the  round and rectangular bolsters for my home practice.  They are both exactly what I wanted - the perfect size, dimensions, and firmness.  Excellent price, too.  I would definitely recommend them</review_text>
I bought this bike from Target about a year ago and I ride it almost every day.  It rides very smoothly, the gears are easy to change, the seat easy to adjust, etc.  It's just an all-around good quality bike.  I wouldn't trade it for anything and would highly recommend it to anyone out there.  I'm not too sure about buying bikes online because you have to assemble them but I recommend going to your local Target to pick this bike up and give it a little test ride.  You won't be disappointed.Also, my fiance has the men's Ranger bike which we purchased about a month ago and he loves it too.  The Ranger's are great bikes if you are looking at riding around your neighborhood or on paved streets.  They do quite well on slightly rough terrain but they slide a good bit if you are on soft sand.  They are definitely road bikes.  No complaints here</review_text>
this bike is the best I ride it every day and have never had a proble</review_text>
After many pounds and many years of not riding, I decided to get a bike so I could ride with my kids.  I have had back surgery so I was a little concerned but this bike seemed to allow me to sit up a bit straighter and put less strain on my back so it has been perfect.  I ride in town on the road or sidewalks and it is great.  I would highly reccomend</review_text>
I went to the local bike shop, looking for a bike for my wife (no, not a trade). When I explaned that I wanted a middle of the road, multi-speed bike for recreational use, he recommended the Schwinn Ranger at Target (he also recommended Target for the trunk bike rack, which I purchased).&#60;br /&#62;He also recommended that I bring the bike in to him for reassembly. His recommendation for the additional service made sense to me because once the bikes are assembled, even if they are assmbled properly, they are out on the floor for anyone to adjust however the might choose. Having a professional assemble the bike is the reason I went to a bike shop anyway.&#60;br /&#62;My wife is pleased as punch with her new bike.&#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;</review_text>
Now that I have this bike, I love biking!  I bought it for a few reasons....so that I could have a fast way to get to my classes at my college, so that I could learn more about biking (and relearn, essentially) while getting some exercise, and so I would have a chance to give mountain and trail biking a try.So far, I've really enjoyed this bike and had very little problems with it.A few downsides and tips:1.  It's not lightweight - actually it's fairly heavy, I'm told, in comparison to other mountain bikes.  (But I guess the upside is that you get a better workout!)2.  The handlebar grip covers keep sliding off.  This can be very dangerous.  If you buy it, you should figure out a way to secure them so they don't slide off while you're biking!3.  The paint job is very nice (I've gotten lots of compliments from other people soley on how pretty the bike is!), but since it's light-colored, scratch marks from bike racks may show more easily.4.  The brakes were "loose" when I first got it, but they were easy to tighten as soon as I learned how to do it.  So don't make a judgment on the brakes unless you've learned how to adjust them.A few great things and upsides:1.  The bike seems versatile for both trail and roads.2.  The gears are easy to change, I like this feature a lot.3.  The bike seat that comes with it is very comfortable and is easily adjustable.4.  The front wheel is also a quick-release and easy to remove.  This makes it easier for me to put the bike in the back of my car and take the bike to a trail or elsewhere (i.e. I don't need to buy a bike rack for my car.)5.  The PRICE is very reasonable when you compare it to other mountain bikes, and I feel it's a really good deal.  Since I'm just getting started in the sport of biking, I didn't want to spend $600 bucks or so.Anyways, good luck with it if you decide to get it!</review_text>
It's a great product, whith this you have the necessary equipment to play flag football, enjoy it</review_text>
Tried out the set today at the pool, works well.The fins fit good even though I wear size 15 shoe. Snug but not painful.The snorkel could be longer, but works suffieciently... I've never snorkeled before and I think I have it down in a hour... to clear it of water you have to put one hand over the end near your mouth while you blow. Works well enough you can go down, come up, clear water, and keep you head down.The mask is the part of the set that needs help, while trying to adjust the strap, it broke. So I took off the plastic adjustment piece and fed the strap though  the hole where the strap was mounted and it stays better. I think it works better after I broke it and improvised. I think I'll do that to the other side too. Fogged up a bit too, but I bet there's a secret about that too...overallFins    A+  not too big, snug fit for larger feetSnorkel B-  easy to use once you get the hang of itMask    C+  strap adjustment lock sucks, better once you break it & ImprovisePrice/Value A- Best deal I found for &lt;$3</review_text>
We spent a week on Isla Mujeres in Mexico during late March, we purchased this dive set so we wouldn;t have to rent and the gear we purchased was far superior than what was offered.  The value was expectional, and i found the whole process easy, i encourage other consumers to purchase this set</review_text>
For a beginners set, this is a very nice one.  The materials are of a good quality and the price was very reasonable.  Shipping was super speedy</review_text>
I have only used this a few times but so far it is great.  One word of caution is to label your set if you are in a group.  We went snorkeling and almost everyone had blue U.S. Divers equipment and we found it challenging to determine what equipment was ours.  Would give it 5 stars but have only used it twice so cannot comment on durability.</review_text>
I bought this last year for a trip to the Carribean.   I only bought one set for my husband to use.  I used it while we were there, also, and liked it so much I decided to buy another set for myself.  The mask fits well, the fins are great, the snorkel works well and it's easy to get any water out of it.</review_text>
AWESOME ITEM ! GOOD PRICE !EXCELLENT QUALITY FOR THE PRICE !I LOVE IT !5 STARS PRODUCT !!!!!!!!</review_text>
I loved the mask and snorkel gear it worked great for me. I loved having the fins with a fitied heel not just a strap!</review_text>
I bought this set in order to go snorkeling in the pool to practice for snorkeling in the Mediterranean.  The mask is great, with easy to adjust straps (while you're wearing it, too).  The snorkel works really well and hsa several cool features to keep water out.  The mouthpiece is soooo comfortable.  I have a piercing in my frenulum (the thing that connects your gums to your upper lip) and the mouthpiece does not bother it at all (like cheap others have in the past)  The fins work well, but are wider than I'm used to (which is old crappy gym fins).  I recommend this set for everyone!!I use the mask with waterproof earphones and ipod case, and the mask straps don't bother my ears at all</review_text>
this is just what we were looking for. very nice product.fins fit great, the sizes are accurate. masks are comfortable with good viewing area</review_text>
this item has really done some damage on my fat. it only works if you use it! watch your ddiet and excercise regular with thighmaster-it works. i am pleased</review_text>
It was hard to pass these golfballs for the price. I normally play the Callaway HX Hot Reds. Thought I would give these a try and glad I did.The Nitro Maximum Distance hit has far if not farther then the Callaways with a much better feel. They are not as firm as the Callaways for better control. For the money they can't be beat. Its your mistake if you don't give them a try. Plus you get two free hats</review_text>
I have used the Sky Caddie on several different courses and found it to be exactly as advertised.  Its great for knowing exactly where you are on the course as well as situational awareness of fairway boundaries and obstacles.  My game continues to improve as I depend my Sky Caddie... Wish I had bought it sooner</review_text>
I own this and the love it. Works great and is more accurate then the Bushnell, although costs a little more. I have not found a course that it does not have and I don't know if I could play without it now! Easy to use and worth the price</review_text>
I have had this unit for a few months. The first thing that you notice is that it is not a heavy peice of equipment and the controls look fairly complex. However, once you get used to the system, the controls are fairly intuitive. Despite the fact that SkyGolf had some problems over the holidays (ei: Server issue which I learned of while sitting on the phone with one of their customer service guys named Carl) they did manage to get back up and running friday night when I was able to start downloading my information again. As for the bad press so far, some people are just too impatient for their own good</review_text>
This one is the best.  Tough for intense ab training and conditioning</review_text>
These Everlast leather balls are good ones, sturdy and tough. There are several good books avaiible now on medicine ball training and you can search online for medicine ball workouts too. I have found that the 8-9 lbs. balls are a bit heavy for most of my female students that are new to medicine ball training. They do better with a 4-5 lbs. or 6-8 lbs ball. The 8-9 will suit most men of average strength. The 12 or the 15 lbs are about as big as you need to go for a superior workot as you progress. With these Everlast balls I carefully remove the synthetic name tag which makes for a more comfortable catching surface all the way around.</review_text>
As the other reviewer said, don't expect this to be perfectly round, if you want one of those get one that is balanced and not leather.  I prefer this over the plastic or rubber because it doesn't slip when you are sweating.  The only downfall I would note is the stitching is not leather, it is a rigid plastic.  Not a big deal, but I have caught it just right before and it can scratch.  Overall it is great for workouts and working muscles hard to get with typical free weights.  Most places have this for much more money or really unreasonable shipping</review_text>
I like this product.  It is not perfectly round like a basketball, so expect to see a little lop-sidedness.  I think they're all like this because the one at my gym is like that, too.  It can be a pretty good workout if you have an idea of what exercises to use it with.  My wife and I just started making it part of our workout routine.  This seems to be a good weight as I don't think I'd like anything lighter.  The one at my gym is heavier and I think it's too heavy.  We chose the leather medicine ball because we like the feel on the hands.  I have not used any other type, but I like this one</review_text>
When I decided to try bicycling I had no idea where to start.After looking at hundreds of bikes I ordered the  Pacific Shorewood. It arrived in good shape and time and I put it together in about an hour. I have rode several hundred miles nowand had a flat tire once!!! I have had no problems with this bike and would recommend it to anyone getting into bicycling for the first time and not wanting to invest too much into it at first</review_text>
Very sturdy umbrella.  Large footprint so you can have friends/family join you under the umbrella to stay out of the rain.  I like it lots.  As good of a price as you will find</review_text>
These knee pads do a good job of saving your child from getting hurt. Fit well...I also purchased the elbow pads and my 10 year old grandson is much safer</review_text>
This was a cute, sturdy horn. Holding up nicely. The only reason why I am giving it a 4 is because it won't fit tightly on my son's handbars. There are two different size bars. One is too big and one too small. I put it on the one that is too small, so it doesn't want to stand up and stay put. Otherwise it is great</review_text>
The battery keeps the charge very long.  It is very cute and great quality!  Thanks!</review_text>
This very affordable motorcycle has provided hours upon hours of fun for my son. I'd buy it again</review_text>
My husband has the metal version of these that are a bit higher and thinner.  He got them from a sports store in the weight dept.  I have also used regular dumbells which work fine because they are a bit thicker to hold so I find them more comfortable.  When I got these, I was very impressed.  They are more stable, so if you go real wide or real close they don't roll on their sides.  The grip is also soft and thick making it LOTS more comfortable.  I don't have near as much pain in my wrist doing push-ups of any type.  I highly recommend them, especially for women</review_text>
Everlast family training set is so usefull.But there is sth which i dont like. the boxing gloves are so small. anyway I like it</review_text>
Simple, stress-free strap for the minimalist.  The water bottle holder is hard to use and a bit clunky, but detaches easily</review_text>
Even after reading several reviews on this product on how it is bigger than it looks, I still purchased the pack.  Well, they are correct - it is bulky but I found that wearing this pack on the hip worked out nicely.  In addition, this pack is well made.I was looking for a pack that I did not have to wear as a backpack but could still carry many items.  If this is what you are looking for... This is the pack for you.  I was able to stuff a camera, gloves, hat, snacks and many miscellaneous items I purchase during the day in this pack.  Even with all these items, the pack was still comfortable.</review_text>
I got this for an upcoming trip to Disney since the heat is acting up the 2 water bottles come in handy. Only drawback I see is that it is too big, you can't get a feeling from the pictures of how big it actually is but aside from that it is exactly what I needed. Lot's of room and pocket and it can be adjusted in a lot of different ways to match our size</review_text>
This is a nice bike, my daughter is having so much fun. I guess we are lucky that this winter have been kind of "warm". We miss the snow thoug. Overall great product and fast shipping</review_text>
I understand the disappointment of the other reviewers, but coaster brakes makes use of the reverse tantion on the chain, which is impossible for transmission using derailleur mechanism. This is the first one in my list for the planned purchase for my daughter turninig 8. Don't have it, so ca't really rate it, but looks like a good choice. 20 inch model rarely comes with transmission. I will re-rate it when I get it</review_text>
I have the Coleman 533- and have used it for 3 years.  It is great to have the option of running white gas or unleaded gas through it.  This stove works great in the wind, and really puts out some heat.  I use it for all camping and fishing!  Would not trade it for the world!  Great Product</review_text>
Just like the ones used in college intra-murals, excellent stitching and look to be very durable.  Fast shipping, and great deal</review_text>
This is an excellent yoga mat, I had one of my own and bought this for my mom on Amazon. Cant beat the price</review_text>
I should have bought this mat in the beginning of my yoga journey. But no, in my never ending quest to save money I bought enough other cheap mats to have paid for this one. Each and every one of them was unsatisfactory and too thin. This is one great mat. It is so comfortable to use and I do not find it that heavy to tote around. I have a pretty good case of arthritis and this Manduka has made all of the difference in my practice.  If you are at all serious about yoga do make the investment and get this mat. It is heads above all of the other $12 and up mats out there.</review_text>
I have been practicing power yoga 4-5 times per week for over a year.  After mats repeatedly wore out on me, my instructor recommended the Manduka mat.  She has been using hers for over 2 years and it still looks like new.  It took a few weeks for the coating (makes it a little slippery at first) and the scent to dissipate, but after the initial break-in period, this mat has stood up to lots of wear.  I love it so much that I bought one for my husband and one for my mom.The Manduka mat provides great traction.  I am able to hold balance poses easily on my mat (something I have found to be more difficult on softer mats).  It is amazingly durable (no nicks or scratches after a few months of use).  As for the size...I love it.  I am 5'9" and I like a deep Warrior pose - with this mat, I don't have to worry about going over the edge.  My 6' husband agrees.Caution - this mat is a little larger and heavier than most found at the gym or sporting-goods store, so if looking for a mat bag, test out the size and strength of the bag with the mat before purchasing one.</review_text>
A yoga instructor I work with raves about Manduka and - after two years of ignoring her - I finally bought one.  She was right. Great for daily practice and to take to the gym.  It's heavy, but it's worth the extra weight</review_text>
Absolutly the best. Finally I have found the mat that feels right for my yoga.To break it before I used it, I washed it with a semi hard brush and a solution of hot water and white vinegar, rinsed it with hot water, and then let it dry under the sun. This way I had no problem with it being slippery.I am enjoying it everyday for the new dimension it is bringing to my yoga practice, and the feeling that I have made a wise purchase.</review_text>
Perfect yoga mat.  Some cushioning, but not too much.  But on the heavy side if you are wanting to take it somewhere</review_text>
This is a great mat!  After two months, 40 yoga-hours, and at least 1,000 Sun Salutations, the mat shows zero wear.  Out of the box, it was slippery.  However, once the release compound has worn off or been washed off, the mat has great grip even when wet.  In my opinion, this mat makes practice on the old, imperfect hard wood floor at the studio much more comfortable.  If someone can wear out this mat, then they are probably doing way too much yoga!</review_text>
I got these on a whim - I didn't really think I would need them, but I splurged, and I'm glad I did.  They really make it so much easier to use the Therabands.  Plus, I've found that I have a latex allergy, but I can still use the Therabands as long as I'm using these handles.  It took me a minute to figure out how to tighten the bands in, but once I did I found that they were very secure.  These handles are light and feel very comfortable.  I highly recommend them if you are going to exercise with the Therabands</review_text>
I like these. They are purposely lightweight so if the band breaks you don't have some heavy handle coming down on you. I like how light they are and cheap</review_text>
I feel real fortunate to have purchased this product.  I have seem various "interlocking" flooring and the Ironman Deluxe is quite "durable".  I do my 45 minutes of exercising on it (over my new laminate wooden flooring).  So easy to set up and put away, and the interlocking stays in place.  I was going to purchase another product that had thin plastic covering etc. to save on some monies.   I am glad I went for "quality" - it was worth every penny.  THANK YOU</review_text>
I am very pleased with this floor, although suprised how light it was.  I was expecting more of a rubber material, but this has much more cushion.  It seems very durable though</review_text>
My whole family does martial arts so I turned my whole garage into a dojang(dojo). This product is perfect. It is stiff enough to do spin kicks yet soft enough to absorb the impact of falling/tumbling techniques</review_text>
Quality construction, I'm very pleased.  Cheaper than at the sporting goods store, too</review_text>
I put this flooring in my home gym -- total of nearly 500 sq. ft. It has performed absolutly perfectly -- very thick, good cushion, durable, very easy to install. Plus, Ironman is one of the best companies in terms of customer service. I had a question on the product and, rather than try to get a reply from Amazon, I e-mailed Ironman. Not only did they reply, they actually called me within 30 min of my sending them an e-mail!  Answered all my questions - one of the rare companies that actually provides good customer service.I looked at several flooring options from many Internet dealers, but the Ironman product was the best choice by far</review_text>
I purchased the Ironman floor system to expand my current workout space.  What I did not realize was that the Ironman flooring would be so thick.  It is fully twice as thick as my previous system!  The floor is sturdy, bounces right back from impact and provides an excellent surface for aerobic workouts or use of the stability ball.This system cost twice what my old flooring cost, but I wound up ordering more to replace all the old stuff.  The quality is far superior</review_text>
The product works as anticipated.  I was disappointed that the packaging was missing golf tips that were advertised as being included.  This advertising was imprinted on the product's box so it was not just a stick-on label afterthought.  I think someone tampered with the box before shipping</review_text>
...or shall we shag later?  Now if they could figure out how to tee the ball up for me I wouldn't have to bend over at all!  But seriously, I find this product to be a vast improvement over the old shag stick that I was using.  I haven't used it on real grass though, just on the practice mat and net I have set up in my garage.  Given the consistent way the Shag Pro serves 'em up, I think it would also work fine out back</review_text>
Before I got the Cybertool Swiss Army Knife for Christmas, I already owned two other Swiss Army pocket knives:  one that's now sold as the Wenger Canyon Genuine Swiss Army Knife, and the other which was essentially the same, but from the late '80s with the BSA logo, from my early days as a scout -- both of which are small and simple knives.  I've used that last knife for almost 20 years now, and with proper care it has maintained practically a perfect edge and smooth opening and closure.  I love it and it's the reason I still go back to Swiss Army knives: with proven quality, I don't have any real need to try out other brands.I've never been one for the big multi-tool knives however, but I must say that I love the Cybertool.  Of course it has all of the standards, but the real attraction is in the addition of the screwdriver with 7 interchangeable bits (1 regular, and 3 double-sided).  I do a lot of pc hardware work and honestly don't usually need more than one of the phillips-head screwdriver bits, but the rest, even the star bits, come in handy if you've ever encountered security screws, which seems to happen more and more frequently.  For both the screwdriver and the pliers, the construction is solid and the alignment is perfect. All of the tools open and close solidly, and the removable items (tweezers, toothpick, and ballpoint pen) are held firmly in place.  It was always the size of the larger multi-tool knives that turned me off, but this one is just right.  Big enough to house everything I need, but not so large that it feels heavy and cumbersome in my pocket.I gave the knife a rating of "4" for three simple reasons. The first one is the translucent body.  Maybe I'm just a traditionalist here, but I would have preferred the choice of solid red or bare metal; I just don't like the translucent plastic.  But that alone wouldn't have been enough to warrant a lower rating.  A bigger issue is the wire snip on the pliers; a smart addition to the knife, but so small it can be difficult to use.  The leverage is there to make the cut, but the depth isn't -- I have to do two cuts, even with 18 gauge wire.  And I only bring this up because there is room to make it slightly deeper and wider.  The other problem is the placement of the hook.  Instead of opening from the end of the knife on the top, it opens from the bottom with the hinge in the middle. Placement on the top of the knife would have allowed it to be twice as long as it is, while giving greater mobility, and hence, functionality. Had its placement been swapped with the can and bottle openers I could see myself using it more often.Overall, a great knife, and one I'd not hesitate to recommend to other hobbyists.  While it's specifically marketed as a "cyber" tool, it would also be helpful as general tool for anyone working with small parts</review_text>
The product came fast! Excelent material of tools. Many tools for many uses. It's not very heavy. The traslucent make the knife a little more cool! Every tool get outs easily. the blades have enough edge.</review_text>
My boyfriend and I bought the matching mens and womens bikes and were able to assemble both of them in under an hour.  The directions made it seem more difficult than it was, and since the bike only has pedal brakes, you skip the long (and difficult) section for installing the hand brakes.I preferred the look of the bike without the front fenders, so chose to leave them off, giving it more of a "beach cruiser" appearance. We use the bikes to ride around town and for strolls along the boardwalk.  It is perfect for us, and I would highly recommend it to anyone looking for an inexpensive mid quality bicycle, that will be ridden mainly for pleasure.</review_text>
I am a 60 years old lady with probably average technical understanding. The advertisement for the bike said "minor assembly is required". But it turned out that the assembly was somewhat of a challenge, not only to me but also to my husband!We only learned from the Owner's Manual that the following tools were required:- Philips head screw driver- 4mm, 5mm, 6mm & 8mm Allen keys- Adjustable wrench or a 9mm, 10mm, 14mm $ 15mmopen and box end wrenches- a pair of pliers with cable cutting ability.We did not have all those tools at the house and I had to go out and borrow from friends. It would have been v e r y  helpful if the required tools had already been included in the package.In addition, the Owner's Manual covers many different types of bikes and it was not always easy to find the paragraphs relevant to the assembly of this particular bike. It took me two days to finally get everything together!Other than that, this China made bike with coaster brakes is comfortable and sturdy and I now ride it happily around the neigborhood.</review_text>
THIS IS A GREAT BASIC NO FUSS BIKE.IF YOU READ THE DESCRIPTION IT DOES SAY IT IS A SINGLE SPEED!  HOW UNFAIR THAT THESE RATINGS, WHICH WERE THE BUYER'S ERROR, SHOULD BE POSTED!I'M GLAD I DIDN'T LISTEN TO THEM!  I ABSOLUTELY LOVE IT!IT'S JUST WHAT I WANTED! A GOOD OLD FASHIONED BIKE LIKE THE ONE I HAD AS A KID.IT SHIPPED FAST AND ARRIVED SAFELY</review_text>
For years I have tried to find a bike like the ones we had when I was a kid.  I want to ride a bike for the enjoyment of the trip--no hand brakes, no gears to worry about, no leaning forward and holding my neck at an uncomfortable angle so I can reach the handle bars.  This bike is exactly what I have been looking for.  I love it.  I wouldn't trade it for a dozen of those 'fancy' bikes.  I did not have a problem with shipping--it arrived when I was told it would.  One fender is slightly bent, but it is not very noticeable.  I recommend it for anyone who wants to ride for pleasure instead of for sport</review_text>
Love these gloves.  Use them for mountain biking for wrist support and palm padding.  Also, use them for floor workouts for support when bearing weight on hands.  Of course, always use them for weight lifting--easy to adjust stiffness.  I bought two sets for birthday gifts.  Very well made. Had very good experience with vendor</review_text>
Recommended.  The rubber grip on the palm and fingers helps a lot, and these gloves don't get ripped to shreds in a few months like some others I've used in the past.  The built-in wristwraps are great.  (If you don't like wristwraps, there's another slightly cheaper version without them.</review_text>
I bought these for my boyfriend and he loves them!!! Works very well for working out hard...heavy lifting. And fast delivery!!</review_text>
Harbinger makes a great weight lifting glove.  My last pair (Harbinger 130) endured three years of 5 day a week heavy lifting (ok, heavy is subjective but a 315lb shrug is a good glove test).  I replaced the black gel-padded harbingers with these and am ambivalent about the improvements. First, I do not see a whole lot of merit to encasing the back of the hand in leather, especially since the back is only single-stitched.  The flexible fabric on the cheaper gloves worked fine and wasn't subject to loose threads.  Secondly, the rubber pads are never going to be as flexible as the gel pads.  Perhaps if I was pressing 450 instead of half that, then it might make a big difference, but then, I have seen guys get that weight barehanded as well.One serious advantage these gloves do have over the less expensive ones is that the finger tip leather goes all the way to the end and is triple-stitched for reinforcement.  My fingers eventually cut crescents out of the unreinforced finger-ends on the 130s.</review_text>
These are hard to find locally for me (Denver), and are usually priced higher than here on Amazon, by at least five to ten bucks.  I use the XL gloves and have rather large hands in general, so I can't comment on the other reviewers' complaints about decreased grip problems.  I find these help my grip tremendously as the standard 45lb, 2" olympic bars are just too skinny for my hands and rip them up considerably.  The extra padding on these gloves allows me to have the entire bar circumference touching only the glove material, namely the rubber pads.  When I wear my XL gloves and curl my fingers around the bar, the leather fingers essentially go all the way to the tip.After using these for about 4-6weeks (3-5sessions per week), I put them through a wash and dry cycle with regular clothes, cause they do get stinky, kinda like neoprene stinky but a bit more sour.  They never bleed, always come out perfect, almost like new--and any slack or looseness that developed during use comes out and they're tight again.I've had about 7 pairs of these now, going back at least six years.  They last usually about a year or more with hard use.  Typically a stitch line gives out or the velcro gives out (I frequently loosen and tighten throughout a workout), but I've also worn down the rubber patches and loosened them enough from the leather surround that the glove isn't comfortable, although usually still usable.  I suppose if I wanted to go until they were destroyed they'd last about two years.By far the best wrist-wrap heavy lifting glove I've ever used, and a relative bargain</review_text>
I lift about 3 times a week.  This is my second pair of Harbinger gloves.  The last pair I had lasted me about 5 years and so I was sold on Harbinger quality.  Harbinger also fits me better than some gloves.  Basically, I don't have fat hands, but I do have fairly long fingers.  In addition to fit and quality, I was looking for additional finger protection and wrist wrap protection, which these glove have.The gloves are a washable leather.  I have not washed this pair yet, but my previous pair were washed several times with no ill effects to the gloves or to other items in the laundry.Everything about these gloves is great.  I especially like the extended finger coverage, which goes past the lowest knuckle on me up to the midpoint before the next knuckle.  I used to tape there but no longer have to.The only minor downside is the Big Grip feature, which are imbedded rubber pads in the palm and fingers.  The rubber takes a few sessions to break in, and so in the meantime, it's not very flexible.  It is most noticeable on curls, where the additional bulk of the rubber prevented me from closing my fist as much around the bar.  One of the rubber pads was also digging into my finger for a few sessions, but I adjusted my grip and that has since subsided.  If this is a big issue, then I would recommend going for the gel padded Harbinger gloves rather than the rubber padded ones.I would definitely buy these again, and definitely have some loyalty to Harbinger gloves</review_text>
I recently got an Anakin Skywalker, and a Darth Vader FX saber. They are both great. They light up great, and look even better on camera! Highly recommended</review_text>
i hily reccomend this to anyone who loves starwars.when i hold it its just like the real thing and it reacts to every single time you move it! IT IS SO MUCH FUN!!! Please get it so you can share my joy! And remember, IT IS SOOOO FUN!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! =</review_text>
Jake, my son, is over the moon with this board.Thank yo</review_text>
I have been using this board for 4 months now.  Solid construction.  No complaints</review_text>
My son got this as a gift when he was an infant.  He didn't care for it much then.  When my daughter was old enough to use it, we put her in it and she didn't like it, either.  The problem was my childre, who were afraid of water to begin with and only wanted to go in hold us tight.  When my daughter was old enough to use it, my son decided he wanted to try it out and he loved it.  Works well, doesn't tip.  My kids are skinny and it fit both of them</review_text>
For those who wrote this item is unsafe, it is not meant to be a babysitter for your infant.  It is designed as a fun toy to place your infant in while under constant parental supervision.  I have had no problem with it and my six month old loves it.  She hated being held in the pool and this gives her just enough freedom to have fun while still being safe.</review_text>
My son loved it and has gotten good use out of it and now we plan on using it with our newest son too.</review_text>
I bought this item and only used 2 times. My baby dont like the stand holes too small and cause she is not feel comfortable when swim in the pool. Anyway, this product is good but just dont fit for my baby only</review_text>
My daughter used this boat when she was about 6 months old. It was the first time she went swimming.We had a little trouble getting her legs in it but she had a lot of fun!. I think the holes for the legs should be a little bigger.She really liked when her daddy pulled her around the pool! Except for the small leg holes I think this was a good buy</review_text>
I am an expectant mom and look forward to using this boat - a gift - next summer with my daughter. In the meantime, my friend brought her 9 mo. old son to swim with me last week and he LOVED the boat! He had a great time and, supervised as suggested, it worked great for him when we wanted to float around and not hold him in both arms. He's hit the teething stage and tried chewing on the rings/balls at the front, but his sharp little chompers didn't damage the boat at all. He did try to lean into the water from the sides, but with "mom" or me holding onto the boat - handy little handles! - and keeping an eye on him (as all should in a pool with a kiddo)he didn't get very far. Very effective for getting past the initial introduction to a pool</review_text>
This lock is real nice and seems very strong....the thick frame on my bike required me to mount the lock vertically below the seat post, which worked out pretty good. The key with the built in light is a nice added feature. I recommend it</review_text>
This is a wonderful product if you have a cold neck or trouble holding it up.  I heat it in the microwave and put it on my neck.  It's a little heavy, but it's also longer than others I've had.  The price is, I think, very reasonable.  I love it.    klutzy</review_text>
This was a Christmas gift for my daughter.  Only complaint it should come with a kick stand. But other than that she loves it.</review_text>
This is a smooth ride. I chose this model based on an Amazon review which noted that the larger wheels make for a smoother ride. The customer service at Razor is terrible though. They take weeks to respond to e-mails and they don't know about the products other than what is on their website. I had a difficult time researching which Razor to purchase</review_text>
I'm not exactly sure why it was a bit more expensive but she swears "it's so much nicer" than her old one.  I'll take her word for it. The blue is very pretty and neutral enough that she loved the color.  My only complaint is my 3 year old son pulled on the handle and actually broke it.  Seems like it should be a bit more sturdy than that, since he's 3.  Anyhow, it's a great scooter</review_text>
This scooter rocks!  It was delivered quickly and it required no assembly.  It is very sturdy and can be easily folded to store.  My 8yr. old loves it!  He has been riding it everywhere.</review_text>
I bought this for my [...] year old son to replace his old razor scooter. My son isn't the most coordinated of children and wasn't able to glide much on his old scooter. This one looks very close to the old scooter but it is much easier for him to glide and keep his balance. The wheels are bigger and there are some other minor adjustments that help and it doesn't look like a toddler razor at all. Hope this help</review_text>
The Razor A3 is a very good kid's scooter.  It's pretty well built (see below), solid, easy to use, easy to learn.  Our son loves it!  It's a little bit hard to close (but that's not a bad thing really).  Almost immediately, a piece of plastic that wraps around the front of the bed has come loose.  It doesn't seem to have much function other than cosmetic, but still shouldn't happen and gives the impression of less than excellent craftsmanship.  At $44 for the scooter, I can't complain too much.I'd recommend this scooter:  we'd buy it again and would recommend to others</review_text>
The first X6HRM I purchased was very flaky, with the screen blanking out after a button was pushed.  I was about to return it, but found out there was a recall.  The new unit functions flawlessly and is great if you have regular workouts you do.  With altimeter, HRM and timer saving data you can download workout profiles to your PC (average software but functional) and overlay curves to check progress during the season or year-to-year.The only minor complaint is that the unit sucks down batteries.  They're easy to replace though, so buy a few spares</review_text>
These skates provide great comfort and support, a very smooth ride, and a great workout. I have only been using them for a week and can already feel a difference in my midsection! The quality and price are outstanding. Unlike other brands, these skates are true to size, so you can order the same size as your shoes, no crazy math involved</review_text>
The only bad thing about it is the seat is uncomfortable, but other than that the shocks work perfectly and the brakes are so good that you stop instantly and almost fly over the handlebars! :)  And the gears shift perfectly!  It's an awesome, stylish, one-of-a-kind bike!I am eleven years old, and I am 5 feet tall.  Even so, this bike is easy for me to ride</review_text>
This bike is smooth riding and packs great features.  Shifting is easier than any other bike I have ridden.  Only downside I can think of is the seat is a bit hard, but an upgrade takes care of that</review_text>
Assembly is quite easy.  The bike was in fact "mostly assembled".  The frame fits moderate to taller riders best.  Everything is quite smooth.  The front disc brake is worth the extra few ounces if you are heavy and needed the extra stopping power.  The most disappointing thing about this bike is its rather heavy weight at 37 pounds.  Otherwise, it is a fairly good bike with good looks.  Okay if you paid no more than 150 to 200 for it</review_text>
These great free weights are covered neoprene to make them easier to hold.  You won't mind working out with these weights at all</review_text>
Work your abdominal muscles without doing sit-ups.  Its compact size and ease of assembly makes this a great purchase</review_text>
I really like this piece of equipment.  The instructions for setup were easy to follow and assembly was simple.  There were no damaged pieces.  It is very sturdy and looks like it will last for years.  I get a great workout of my abdominal muscles - I think its easier than doing situps because your legs are held in place by the supports, plus you are working out more muscles by hyperextending the abdominals.  I don't use it as much for extending the back but is similarly easy to use.  The first time I used it my torso was sore for a few days, now I am using it almost every day and seeing results in just a few weeks.  Its not too big and have room to leave it in a corner of my bedroom so I can use it quickly in the morning or evening</review_text>
I've had back problems for years, due to spurs on my spine.  When I used a Roman Chair years ago, my back always felt great.  I love this piece of equipment.  It's comfortable to use, it was easy to assemble, feels stable when I use it, and really gives me a strength-building workout for my back.  I haven't tried all of the adjustments, yet, but I'm sure I'll be able to vary my workout quite a bit with them.  Value, comfort, adjustable, and durable, an overall a great value for the price.  I got the Ironman 3-Station Power Tower with the Apex/Roman Hyperextension Bench, together the price cannot be beat.</review_text>
I have had experience with this type of product for many years and it is very useful in maintaining a healthy back.  This particular Roman Chair works well, but could be easier to use if the handles extended out further.  The abbreviated style handles make it somewhat more challenging to get into and out of the bent over position.</review_text>
Good quality roman chair that was easy to assemble.  It is pretty comfortable and stable when being used</review_text>
I chose the 35 mm version of these fenders to put on my commuter, which I ride on 28 mm tires.  I was looking for full coverage fenders to keep me and my frame from getting mucked up riding through the rainy Seattle winter.  The support bar attachment points are very sturdy on the fender end, made entirely of metal, not plastic, and riveted to the fender.  (Some older Mt. Zefal fenders I had before had plastic clips that broke after a few too many bumps to the fender.)  The Nyloc nuts that secure the support bars to the fender attachment points can be readjusted as you get the fenders centered over your tires, but I imagine their built-in locking effect will wear off in the unlikely event you need to fuss with them more than several times---nothing some Loctite wouldn't fix, though.  The mudflaps are flexible rubber and are very securely riveted to the ends of the fenders.  Your pant legs and the folks riding behind you will thank you for the extra coverage.  (I hate catching up to rainy day cyclists with partial or no fenders.)  I try to be careful about my bike, but the fenders get bumped occasionally, and these hold up wonderfully to the abuse, flexing and springing back into place.  I've put the bus bike rack arm over the front fender without any problem, though I don't do that often.  The fender surface is smooth and accepts stickers well, in case you're into reflective tape or other safety/decorative measures.  Finally, I really dig Planet Bike for devoting 25% of their profits to bike advocacy</review_text>
The product arrived on time and was exactly what was described. I would buy from this vendor again without hesitation</review_text>
He is always into air time...snowboarding or skateboarding.  He loves this toy</review_text>
i used this product last weekend, and thought it worked well.  steve and i were able to compare our jump time to each other--though i wish we didnt have to share the air pod.  meant loaning it to him after every run.  a lot of people on the mountain liked it and had never seen anything like it</review_text>
I tried out the AIR POD last weekend on my first trip to the mountain this season.  I never heard of Tech4O before, but they have a nice site with some other really cool watches and stuff on it.  I'm still not sure how it works, but it is so cool.  AIR POD can tell the exact second you leave the top of the kicker and measure your airtime until you land.  Me and a friend of mine had a little comp to see who was going bigger off the same kicker and the most air I was able to get was 3.45 seconds.  Even when we didn't totally stomp the landing or washed out a little bit, the AIR POD still recorded our air time perfectly.  The strap was a lot more comfortable than I thought it would be and the light made it easy to check my air even when it started to get dark.  The last couple of seasons all I did was hit the rails and boxes in the park, but those got old.  Getting an AIR POD really makes getting bombing the mountain for huge airs fun again.  I'm defintely gonna keep it my bag with the rest of the stuff I always bring to the mountain</review_text>
We have really liked it. One of the attachments for the cover was broken in the box but InStep shipped us one out without a problem. I would recommend this stroller</review_text>
The lower compartment could be easier to access, and could include a parent console.  I went online and found that InStep does indeed sell the console, but only for the single stroller :(  Other than that...it is GREAT.  Even better is the price...beats that BOB anyday!Would definitely recommend for all moms who need to restrain those active kids and go for long walks/jogs.  My 2 and 3 yr old (heavy boys) sit in it for 2 hours almost every day and I barely have to push it with my finger :)</review_text>
I bought this stroller recently and am compelled to write a review because I love it so much. It is such a wonderful stroller.  It glides easily, even with one hand.  It is also very easy to open and close and is relatively lightweight, as far as double strollers go.  It stores nicely when collapsed, too.  It has great rubber wheels that make the ride very smooth for the passengers and extremely easy to steer for the adult.I did a lot of research on double strollers and this one seemed like the best to me.  And, it is the best.  I did read a lot of complaints regarding the seats -- especially that they don't sit upright, which is true.  But I have found that my daughter enjoys sitting up and holding on the bar.  She leans back when she wants to rest.  She hasn't had any issues with the seat, luckily.  I was worried about that.  But it turned out to be no problem.I must say, however, that while the stroller is FANTASTIC for walks, runs, trips to the park, etc., it may be too large for using in stores.  I have a tandem stroller that I keep in the car for shopping.  I use this stroller solely for outside trips</review_text>
After hours of searching for the right stroller, it only took me a few minutes after finding Instep and talking to their excellent customer service to know that I had found the perfect one for my family!  We were so excited once it arrived, little assembly was required and we were on our way.  Transporting it is effortless because it folds easily and fits right in the trunk.  I use it everyday whether at the mall, walking around the block or jogging.  My children are very comfortable and love the smooth ride!  It's a very attractive stroller and I get compliments from people all the time.  It was worth every dollar spent and we will use it for years to come.  It also provides peace of mind to know that if we ever did have a problem or more questions, Instep will be there to give us superior customer service!</review_text>
I bought this stroller for my twin girls, who are almost 2.  They had out grown their front-back duo glider, so they love the side-by-side stroller.  It pushes so easy and light and w/ the swivel front wheel option, it is perfect for going shopping or walking.  I do like that the wheel will lock in the event I do want to use it as a jogger.  The only reason I did not give it 5 stars is because the "storage basket" underneath is WAY under the seats and is small.  I have to get on my knees to reach under there to put things in and get things out and the diaper bag will not fit because there is not enough "height" room between the basket and bottom of the seats.  I would also like a stroller caddy to go across the top bar, a place w/ a cup holder and storage for keys, phone, etc.  I do not think you can purchase one for the double stroller.  Other than that, it is a great stroller and a good price.  I definitely recommend it for moms that need a side-by-side stroller, but need to be able to "cruise" the mall or take walks, because it is easy to handle.  It also folds and un-folds very easy.</review_text>
Nice little 3-AAA light for the price,not sure of the runtime though I would guess its about 2 hours near 75-100 percent and then run for about 2-3 hours at a steady decline this is my best guess dont hold me to it though.The 8 LED's are bright its pretty compact about as wide as your palm and roughly 1.25 in diameter,I like it has an octangular shape and will sit without rolling in or on a nightstand.Its a good light at home but not sure of its weather proofing I'm not sure how well it would do or how reliable in wet weather therefor i I would not use it on the road and surely not in military/police lighting.4 stars for for it neat design and brightnes</review_text>
I was given a Sona 8 LED for Christmas, and I now plan to replace all my other flashlights with this wonderful little flashlight.(cars, basement, garage and other emergency areas)The light from this flashlight really incredible. These are the type the lights that you would want to carry in your vehicles</review_text>
I purchased this product after I saw a commercial on TV.The first day I used it, I was sore. The next day wasn't any better. I've been using it for three weeks, combined with a healthy diet, and I've lost 7lbs. and my clothes fit a lot looser. I am not a person who sticks to diets and exercises but this I am able to do. The instructor is not annoying at all. She moves very quickly through the entire exercise, before you know it the 20 minutes are up.When I first got this, I honestly expected something completely different. When I was about to use it for the first time, I honestly was going to send it back because I thought "what real difference can a little machine make?" But it makes a lot of difference. It makes the workout a little more difficult and you don't have to exercise as much as you would just by regular exercise. I've read some other reviews on this product that claim that bruising occurs, however I've been using this product and I do not have any bruises from it.If you are looking to lose weight, gain energy, or just tone up, purchase this product.</review_text>
Just got this product a week ago have used it every other night and can feel the difference already.  Mind you I am eating healthy and doing cardio (rollerblading).  You can feel it working when you use it.  The video, after the first couple times watching it gets pretty boring.  I just do the routine myself, adding a couple reps to each set, without the video.  Good buy</review_text>
I've had the Zone Pilates for about 5 months and just started using it 3 weeks ago.  I have noticed a difference in my clothes fitting although I've only lost 1 pound. The commercial claims you only need to use it 20 minutes 3x a week which is all I have been doing it.  The excercises are very beginner but the tape includes an advanced section.  The instructor is not annoying and she moves quickly through the routine.  THe first day after I first used it, I could barely walk!  Everything was so sore but now I have no problems.  Its getting over the initial soreness.  I would recommend this to anyone who is out of shape and wants to start out slow.  I usually hate excercise but I have had no problem staying motivated to do this</review_text>
Yes, I am still airing the mat because of the strong smell---and it's getting better. But it's also very sturdy and supportive, and it's going to be the prettiest mat in the studio---by far. It doesn't curl at the ends like my other mat, either. I would recommend this mat because of the durability and nice color, especially for the price!</review_text>
At first glance I was very excited the product "looks" really pretty, very much like caribbean blue running water. Once the chemical smell hit my nose I was horrified. I would never have taken this into a yoga studio much less used it in my home. My yoga teacher gave me a tip on getting rid of the horrid stench. I simply tossed it in my regular washer (not recommended in instructions)on gentle cycle with a very small amount of Tide detergent. Once finished I rolled it in a towel to dry it and then let it air dry for a a couple of days. It was good to go and now I love it. Every time I use it I feel like I am floating on water going somewhere thats not stressful. I definetly recommend the product but wash it first.</review_text>
My 14 year old just loves his scooter....he 5'9 and he has a blast on it...it is "WELL MADE!"  Nice product glad we got it!</review_text>
this was a huge hit! my girl loved it, and it's hot pink, perfect! she can't wait to get it outside to ride around. this is perfect for the summer and for providing hours of entertainment</review_text>
I bought this for my six-year old.  She was up and running on it in about 20 minutes.  There is really no assembly aside from putting the handlebar on out of the box.Very sturdy design with easy adjustable handlebar height.  Worth every penny and better than a bike</review_text>
We have two Kick Scooters and we like them very much.  We are 7 years old.  We learned to ride them and glide in two days.  They are nice and light and fold up neatly.  One is pink and one is blue and we bought helmets also</review_text>
My kids recieved them for christmas, before they could get outside.  They were able to ride them on our hardwood floors without making marks and in a small area. Once outside they have held up to everyday use in wet and dry conditions.  Well worth the money spent on these! Great way to keep the kida active!</review_text>
My husband and I went on a snorkling vaction to the USVI. I got persription lenses for my mask but was faced with delimma of how to carry my eyeglasses with me so I could see when finished. I didn't want to leave them on the beach neither did I wish to leave the rental jeep keys and my DL unattended. I used this wonderful folding wallet! It had room for my glasses, my Driver's license, money, CCs, and the Jeep key.I'm sure a thin cell phone would have also fit. Very versatile and COMPLETELY air-tight! This item is lightweight (it floats...so position it to avoid a square sunless patch on your back...I wore mine over one shoulder) Excellent product</review_text>
We used these on a recent trip to Disney World to over come the FL water.  They helped us save over $20/person because we did not buy bottled water.</review_text>
This is a good gun overall.  Solid construction.  The most I can get in the magazine is 38.  It may hold more but given the resistance I'm meeting at 38, I don't want to force it.  The loading tube makes it easy to reload.  The velocity is significantly slower than advertised.  It says 240 FPS, but I would estimate that it is less than half that.  This is my fourth airsoft gun, and the slowest.  Although it has a hop up, even with it off the pellets still rise considerably.  From 30 feet, to hit the waist, aim at the feet.  It is a good starter gun for a first AEG, and will work well in close combat.  Airsoft Central provided really fast shipment.  Amazon estimated delivery date was anywhere from 31 March to 5 April.  Recieved it on 29 March</review_text>
Many U14 players on our team are biased towards this racquet because of its sweet sweet-spot. It's simply a racquet that allows you to FEEL tennis while you play</review_text>
The HEAD Liquidmetal Instinct Racquet is a wonderful racquet for intermediate and advanced players(as said above). It gives the player more control, which is needed for a child (or adult) who isn't the best at tennis. Later on, you can add more power, but this is a very nice racquet to help your form. The colors are orange and silver, which is different than most racquets. Overall, I like this racquet very much</review_text>
I've been looking for a pump with a gauge on it for a long time.With this pump, I no longer have to guess how much air is inthe ball. Now I can tell exactly how much air is in the ballbefore and after I pump it up.</review_text>
This is definately what I was looking for, but I chose the wrong size.  A 7 foot jump rope is probably better for kids</review_text>
I have this raider helmet and I'd have to say the same thing as the last review.  I needed a helmet and went for a cheap one.  It felt like it.  If you aren't going to use it that much, then you can probably get away with it.  But I would go for an HJC or a shoei helmet.  I just purchased an HJC helmet and it feels so much better.  You get what you pay for</review_text>
I just received the GOfit six pound toning ball, tested it out, and it is great! It has the weight you need to tone your arms and abs, but is nice and soft and you get a good grip on it when you are holding it or doing leg exercises.  I highly recommend it</review_text>
This is a nice exercise bicycle that is very sturdy and super quiet. My complaints are the bike comes very poorly packaged and my rear stabilizer bar was shattered and I had to order a replacement.  Also, you can not adjust the resistance levels when using one of the 6 preset programs.Overall, this is a great bicycle and I'm very pleased with it.</review_text>
received this product in good time but it looked like it had gone through a tornado. The bike went together fast but had a bolt missing and the plastic end cap at the rear was smashed. Still waiting for replacements after about 3 weeks. Soon discovered the pulse didn't work and called cust serv. Long story short they were very helpful and friendly/sent me two handle bars, a new computer and finally a new cord that proved to be the correction needed. All in all the bike is is a good buy for the money</review_text>
I received this bike last week, and I couldn't be more pleased with it.  It was easy to assemble, seems well built, and works exactly as expected.  The fit and finish is better than I expected, and it is probably the quietest mechanical device I've ever (not) heard.That being said, as others have noted the box came pretty beat up, but nothing was damaged in mine and all the parts were there.  I did have a lot of problems with DHL shipping it on time, but that is not the bike's fault.  I had one small problem in that one of the pedal straps seemed a little kinked and would rub against the pedal arm, but I was able to adjust that away.  Nautilus (that's who owns the Schwinn exercise equipment name) customer service was incredibly helpful and is sending me new straps even though I'm not sure I still need them.  They were really a pleasure to deal with (and no hold times!)All in all, I highly recommend this product</review_text>
Package delivered with holes,dents and dings, but all in all all parts were there. Easy to assemble. This is the 2nd one purchased. The first came with a broken water bottle and the second had a cracked plastic rear stabilizer,other than that it was fineThank yo</review_text>
This is by far the best purchase I have made in years.  Although the box was beat up on arrival, inside all the pieces were fine.  My teenage daughter and I had it put together in about 30-45 minutes with no problems.  The choice of resistance is great and it's size is perfect for a small living room.  There is virtually no sound, you can EASILY watch TV while doing an intense workout and hear every word.  The bike adjusts to fit almost every height and it even comes with it's own tools so it takes seconds to do.  You can't go wrong with a Schwinn!  Great quality and a big bang for your buck</review_text>
If you are looking for an inexpensive yet well made basic exercise bike, I highly recommend this.  As other reviewers have noted, for whatever reason I received the box in poor condition, including multiple large holes, yet ultimately the only problem turned out to be a single missing bolt, which I bought for $1 at the local bike shop.  I put the bike together by myself in about half an hour, and it fits snugly into my living room.  Very sleek, and it's a Schwinn, which has a great reputation.  I have been using the bike for about a month and have had no problems with it.  The seat is relatively comfortable, computer works fine, etc.  Oh, and the most important thing: this is a steal compared to the sticker price; you really can't find this bike for under $300 anywhere but Amazon</review_text>
Once we finally got the bike together & working properly, we found it very easy to use.  Very Friendly User!  Which we both (my husband & myself) believe is a great advantage to help us get on it to use it, daily.  We like it's sleek size, fits just right our small living room.I must admit in the beginning getting all the pieces here, unbroken was challenging.  Much of a headache, but every one we worked with was very friendly and helpful.  We eventually got it all put together.  and now we love our bike</review_text>
Just went through a one week power outage in Buffalo and here's what helped:1. Crank LED Flashlights are great. I had one from Gander Mountain with 3 leds and you could selecteither one or three leds to light. I also used two Lightwave led flashlights, the 7 led model and the 3led model. Both are great and lasted all week. My favorite was the Freeplay Indigo led lamp. Worked greatand I carried it everywhere. Candles are ok but you can't walk with them, they're dangerous, and theymelt faster than you think.2. Get a led headlamp for hands-free, up-close work. I used a Princeton Headlamp but got the most usefrom a PantherVision ballcap that has 2 leds embedded in the visor. Put it on in the morning and it wasthere whenever I needed it.3. Radios are a must. The Freeplay crank radios are great and a must. I also grabbed the "Safety Cross 6in 1" crank radio/flashlight when I went somewhere - I wish it had AM but it's just FM. Two other greatradios to have are the GE Superadio and, even better, the Grundig S350. I like the Grundig best becauseyou can forget to leave it on and run out of batteries, a great feature. The GE Superradio sounds muchbetter and I used it when I needed a break from Emergency Radio to listen to real music. The GE uses 6 Dbatteries and the Grundig uses 5 buy they last forever.4. Check out the "Basepump". It's a sump pump that operates off your house's water pressure - no powerrequired. It can be your primary sump pump or added as a "power out backup". What a great product.5. Didn't have a generator, would have been nice, not sure I'll get one. If you do, read the directionsand know them cold. Start the generator once every 3 months. Have an electrician rewire your box so thatyou can shut your box off and power your entire house from the generator. If you are not moving for along time consider a natural gas backup generator. If you want something cheaper and portable everyoneraved about the newer Honda generators with the automatic cut back, low oil shutoff, etc. I think it'sthe Honda EU3000is ?6. We had trees down everywhere. I had a Fiskars axe (the lighter head) and a Fiskars hatchet: bothoutstanding tools. Didn't have a chain saw but I do now, bought the smallest sthil model. You reallydon't need much more than a 12-14" bar.7. Keep some canned in your pantry. Fruit Cocktail, soup, beans, tough to eat them cold but they work</review_text>
I have owned this base support rack system for a long time and loved it's versatility and simplicity. Available with locks at each foot that work with a single key, you have the satisfaction of knowing your roof rack is secure.The Thule 300 system works with cars equipped with rain gutters and is one of the most universal roof rack systems available. The load bars are also available in different lengths to accommodate the width of your particular vehicle's roof.Thule manufactures a large number of carriers that can be attached to the LB50 load bars including bike trays, ski racks, boat carriers etc.If your car has rain gutters, and you are looking for a good, sturdy, versatile base support system, look no further. Thule 300 is the best</review_text>
Don't get me worng I know what im talking about I recived this 8 days ago and this gun CAN compete with those M14 you see on this site the rate of fire IS higher than the 14's but these gun's have a tendencey(because they are shooting so fast)to spit out a BB that only goes a few feet but other wise prepared to get blasted by what must be like a a shotgun amount of bullets. My daad and I shot at one of our shovels outside our house and we hit it QUITE a few times. Only use the iron sight the scope is flimsy and worthless. I have even played with this gun during paintball i loaded some 6mm paintballs into it and and snuck behind one of my friend from 15 feet away and unloadded the whole clip on him</review_text>
This gun is an okay gun.It shoots fast on auto and goes far.I have two complaints about this gun.1.The saftey is allways falling out and hard to put back in.2.The trigger is sortof hard to use.Some times when i want to go auto it dosent insted it just burst or single shoots.Also my battery last really long so i dont know what so other people where talking about. This is a all around good gun</review_text>
I got this rack about a month ago - it fits right over my spare - and the great thing is it can be adjusted if you have an off center spare (mine's a CRV). Very easy assembly. It can also be swicthed from car to car easily. The only drawback here is that it is not actually locked onto the car - so it could be stolen right off the tire when it isn't in use ( and the bike with it). What I did was to buy a small chain and lock - and I just locked the rack to the car (The bike locks to the rack) to insure security when I'm in places I don't know well. Overall a good rack for the price (The other off center spare rack is the Thule - a minimum of 160.00, even from EBay - and the assembly is harder</review_text>
As I stated in the main title, this is the best way ,I know , from Italy, to begin a collection of baseball trading cards! Everytime I purchase it, it is a surprise, mostly a good one and only one or two times I was a little, little disappointed!A must have for the beginner</review_text>
Its just what we were looking for in a air bed thank you very muc</review_text>
I purchased this rather last minute before the Breast Cancer 3 Day Walk.  It was definitely worth the money!  It fit great in our two person tent and there was still room for my tentmate to have one also.  The pump was so easy to work.  Since there's no electricity on the walk, I had to have a battery operated pump but didn't want to have a mattress and then buy the pump separately.  The built in pump made it so easy</review_text>
I actually took my Insta-Bed camping. It was wonderful! Very comfortable in my tent</review_text>
I found a pair of these at a fight in california. They are longer, more stretchy and form fitting than any other wrap. I have used all kinds, these protect and support the best</review_text>
I bought these shoes for my Granddaughter's Christmas present and she loves them!  Very pleased</review_text>
I bought one of these in Poland in [...].I loved them from the first ride.It is a lot different than rollerblades but after few minutes you can do superb tricks ! I started to like shopping - it is perfect for riding on the flat floors</review_text>
note, shoes are listed in womens size. kids sizes are -1 from the size listed. example: listed size 3= womens size 3 & kids size 2 (in the tongue) but fits more like a kids size 1. hope this helps future shoppers</review_text>
Hi - I've used a lot of training devices in the past. Polar HRM of several models, the garmin X01 GPS models, stopwatches, even the new Nike/iPod combo and this one really takes the cake for me. I have a scientific background and work in the tech industry, but even though I understand math and engineering, it's not what I want when I am working out. I want simplicity, reliability and features that sit there until I ask for them. I don't want to get a degree in deviceology to make it work each and every time I'm out for a run, hike or bike. Sometimes I am training for a marathon or triathlon - so I'd prefer my unit be capable to help me reach those goals - but it has to be intuitive and stay out of the way when I just want to work out.This model can expand with GPS, or two different bike modules, or a foor pod if desired. It also can be used with the SmartBelt which will work with the T3 during exercise, but the belt stores advanced workout metrics so you could geek out with PC/coach and truly train like the pros if you wish.The unit is well designed, thin, utilitarian yet not overly geeky (I would take it off for a black tie event, but that's about all). The batteries in the watch and transmitter are consumer servicable and the built in training software is a joy to use. Yes, there are five overall modes to the watch and the unit looks good (so there are no tiny text to help remind you what buttons do which) - so you do need to read the manual or get help from someone else at the Suuntu discussion boards that are free online. Once you master the basics of how the buttons affect the software - you will feel comfortable focusing on your workout and not operating a device.I am really impressed how well the unit works and the intelligence and design that went into the interface, the training software that is built in - as well as how well the display works. The built in logs also are great with a 15 most recent workout, plus last week, last month and the last 6 months cumulative data</review_text>
I was impressed with this watch the first day I received and used it.  It is very accurate and has enabled me to increase my training effect very easily.  I encourage anyone who works out to buy it.  Only thing is, it came very scratched from Amazon; but I was too impatient to use it, so I overlooked that</review_text>
Good interface, require time to know how it works. Display very easy to scratch. Training Efect gives you a very good idea the level of your workout.Here it's my concern:According to Suunto T3 user's guide, It calculates the percentages for the Heart Rate Zones without the use of the "resting heart rate" variable.Which method is more accurate?Is possible to change the way how my T3 calculate the heart rate percentage?I mean including the "resting heart rate" variable(Karvonen method)?</review_text>
I use to have a Polar F5, but once I saw that Suunto had come with a new line of fitness monitors I had to try them. Given Suunto's reputation for making excellent quality wristop computers I new they were onto something good, and the product lived up to my expectations. Althow It's not as easy to use as Polar products, It is whithout a doubt a far superior piece of equippment, whith a large array of functions a much larger memmory for saving trainig sessions and a beautiful overall design, Two thumbs up for Suunto</review_text>
The heater element is a slightly different design from traditional heaters like this that haven't changed in thirty years. It's flat and lights easier. The burner is a friction fit like all the others and can come loose if you shake the unit hard. You must use care in handling the liquid fuel for these things. This heater is smaller than the big Jon-E and it would make more sense to have one of these in each pocket. One big Jon-E in an inner breast pocket will warm your whole body.My tip for lighting the heater is to run hot water over the base of the heater to preheat and volatize the fuel. Once running these heaters rely on heat feedback through the case to stay lit</review_text>
This thing is great, be sure to get some heavy bag training gloves with it.  I'm able to punch as hard as I possibly can without killing my hands so it does its job :)  Although kicking is another story, its much harder towards the bottom and my foot regrets that hah</review_text>
Everlast has been around since 1910. They are a brand you can trust and the bags are very durable. If you want to get started in boxing or just purchase a bag for exercising this bag is the ideal purchase. Buy Everlast!! they make good boxing equipment, classic stuff</review_text>
I've had my SolLight bottle for about a month now and I'm impressed. The light is bright enough to be useful and the cap construction (panel, battery, switch) is top-notch.Here are a couple of my "nits" and/or observations:1] The bottle is a polycarbonate, but is not the same thickness as the Lexan used in a more trendy Nalgene bottle. The sidewalls of this plastic do flex a bit. I haven't run into any durablity issues per se, but I wouldn't toss this bottle around like my narrow-mouth Nalgene's, either.2] The battery in the cap is bulky (um, it's a battery!..) which can take some getting used to when drinking from this bottle. You really have to hold the cap from "flopping" back into your face.3] The light output from the cap isn't as bright as some other LED lights I have, but the runtime can't be beat (10+ hours). The light is a good lantern for task lighting situations such as rummaging through a bag or reading a book. Not so great for lighting a room, although the output is adequate to see what you're doing if the power goes out.On more positive notes, the bottle design has a super-wide mouth for easy ice insertion and wash access. Also, this thing is an awsome conversation starter and is my constant companion booklight, too</review_text>
I bought this so I could have some light in my tent while hiking.  It gave off more light than I expected.  I don't know if I could read by it but it's pretty bright.  Perfect for those who are trying to cut wt. on there hikes and have things pull double duty</review_text>
I purchased this for camping/canoe trips as a safe inside-the-tent light.  When empty it's a bit top heavy but full of water it's fairly stable.  The white light won't blind anyone but it provides barely adequate light for reading.  Either light color (red or white) is fine for a night light.  The light switch is a bit stiff but it probably won't turn on by accident.  The top diameter is larger than a wide mouth liter Nalgene bottle.  So far no complaints.</review_text>
This utensil is nearly perfect in both form and function.  Who would have thought a spork could be so aesthetically pleasing?  I bring this to work with me everyday and I can't imagine a better utensil.</review_text>
More functional and stylish than any other utensil.  The serrated edge is like a mini-knife, handy when you need to cut something in the wild or at work</review_text>
This is my second Tennis racket, i have the Wilson US Open as a beginner and played with it for a year. I have been playing with the Head LiquidMetal 8 for a week now and i have to say it is amazing. Extremely light(on the UPS scale stringed it weighed .60 lbs) and packed with a punch this racket has increased my confidence level tremendously, i can't blame anything on the racket anymore so i try extra hard and have definitely improved a lot in just a week. Look and feel of the racket is definitely a plus, it has the integrated vibration dampers so you can't lose it while playing. Comes with a full cover in Black and Silver/Gray to match the racket. I got this with Free Shipping through Amazon - MidWest Sports - with no tax, even the stores can't beat that. Got the Racket and 2 cans of Balls delivered at my door for what other stores are selling only the racket for.Amazon is the best, i am completely satisfied with the whole experience</review_text>
The ball itself functioned as advertised (although as others have mentioned, it smelled for the first few days after I got it).The video was good, btu too easy (I'm a 27 year old guy in ok shape)</review_text>
The ball that comes in the kit seems pretty sturdy (thick outer shell, should hold up well).  I ordered the 65cm (because I already have a good quality 55cm FitBall), but it seems small to me - it isn't any bigger than my FitBall to be honest.  I note another poster said it took over three days for her ball to relax enough to fill it to full size, so maybe that is the problem (although I got this on a Friday and it is now Sunday...).  The workout starts with alot of lunges, which I absolutely detest (I don't mind squats, but Iunges bother my knees, even though I do use proper form).  Once you get past the lunges, the rest of the workout seems pretty good.  The music was kind of bland and boring - something livelier would have been nice.</review_text>
The product is just as described. The video is a bit limited if you want variety, but I bought the product mostly for the ball and the video was just an addition to my collection. The ball is good quality, stays inflated more than I expected</review_text>
This is a great exercise ball. It was the exact size I needed. It was easy to blow up and the DVD is really great</review_text>
Actually quite a well rounded and good-hard video. It really works all your body parts, including arms, legs, back and stomach. The people in the video smile a bit too much, but the instructor is not too peppy, which is good</review_text>
This short ball workout works not only your core but also your lower and upper body using fun unique moves.  I am an intermediate/advanced exerciser and my abs are so sore it hurts to laugh.  The included ball is good quality not thin like other balls I have used. Keep in mind it takes about 3 days to reach full size.  You will need to pump it up and let the rubber relax before continuing to add air. I really enjoyed this workout and the time flew by.</review_text>
I got this workout, loving the FIRM workouts, but wanting something a tad easier then the weighted workouts...something for variety.  I got it and figured I'd play a bit on the ball, it'd be fun.  Well, Allie isn't playing.  She really incorporates a lot of moves and works various body parts in this short 30 minute workout. And I felt it in my core all day long.  This workout will stay in my routine, and while it's not as easy as I thought, it was still fun</review_text>
My sons both have a fly bar.  We have an issue with both.  When calling customer service, I received the best service ever.  They are replacing one and sending new parts for the other at no charge.  GREAT CUSTOMER SERVICE</review_text>
We were glad we went with this pogo stick. It is very durable.  The boys love having contsts to see who can do the most bounces. My husband even joined in on the contest. However he just couldnt keep up.  I will say it was a good call on buying this item.</review_text>
When I started biking to work, I immediately bought a pair of these.  They were well worth it.  Rather than trying to balance everything on my person or stuff everything into a backpack, I can just throw it into the pannier.  It's large enough to fit an entire bag of groceries, yet it collapses to keep it out of the way if you don't need it.The snaps that create a rigid border are a little finicky, but otherwise it works as expected</review_text>
I love this product. I didn't realize how dehydrated I was until I purchased this. I love knowing where I am all the time with my hydration. It's an amazing product. So good I bought another for my husband. You won't be sorry with this</review_text>
My daughter and I have each been using a hydracoach for about 2 weeks.  They are well-constructed and are pleasing to the eye.  Before I mention a few problems I should state that they achieved their purpose of causing us to drink more water so we continue to use them.  Now some problems: When the bottle is first filled, the first few ounces require extra effort to sip.  The measuring device is not accurate.  The bottle is 22 ounces but you refill with about 2 ounces left.  We both found that drinking those 20 ounces registered between 12-16 ounces on the display.  We compensated for this by reducing our goals, e.g. 100 ounces of drinking equals approximately 75 ounces on the display.  I found that the ounces on my display will occasionally jump while the bottle is just sitting.  One time it jumped over 500 ounces.  Two other times it jumped 5-10 ounces.  My daughter has not experienced these jumps</review_text>
I'm fit and athletic and I don't mind a little blood rush to the head...if you are too than you'll like these boots.  It takes about one minute of hanging to get comfortable on the ankles - then after that it's almost like meditation.I hang about every other day for 10-20 minutes at a time.  I usually do it with only socks on for a bit of extra cushion.  Feels great, good stretch, very relaxing.  And if your strong enough, just hang from a pull-up bar as they are cheaper than 'special' bars and just as strong.And it's fun to get the ladies into the boots!!;</review_text>
I have been very happy with the hang-ups and have used them for the last month.  I have not had any issues and they look to be built very well</review_text>
they not the easiest boots to put on, but once they on, they are secure and comfortable to wear</review_text>
I got these along with the Teeter Hang Ups door rack.  The boots are sturdy and comfortable.  Feel confident in getting them.  They work</review_text>
I wanted one of these for a long time.  I just didn't know it.  I always loved the Hangup Boots, but never bought them because I didn't want the big inversion table.  Then I woke up one morning with a drive to get the boots and just find something (a jungle gym perhaps) to hang from.  And then I saw this rack that hangs in your door.  It was perfect!  It installed easily in my studio doorway.  It can be used for pullups or just something to stretch out with everytime I walk in and out of the room.  Our daughter is constantly climbing on  it and inadvertantly getting great exersise.  I did get the inversion boots as well and try to find ten minutes a day to hang upside down.  It gets blood to the brain and takes pressure off the spine.  You can get a totally different work out being inverted.  I highly recommend this to everyone, but especially fellow yogis.  Yoga is great for working out back problems and this rack (paired with the Hangup boots) really helps with strengthening and lengthening the back.  Cobra pose without a floor!I am glad I didn't hessitate in getting this.  I use it everyday</review_text>
Seem to the best value on the market. I didn't research too much, but found them to be the apparent best value</review_text>
I got a pair of these boots for Christmas and even though I'm not sure what all they can be used for, they are great!  The construction is top-notch, they're  easy to use, comfortable, etc.  I seen cheaper boots on the market, but when I'm buying a product to let me hang upside down a few feet above the concrete/tile floor in my house, I want the best product for the job.  ;</review_text>
Very simple installation and then you are done until it is time to replace the batteries.  Remember to install sensors in a manner easy to get to</review_text>
My original goal was a replacement rearview mirror with Compass and Temperature but installation would have been very complicated involving major disassembly of the vehicle. This unit performs as well, if not better and installation was a breeze! The compass actually reads out in degrees and appears to be very sensitive. The wireless remote temerature sensor was easy to install (many choices of location) and works perfectly. The new mirror that I was considering would have cost more than twice as much as this unit. I am very, very pleased</review_text>
It took me approx 30 mins to set this up.  It was easy to install the temp sensor in the grill under the license plate on my Toyota Sienna - I used the included plastic straps.  I put the unit on my windsheild, plugged it in to my lighter, drove around in a circle (easy to follow instructions).  It has worked flawlessly since.  Accurate temp and compass readings.  Backlight automatically goes on when it gets dark.My only complaint is the size of the temp reading - it is hard to read from the drivers seat.This unit is highly recommended</review_text>
Fantastic for 2 ppl, much spare space for putting your backpacks or other stuffs next to you. Fast building, ligh weight and cheap at Amazon!!</review_text>
Just got back from our first trip with this tent, and it performed admirably.  Set up was quick and easy, as was take down.We had high winds and rain, but the tent felt solid and not a single drop of moisture collected or leaked inside. Overall, a great product for the price we paid (bought it on sale).The 5 of 5 rating indicates that the tent is as described and performs all the functions it claims.Was very roomy for two, and lightweight for its size (though it might be a tad heavy for extended backpacking treks - still, light enough to hike with for a few miles).Recommende</review_text>
First, I need to share that I am an avid backpacker.  Though fatherhood has taken away many opportunities from legit overnight trips, I still try to get to the mountains on a regular basis.Second, I need to share that I work at Amazon and am biased towards this product.  I was involved in working with Eureka on the tent's design and functionality.  We designed a tent that was lightweight yet enough room for 3 people.  There is also a ton of ventilation with 2 doors for easy access--both of which can open from top or bottom (again more ventilation).I am using the tent personally with 2 adults and a small child.  It's plenty large, and certainly reasonable for 3 adults.  I love the vestibule where I can store our packs if it's raining--or even use the area to boil water if there's an intense rain.I must admit that I have not personally used this tent in the rain, but Eureka builds high quality tents that are seam sealed to prevent leakage.  Also, we wanted a tent where the stitching from the tub floor wasn't near the ground--to prevent any water from seeping in via the floor.Lastly, I like the color.  Unique but crisp and attractive.  I think most people will like it, particularly University of Michigan fans.Hope you enjoy the tents as much as I do.  (If it's not obvious--the price of the tent is supposed to be incredibly aggressive to introduce backpackers to Eureka's high quality performance)</review_text>
Wonderful bike for the price. My 8 year old daughter LOVES it!Easy to assemble and seems very sturdy</review_text>
the people who write negative comments about this unit surprise me.  I've used many 'ab-machines' and none isolate the abdominal region as good as this.  My gym had one of these and i used it all the time untill someone stole it, so i went ahead and forked over the 180 bucks to have it delivered.I mean Oprah Winfrey gives it her endorsement what more do you need</review_text>
Do all your exercises in an upright position with this version of the Bowflex machine.  It has a smaller footprint than the standard version</review_text>
I bought the Bowflex Xtreme for my wife and now we both use and love it.  My son and I put it together in about 3 hours with no trouble (just follow the instructions carefully).  After only a few weeks it has made a big improvement in my physique.  I highly recommend this product.  It's well made and has a small footprint</review_text>
I assume the Extreme is underappreciated because I can't find reviews on it. I've wanted a Bowflex for a decade but have been too cheap and too busy to seriously consider buying one. I finally pitched all the cheap substitutes and got the real thing. I chose the Extreme because of it's smaller footprint and the ability to do all my exercises upright (lying down on a bench at 5:00 a.m. doesn't do much for my motivation). Putting it together was tedious and the instructions were a bit hard to follow because the pictures didn't always fit the process but basic reading and mechanical skills will get you through it. The training video is pretty good, Tom Purvis knows his stuff. I was surprised that some exercises included in the basic program on the poster were not included in the DVD. Lame, but not an issue with my personal trainer background. What I like most about the Extreme is that I can remove the seat and do several exercises sitting on a large exercise ball to add a stabilization challenge to my workout. I have also found that I can use the Extreme like a rowing machine when I use an exercise ball. It looks like the Extreme 2, which is set up so you don't have to (and thus cannot if you want to) change cable settings, probably wouldn't work with an exercise ball. Not sure about that, but that's my guess.LONG STORY SHORT: Excellent construction and design, great if your workout space is limited, pretty fast switching between exercises, leg attachment is worth the extra bucks but watch for specials because you can sometimes get it added for free. Great overall deal!DOWNSIDES: Short-term: tedious assembly, dvd doesn't cover all exercises. Long-term: 210 lbs resistance isn't going to cut it if you're a serious strength trainer which means an extra $100 for two more 50lb rods.</review_text>
I purchased a power-pro in 1995, began working with it consistently in 2001 and felt / saw immediate results.  I outgrew the 210 level last year and found they'd stopped upgrading bows for the old machine.  It cost less than $100 per year, but I was indignant - mostly because I had used it as an expensive clothes hanger for half a decade.With the XTLU2 I've lowered resistance because the bows are new and stiffer.  I've also used the lat tower and leg attachment past the point of 'gosh, this is fun' to where I feel a nice ache if I neglect those exercises.  I am upgrading the bows now so they'll be ready when I am.I'm trying to decide what to do with the old machine.  They say there were recalls, but I didn't experience any problems.  I can't sell it without the improvements and I shouldn't give it to the Goodwill if there's a danger.  I need to make friends with fat people who just want to try the machine out.  Actually, this is a pretty cool problem to have at this point.Oh, the machine is silent so you can work out whenever you have time.  I get a great sweat within forty minutes and the buzz lasts all day.  It's like nature slipped me a little Valium 5 that makes dealing with grouchy people easy!It is compact, so you really can put it in your studio apartment and pretend it's art when people come over.  Remember that your bowflex is like a toothbrush; you don't share it with other people because that would be nasty for both parties.  Stick to your guns on this one</review_text>
I bought this for my 8 year old when it went on sale for $[...] just before Christmas.  I figured I didn't have much to lose, he mentioned he would like a skateboard but had never really used one and if it only held up for a short time, at least he would be able to try it out.  Was I wrong.  This skateboard is very durable, my 12 year old and his friends have been using it more than my 8 year old.  It has had no problem supporting their weight and it glides smoothly all over my house as well as outdoors.  We have had no problems whatsoever with it and I wouldn't hesitate to tell people to save your $ and buy this instead if your kid thinks he/she wants a skateboard.</review_text>
I purchased 8 of these child carriers for my bicycle rental shop. I have absolutely no complaints about these carriers. Most likely, it will be difficult for most people to put the carriers together and install it onto their bike, but once it is mounted properly, it is well worth it.I have had the child carriers working for about a year, and they have withstood the use and abuse by my customers remarkably well. I would recommend this product to anyone searching for a safe, sturdy and durable product that any family with little ones can enjoy. And I have eight carriers to prove it</review_text>
The product came quickly, was reasonably priced, and was easy to figure out (no instructions came with it).  Some assembly was required regarding the belts and their clips.  I started at 12 lbs and have worked my way up to 20 lbs so far.  Only drawback I anticipate is that it will be too hot to use in the summer.</review_text>
These are great to use and light weight. I use everytime I go camping or hiking</review_text>
Our baby loves this mobile.  It plays music for a long time, and we have never had to change the batteries in the 8 months we have been using it (unlike our first baby's mobile, which needed new batteries monthly).  We like the feature that allows us to remove the arm, and toys, but keep the base attached to the crib so the baby can fall asleep to the music even after she has outgrown the mobile (pulls the toys off, etc)</review_text>
We bought these mugs for camping trips and they are excellent. Just right for early morning cups of coffee and hot chocolate, while breathing the cool mountain air. We like to warm the cups on the grill, while heating the water for hot beverages. We also use the mugs for water while brushing teeth and I use them for rinsing the dishes. The quality is top-notch. The only reason I didn't rate the mugs with five stars is that I wish they were slightly larger, say 12 oz.</review_text>
This is a great little lightweight coffee cup with a very solid hard enamel coating over metal.  The only problem was that Amazon just wrapped these in a very thin sheet of parchment paper so two got chipped in shipment.  Amazon was awesome though and got the replacements to me in two days and paid for return postage.  The replacements came and were in excellent condition when they arrived.</review_text>
I don't own one of these, but I use them at the gym every chance I get.  I'm a big fan of trying new things to stay in shape, and the BOSU trainer is amazing ... balance is crucial to many different things, and the BOSU is a great way to prep for the snowboarding season, work on surfing technique, and simply train your core muscles in ways that you never knew possible.  This should be a part of everyone's routine</review_text>
This knife is of the very highest quality. I had bought one some years ago as a gift and always wanted one for myself. The price was very good. Shipping was fast. I would highly recommend this product and company to any who are serious about fine knifes</review_text>
It is the best backpack I have ever seen</review_text>
I have two Illuminators.  One has a radio.  I use one every night when I walk my dog.  It gives great light on one and very bright on three LEDs.  I know there is another brand that doesn't work this well.The one with the radio works well also.  I have been using them for several months</review_text>
I bought this pack for my Trek 6000 mountain bike. It is just big enough for a spare tube and the Blackburn Airfix inflator/multitool. It is small enough to fit perfectly under the back of my saddle without any protrusion and small enough not to add too much weight. I chose the velcro version because they can be tightened up closer to the bottom of the saddle and more securely. The other version seems to hang from the saddle and bounce freely under it.As a side note, I have the small aero wedge pack with velcro for my Trek road bike because the tube takes much less space. A tight fit with both and carrying what I really need in case of a flat, chain problem or necessary tweak</review_text>
we bought this skate for our 6 year old.  i love that it adjusts sizes.  it is very sturdy, and rolls smoothly.  the only thing that would have made it better if i had known was the brake system..... for someone so young i would have picked the ABS system ... the braking is somewhat difficult for someone so young.  she loves the look though.  great colors for a gir</review_text>
I purchased this bar for my kids few months ago. It was easy to assemble and I fixed that on my porch door. My kids like the pull-up bar so much that I ended up buying another one and I fixed that in the basement. I am highly impressed with the strength of the product. Highly recommended.MKPennsyvania</review_text>
The bar worked great and held really well for the first set of brackets, but held a little too well for the second set. I can't get the bar off anymore!!! The telescoping mechanism stopped working. If anyone has any suggestions..</review_text>
This bar is great.  It was easy to put up and the pad on the bar is soft on the hands.  The only problem with the bar was that we couldn't get the pad to move so it is centered on the bar.  This is a minor complaint.</review_text>
This chin up bar works perfectly as described. The padding on the bar is a nice addition and wont hurt too much if you run your head into it. The only problems I had with it, is that while installing, the instructions didnt suggest pre-drilling holes into the door frame. This helps the wood not crack during installation. Otherwise, instructions are very easy to follow and the frame is very sturdy. Im about 180lbs and have had no problems with it. It also comes with two extra frame mounts to allow you to move the bar from a chin up bar to a bar to hold your feet down for sit ups. Overall a great product</review_text>
I read the reviews about this bar falling down, and even though I weigh 220 lbs, I bought it anyway.As long as you install the brackets, it will hold up anyone.The main thing I like about this bar is that the brackets will hold the bar for any direction of pulling.There are only two downsides to this bar.  The brackets stick out into the doorway a good 1 1/2 inches on each side.  Also only one side of the bar has the foam grip</review_text>
Ever since I started using the chin up bar my upper and lower body strength have improved. Thank you</review_text>
I've worn mine since Decemeber of 1999, it's still running strong and accurate.  Gone through a few Heart Rate Chest straps, batteries and also replaced the bezel and strap.  Would love to by my next Suunto but not ready to pack this one away.</review_text>
Product is very good in comparison with competitors.. much softer and after 10 minutes of workout- you forget that they are on your wrists... only negative point- a bit too short around the wrist, but as I understand- they are designed for women anyway :</review_text>
Although these plastic bars may seem a bit flimsy at first, the thick quality of the material won't let you down.</review_text>
This product is made of plastic I thought it was made of steel but it works fine</review_text>
My son has no problems doing push-ups with this bar...he is happy with this item</review_text>
I bought these a year ago at Oshman's (now Sports Authority) because they are remarkably light and easy to take apart and reassemble during trips.  Even though they are all plastic, I never had any problems with them not being strong enough.</review_text>
I sat in the chair I'm 5'4" I bought the chair for someone who is 6'2" and 250lbs.I think it'll fit him a lot better. I liked the material the chair was made of and the fact that the pillow was detachable. It was well made for a larger perso</review_text>
Great fenders for bicycle. Made for a bike with standard brakes, though my bike has disc brakes (had to use a litlle of my McGuiver skills to make it work). Again, this is made for regular brakes, so if you buy this product, be prepared for a little extra work on installation</review_text>
These are tough plastic fenders that won't rust and have pre-mounted stainless steel support rods.  Since these are a universal mount it took a little thought to mount them on my bike.  One of the mounting tabs did not work on my bike so I had to drill out the rivet that held the tab and drill a hole in the rear fender to mount it.  Had to remove the rear wheel to mount the rear fender so some tools are required and I had to supply the mounting screws</review_text>
Despite its awkward size, it was comfortable to wear and did what it was supposed to do</review_text>
As a personal trainer, I have yet to find a more versatile piece of equipment.  It's a great ab and core workout, but I also use it for upper and lower body exercises, with and without weight, as well.  I highly recommend this for beginners as well as veterans to exercise.  You'll love it</review_text>
I just received my treadmill and I absolutely love it. It arrived much earlier than expected and was a snap to put together. My husband had it working in less than an hour. He's a big guy and the deck is the perfect size. It also has a cushioned deck which prevents jarring of knees and back. It is very sturdy and should last the distance. I would highly recommend this treadmill</review_text>
Needed a treadmill and saw this was top-rated in Consumer Reports. Though it's pricey, I'm tall and big and saw this could handle my size and stride. I've never had a treadmill and knew some baby model wouldn't do the job.  BOWFLEX has one of those pricey but good quality names, I thought...much like BOSE for sound systems.  They both are B's also!It was a snowy Friday in Wolfeboro NH when it was to arrive only a week from ordering and EAGLE USA delivering it.  Was going to order from one of those sports outlets but look at the delivery reviews....they are terrible!  So I flew with the EAGLE!  Called them to make sure it was going to arrive during the big snowstorm storm that day in the 12-5pm slot...they said it may be a bit late and even called to say it would be there at 5:30PM and we all waited for it longingly looking out the picture window  Yes, they arrived at 5:30pm and manhandled the truck into the driveway backwards to my open garage while his sidekick surfed on the loading lift of the truck ....almost falling off.  I slipped them a $20 - he barked 'Give it to the kid' so they would deliver it over the 'threshhold' into my basement which they did.I went up to watch tv and my wife had it assembled in 2 hours without me....she said it would have taken longer had I been there helping.  I did help actually with one piece fitting it in a bit.....not sure why it was a bit tight but we got it together.This thing is a monster as it weighs....well, close to my weight.  It is not junk as it feels top flight and looks it!  I don't plan to move it at all.  Use it every day now and already can feel and see the difference after 2 months!!  The programs are a but much for me so far so I just set lift and speed as I need to in the 20 minute general program.  Eventually, I hope to use the programs as there are a lot of them.  I like how it tells you miles and calories burned.  I like to watch the display changing...........beats watching an EKG in a hospital bed!The fan at highest setting is too weak for me and you can't aim the direction so only benefits me much, as I'm tall, if I'm slumped over gasping for air.....which is a lot of the time.If I could get the heart monitor around me (my wife says 'Don't even try'), I would use it.  Maybe in a few more months.Well, this is a great unit especially here in central NH where 8 months of the year are inhospitable unless you're Yukon 'Cornelius' Jack!  Don't know why I'm up here, but I know I'll live long with my BOWFLEX SERIES 7.Thank you and happy treading - SHAMBO from Wolfeboro, NH!</review_text>
I was reluctant to spend the money on this treadmill at first. However, after reading independent professional reviews on treadmills I decided to try it. I'm glad I did. I have no complaints about this treadmill in terms of it's functionality and appearance. It works wonderfully. It feels sturdy. I can run on it b/c it has plenty of room. I keep it folded up when not in use - so it really doesn't take up an enormous amount of space (it is big though, don't get me wrong). The only thing to keep in mind is that it's HEAVY. It really does require two people to get it in your home and set it up</review_text>
The treadmill is high quality and runs fine, although it is a bit on the loud side when running on it.  The features and settings were exactly what we were looking for.However, be warned about the free shipping.  Amazon contracts local shipping companies to deliver the product.  I thought everything was going to be good when the shipping company called me to set up a delivery window.But, when they arrived, they laughed when I said that I cleared the way down the steps to the back basement entrance where the treadmill would be placed.  The main delivery guy said "Man what are you trying to do, break my back?"  He then proceeded to tell me that the delivery was for "threshold delivery" and that meant that they would carry it to the threshold of the front door.  He then said that if I wanted it brought somewhere else, I needed to pay extra and make those arrangements ahead of time.It got a little ugly at that point and told them that their delivery slip said nothing about which threshold to bring it to.  So I gave them the choice of bringing it to the threshold of my back door or loading it back up on the truck.  They reluctantly agreed to bring it to the back door.After they left, I realized how heavy this thing really is.  I estimated over 300 lbs.  It took all I could muster to get the box over the sliding door track and inside the house.  Even if you broke down the box and carried the pieces in one by one, the treadmill/motor portion of the device is all one piece and is easily 200 lbs.  The only other pieces are the console and support arms which weigh very little by themselves.I ended up straining my back in the process of bringing it in.  I am most angry at Amazon for not making it clear that the delivery was only to the door, not inside.  Also, Amazon did not offer any other shipping options at the time of the order.I will definitely think twice about ordering a large item from Amazon again</review_text>
Our family is enjoying the Bowflex series 7 treadmill as part of our exercise routine.  It is great because it is so easy to use and fairly quiet.  We set it up in front of the television and the time goes by fast</review_text>
Works as advertised. Heavy, industrial strength. At around 300 pounds, had to dis-assemble the box before moving individual components to the second floor. Need at least two people to move the shipping box from home entry to workout area in the home. Using it everyday. Easy to fold up and down. Easy to program and use. Nice safety cord feature will stop the treadmill. Heart beat sensor in hand rails does not work consistently. Heart beat monitor chest strap works great. Some assembly required, but not too difficult. On board three speed fan is a nice touch. The treadmill runs relatively quiet in relation to running on it. We love it</review_text>
I got 20 of these for a project and just for the hell of it I loaded em all up and shot through a clip in each. One had so little power I couldn't actually feel the impact from 2" away. Another seemed to want to shoot at 90 degrees from where you were actually pointing. the remaining 18 were actually pretty spry. And hell at this amount with shipping I was paying a buck a gun! A buck for a toy gun with a removable clip and a working slide is good enough right there, the fact that they shoot is a bonus</review_text>
When i got the gun i took it outside to shoot it and it went about 2 or 3 yards. It is still a good gun for 00.01!!!!</review_text>
even though the total price ends up being about 6 dollars, it's still a great gun for that much money</review_text>
Buy 2.  I did and the first one was broken but the other one has been working great now must have gone through 150 bb's alreadyGreat gunMust Bu</review_text>
Fun little guns. i shoot my little brothers with them when they get out of line. they only sting a little. probably clock in at around 100-150fps. Way worth the $7.02! Loved them</review_text>
I bought this Scuttle Bug for my 2 year old son & he loves it. Everything about this product is wonderful. I would highly recommend buying this. If you are limited on space it is not a problem, just fold it up & stick it in the closet. I definitely give this 5 STARS*****</review_text>
I thought this trike would be perfect for my toddler who is 22 months and still a little too short for the 10inch trikes.  Unfortunately he is way too big for this item.  It isn't adjustable at all and is really more suited towards a one year old.  I wish it was just a little taller because it is a great design and seems very durable.</review_text>
Excellent product.  Using it for knee rehab, but it also work well for my wife with foot and heel problems.  Much more difficult than the blue or green foam models.  Very well constructed.  I weight almost 200 pounds, and it handles my weight well - adds a lot of challenge to balancing exercises</review_text>
this gun is good but my friend got one that shot like shiz. he couldnt hit me from 5 feet away with a shot right at my body. idk what was up with his but airsplat took it back and gave him a refund. airsplat always has excelent service</review_text>
this gun is very nice. ive had it for about a mounth now and i use .25 grams. i can hit a stopsign 200ft away withease.[especially when you get a scope and tune it in. DOESNT COME WITH SCOPE!!!!!!!!! overall it is a great gun and shoots really hard too</review_text>
So, I'm onto my third bike. Not that I wanted to be on my third bike, it just turns out that normal chain & cable locks just do not stop people from stealing bikes! Of course, it says volumes about a person that would steal a piece-o-crap bike, but I digress.So, this time I got a real bike (Hey, I commute to work on a bike, and I thought, "What the heck?"), and I really want to keep this one. So, it stays in the house or in my office."But", you say, "what does this have to do with the OnGuard Beast 5017 Bicycle Chain Lock?" Well, like I've already said, I want to keep this bike. So, I got one based on the reviews of this lock.`Know what? It's great! Most people look at it, and think it would suffice for a Motor Cycle. If that's what they think; all the better. This thing looks intimidating. And talk about a conversation starter.There are some caveats to this thing though. It's heavy - almost 10 lbs. - so this is not for the bike racer. Carrying it does cause some challenges, like where do I put this thing? I now hook it around my (rear) bike rack. It could be 1 or 2 links longer, but I can still lock it to almost anything. And it requires at least two hands to lock!But, if want peace of mind, this is your lock</review_text>
As an experienced cyclist who relocated to Manhattan in the summer of `04, I wanted to purchase the most theft resistant chain available. My ambition was to use my Trek 3900 for both exercise and transportation, while not having to constantly worry about it having it stolen. Having experienced several bicycle and bicycle part thefts in Boston and Chicago, I decided to thoroughly research bicycle chains and locks. Stories about the vulnerability of U-locks and the clearly stated Kryptonite null-and-void-in-New-York warranty steered me towards a hex chain made by OnGuard.As a previous owner of Kryptonite and Master U-locks, I initially wanted to stick with a tested brand. However, lessening the appeal of Kryptonite locks was a widely publicized story in 2004 explaining how a design flaw in certain models allowed them to be compromised with a Bic pen(!), causing a recall. In Chicago, I had a frame destroyed when one thief attempted to break a Master U-lock with a long pipe. While this failed attempt slightly bent the U-lock, it collapsed the main tube of the bicycle. Hence, I thought using a chain manufactured slightly lesser-known brand without publicized vulnerabilities would be a good idea -- much like purchasing a Mac would protect against Windows viruses.After one year of use, I have been very happy with the 12mm Beast Chain. At 9.5 pounds, this chain is at the upper limit of what one can affix to the bicycle and still be able to ride it. In my case, I am able to rap it around the seat post and have enough clearance for my legs. For a typical bicycle, the chain adds about 40% to the overall weight. When I purchased this lock, I was unaware that a 14mm, 15 pound version existed. Even so, I would not have purchased this model, which is more appropriate for a motorcycle or piece of construction equipment.The design of the Beast chain is exemplary. In addition to having very long, thin keys and complementary keyhole, there is a sliding keyhole cover, making the mechanism very corrosion and pick resistant. The thick polyethylene coating may serve a similar purpose while preventing freezing, which has been used by savvy thieves to make the lock more brittle. For the record, I used commonly available electronics freezing spray to embrittle an earlier-generation Kryptonite lock when I lost the key. With five hits with an over-sized hammer, the protruding barrel lock and supporting metal cracked right off. Pretty scary.While no chain can eliminate the possibility of bicycle theft, I still have my Trek. It is impossible to tell what tactics thieves will employ next. It seems unlikely that a conventional pair of bolt cutters could cut this chain. When I emailed OnGuard customer service, they had no straight answer on its cut resistance. My impression is that only an oxyacetylene torch or hydraulic cutter could break the links. Both techniques would attract a great deal of attention. Hence, secured with the Beast chain, your bicycle will be about as safe as one can get in a public area.</review_text>
This seems, to me, a very high-security lock. I bought it to protect my new bike, after my previous bike was stolen by thieves who cut through an OnGuard Rottweiler armored cable lock.I don't think the OnGuard Beast could be cut with hand tools. The shackle of the lock is such a tight fit with the chain that it leaves no room for pry bars to pull it apart.However, this is the heaviest bike lock I've every seen. A typical U-lock weighs less than three pounds. (Kryptonite's New York U-lock is just under four.) The Beast 5017 weighs almost ten, more than even the Kryptonite New York Fahgettaboudit chain, which it resembles.You'll have to have some way of carrying it. I don't think you can simply wrap such a bulky, heavy chain around your seat post, though I ride a recumbent and say for sure. If you expect to put it in a messenger bag or backpack, put ten pounds of rocks in your bag and ride around a bit before purchasing this lock. I suspect the only good way to carry it is to strap it down to a rack.Also, the Beast's two-piece padlock is inconvenient. When you unlock it, the shackle pulls all the way out and separates. Usually it falls onto the ground. When locking it, you have to assemble the chain, shackle, and lock and hold them together (all the while keeping the bike in place) while you turn the key. OnGuard could have made this more convenient by having the padlock automatically lock when you pushed the shackle in.OnGuard supposedly offers an anti-theft warranty with the lock, though the warranty that came with mine said that is "void out of state of New York". Like most lock warranties, you can't make a claim without evidence (the damaged lock) that someone cut through it with hand tools.Pros:Extremely secureMore flexible than U-lockCons:Very heavyDifficult to carry on bikeA bit clumsy to useRecommendation:I would recommend a good U-lock to riders with bikes that can use one. Get the OnGuard Beast only if you need super-high security or have a bike that won't work with a standard u-lock</review_text>
My four year old loves all things Super Hero, especially the Power Rangers. This was a huge treat! He slept inside of it on the top of his bed for a week after receiving it, and now uses it as his area rug or a mat from which he watches videos. It's definitely a "junior" sleeping bag though. Doesn't provide much cushion support, but at this price and this age, definitely worth it.</review_text>
My 5-year-old nephew loves this sleeping bag.  It is comfortable and the pictures on it are of good quality.  He thought it was very cool and uses it all the time</review_text>
I bought this for my 7 year old son and he just fits in it and hes a small guy. But he loves the power rangers so he was happy and thats all that matters</review_text>
The only place I could hang my 80 lb bag is in my garage, however, my ceiling is so high that it is unrealistic to hang it from there.  I got this, and using the mounting method suggested by "C.H." below, it's working perfectly.  I got in a few good workouts this weekend that included kicking and it seems to be very sturdy.  When I'm done, I just swing it to the side and it's out of the way.I don't forsee any problems, but I'll update if something should happen</review_text>
Umm...you spelled intelligence wrong.  Which is always most amusing when someone is mocking the intellect of another person.Way to go, brainiac.Less punching, more schooling</review_text>
I have been looking for a convienient way to hang my 100lb heavy bag.  This mount is very sturdy, I used concrete anchors and hung it on my basement wall.  I would bet that it could hold well over 100lbs.  I think that limitation is based on hanging it on normal 2x4 wall studs.Overall great product, but caution it doesn't come with bolts/screws to hang it, you have to visit your local hardware store for that stuff.Then when your all done hitting the bag you can just swing it out of the way</review_text>
I bought this to replace another one- that had a plastic dome, and was not seamless like this one. While the lid is a little difficult to remove, it seals in the coffee flavor, and is a breeze to clean allparts in the dishwasher. We use it 2-3 times daily. This is the best one that I have found, and would unquestionably buy this again, even to just have an extra pot when the family all gets together.Will never go back to the automatic coffeemakers</review_text>
The coffee pot is simple and well made. I still managed to break the glass dome after one week. I contacted Coleman by email to see if I could buy a replacement dome. I received 2 domes @ no charge 3 days later.</review_text>
This bag is awesome. I can put my laptop in it and still ride my bike. My laptop is 17" apple laptop. My favorite program is Painter because I can make cool pictures on my laptop on it. I wish that I had another one so that I could have two computers. I would sell one for over one thousand dollars</review_text>
Revised 22 Feb 2007.I was looking for a high-end machete when I ran across this little sword by United Cutlery (UC) in Cabela's catalog, where it is sold as a "slimline machete," not a "ninja sword."It's ground from a single piece of 420 J2 stainless steel with nylon cord wrapped around the hilt. This choice of steel is questionable for any blade over 12 inches. If it is heat treated to a hardness adequate for edge retention, it tends to be brittle, resulting in chipping of the edge or even catastrophic failure. If it is not heat treated, it tends to be too soft to really hold a sharp edge.Still, I have heard of this piece being put to hard use and have never heard of one breaking. It may be that it's just short enough to get away with using 420 stainless. I suppose it's all in the heat-treat, and without Rockwell testing, followed by torture testing, I'll never know what this thing can and can't do.It's reasonably sharp out of the box and can be tuned up with a few swipes from a carbide V sharpener. The Tang stamp says "hand made," and the finish is very good. I've heard complaints about loose handle wraps, but I haven't had that problem despite handling the sword quite a bit.But is it a machete or a "ninja sword?" Well, it sure isn't a machete. It really does resemble a short Japanese sword more than anything. Rather, it resembles a longer version of the Americanized "tanto"-style knives that have become so popular in the "tactical" market. Granted, I have heard of people going into the woods and clearing brush with this thing, but I think it would be tiring, and when it comes to swinging a sharp metal object, tiring equals dangerous.If you want a brush-clearing tool for fifty bucks or less, there are many choices: the ubiquitous Ontario and Meyerco machetes, the Woodsman's Pal, the Crocodile Knives no. 227, various machetes and field knives from Condor, and a pile of inexpensive offerings from Cold Steel, to name a few. Then there are dedicated gardening tools like ditch banks and weed knives. There's no reason to clear brush with an Americanized Japanese short sword unless you really want to.As a sword, however, it handles nicely. It's solid and lively in the hand, nimble for thrusting, cutting, and chopping. I've made a mess of many cardboard boxes with it. Again, I don't know how it would hold up if bashed repeatedly into masonry or body armor, but otherwise, it makes for an expedient weapon in close quarters. So a short sword is what it is.The sword clicks positively into the included Kydex scabbard, which is light and flat and allows for several different modes of carry. I wish I could find a machete at this price that came with such a nice sheath.I have numerous clubs, axes, knives, swords, and sword-like objects around the house, some of high quality and commensurate price, but it is this el cheapo sword that leans against the headboard of my bed, and it's the first thing my right hand will touch in an emergency. (I'd much rather grab the Paul Chen Practical Wakizashi, but that belongs to my wife.) That, I suppose, is testimony to its design and execution, which is just about as well suited to fighting in tight spaces as anything out there. The grip could fill the hand better, and along those lines, I'm thinking of wrapping the handle with some leather grip tape.The remaining question is: Can a blade this size, made of stainless steel, both hold an edge and stay in one piece? Come spring, I'm taking this thing into the woods to find out</review_text>
_I have collected swords, both eastern and western, for over 30 years now, and I finally bought this model out of curiosity. It is far better in both quality and design than I expected. This is a good quality blade. The steel is a good, rigid, stainless variety that seems to hold its edge. You could chop through a fence pole with it and it would not fold up on you._While this is not a full-length katana, it is of a good useable length for use in tight quarters- it is also easily drawable from your back without hanging up on the sheath. The hilt is covered with wrapped nylon over plastic, and of course since the tang is one piece with the blade there is nothing to separate. I find the overall look to be clean and modern- not cheap. The flat black finish will not catch light. There is an elegant simplicity to this tool._The sheath is especially nice- it will mount on your back or your hip. It is of solid constuction and will not pierce or pull off the first time it snags on a branch or fence. Being nylon, it will not rot or rust- like the sword itself._There are some cheaper knock-offs of this blade on the market for even less, but you are much better off to stick with the proven quality of United Cutlery._A sword can be either a tool of ill-omen, or a spiritual symbol, depending on the inner development of its wielder....</review_text>
Nice item to keep your foam roller from breaking down or getting flattened</review_text>
This machine is a great price and a great piece of equipment.  It arrived fast and was very easy to put together, even though it looked intimidating at first. It's very quiet and great for using while watching TV. The foot rests are definately too big, so you have to be sure you have shoes on and tighten the velcro as much as possible. It is sort of annoying to have to stop and adjust when my feet slip sometimes, but that is my only complaint and you can find ways to deal with it. Overall, a great value. I would recommend this to anyone looking for a good workout</review_text>
It is a great value. I have used it for 2 months (3 times a week, 30 min each) and I can start seeing the results (not spectacular, but you can tell there is a difference!).Only downsides are the pieces. There do not last long. The good thing is that it comes with a (3 months) warranty and the Co. shipped the replacements VERY fast. I really recommend it if you want to excercise without spending lots of money. I am very VERY happy with it</review_text>
I based my purchase on reviews I read on Amazon.  They were overwhelmingly positive and I can add my own good review to this.  My husband who isn't handy set this up in no time and both of us have been enjoying a good combination of aerobic and strength training with our Body Trac Glider.  As a person with CFS (Chronic Fatigue Syndrome), I can recommend this to people with the condition who have the capability and want something they can handle that doesn't take up alot of space and that they can do in their home</review_text>
Easy to assemble and solidly built - a good value for the money.  The main complaint I have had after months of operation is the comfort of the seat - it's a bit stiff for long sessions.  Beyond that I've noticed that the central piston gets extremely hot during extended use (60 minutes or more); sometimes this seems to cause it to slip or lose resistance.  In my experience this can be fixed by merely letting the piston cool and checking the resistance setting.  I've taken to using the unit in half hour increments to avoid these issues</review_text>
excellent rig for the money.  great customer service.  I was sent a new arm after my brother broke it when he was on the highest setting.  It seems to have been just a fluke..a weak weld</review_text>
I didn't think the rower would be as solid as it is. It is well made and went together in no time. The foot pads take a little trial and error but are not the impossible task others make it out to be: just don't pull your heel up during the stroke, keep your heel against the lower lip, and put the toe straps on firmly. It sits in the space above my garage in freezing cold and blistering heat and has never failed to work for me. The machine simply does what it is made to do and it does it at a reasonable price.</review_text>
I was a little worried when I got this machine becvause of the low price, but it is an excellent piece of equipment.The machine is very easy to put together, and you can keep track of how many calories you burn. It is easy to change your resistance level, and the machine timer will stop if your form is not correct.The oar design ( versus the one bar design on most machines) works more muscles in your arms and chest.I also find it to be a great stress reliever. It may sound cheesy, but sometimes I like to put on music, close my eyes and imagine I am rowing in a lake. It is very relaxing.I do wish there was a way to track distance by mile however, and if you start going at it really fast you start to hear strange sounds, so I think moderate exercise is best on this machine.Also, for someone who is very overweight or tall it may be akward to get into the feet stirrups or seat. I am a 155lb woman, and my butt covers the whole seat, so the seat may not be wide enough for someone much heavier.All in all, it is a great machine for the light or moderate exerciser</review_text>
I purchased this about a month ago, and it's been great so far!  It came out of the box mostly assembled, and only took about 10 minutes to finish the assembly.  It really doesn't come with any instructions for use, but if you go online and look for rowing machine instructions, there are 4 or 5 sites that have instructions to help with that.  The foot pedals take a little getting used to; I experimented and found that the best thing to do is wear shoes and strap your feet in tight-otherwise feet tend to slip off pedal.  I am trying to come up with a way to make the back lip of the pedal higher so my feet won't slide off so easily, but haven't really come up with anything yet.  It's not a huge problem, just an annoyance.  After the first or second session using the machine, you learn little tricks to keep your feet in place, and they seem to make me work harder too since I am gripping more with my toes as well as using my toes and feet to help my pull myself back to the start point.  This is definitely a full body workout; it can be made more difficult if you prefer as the shock has an adjustable ring to increase resistance.  I feel it the most in my legs, butt, back and stomach, believe it or not.  One thing I did find is that you have to watch your posture with this and all other rowing machines, or you will end up with a very bad backache by the end of the session.  For the money, it's a good sturdy piece of equipment, and is well worth the money</review_text>
Wore out one of the cheapo bags in about three months.  This one has gotten heavy use for six months and is still like new.  Holds proper psi for months at a time.  Shape is perfect, well balanced, seams are easy on the hands</review_text>
I was pleasantly surprised when I got this backpack. Nicely made and well thought out. Tons of pockets and you can make the two large compartments into one big one. Can't beat it for the price</review_text>
I have been swimming for 21 years and this is the best goggle out there! I have had at least 4 pairs, and I love them! I do agree with the anti-fog coating wearing off quickly, but it isn't like other goggles where you can't see anything when they are fogged</review_text>
I purchased this set of goggles because they are one of the best that I have used.  They do NOT leak.  This is my second set of vanquisher goggles and I will likely purchase additional sets as needed.  The only drawback I see is that the anti-fog coating wears off very quickly.  However, I think that you will find this on every set of goggles.  Speedo makes premium products and these goggles live up to that speedo tradition</review_text>
This is the only style my son will wear for competition. They stay put with comfort.</review_text>
I've been swimming for 20 years and this is the best goggle I've ever used!</review_text>
This was my third buy of a swin google, and think this is the best.Good quality , very adjustable and with a very good look in the water.Perfect for swimming.</review_text>
I find this pair of google good. They provide good seal from water. The nose adjustements that come with it, may not be perfect for your nose bridge but still they dont hamper their performance.Overall a good product and much better than other cheap stuff available online</review_text>
I've been using these goggles for a while now.  I've tried several other goggles and the fit with the silicone is just right, and very comfortable.  I thought that the silcone would wear out, but it's lasted me many swimming sessions and is still airtight (although I have to adjust the straps tigther because the silicone straps are loosening with use).  Vision is good but I've had a better view with other goggles.  It will also fog up slightly with extended use.  Anti-fog drops or spit will fix that up.  I've used them to swim in lakes (triathlon) for extended periods with no issues.  I've also noticed that Speedo's quality in all of products I've tried (silicone swim caps, swim jammers) is above par.  I guess that's why they're the industry leaders.  It's a great pair of goggles and Amazon's got a great price on them with free shipping to boot</review_text>
I purchased this for my nephew and he loves it.  It is great quality and a very good bargain for the price.</review_text>
Excellent value and fast shipping.  Cover is lightweight but perfect for covering two bikes instead of one.  Highly recommended</review_text>
Per a suggestion in "Maui Revealed", I bought the fanny pack for water excursions. (The author suggested not leaving anything in the car, and he was right - there was broken glass at many parking areas...) Nothing got wet. It is a great product</review_text>
I received this fanny pack then promply took it sailing, to Blizzard Beach and through 7 hours of boogie boarding. Everything (glasses, money, phone) stayed dry. The only complaint was the stitching for one strap came unsewn. It was easy enough to fix, but would have been a disaster if it had happened on a water slide.</review_text>
This compass is very well made, very good workmanship, all of these, together with a very good price, make for a very good purchase</review_text>
Exactly what I ordered and it was delivered sooner than what the seller had estimated. There is nothing like a used East German Mess Kit to cook with if you have to run off into the woods because of the black helicopters</review_text>
Even after reading several reviews on this product on how it is bigger than it looks, I still purchased the pack.  Well, they are correct - it is bulky but I found that wearing this pack on the hip worked out nicely.  In addition, this pack is well made.I was looking for a pack that I did not have to wear as a backpack but could still carry many items.  If this is what you are looking for... This is the pack for you.  I was able to stuff a camera, gloves, hat, snacks and many miscellaneous items I purchase during the day in this pack.  Even with all these items, the pack was still comfortable.</review_text>
I got this for an upcoming trip to Disney since the heat is acting up the 2 water bottles come in handy. Only drawback I see is that it is too big, you can't get a feeling from the pictures of how big it actually is but aside from that it is exactly what I needed. Lot's of room and pocket and it can be adjusted in a lot of different ways to match our size</review_text>
An eye pillow doesn't seem like much, or to some it may even seem silly, but they are actually pretty cool.  I never used one until my yoga teacher placed one gently upon my eyes during our last pose (Savasana or "Resting Pose") in class.  The soft scent was nice, not overpowering, and the light pressure it put on my face felt good.  It also is very effective in blocking out light, and this helps you to completely relax.From a more practical standpoint, my daughter uses my eyepillow when she is suffering from a migraine.  I rub her forehead with peppermint lotion, and then place the eyepillow on her eyes.  It doesn't always chase the pain away completely, but it offers some relief</review_text>
Good heavy duty nylon netting but the hooks are plastic and I'm not sure how they will hold up. So far so good. They are fairly thick. The net itself seems a bit big for using with a rear rack alone. My wife has the wald metal folding baskets on her bike and uses the cargo nets for those and they work great</review_text>
I found this product when I was in search for a pair of Heely's for my six year old daughter. I couldn't find the Heely's in her size because they start sizing them at a 13/1, plus the shoe was too expensive. I ran across the Bratz skate shoes, and thought I'd give them a try because almost every little girl I know loves Bratz, I could purchase them in my child's size, and they were much more affordable. They came in the mail fairly quick and my daughter LOVES them. She wears them all the time...they are worth the money. Now I hate that I bought my 9 year old a pair of 87 dollar Heely's from the mall. I could have bought her a pair of these</review_text>
Very good, works well... I am very happy with it and I am glad I found it.</review_text>
I was very pleased with the expedient delivery of my daughter's Bratz Girl's Skate Shoes.  She will be receiving them on her birthday, she will be pleased as I was.  I received my order within 3 days now that's fast... Way to go Amazon....</review_text>
These are not "roller skates" as one would assume. hese are wheeled shoes in the same vein as the "Heelys" line. But they have 4 wheels with the option of using one. They are also less then half the cost of the "Heelys" so when your kid out grows them they will not cost you an arm and a leg to replace. I like anything that encourages outdoor play, although I must admit I want to shove every kid that rolls in front of me at the grocery store. My Sophie will not be wearing hers to the store, schoole or anyother place that doesn't have a flat surface outdoors</review_text>
Great skate shoes !  Well made and easy for my 5 yr. old to operate to pop the skates down or retract them.  The great thing about them having skates in front and back, is she can choose to either drop only the back skates(like the Healey's) or drop all four.  They were a third of the cost of the healey's, so I would definitely recommend these over them.  :-</review_text>
My 7-year-old daughter loves these! I don't know how they compare to regular roller skates, but she is getting around in them pretty well. They are fairly heavy, but she likes to wear them as shoes as well. They seem to be very well made - she's used them at least 50 times and they still look brand new.Note that these skates have four wheels - not just the heel wheels (though you the front and back pop out separately, so if you just wanted to use the heel wheels you could.)</review_text>
this great toy isnt just for little kids my bff Kelly has these & she 12!! Imight write back so be afraid be very afraid!</review_text>
Very nice. Much better than I expected. Thinking of hanging them on the wall</review_text>
If you are looking for a Mexican style handwrap these are hard to beat for the price</review_text>
I have been using this dampener for about 4 years now.  It isn't too big or too small.  It fits in the racquet perfectly and the look of it is great.  Overall, I have been very impressed with this product</review_text>
Although I like my new locker bag, my old one was 17 years old, it isn't as usful as my 17 year old model.  My original model had a full length "gatorade bottle" holder in the front of the bag.  This enabled me to remove the bottle after the bag was in the locker.  Now I have to remove the bottle first or wrench my shoulder trying to reach up and over the top of the bag within the locker.  I also fear that the new bag is deeper and will not fit in the rather shallow lockers at the university.  The old bag fit perfectly.  I only replaced my bag of 17 years because the zipper was finally getting stuck sometimes</review_text>
I actually purchased this locker gym bag for my husband for a Xmas present.  We had looked at several stores in our area and no one carried them, so I ordered this one.  The colors are great - very bright and vibrant, and the size is great for doing what it says - fitting into a gym locker.  Matter of fact, another guy at the gym commented to my husband that he was looking for a bag like that and asked where he got it</review_text>
This bag is simply amazing!  I go to the gym 4 times per week and often go directly from work so I needed a bag that would hold everything I needed to workout and clean-up afterwards.  The Ogio Locker Bag does it all:  it's got a special compartment for my gym shoes and a shelf to separate them from my towel and workout gear.  It fits perfectly in just about any gym's locker (I go to Bally's) and with its front-opening door, you can access everything you need while your bag is IN the locker! I love the fact that it comes with containers for my toiletries (shampoo, conditioner, soap) and also with a comb, brush, and mirror. To top it off, it's light-weight, sturdy, and even comes with a built-in vent so that your wet/sweaty clothes don't get too ripe! LOL! : )  I couldn't be happier with my purchase!  GET THIS BAG!! You won't be disappointed</review_text>
I was so excited to find this item on line!!!  We had a "very used" Ogio Locker Bag we had been using for approximately 19 years that needed replacing.  I love this "locker bag" for carrying  my shampoo, conditioner, make up, blow dryer,  curling iron, etc. while traveling</review_text>
good for exercising.wish it were supplied in smaller packaging units</review_text>
The product was exactly what I was expecting and it arrived very soon after it was orgdered.  Excellent service.  Thank you</review_text>
A very good exercise machine to help keep in shape.  Like it very much although haven't had it very long to go more in dept</review_text>
This is the best back-pack I've ever tried. I'm an emergency rescuer, and I commonly participate on campings and stuff like that, and I can say this back-pack is a must-have. It's so big you can get anything you'll need on a whole week camping ! It's very confortable, and you almost don't feel its weight. I love the sleeping bag compartment, since I can even use it both for the sleeping bag and the tent ! (keeping the sticks on the outside, of course). If you are looking for a complete back-pack, with a lot of space and very confortable, buy this one... garanteed</review_text>
I actually had to send this back, however.  While it had great features and a great price, it was a little too small for me (in 2 ways).  I think the volume was a little small for the week of backpacking I was planning.  But more specifically, it only came in one size, and I couldn't adjust it adequately for my height (6'2").  I was sad to send it back, however, because it seemed very nice otherwise</review_text>
The only time you will regret having bought it is when u lose it!!! This is an amazing tool that everyone should have. If not exactly this model there are 100 others to choose from depending on ur profession and way you want to use it.I found one of the cheapest prices for this knife on Amazon</review_text>
This is a great tool.  I'm very happy with this purchase.  The space pen and the mini screwdriver are very cool.The first pocketknife shipped to me had a crack in the plastic, but I went to amazon.com and submitted the return info and I got a perfect one the next day.</review_text>
IT'S GREAT ALL THE TIME, IT IS VERY CONFORTABLE IN MY POCKET AS IT IS THE PERFECT SIZE. VERY GOOD FOR USE IN ALL YHE DAY DUTY AS OPENING BOXES, ET</review_text>
The Table Top Air Hockey game was shipped in a very timely manner and the packaging was excellent.  The game came to us in very good condition which is important to us because we are giving it to one of our grandchildren for a Christmas present.  The game is exactly what we were looking for.  We also appreciated all of the communication we received from Buck A Ball about the status of our order.  Buck A Ball also sent us an e-mail thanking us for our business.  We won't hesitate to do business with Buck A Ball in the future.  We have five grandchildren who are all involved in various sports so we will be looking at Buck A Ball when we need anything sports related.</review_text>
I bought 2 and took them on vacation to the Caribbean. They close small enough to pack, inflate and deflate with little effort, and were eay to repack in their handy carrying case as well. They are so comfortable, and easy to get into. I was the envy of all as I floated cooly through the Caribbean.</review_text>
These cushions were recommended to me by a physician, but one from a medical specialty that doesn't involve treating feet or orthopedic problems.This product is well designed and manufactured, and I like the support and comfort it provides substantially better than the four or five different types of so-called "orthotic" cushioning/support products (e.g., from Dr. Scholl's) that I bought over-the-counter at pharmacies and grocery stores. "Gellin'" may be fine for most folks, but slightly squishy insoles just don't cut the mustard, nor do ordinary rubbery-plastic inserts.My subjective, anecdotal impression, however, is that the ViscoSpot cushions have indeed lessened the pain and inflammation I otherwise would likely have suffered while walking or on my feet for long periods.  Anyone with this condition knows that a hard step-down can result in a searing, stumble-inducing pain.  These cushions do significantly lessen the shock, as compared either to using no device or the other cushions/devices I've tried.But these cushions have not yet "cured" or substantially improved my plantar faciitis, despite about a month of use now.  (My symptoms date back about four months.)I don't know how these may compare with prescription "orthotic" devices that are custom fitted by foot doctors.  I've been trying to cure my problem "on the cheap," but I've ended up spending about $200 so far on various stretching and exercise products, along with various cushions.  Maybe I should have bitten the bullet and seen a specialist doc to begin with, I dunno.</review_text>
IN A NUTSHELL: SUPER FOOD SUPPLEMENT LIKE BREWER'S YEAST or LECITHINOver 5 times more Monounsaturated Fat than Polyunsaturated Fat! --And -- over 20 times more Monounsaturated Fat than Saturated Fat!BUT THAT'S NOT ALL ---Golden Flax Seed ?is a nutritionally complex food. Flax Seed contains a very a high concentration of alpha linoleic acid (ALA) ?an omega-3 essential fatty acid ?plus fiber, lignan and many naturally occurring vitamins and minerals. Increasingly, recent studies have revealed that Flax Seed does help reduce serum cholesterol levels, fights cancer and controls blood glucose levels.IT IS IMPORTANT TO BUY WHOLE FLAX SEEDS & THEN GRIND THEM:Buying flax seed unground, keeps it fresh, and retains all the nutrients while on the shelf. However, it is important to grind the flax in a coffee grinder before using, otherwise the flax seed will most likely pass through your digestive system intact, and you will not have received the benefits of consuming them.It is important to AVOID ground flax, since no matter how wholesome, and fresh the flax was when it was ground, it loses its nutrient value, and turns rancid very quickly, even when purchased in a vacuum sealed container. In essence, a vacuum sealed container is only useful if you use all the flax as soon as the container is opened. That of course assumes that it was sealed as soon as it was ground in the first place.FYI - Traditionally, "Golden Flax" is higher in oil than the ordinary yellow flax which is traditionally higher in fiber.BOTTOM LINE: ONE OF SEVERAL BRANDS I CONSUME DAILYThis "Now Golden Flax" is an organic food supplement which can enhance human health when used daily, and a truly excellent value.</review_text>
Tri-Athletes use this to stop the rubbing of all body parts as they go from wet to dry and have their clothes rub on them for miles.BUY THIS!It works when breaking in new shoes, the shoes break in Not your feet!It works with boned or wired garments, that annoying rubbing you can get just won't happen.You can jog, run, and walk with out having your thighs rub together (so anyone can get some exercise, or at least have a day with out pain!)Great for Diapers were the elastic rubs, stops it cold!Tennis players and joggers nipples can even bleed from their shirts rubbing against them...but Not with this!Point is: Have one of these on hand you will find it very useful and share this product with friends.BEST THING SINCE SLICED BREAD!GREAT PRODUCT.GET YOURS.I've got mine</review_text>
If you surf or swim in a wetsuit, then you know how painful and distracting rashes can become.  This is the best product to apply before you put your wetsuit on to prevent any rash</review_text>
Well, I have had this Nissan bento for over 5 years now. And as an adult, I have to say that I have no problems with it keeping food hot. I find that it is VERY COMPARABLE, even BETTER than the Zojirushi Mr. Bento. I like my food HOT, and being entirely stainless steel, it keeps all 4 containers hotter than the Mr. Bento. The top 2 containers in Mr. Bento tend to be cool (room temperature) after 4 hours or more, while in the Nissan, they are usually more than warm (but not steaming).To make sure I am comparing correctly, I preheat the 4 containers with hot water before I pack, just like Mr. Bento.Also, the construction of this bento is much more sturdier than Mr. Bento, which has a lot of plastic. Like the other reviewer, yes it will dent if it gets banged around. As an adult, I don't have any problem with it.Also the Mr. Bento I got from Amazon in Xmas 2006, was made in Thailand, not Japan. Apparently it is too expensive to get it from Japan now or something like that.My girl friend's Mr. Bento was made in Japan, and it was much sturdier, and kept food hotter. I think the new Mr. Bentos have a plastic lid, which allows heat to escape.Anyway, I just sold the Mr. Bento on ebay, and kept the lunch bag, which fits the Nissan Thermos really well.I love this Nissan Thermos lunch tote. It really is worth the money</review_text>
pros: this sword is a very good quality sword for its price, it makes an excellent fantasy piece and it is very well crafted and detailed. the blade is well connected to the hilt and the sword fits perfectly in the sheathcons: some of the metal skulls decorating the hilt are loose and wiggle around sometimes, the blade gets dirty easily and is hard to clea</review_text>
I use this pad everywhere I go.  This pad will help keep you warm and get a good night sleep while you are on the trail.  Very durable</review_text>
I believe in spending the extra dough for great equipement, you will love them!!!!</review_text>
I purchased these gloves to replace the gloves that game with my heavy bag. I should have replaced when I first got my blister. I have a few blisters from the other bag gloves. These are pretty well made and look good compared to other gloves like century. The bar in the palm can be a little problematic if you want to do some grappling. I removed it since I do little grappling, plus it feels better to punch without it.  I have no blisters now. Great glove for beginner or advanced</review_text>
I use it to punch the bag. The thing is awesome. Natural leather, durably built. The only thing I was worried about - could it protect my hand enougth without boxing wrist belts? (before I had bag gloves with no fingers separation) Yes it is solid enough for that. Totally deserves 5 stars</review_text>
I have been fighting in mixed martial arts now for a few years.  And have used different types of gloves.  But these gloves cover the entire knuckle area.  Promoting a flater fist.  Which will give a harder punch.  And the durability as never been a question</review_text>
I gave this product 2 stars because the assembly is a mess.  However when you do eventually get it put together it does look pretty good and is very functional for the money.  It has the worst assembly directions I have ever seen for any product.  The parts are not clearly labeled at all, and you are left guessing which screw is supposed to go where.  For the last step I dont know if parts were missing or not but they were talking about screws D and E when you only had 3 screws to choose from( A,B,C) which as I said were not clearly labeled at all and you need to figure out which screw is which letter.  I fancy myself fairly handy around the house and this was not easy to put together at all.  Very frustrating.If you are able to decipher the instructions, and you will need to stray from them if you want to put it together, it does look pretty good.  It can hold 2 bags with 4 shelves for shoes or equipment, but not sure if it would hold extra large pro style bags.Not sure if the money saved is worth the hassle of putting it together.</review_text>
I bought this rack to try and organize my golf supplies and I couldn't be happier. Shipping was fast and well packaged. The instructions were great and assembly was easy and quick. This thing really looks great and has plenty of room to hold two golf bags and all my accessories</review_text>
This is an excellent bag for anyone regardless of rather you are training for boxing, martial arts, or just want to punch and kick something and will take whatever you can give it.  I've tried a couple bags and this one was by far the best in the 80lb range.  Another review mentioned a couple of "problems"  that they felt were signs of a return, but are not.  This bag does not ship with a plastic covering, the zipper top is intentially missing and Everlast includes a sheet explaining why (unzipping it voids the warrenty), and all the hanging chains do come wrapped in a pink ribbon.  Most of the reviews comments are just how Everlast packs every bag.  Mine arrived with with well done packing tape in a box that was a little beaten from shipping, but the contents were not harmed or dusty.  I train mostly bar hand, so my only complaint is that the Everlast logo stitched on to both sides of the bag can do some extra damage to your knuckles, but if you are using wraps and bag gloves than it is not a problem.  Regardless, the quality of the bag and the beating it takes, compared to many other bags on the market, makes up for the stitching on the logo</review_text>
my second granddaughter loves this "flyer."  now all she needs is snow</review_text>
These things are wonderful! go ahead and buy a set of them, because they fold up so they dont get in the way like other rear mount baskets might, and they can hold quite a bit and still leave room for a bag or something to be put on top of the rack. Only problem I had was with the hardware that comes with it. I have a delta bike mount and had to go buy some longer screws and some zip ties  to put them on, but that was worth it for these baskets, not every rack is the same afterall, LOVE EM! GET EM</review_text>
We have 2 inflatable convertible chair/sleeping bags for our girls ages 5 & 7 (1 nemo & 1 tinkerbell). We use them regularly. They are light so the girls can move them around & take them to friends or relatives houses for sleep-overs. The nemo bag is easy to inflate & the cover is removable so you can toss it into the washing machine. It's a bit of a struggle to get an already inflated bag back into the cover once it has been washed & since it takes about 5-10 minutes to inflate the bag we don't deflate it after each use. Our girls have twin beds so we slide the inflated sleeping bag under the bed until we need it. This storage spot also helps keep all sorts of other toys from "hiding" under little girls beds too! Most of the time they convert the bed into a chair & leave it infated in their rooms.Our girls love to play video games & use their chairs all the time - it is a great feature. They carry them down to the playroom or the living room (if I let them). Even the 5 year old can convert it from a bed into a chair in about 1 minute.We are very pleased with these inflatable chair beds but the reason for only 4 out of 5 stars is that the first Tinkerbell bed had a bad seam & would not inflate. (The nemo & tinkerbell are basically identical in design.)  We returned it without any problems & the company sent a new replacement right away which has worked fine. In the box you do receive the sleeping bag, inflatable bed, pump & a 1 time mini repair kit (vinyl patch & glue).If you plan to buy an inflatable sleeping bad, then purchase one like this with the convertible chair feature. It is certainly worth it.</review_text>
We bought this for our 3 year old.  For those overnite stays.  Most of our family are with out a toddler bed for him, so this works out nicely!My only problem was that the pump that it comes with is horrible, so I used a pump we already had and it worked just fine</review_text>
What a life saver. I needed sleep space for my granddaughter (age 3) when she came for one of her infrequent visits. It had to be compact and easily stored. This solved my problem plus she was ecstatic to be sleeping with Nemo</review_text>
I got this bed for my daughter for going away trips, it pumped up quickly and my daughter played on it for a little while, the next day her cousin spent the night,she is 3 and she liked the bed.I did put a comforter underneath just for extra cushion,( 3 yr olds are very honest and if they don't like it they tell you so-)and she liked it!</review_text>
I already had the Step with only one riser and really enjoyed it.  I had reached a point were I really didn't feel challenged any more.  I purchased the double because now my kids can "workout" with me on the lower step (thus eliminating one of my excuses).  This workout, done 3 - 4 times per week takes only 30 min for cardio step and 15 min for abs.  Just saw my doctor and he said he had never seen anyone raise good chol., lower bad chol. and improve lipids/tryg. without medication in his career like I have done (he's a semi-retired older dr.).  I'm 39 and hope to continue this regimine for many many years to come</review_text>
I found this product to be PERFECT. Being able to adjust the step with 2 sets of risers makes working out with step videos much easier. These are very easy to handle and lightweight, but very supportive and sturdy. You just have to make sure you put the top step over the groove for it to lock it into place when using the additional risers. I totally love it and found a new way of working out</review_text>
I got a box set and when I looked at the Derek Jeter card I saw George W. Bush and Mickey Mantle. I thought it was so AWESOME!!!!!</review_text>
The Derek Jeter/ George W. Bush/ Mickey Mantle card #40 in Topps 2007 series 1 was not supposed to be released! None more will be released, making this the hottest card in 2007! I got one in a Topps 2007 Box, and the card is amazing!!</review_text>
I was shocked when I found this skateboard for $3.00, as I had seen the same exact skateboard at K-Mart for $10.00.  Upon receipt of the item, I was happy with the packaging and look of the skateboard.  It was a great gift idea for my kids ages 7 and 9.  The only thing about the skateboard that I didnt like, was that the wheels are not as fluid in movement as I had hoped.  They stick a little from time to time.  Other than that, the product is great</review_text>
This stuff is great. Better than I expected. Light but stable! Moreover, this vendor delivers my stuff ON TIME. I do recommend this vendo</review_text>
i actually bought this because i thought the price was pretty cheap but turns out, the songs and graphics are horrible and not worth the shipping rates. this will probably collect dust in my closet.</review_text>
This is a TV dance pad, not the authentic DDR pad as we ordered.  My children were disappointed in the music, graphics, and the lack of challenging levels of difficulty.  They said it was "cheesy"</review_text>
I bought this product for my little sister so that she could exercise in the house and she loves it.  The rest of the family enjoys it too.  If you've never seen the XBOX or Playstation version of DDR, then this game is fine.  I gave it four stars because some of the graphics in the background are a little annoying and make it more difficult to see the arrows.</review_text>
This is a lightweight, solidly constructed rack for hardtail ATBs with rear disk brakes.  There don't seem to be many racks made for this application, and this one works well</review_text>
It seems to me a very good choice, Hard, good paint.You can atach the painners at the sides of the rack, and in the top, the sleeping bag, a mattress or something elseIt also hace a special atach point for your RED BACK LIGHTA very very helpfull accesory for your bike when you travelPAY ATENTION if you need it For DISC BRAKES BIKE or NOT, there is a diference in the way you atach it to the bike and also in the PRICE There are two models, almost exactly the sameBe carefull!!!</review_text>
This mat may have a design flow, or perhaps it was rolled up before paint on the cute paisley pattern dried up. Layers were stuck together and it was hard to unroll. In the process, the paisly design ripped bits of the bottom side of the mat. I suppose it's still functional, but my brand new mat looks pretty awful</review_text>
The mat is really cute, and does not slip at all. The only thing I don't like is that it is a little too long and it would be nice if it was slightly thicker</review_text>
I love the look of this mat. Love the pattern and colors, but it is a bit thin. I just layer it on top of my old mat</review_text>
I'm SO happy I bought this mat! I love the color, design and the energy of it.I also got a matching bag for it from ebay.I'm not only using my mat for youga but also practice meditation on it... and everytime I'm having troubles in my yoga practice I look at my mat and smile.</review_text>
What you see is what you get. Pretty straight forward. I thought I would have a problem with it staying on but it hasn't budged</review_text>
There was no size information included in Amazon's description, so I went looking for it.*  Measures 191" x 48" x 46" h., constructed of 2" steel tubing, two large plated "S" hooks* Fits up to 14 ft. hammocks (hammock not included)* Easy to set-up* Assembly / information sheet* Weighs 56 1/2 lbs.</review_text>
My husband got this for me for Christmas. I LOVE IT!!! He asked me to do the review since I'm the one who uses it the most. I have a chronic back problem and since I've been using the table the pain that I've had has eased up from using the Inversion Table</review_text>
I am very happy with my inversion table. It is good quality at 1/4 the cost! It's just what I was looking for. And the customer service Dept. was great!  Thank you</review_text>
The inversion table is just as described.  It is easy to put together and is durable.  Quick shipping also</review_text>
Box was fairly damaged when received and was missing 1 washer, but was not worth the hassle to replace.  Everything else about the table is great!  It gets used quite frequently</review_text>
These are quality CASINO cards that have actually been played in the casinos.  I am a card collector and am very happy with this set.</review_text>
After reading the other review I almost backed out of ordering, I'm glad I didn't.  Maybe the other reviewer doesn't understand the word used, and a deck for under a dollar what do you expect.  The cards were fine, used but fine.  If you want a deck for a serious game then get a new deck, otherwise these will do. I am very happy with my purchase and with the speed in which my order was handled</review_text>
I feel that this pedometer works well enough for any amateur walkers use. The step counting is acurate enough and when it is off it is usually not off by that much. The main problem I have with this product is that it tends to fall off quite easily. After a number of falls this product will most likely be rendered unusable. The falling may also have something to do with the different gaits of different people. I give it a 4-5</review_text>
NOt much to this little gizmo - but it is accurate, it is easy to use, and I loved it!  i did have problems with keeping it attached to my pants because the clip seems too small.  but i took a baby safetypin and was able to clip it through the hole in the beltclip - something I couldn't say with other peds that i have owned.  all in all, a very good deal</review_text>
I was pleased with the item and time frame of deliverythank yo</review_text>
The gym is great. Its pretty light so when you do certain exercises the machine wants to move with you but luckily they included the little tabs of metal that you can step on to prevent the machine from moving.  For the money you can't beat it</review_text>
This is an interesting item that I bought.  (+)It is very easy to assemble with tools included.  (-)It says that it's 170LBs of resistance but it feels a little lighter.  (-)The workout takes a little getting used to because the tension is a little rough.  (-)Also, when doing stand-up exercises, you'll probably have to stand on the frame because the machine will move.  (+)All in all I feel like this machine is a bargain for what I paid for it including shipping.  (+)You can get a quality workout from it and it doesn't take up much space.  (+)It also has a ton of exercises for you to do with "How To's" in the manual if you need assistance configuring the machine</review_text>
This compass does a fine job of indicating North, South, East and West</review_text>
My 8 month old son loves this toy.  He is learning cause and effect concepts.  It's simple enough for him to understand how to press down the top to get the cute butterflies and lady bugs to spin around and land in the holes.  It's entertaining and easy to carry along, with all parts safely enclosed...nothing to lose! I love this toy because no batteries are required...just kid power. It's just back to basics for an entertaining simple spinning top type toy.</review_text>
My 8 month old loves this toy. He is just starting to learn how to make it spin by himself, but has enjoyed watching other people make it spin, pushing it around on the floor, & chewing on the handle. It also distracts him well when he is fussy.</review_text>
I just got the blue colored mat. I love it!1 - Im 6 feet tall and I fit completely on the mat with some space left.2 - There is plenty of cushion for me not to feel the hard-wood floor.3 - It comes with a carry bag which broke immediately but a needle and thread and its back together now.4 - There also isnt much of a smell</review_text>
This is a hella sweet product.  It stores more water than I could ever need and even has a place for me to put my keys.  Oh, and the ladies love it</review_text>
Well made and so easy to use a monkey could do it. Filled mine with liquor and went to the city for St. Patty's day. It did the job needless to say...</review_text>
I used this product to support my rapier sword at the Texas Ren Fest for 5 weekends. It's sturdy, good quality leather and accomodated my sword perfectly</review_text>
I love this bike the reason I am giving it 5 Stars first of all of because the look of it and second of all the handling of it. This Bike rides like a dream I love it. The flame fenders I took off right away because I didn't like the look of those but everything else on the bike is rad</review_text>
I bought this bike for my boyfriend.  He was excited to say the least!!! I already had a mountain bike, and he wanted a bike, so we could ride together.  So as a surprise....I ordered the one that he had been "eyeing" (the PT Cruiser Turbo 7).....He put it together the day after it was delivered!!! He had to do a little adjusting on the gears, but other than that it went together perfectly!!! Couldn't ask for better!And he said it rides "like a dream!"GREAT CHOICE!!! WOULD HIGHLY RECOMMEND.....just need someone that knows how to put bikes together --- and he knows just that</review_text>
First off let me start by saying that anyone who remembers fixing bikes as a kid will have NO Problems assembling and adjusting this bike when it arrives!If you have never done this before I recommend using the local bike shop to do it.The bike is SUPERB and rides like a dream.The bearings are top notch and you can stop pedaling and coast a good block PLUS on just the inertia alone (try that with a mountain bike).Shifting is smooth once you get the gear's adjusted.The braking at first will cause a bit of squeal noise until the pads seat then you wont hear a thing (I used them sparingly and not harshly the first ten miles until they wore in)This bike is BEAUTIFUL to look at and in just this past week I have been stopped at LEAST 10 times and asked questions about it.I even had a group of mountain bikers stop me and tell me it was a "SWEET" bike.Pedaling is smooth and the frame is very strong (I weigh 285), the seat is VERY comfortable all the time.I have tried over a dozen bikes and This one tops them all.I am also 6'1" tall so alot of the other so called Cruisers dont cut it against this bike.You wont be dissapointed</review_text>
I love this toy carrier and we use it all the time. We keep our daughters living room toys in it at home and we pack it full for traveling. We take it with us whenever we know we will be visiting someone for more than a few hours and have received tons of compliments on how cute it is, the design is bright and cheery, and how smart it is to travel with our daughters favorite toys. She is entertained and we can have a nice visit. Our daughter is only 9 months and we've been using it for about 3 months now. At this point it holds quite a few of her toys but as she gets older we will need to get something bigger for at home but I think we will be able to use this for traveling for quite some time.</review_text>
I have had my Blackburn Delphi 6.0 for six months and have put on thousands of miles and tens of thousands of feet in vertical gain.  I upgraded from an older Vetta model.  Since I do a lot of climbing the vertical gain and percent grade features were a major attraction for me.  The operations of all Delphi computers are simulated in detail by an excellent interactive program on Blackburn's website.  This was a major selling point.  I could "use" the computer before I bought it.  It eliminated unexpected surprises--I knew exactly what I was getting.  The ability to utilize customer service, if needed, was also important to me.  VDO, for example, is a German company with no U.S. offices.  They have a Germany customer service telephone number you can call, but they only speak German.  This might change in the future, but this was the case at the time I made the purchase.I am 45 years old.  I raced when I was in college but now ride for fitness and enjoyment.  I don't ride fast but regularly climb 3,000 to 4,000 feet in a single ride each weekend.  I was not looking for a "performance" computer, rather just something to keep track of the basics that are important to me:  speed, vertical gain, distance, % grade.  To that end, I do not use some of the advanced features such as laps and heart rate.- I found the computer relatively easy to set up and learn.  It is fairly easy to navigate while riding.  I won't spend too much time on navigation because every one has their own like and dislikes.  Go to the Blackburn website and navigate the interactive program for yourself.  Suffice to say that, in general, I am satisfied with the operation of the unit.- The wireless transmitter and the cadence sensor attach with zip-ties.  I found this unsightly.  The clamps that I have used on Vetta and Cateye products are much nicer.  However, I suppose it is difficult to provide a clamp to accomodate such a large variety of tube diameters.  But this could be accomplished with shims as it is for the handlebar mounting bracket.  However, this is not a reason to not buy this product.  I did not have a problem mounting the cadence magnet.  Although it is toward the end of the crankarm it is not near the pedal spindle.  Every bike will be different.  The cadence wire is indeed long (better than too short) but I just bundled up the extra and zip-tied it to the little chainstay brace located between the tire and the bottom bracket.- Speaking of the wireless transmitter...Coming from a wired system I wasn't sure I'd like the wireless transmitter, but I do.  Reception at the computer has been excellent even though I have it on the right side of the handlebars and the transmitter on the left fork.- The altimeter feature is great.  It is why I bought this model.  It works by measuring barometric pressure and has a resolution of 3 feet.  However, the barometric pressure changes from day to day and so did the "home" altitude as measured on the computer.  Calibrating the home altitude each time became annoying.  But as I thought about it, I realized I really don't care about the altitude...I just wanted to know the CHANGE in altitude as expressed in total vertical gain.  So now I just zero the vertical gain and go!- The vertical gain and % grade feature are wonderful for knowing more about the road you are on.  I am training for a century ride that has almost 10,000 feet of climbing and grades as much as 20%.  These features help me to know if I am training properly.  In my experience, the vertical gain measurement has an accuracy of +/- 5%.  Occasionally I'll see measurements as much as +/- 10%..  This is definitely within the tolerance of most electronic instruments and I'm sure that slight variations in barometric pressure between the start and finish of your ride contibute to the difference.  My point is that this device will give you a very close vertical gain measurement but it won't be exact.  The current technology has limitations but it is FAR better than not having this measurement at all .  Another important point is that this device measures ALL vertical gain.  There are units on the market that will not measure gains less than 30 feet.  I think that is a bad idea.  For example, if you were riding a century that had a rolling topography and within each mile there were two 25 foot rises (a reasonable scenario), there would be 5,000 feet of unrecorded vertical gain!  I appreciate that the Blackburn unit records all vertical gain.- The computer calculates gradient by measuring distance traveled and altitude gained.  By necessity, there is a lag in the display of the % grade (it is updated every 5 seconds using data measured over the prior 20 seconds).  This is annoying (but necessary) because you want to know what the grade is right at that instant as you feel your legs strain.  This feature is finicky.  You will find that the reading fluctuates noticably as you climb (the more grade, the more fluctuation).  I speculate that this is because of two reasons:  First, roads never rise in a straight line--they are wavy.  Second, the steeper the grade the more riders tend to not ride in a straight line.  They wiggle off to the left and then to the right.  This will affect distance traveled and hence affect the % grade measurement.  The main point is that this device will give you a good ballpark measurement.  Don't expect it to be exact.  But again, it is far better than not having the measurement at all.  On a small side note, the % grade pegs out at 20%.  There are a small number of riders out there that ride roads with gradients exceeding 20% and it would be nice if it could be measured.- The distance measurement, when programmed with the correct wheel size, seems to be accurate within a few hundreths of a mile (verified with a gps unit).- I have not used the heart rate moniter, but my wife has.  It's operation is straightforward and seems to work fine.  She comfirmed the presence of the "spikes" mentioned in an earlier review.- The computer seems to be durable.  I have accidentally dropped it onto the garage floor a couple of times and it still works fine.- During one ride I was caught in rainstorm for about two hours.  Toward the end of the ride I noticed that the display would not respond to commands.  Closer inspection at home revealed that water had gotten into the unit.  This was not a surprise as the rain was heavy and water had once gotten into my old Vetta unit (which eventually dried out and recovered).  Although I figured that the unit would eventually recover, it is still unnerving because you can't be so sure.  The owner's manual says that if this happens to contact customer support.  I emailed them my story and in three days (I wish it had been more quicky) I received a reply.  The remedy was to remove the battery cover and let it dry out.  Blackburn wouldn't say whether or not water would ruin the computer, but as it turns out the unit did recover only needing a new battery.  If you ride in the rain on a regular basis you might want to consider protecting the computer from water.  This story also reinforces the need to consider customer service when deciding on a product.While waiting for my Delphi to dry out I had to consider that the unit was ruined and I might have to buy another one.  I actually looked at other companies and their different models again to see if I might be more satisfied with something else.  I came to the conclusion that I would buy another Delphi 6.0.  This is the greatest compliment I can give this product</review_text>
Table Tennis is the fastest sport in the world.  Unfortunately, it is very rarely on television.  For anyone who has played a few years at this game, which requires lightening fast action and re-action, Volume 1 is definitely worth buying.  The players are the world's best.  The filming is excellent, with consistent re-plays to highlite the best shots and points.  I recommend this DVD to anyone who plays table tennis seriously.  I guarantee you will get a good feeling just watching it.</review_text>
I bought this bike for my 2.5-year-old for Xmas.  I needed a lightweight tricycle that was easy to carry to and from the park and one she could actually pedal.  It is a joy to see her enjoying her trike at the park, pedaling for long distances.  I'm close behind in case she topples over, since most trikes by nature are not stable.  I have an older Kettler (built for stability), but I hate it because it's so heavy to lift and my daughter could never pedal it.  So that's in the garage and she'll use it when she's older.  We tried other tricycles at the toy store, but I didn't like any of them for a variety of reasons.  Even the Dora counterpart (I did not want a darn Dora trike) was not as well designed as this one.  This trike has thick, cushioned wheels and a comfortable, wide seat.Graphics:  I hate the Cars graphics.  I hate that my daughter is a walking advertisement for a product.  I don't care if the graphics are for Play-doh, Sesame St. or Dora.  They should be paying me to advertise, not the other way around.  Visit the Campaign for A Commercial Free-Childhood online for more information.Assembly:  Assembling bikes is such a headache.  I took the unopened box to the bike shop and let the pros assemble it for $15-20.</review_text>
My son has been wanting a "big boy bike" for a while now.  He sees all the other children in the neighborhood with one and it is now his turn.The bike is the perfect size for him.  He struggles a little bit with the pedals, but I am sure that would be the case for him with any tricycle.  The only issue I had was that the tires are plastic.  But what more can you really ask for for the price you pay.  The bike looks great and he loves it</review_text>
For a two year old who is learning, this is perfect. He tries to use the pedals but it is not an easy concept for him yet. So he uses his feet to move most of the time. The best feature for him is the nook below the seat. He loves putting different things in the small space to take with him when he tries to ride</review_text>
The stickers that come on this don't stay for very long.  However the trike itself is a hit with my two-year-old</review_text>
saves the day.  It makes my family sleep easier and more secure at night.  We're in a two unit apartment building and there is an entry door and hall before our units.  The last person in at night places the brace under the knob, so we all know we've eliminated the threat of someone coming in though the front door.If someone were to try to force the door, (I don't think theres a chance of them getting through the jammer) the worst thing that would happen is that the knob would tighten, making it difficult to turn.  We solved this problem after a trial run and found that if you unscrew the knob and reassemble it in the door, it works fine.  We think it's due to the stress of the knob against the door.  I still can't see any part of the door failing either.Good Luck!!</review_text>
My son absolutely enjoys the sleeping bag.  I can't get him out of it</review_text>
These are great!  Very comfortable-no regrets.  I ordered a size that may have been a little big but with the hand wraps it worked out perfect.  Love the vent in the palm too-hands never feel too hot</review_text>
There's one more thing you should know about this glove, it has a small metal bar handle in the middle for when you clench your fist, and trust me, the handling on this glove is a dream come true.With softness, easy off and on, and grip, I would recommend this for your hands.Your fist will thank you</review_text>
Same good quality Everlast product that I would have received if I purchased these gloves at the sporting goods store.  And, much more convenient and time efficient. A pleasant experience</review_text>
I was very pleased with this purchase, it was shipped VERY quickly, all the equipment was in the box, easy to use, and a greta releaver for stress....PURCHASE FORM THIS OWNER!!</review_text>
Sometimes the simplest thing can be the best thing in the world. Gee, I wish I came up with this gadget, I would be a millionaire by now. If you want to work your arms, abs, back, just use this EVIL WHEEL everyday. Forget about Sit Ups, and wasting money on BIG HEAVY machine. This Wheel can be used for ANYONE ANY age, ANY sex, and of course at ANY place~! Do not worry, I will come up with some gadget next time and be a millionaire! We all be glad I did it~!</review_text>
Easy to slip on and off, players can change 'sides' in seconds, reasonably robust finish. Buy adult size for players over 12 years old</review_text>
This is a great quality protein.  It blends well (although the protein foam will separate from juice after a while if you leave it sitting).  The flavors are great</review_text>
Good Set of flights.  pick your mood and there should be a set of flights to match it.  I gave this set to a friend as a gift and they loved it</review_text>
Versatile kickboard that allows you to hold it comfortably in many different ways. Very easy to use</review_text>
I first discovered this kickboard when my family decided to stay at the Sheraton Hotel in Seattle. I have never seen a design like this before. My 2 year old loved holding on the the board and would not let go. This unique design is better than any standard board</review_text>
Rack up buy-in chips in these attractive trays before everyone arrives then wait for the compliments. An inexpensive way to add a classy touch to home games.</review_text>
I am seven years old and I like golfing.  I can golf indoors during winter now.  It is challenging because it does not have guard rails; it will roll off the green if you miss the cup.  It does not take batteries and the ball rolls out by itself.</review_text>
I got my fit band within days of purchasing it!..It really works my arms and I'm very, very satisfied with my purchase and with the seller!.</review_text>
Haven't tried using the band yet, but it looks about the correct resistance</review_text>
This is what it says it is.  Works great slid between a doorway or drawer etc.  Good price and fast shipping</review_text>
If you use exercise tubing to workout, you need this door anchor.  It's sturdy, but not so thick that you can't shut the door.  Very well constructed so it doesn't feely cheap or flimsy</review_text>
This stretching rope does not stretch on it's own but is extremely well designed and strong.  During my physical therapy I used another device that broke, so I am glad I found this to replace it..  the strap is wide enough so it does not cut into your foot and the beads on the side give you a firm grip and gives you a guide as to how well you are progressing.  An excellent tool for therapy or just stretching</review_text>
Good stable step.  Can also be used as a weight bench for some weight training</review_text>
I ordered The Step F1011W hoping it would be identical to the sturdy Step's used at the health club.  It was all I hoped it would be.  The 4 included risers give me plenty of adjustments to vary the intensity of the workout.  The Step is solid under foot on all parts of the stepping surface with no wiggle or shake, making me feel confident as I hop, jump, and step through my program.  I tried a mini version of The Step (made by the same company, I think), but in this case, bigger is better.  The larger size enables The Step to double as a flat style workout bench as well. When not in use it slides  under my furniture</review_text>
It is working well and taking a beating.  And so is the Original Health Club Step.  I have been looking for an exercise program that will fit my lifestyle - and at home exercising is the way to go for me, so when I decided to buy a step, I wanted it to look like and behave like the ones I'd seen at the gym.   This one is exactly like those, takes a licking and keeps on ticking.  Its life will be long and hard</review_text>
This is one GREAT product! A very stable supportive step for any basic or advanced moves. A serious illness kept me from stepping for almost three years. I have since regained my health and am stepping with confidence, thanks to this quality product. Worth every penny of the price.</review_text>
I truly like this platform.  I owned a Rebok Step platform for years that I  thought highly of but I gave it to a friend and bought The Firm Fanny Lifter (the blue and purple one) to save space.  While the Fanny Lifter was great (and is - I still use it for leg presses, lunges and other strength building exercises), it was not stable enough for the step workouts I like to do.  I have some Cathe Friedrich and Christi Taylor workouts that you need to be able to do some travelling to get the most out of the routines.  Also, it is more stable on my less than level 100 year old wood floors than my Rebok platform was.  I would recommend investing in this platform to anyone that will use it.  If you are new to stepping, perhaps try a class a few times before spending the money or try the less expensive, shorter version.  I have seen it for $20-$25 at discount chains.  Personally, I have been step training for 20 years (I'm 41) at different impact levels and have no problems. For higher impact I train on the 6" level and lower impact on the 8".  My 9 year old cocker spaniel also uses it to get on and off the bed.</review_text>
To the reviewer who said you can make something like this for $20 or less, well, clearly they don't do step aerobics.  This step is designed to absorb a lot of the shock of the moves, making it safer on your joints than wood.  There is a nonskid mat on top.  It is also sturdy and rated for up to 300 pounds.  The step can be used for cardio or double as a weight bench.  Additional risers can be purchased to build it up higher.  Yes, it is expensive, but so very much worth it for the design and technology that went into making this safe for any level exerciser.  I have been using my step for 10 years, and it's still going strong.  It's made to last</review_text>
This is the exact same size and type of original health club Step as used by Cathe and other instructors in the majority of thier home workout dvds! I had the home-size Step first and didn't like how unstable it was due to the smaller size, so I purchased this one from Amazon. It is more stable and safe to use if directions for use are followed correctly. Hard sturdy plastic with rubber traction, came with 4 risers. Besides stepping, its great to use for a weight bench. Amazon shipped it fast too!</review_text>
This step is a quality piece of equiptment. It is sturdy and strong and can manage a large amount of weight. Also, when you are doing aerobic moves on it, it does not topple over and come apart like other steps that I have used. It also stores easily under a bed or in a closet and thus, does not clutter up your space. In addition to all of this, it is easy on the eyes as it is black and grey in colour</review_text>
Solid design, no complaints. I was a little leary of the red only having 3 led's. But it did its job and then some.</review_text>
Small size is a big plus.  More than ample light to use at night on pathways.  Red LED's are handy for use at night for reading maps/directions or just finding your way around without waking others who might be sleeping.</review_text>
There are flashlights and then there are FLASHLIGHTS. The S&W Galaxy is a real must have!Powered by 3 AAA Batteries it beams a bright white light out that can be seen for hundrets of yards and the red light function is perfect at night. The price is hardly beatable, unless someone wants to spend 300 bucks for a flashlight (vortex luxeon).I hve been a fan of Mag Lights for years, which cost the same as this one but I had to alter my opinion. After I bought one for myself and tested it I gave one to my wife, have one at work and tell everybody who's looking for a Flashlight about this one.If Amazon would allow more than five stars to give, I would always give the max!</review_text>
We use timers, many times a day for processes at work. This timer is great, can be attached to clothing, takes abuse</review_text>
This compass tells all the information you need so you won't get lost.You want to know the lay of the land? This compass is all you need.Excellent instructions and just large enough so you don,t have to squint to see what you are looking at. Great compass</review_text>
Very popular with my nephew who's a huge Packers fan. Loved the quality and the reasonable price</review_text>
the rail arrived in great condition, easy to assemble and was shipped in a timely manner. thank</review_text>
Assembly of this hyperextension bench is a breeze, and you'll be on your way to a better body in no time.</review_text>
Xodus 45 Degree Hyperextension Bench is a nice exercise machine by mercantila, looks great, and is surely cheaper than similar other benches. I assembled the entire machine in less than 20 minutes. I would have given it 5 stars otherwise, but I am not very comfortable with the bend angle. I would have rather preferred between 55 to 65 degrees hyperextension bench, but I guess there is non like this in the market, as I searched it on internet. Anyway, if you are looking for hyperextention machine, you can trust try this machine</review_text>
This is exactly what I was looking for.  I own my own reformer and I wanted something else to do on it besides the tapes that came with it.  This is an excellent workout and very user friendly</review_text>
Amazingly small to pack but absorbs water well and dries quickly</review_text>
I bought this towel for a two week trip back-packing through France and Switzerland.  The towel is very absorbant (including towel-drying my long hair) and dries very fast, in maybe an hour or so.  Definitely buy the XL if it is your primary towel for showering, it is not very big.  It also resists smelling if you do have to pack it away right after showering, I had to leave it wet in my suitcase for 2 days and it did not have a musty odor when I took it out.  It feels kind of like paper, but is soft, and better than some of the more felt-like material travel towels that do not absorb as well (like the one my boyfriend bought for this same trip).  I will recommend this towel to any of my friends and family on traveling excurions</review_text>
My son got this bike for his 4th birthday on March 14th, 2007.  I chose this type due to liking Schwinn bikes for a long time...always had this type of bike for myself and my older children.  Also, it may be a little large for a 4 year old, but I would like him to have it for some time, not just grow past it!  Which is why I also liked that it came with training wheels!!  Good sturdy bike that I think my son wil enjoy for a long time to come</review_text>
I luv all the firm workouts. I use the fannylifter with other firm workout DVDs that I own. My clothes are baggy after 2 weeks of using the DVD's</review_text>
I have been doing gentle aerobic exercise twice a week now for about three months for an hour each time, mostly on the stationary bike.  I could only do ten minutes of the lower body workout in this set, and that was without weights.  I can only do about five minutes of the abs workout.  I honestly thought I was in better shape than this.This has one DVD that has separate workouts for upper body, lower body, and abs, or it also has a workout that combines all three.I was torn about getting either this or The Transfirmer set which is more than double the price of this. I decided on this since I was not sure I would like these workouts although the very old set I have called The Firm Parts is excellent.  I decided on this because I have wanted a six inch step for years since I remember how effective it was at firming up my rear and thighs when I used to take a step class. I also could not, after much thought, figure out how having the slanted step in The Transfimer would be of any benefit. It seemed like a gimmick to sell more stuff to me. I can always buy more DVD's if I want and use these steps with them, without having to have a special slanted step.If you've been exercising for a while and getting your heart rate up several times a week for at least six months you might be able to get through an entire workout the first time. If you are over 45 like I am, unless you are in exceptionaly good condition, you might feel discouraged when you watch this.The steps that come with this are nice but they really are only for the lower body, even though they try to incorporate them into the other routines, like having you rest your heels on them when you lie on your back for the ab work. I know from past experience that nothing will tone your lower body like step workouts (except for running) and this one is pretty good, although they go fast and are constantly changing up the moves, which is confusing when you start out. It will take me about ten sessions until I am able to keep up with the continuous changes they do but this is normal for any step class. This helps to keep it from being too boring. It might be at least fifteen sessions for each workout until I will be able to get through an entire workout. By that time I should be looking good though.I intend to try to tough this out until I can get through an entire workout. It is killer stuff.People are addicted to The Firm workouts. They have a loyal following. I have the earliest Firm VHS tapes that I found in a second hand store. That set is called The Firm Parts and I like it better than this since it is more beginner friendly. I also get a kick out of how they tried to make it look  sexy, like they did when this was released in the early seventies.  Those girls are incredible looking. I've seen if for sale on eBay.This is more for intermediate and advanced exercisers, and for them it should be perfect. But if you are a determined sort like me you might be able to just do a few minutes at a time of each workout until you are in good enough shape to get through the whole thing. By that time you will most definitely see very visable results.</review_text>
....that this is the same as the FIRM "original" Body Sculpting System out a few years back with Jen Carmen "Body Sculpt", Lisa Kay "Ab Sculpt" and Allie DelRio (Now Pointer)"Cardio Sculpt". Very effective workouts, all on one nifty DVD now.</review_text>
The kids in the nighborhood love to play tackle football. I was worried someone was going to get hurt, so we bought this for the friend (age 10)who's yard is the field. The flags are sturdy and work very well.  The boys used them not only for football, but other chase games too. Unfortunately, 6 months later I see they are back to tackle. Don't know if the flags have been lost, or if boys just like to tackle.</review_text>
awesome quality but tells us as an e-mail when the hot wheels speedometer comes i</review_text>
I need instructions for installation and operation of the Bell bicycle speedometer.  Can you email them to me.  Thank you</review_text>
I thought this product was very good, my child has celeral palsy and the phyicaltherapist was able to use them right away thought that they were durable and safe which is the main thing</review_text>
So far so good.  Skates and pads appear sturdy.  My 3.5 year old fits them but they are fully extended.  She didn't take the skates off for 2 days :)  I'd recommend these, but not sure about the sizing as my little girl is small for her age</review_text>
My nieces loved these roller skates.  And they can use them for awhile because they are adjustabl</review_text>
I bought these skates when they were on sale for just $3.99 and I'm so glad I did. My daughter will be 4 in April and she loves these skates. They fit right over her shoes and I was amazed at how well she did on her first try.</review_text>
The skates are great, the pads are great, the bag is worthless.  My three-year-old is still too young for this, but she'll love it next year.</review_text>
I actually ordered 3 sets one day because they were only 3.99 that day. The price at Walmart was 16.99 so it was a great deal. The knee and elbow pads are great because my daughter can wear them with her bikes and scooters too. I would recommend them</review_text>
It all fits in a box that is not crazy big or crazy heavy, so shipping is not too bad.  It took about 1 hour to put together with kids "helping".  It is very sturdy.  I like the padding on the handle bars and the good bumper below the seats.  The hinge bearings move very smoothly.  Just well designed and engineered device.  Highly recommend it</review_text>
Wow, this is some seesaw!  It is well built, has no place to pinch/hurt little fingers/limbs, and it holds half the neighborhood at once (a big child can sit with a toddler on one side comfortably).  The lock feature is great because our 3 year old can sit on it without hurting herself (if no one is around to totter with her).  My only regret is that we did not buy it soon</review_text>
Very sturdy. Kids love it! Looks great too. I also like the lock feature</review_text>
I bought this blender to take on the road with me and ended up using it mostly at home.  It blends up my fruits and veges when I feel like making raw vegan soups or sauces.  I love that I don't have to plug it in and find it easy to clean and use.  There are 2 different crank options, one for heavy duty blending and one for mild.  Obviously you provide the muscle but not much is needed.  You will need to keep it steady (it does come with a mediocre clamp) and it takes a little getting used to but I'm quite happy with this unit.</review_text>
My son ordered the sward.  He likes it, and the ordering process went smothly</review_text>
The 4X32mm Range Estimating A.O. Full Size Master Sniper Scope is by far the best scope that you can mount to an airsoft rifle, or even submachine gun. Lets face facts, most airsoft guns have no purpose to have a scope on them, they don't go as far or as accurate as a hunting rifle or other rifle. But with this in mind, this scope is the best because, with airsoft why spend 50 dollars or more on a scope? The really cheap scopes, they break or don't even fit on the gun, the expensive ones, they are the same as this scope. This scope is easy to mount and easy to use. If you have never used a scope before, dialing it in or zeroing with come really easy, no tool or anything is needed to dial, except for mounting the scope to the gun, and it is actually easy to mount without the tool. The scope is designed to capture light through it, when it is pitch dark outside, when you look thought the scope, it looks like it's beginning to get dark outside. There is also a sun cap that allows less sun to block your view. All and all this is a perfect scope for airsoft.Guns that I would recommend and have mounted scope too:1). The UTG M40A1 Master Sniper Rifle2). The UTG AK-47 Tactical "WarHawk" assault rifle3). The UTG Desert camo and/or Olive green M324S Sniper rifle4). The CQB Navy SEALs UTG MP5 A4/A5 submachine gun.</review_text>
i realy like this scope.  it is a bit excessive for most airsofts.  a round bullet doesn't go very strait no matter what gun you are useing.  it has very fine adjustments like the scope on my 232 hunting rifle, it is of real rifle quality  44$ with shiping was very worth it.  i can peg squirls from 50' easly with it</review_text>
This board is one you can tell diffrent bettween the cheap boards like a mongoose and world industries,so much lighter,wheels and truck are so much smoother. But world industries has been making these boards since 1989,they are the best skateboard company around. Ill definitely buy again</review_text>
If you're looking for something for a beginning rider, this is a nice compromise between the 15.00 department store board and a custom board selling for 80-100 bucks.The wheels roll well, the trucks are decent and the graphics are cool</review_text>
This was a great deal. My son has been very happy with this akateboard. Thanks Amazon for such great products at great prices</review_text>
Ok, just made a friend who was a skateboarder, so I wanted to have something that I could try to learn on.  I couldn't believe the great deal on this board compared to other boards that were identical except the graphics on the bottom (it's WAY more now than what I paid...).  Anyway, I couldn't be happier.  It's a decent quality board and I'm having fun--and so are my kids!  We'll never be skaters, but it's still fun to have a solid quality skateboard around just for kicks</review_text>
My son has been wanting a new skateboard.  He actually saw this one before I got it wrapped.  He is very anxious to use it.  A few of his friends have similar ones and he thinks this is VERY COOL!12/23 He just opened it up and he and his brother are in the garage trying it out.  They both love it</review_text>
Well I ordered this ball in anticipation of a men's indoor flag league that I compete in...  I was pleasantly surprised when I opened the box and found that they had sent me the wrong ball.  The pleasant part is the fact that they sent me an all leather, NFL "The Duke" football.  Hey, who am I to argue with an upgrade to a ball about 3x's the price</review_text>
This is a solid piece of equipment, and using it for a few minutes daily does seem to help with back and shoulder pain -- not to mention, clears out your sinuses. The table has to be assembled, but the process is not too difficult. The tools you need are provided (maybe I had to supply my own flathead screwdriver, can't recall); it took me about an hour and a half to complete the job, and I mostly just followed the pictures. Everything about the table is sturdy, and the inversion mechanism works smoothly, so you feel safe not only hanging upside down like a bat, but also getting into and out of position (unlike with gravity boots and an inversion bar, which are kind of scary).  The ankle cuffs are well padded, but the pressure on the tops of the feet (which take all your weight while you are suspended) tends to get to me -- wearing athletic shoes with heavy sox helps. I can do only a few minutes at a time, but am working up to longer.  One caveat about having this table in your home: it needs space.  You can fold it a bit to reduce its footprint, but it will still need room to swing while you are in it.  Nevertheless, I love my table, feel better for using it, and am content to give it all the space it requires</review_text>
Great machine with easy assembly. I would'nt suggest using the super saver shipping though. My first one came damaged and they only deliver from 9-5 weekdays. My second one was ok but the box took a lot of beating. After a week of use I have found I get better results using the machine on my belly instead of on my back. Good sturdy machine if you have the space for it</review_text>
This is definitely one of the best purchases i've ever made. Not only did amazon get me a good deal on the equipment but, the machine does what it advertises it will do. I'm 6'3" tall and weigh in at 350lbs, I'm a big boy. But this machine handles me know problem. After inverting the very first time I saw positive results in my health. After inverting for two weeks using the Lifegear Heavy duty inversion table I can tell you that I can walk without pain for twice the distance that I could travel before. I am not in constant pain all the time anymore and if it arises I go invert for a while and it subsides. Thanks Amazon for making this affordable to me because i'm on a fixed income and was getting no help with my back injury until I was able to afford this. Thanks again</review_text>
This is a very solid, comfortable piece of equipment. I am very impressed. I am 6'7" and this table fits to 6'9".  The only thing I do not like is the ankle braces are non-adjustable height wise (they swing out for access) so if you have large feet they are difficult to slide in easily. I like the padded back and the price is outstanding for such a durable strong table.  I have only owned for a week and already notice improvement in back pains and general flexibility.</review_text>
I ordered this product the Wednesday before Christmas and to my amazement Amazon got it to me by Friday. The box is heavy, so best to find a friend to help with dragging it inside. The set up is easy, though the instructions are awful. I like the mechanism that secures my feet but my wife hates it. Before you buy, make sure the particular way this table holds your ankles is acceptable. There are other alternatives out there. Other than that, it is high quality, very stable and easy to use.</review_text>
A very sturdy piece of equipment.  My only 2 complaints are:  1) Very poorly written assembly directions, and 2) uncomfortable foot/ankle holders.</review_text>
I bought the LG HD Deluxe Table as a gift for my husband and he is very pleased.  It is very sturdy, easy to assemble with smooth operation. I would recommend it to anyone looking for an inversion table.  I also received this item much sooner than expected</review_text>
This is an excellently built product. There are six members in my immeadiate family all between 200-340lbs also my son is 6'7", the LifeGear Heavy Duty Table handles everyone with no problems with only a few seconds of adjustment between users. We liked it so much we bought another one and had it shipped to my wife's parents for Christmas</review_text>
This is a very heavy duty, solid piece of equipment.  I have no complaints about how it works.  It works fabulously, in fact.  But here are some things you should be aware of before you buy...One, it takes up quite a bit of space.  Not only from the frame itself, but also the amount of room that is necessary to invert goes beyond the "footprint" of the frame.  So it's not something you can just tuck in a corner someplace; it takes some room to operate.Two, it's very heavy.  Note the shipping weight is over 80 pounds.  Removing the table from the frame is ackward and difficult to say the least.  You could easily strain your back removing it, which kind of goes contrary to the benefits of the machine.  So don't think you're just going to remove the table, fold the frame and store this under the bed easily.  I mean, it can be done.  But by the time you do all that, you will be exhausted and may have a strained back.  So plan to have this thing set up and ready to go full-time because it's just WAY too much trouble to break down for storage.Again, please understand that I very much like this machine, thus the five star rating.  But these are just things that might not be readily apparent to someone shopping online and I just wanted to make sure you understand what you're getting.  If you don't have the room to leave this thing set up all the time, it may not be what you're looking for</review_text>
My wife has problems with her back and after much review and research on different inversion tables, we decided on the Life Gear HD table.  The ordering process from Amazon was simple and quick.  The table arrived within 6 days.  After opening the box, I read the instructions (clear and consise) and had the table up for use within 30 minutes.  This is definitely a quality, heavy duty, built-to-last table.I would definitely recommend this table for anyone who has back problems.  The best part, however, was the value pricing for this product from Amazon.  The free shipping made this a great buy!You can order this product with the confidence and knowledge that you will be very pleased and satisfied with it.</review_text>
We are very satisfied with this product.  It works as advertised.  It is really nice not to have to worry about batteries</review_text>
I found this light to be one of the best buys I have made in a long time.  It is very easy to use, it always shines where you are looking and has a bright enough light to see for a long way.  It is lite and compact and is not prone to moving around like other clip on lights.  This is a must for anyone who goes out at night</review_text>
This product is well designed and sturdy.  Looks sharp, too.  It's designed to use plastic grocery bags as liners, so you don't have to worry about getting it all sticky and dirty.  It even has a convenient storage compartment for spare grocery bags.  Makes a great gift for yourself or maybe for someone you know who just got a new car!</review_text>
My kid received these for Christmas yesterday.  He loves them and they seem a great pair of skates for the price. The shoe strings are too long, but they look so cool, I will just go buy a shorter pair for them and then they will be perfect. It's important to make sure the shoe strings don't hang down and get knotted up in a wheel--this happened to my son and I caught it before he stumbled. So make sure you get a shorter pair of strings to go with these skates.  I initially thought I would just tuck them inside the skates, but they dont stay tucked in</review_text>
I purchased this for a friend as a Christmas gift. He was very very pleased. I think for the price through whichever company I found through Amazon, it was a great deal. It is now very well used.</review_text>
I feel the kickballs are of similar quality and composition but this is the one you really want!(...</review_text>
The item was as expected and arrived in a timely manner.  I was satisfied with this transaction</review_text>
I was a little apprehensive about getting this bag, because it looked like it could only fit a mat and maybe a wallet in the pocket.  But I was amazed at how roomy it is!  I can fit two blocks in the bag with my mat, along with clothes and a dvd.  The pocket can hold quite a bit (I have mine stuffed with an ace bandage, athletic tape, a wallet, and deodorant) plus there's an extra pocket for a cell phone!  It's very strong, well made, and after dragging myself through the pouring rain, I found that nothing in the bag was wet.  Highly satisfied</review_text>
I bought this as a gift for my grandson for Christmas.It is a very good product and what a deal! He loves it! I'm sure he will use it for years to come</review_text>
Backboard smaller than I thought it would be but great item for the price.  Our kids are small so it is sufficient for them</review_text>
I absolutely love this bag. The adjustable handle is so convenient. It can be worn over the shoulder or across the chest or even in your hand. The mesh allows the bag to breathe in between sessions and the zipper is nice and sturdy. The fact that it's made out of recycled soda bottles makes it even better</review_text>
Perfect Pushup along with the tips on the Power 10 workout DVD provide an efficient and safe workout without injury to wrists or elbows. The circular base with the under padding allows you to safely push and dip lower with more intensity normally experience only when doing dips. Actually, you will feel as if your doing parallel dips. The benefit of the circular motion and proper form is gained from the DVD. The creator of the product and the fitness model instruct and demonstrate various workout routines, but most importantly, on how to involve the circular motion that is truly the 5 star benefit. It relives the pressure off elbows and wrist while ripping your chest,arms and upper back. Include the handles with your upper body weightlifting routine. The only negative is the DVD is overprice and should have been included with the handles, however;  the benefit outweigh the cost.</review_text>
I recieved this product about 3 weeks ago and am impressed with how it works.    I used to be an above average wrestler in the highly competitive state of Iowa, so over the years I learned many pushup and workout techniques to keep the body fit and strong.  I used to treat my body as a hobby, using pushups and dumbbells as my main source of lifting and staying in shape.   Over the past year, I've put on a little weight and lost some tone just like quite a few people do once the final years of school, careers, and family consume the majority of your time.  Recently, I am looking to get back to old form.  I saw the Perfect Pushup on television and was intrigued by the equipment.  I also did a little research via the internet to see what information I could find on the product.  I wondered how doing pushups with the Perfect Pushup compared to doing pushups normally, and wondered whether I could get into shape faster with them and whether they worked.  I can tell the difference between the results from the Perfect Pushup and that of doing normal, flat on the floor pushups.  So far I am pleased.  Getting acclimated to the twisting motion of the Perfect Pushup is probably the hardest part, especially if you are used to doing pushups flat on the floor.  But, after a couple sets the twisting motion becomes a natural movement.  Doing pushups on the Perfect Pushup tends to be a little difficult for the first week because the twisting movement really targets the whole upper body and some of your abs.  I felt a little soreness a few hours after doing a set of twenty.  For the first week, fight through the soreness and realize the pushups using the Perfect Pushup are a little tougher .  Try going back to normal, flat on the floor pushups and you'll be amazed on how many you can do.  You feel like you have to do 100 before getting a burn.  I haven't done a vigorous workout with the Perfect Pushup yet because of a busy schedule, but I try to use them for about 5-10 minutes a night.  So far, everyone else and I can see I look thinner and more toned.  I think I look more toned in my chest and upper abs so I am excited to develop a more routine workout that lasts 30 to 45 minutes much like I used to do as a wrestler to see how fast I see results.  I'm so impressed with this product that I recommend it to everyone including  friends and family.  Some friends have stopped by the house and saw them lying on the floor.  Of course like a lot of people they think it is another workout fad until they try it.  I have a few friends that live and die in the weight room.  They teased me a bit then became pretty impressed once they decided to do a set of pushups.  The burn and muscle fatigue comes quicker than most expect meaning the Perfect Pushup works even with those accustomed to working out on a regular basis.  One thing that really impresses me is how easy the Perfect Pushup allows you to isolate arms and chest muscles with ease doing one-handed pushups.</review_text>
It is great with the regular and wide pushups, not so great with the close because your wrists will still get some angular stress, but that is a minor quibble. The product is very well made, light but solid, nice rotation and very sturdy while in use. I hadnt done pushups in well over a year and so this was my reintroduction to them. I felt my core got a nice workout, too, especially the obliques. I didnt realize it at the time but using the proper form does work the core quite a bit. It is harder than the normal pushup because you dip down much lower but that makes it much more effective and you work more muscles. At 39.95, this is a great investment. Consider all the home exercise machines that are a thousand dollars and more and not as effective as Perfect Pushups. Make no mistake, you still have to put in the work and sweat to get results but so far this has been exceptional.It took about two weeks to get mine because the demand was greater than the supply but the wait was worth it. The earlier you order it, the sooner you will get it.</review_text>
If you're tired of the same old workouts and sore muscles afterward, this great product will change up your workouts without the strain on your wrists</review_text>
I would rate this much higher if there were more stars to pick from like 20! Before using the perfect pushup bars I could hardly do 6 girly push ups and I am a girl. Now that my husband and I have been using these I can now do "Manly" leggs straight push ups. I can see the difference in my arms, back, shoulders, and abs. I know most think it is just for Men but women you can gain strength in your upper body where we as women tend to be weaker. Oh did I say you gain in your chest muscle too? Well you do. This is the best $50 dollars I spent on work-out epuipment. I love that you can break the workout down throughout the day and it only takes 2 minutes to do each set. It is ideal for those persons who stay home or work the time that it takes you can be in shape in 21 days. That my friends is no lie.</review_text>
I was a little hesitant about the order's arrival after reading some of the feedback but the product arrived on time (after 9 days as is stated) and the quality surpasses my expectations.  The materials and construction are very sturdy, right down to the workout poster, being made of heavy grade glossed paper, that accompanies the Perfect Pushup.  The Perfect Pushup itself is great.  While regular pushups put a strain on the wrists due to the angle, this product eliminates that problem and allows your arms to rotate naturally, reducing stress from muscles being forced to work in an unnatural motion.  They are more difficult than regular pushups because of the factor of stabilization involved and allow you to extend the motion beyond your chest touching the floor in regular pushups.  The workout poster is pretty basic so if you want more creative workouts beyond narrow, wide, and regular pushups pickup the available DVD.  The construction seems able to last a lifetime.  I'm very happy with this product</review_text>
I ordered the product by 'expedited shipping'.  The order arrived in about a week.  In the seller feedback, I said I was disappointed in the time it took to deliver.  Well, today I received a courteous phone call and even an offer to refund the shipping (I did'nt take it) !!  So I change my opinion... Great product.  I used it every other day and am getting results.  The best part is it does'n't make me sore or hurt my joints like lifting weights (but I did try to bench press today and I am stronger).  Great service, which is so rare nowadays.  I would buy from the vendor again with confidence.  Oh... and the workout is great because from just following the instructions, I can hit the arms, shoulders, back, and chest from just one exercise</review_text>
AWESOME!!! I'm in the military so I've done my share of push-ups. You can feel the difference the first time you use this product. I can't wait to see and feel the results. Must have for anyone looking to maintain or build muscle strength.</review_text>
I'll make it short and sweet.  The product is simple and truly great.  If you are willing to put in the time and sweat, then you will get results.  This will be the best $40 you ever spend on fitness</review_text>
I am very happy with my purchase.  The treadmill runs smoothly and the controls are easy to use.  The preset programs make my workout easy.  Readouts are easy to see.  This has taken the drudgery out of my workout progra</review_text>
I've never done pilates, but I do yoga, and I chose a pilates mat because they are generally a bit thicker, and this one because I've had good luck with the Hugger Mugger brand in the past, and because I like the color. Yes, some people shop for things based on color. Sue me.Anyway, the mat is great! I really do like the extra thickness, because I often have joint problems, so some poses can get uncomfortable awful quick if using a regular-thickness yoga mat.The only 'problem' I have with it is that it is a bit slick. I was told by my yoga instructor that this is common with pilates mats. Yoga mats are generally just a bit sticky, and this one has a bit of that, but not NEAR as much of a gripping feel.I have also been told that you can use window cleaner or surface cleaner on your mat to make it a bit more sticky. I would recommend NOT using Mrs. Meyers Clean Day Surface Cleaner. I did. It left a residue that took quite a bit of rinsing to get off. It didn't hurt the mat irrevocably, however, so I'm willing to bet window cleaner or another surface cleaner wouldn't hurt your mat, either. I will probably try window cleaner eventually, but only when I have time to rinse it for a while if things go awry</review_text>
I'm a size 24 woman and my thighs are HUGE. They rub together and can get quite painful. Exercise was an ordeal. But I have to exercise to get the weight off. Talk about a catch 22 situation! I read somewhere that this product which is used by hard-core hikers and triatholon-ers is also great for us lesser mortals with excess adipose. Now I workout and have NO issues with the 'chub-rub'.</review_text>
This product is one of the few that really does what it says.  After experiencing some painful chafing from my sports bra following running, I started looking online for something to prevent the problem from recurring.  This fit the bill perfectly.  It is easy to apply, not greasy or pore-clogging, and works on feet to prevent painful blistering and rough calouses.  You should try it before you spend a lot of money for new workout clothes, etc. trying to fix the problem</review_text>
This stuff may seem pricey but it works.  Not something you normally share with anyone, but inner thighs are thanking me daily.  Ofcourse now that I can exercise without pain of chafing, I have lost 90 pounds and need this product less and less</review_text>
This is the BEST product ever made for chafing! Had been to Doctor many times and gotten 3 different creams that made manners worse! Saw an add for BodyGlide tried out as my last hope. Cured my chafing in 2 days</review_text>
This product allowed my son to run Cross Country with fewer blisters and me to work consecutive 12 hour shifts on my feet the whole time with little to no blisters. I highly reccomend this product for anyone with EB</review_text>
This stuff is great.  I use it almost everyday at work where I tend to get hot and sweaty throughout the day.  I would recommend it to anyone</review_text>
If you want to have six-pack abs, this wheel and the right diet will get you there.  Your arms may also benefit from the workout you'll get using this product</review_text>
The Ab Wheel is very simple to put together - just attach the wheel to the hand grips. Delivery was quick. Some instructions or use examples would've been nice. But, all-in-all it works for me. :</review_text>
For anyone in search of a 6 pack. I just bought one of these, used it a little bit, and it works amazingly well. Seems like the easiest way to develop a 6 pack is using this and proper diet. A good piece of exercise equipment and very affordable. It isolates abs better than anything.To all the doubters, when used properly this product does work.Note: Don't use if you have back problems because it puts a great deal of stress on the back</review_text>
The Abwheel is a quick easy way to get a good ab work-out. Plain and simple</review_text>
i had a baby nearly 7 months ago, so i have been buying ab workout equipment left and right. most of the time i end up returning the equipment because it does not work as promised (the cross crunch, sauna belt pro)the ab wheel was very in expensive and really works! you begin to feel it working immediately. after my first night of using it, i was sore the next day (a good sore, i knew i got a great workout)the only suggestion i have is that you buy a thick pad to put under your knees because using it on the floor really hurt my knees</review_text>
I don't know about building six pack I mean personally half of that relies on you genes so if you did not choose your parents well then #@%%^$!! But this device is cheap and very very effective. Before my body got used to the routine I felt the burn. Well worth it and extremely portabl</review_text>
Very nice stuff.. Its perfect for abs.. But, if you dont have balance and are not strong, its not perfect!I just loved it</review_text>
Sometimes the simplest thing can be the best thing in the world. Gee, I wish I came up with this gadget, I would be a millionaire by now. If you want to work your arms, abs, back, just use this EVIL WHEEL everyday. Forget about Sit Ups, and wasting money on BIG HEAVY machine. This Wheel can be used for ANYONE ANY age, ANY sex, and of course at ANY place~! Do not worry, I will come up with some gadget next time and be a millionaire! We all be glad I did it~!!</review_text>
Yea, i just received mine yesterday, i used to use a barbell for this method and it worked wonders.  when i heard there was an actual machine for this, i bought it right away.  since i received it yesterday,  i've been using the heck out of it and it is making me hurt already!!!  a good hurt!!!  for less than 15 bucks, you can't go wrong!!  and its not like you have to pull out some big machine, its just a real portable easy to use wheel.  you'll feel the burn the first time you use it!!! awesome</review_text>
After some set up issues got resolved, the computer worked better than I'd hoped. It's important that the sending units are on different sides of the bike</review_text>
To give a little background on how I'm comparing this workout, I have the following other Cathe workouts:Power Hour, CTX Kickbox, Rhythmic Step, the entire Intensity Series, the Terminator, Kick Punch & Crunch, Timesaver, Low Max, Kick Max, Muscle Max and Low Impact Circuit.Hands down, this is my absolute favorite workout. I think what takes the cake for me is the music. It's not *just* 80's music, either - it's remixed techno versions of it, and since I'm a huge fan of techno and going out clubbing and dancing my heart out to techno, it's a small wonder I find this workout so enjoyable.The step routines are a total kick. I'm not sure exactly how to recommend this workout as far as those new to Cathe's workouts goes. I think the choreography is easy to follow, but then I've been doing Cathe workouts now for around four years, so I've had a lot of practice (I used to not be able to make it through even the warmup of Rhythmic Step once upon a time ago.)Basically, my recommendation is if you can't figure out the step routines, just take your time and keep trying.I can't comment too much on the weighted portion of this workout - I tend to pop this one in and utilize all the cardio segments, including the bonus cardio track at the end for my cardio days. I plan this workout occasionally on my weights days on a weekend when I know I can dedicate a whole hour and a half to a workout, and I can tell you I am WIPED OUT by the end when I do the entire thing.BEST BEST BEST Cathe workout so far, though! LOVE it. I hope Cathe can put together more jewels like this. I think it also helps that she's definitely in a very happy mood when she's doing any of the workouts in the series this DVD came out with. In her Hardcore series, she just doesn't seem quite so happy - more like she's worn out, so it puts a completely different mood on the workout.Get this DVD! It's fantastic</review_text>
First of all, I never did Body Max 1. So, I don't have a way of comparing this to what Cathe has already done in that area. Secondly, I didn't do the entire video at once because it's just too damn long. I skipped the step section at the beginning and the cardio blasts, and then went back and did them later as a premix. However, this is a fun workout that gets the job done as far as weights and cardio.Honestly, my favorite part of this video was the warmup. I really had a good time with the step portions of the warm up. Yet, all of the cardio moves are fairly simple and can be picked up pretty easily on your first or second try... especially if you know Cathe's "usual" moves. Hard enough to make advanced exercisers sweat, but easily modified for those that aren't there yet.The best part of any Cathe video are the premixes - her videos are shockingly long for me, but I always can find a mix that gets me what I want to do in the amount of time that I want to do it.  I definitely recommend checking this video out</review_text>
This is a 96 minute workout so you do get a lot of bang for your buck with this one.  There are also about 6 premixes for shorter workout options, including only cardio, upper body, circuits, etc.I would recommend this to people already used to Cathe's choreography as the step workout is fairly intermediate.  There are 4 power circuits which are quite good.  The part that I found the toughest was the upper body workout using the stability ball.The music is fun, using 80s hits like "Don't You Forget About Me" and "Jessie's Girl", etc.I wouldn't say this workout is as high intensity as Cathe's IMAX workouts, but it is good for circuit or intermediate step, etc</review_text>
I've been very happy with this strap.  It's not as thick as the ones used in class, it's perfectly adequate for home use.  Love it</review_text>
I tried a friends and loved them.  I live in California but it has been colder than normal and windy.  I was at the beach painting & without these ear warmers I would not have been able to stay.  They are wonderful and they adjust for big heads.  They arrived quickly.</review_text>
If you do not need any type of extra special tire, this is a good tire for the price.  I bought it to use on my rear wheel b/c I bought a bike trainer also and my mountain bike tire is too knobby.  I also did not want to cause excessive wear on my mountain bike tire.  I did not realize until I changed the tire but my original tires are also Cheng Shin.  I haven't had any problems with them and from what I can tell I likely will not have any problems with this one</review_text>
When I got my bicycle I bought one of those little velcro on mirrors and it was terrible. I wasted my money. So I started looking for a replacement. This one works great. You get a wonderful view of what's behind you. And for the price it can't be beaten. If you need a bicycle mirror this is a great one to consider</review_text>
I love this mirror, swivels very good and does not get loose (so far, about 2 month use) Was able to install it by using provided instructions</review_text>
I bought this stove/grill on sale at a Target store to replace my old liquid fuel stove in time for camping season this past summer. It came with the instastart ignition although it doesn't say so in the Amazon product description. The product picture shows the little red igniter button near the center of the stove front. The grill is an excellent design option allowing for grilling steaks, hot dogs, burgers, sausages, etc., which I do frequently now. The Instastart ignition has worked flawlessly so far.Propane bottles win hands-down over liquid fuel tanks (no more having to pump the darn thing all the time). The bottles are cheap and with normal use, last through a three-meal day, no problem! I usually get a meal or two the next day, since lunches are typically cold... sandwiches, salads, etc. Most of the time we are away from the camp site at lunch time anyway. I always bring a 'bottle-a-day plus one' to be on the safe side and usually bring a bottle or two home for the next trip (depending on the length of the outting and how much cooking). I can usually find the bottles on sale through the year for just over a buck in the 'big' department stores and load up on them. As far as I can tell, the claim of an even, continuous gas flow is true (high or low)... just like using a gas range at home. Clean up is easy and the grease trap underneath the unit catches all that fat dripping from those New York strip steaks. Two or three strip steaks will fill that grease trap reservoir to the brim, so don't forget to empty it before grilling again. The long grill burner also heats that 10 or 12 inch fry pan across the bottom quickly for bacon, eggs, etc. The grill itself will take some scrubbing when you get home if you have been grilling steaks.If you're looking to replace that old liquid fuel stove, do yourself a favor and get this unit, you won't be sorry</review_text>
I love this zafu and use it in many ways.  Its number one use is obviously for my daily meditation practice.  It is just the right height, and I can scoot the buckwheat hulls inside the cushion around underneath my sitting bones in order to find the perfect supportive position.  I sit on this cushion for an hour every morning and it feels comfortable to me for the entire session.  I also keep the cushion in my living room and sit on it when I read at my low coffee table and when I watch TV.  Much better than couch-sitting, and much better than sitting on a normal pillow on the ground.  This zafu is dense and supportive</review_text>
This is a very nice black all-aluminum welded rear rack for mountain bikes. Came with everything I needed to fit onto my 21" frame (w/26" tires) Giant Rincon. It is pannier/basket-ready and some nice features include a built-in plate that acts as a splash-guard and an included bracket for mounting a rear light. This thing is nice 'n' light at less than 1.5 lbs is load-rated at around 30 lbs. It carries a life-time warranty.</review_text>
Excellent quality; much easier to put on than the cap I used before</review_text>
I have used this cap almost daily for over a year. It still fits snugly and is very comfortable. Writing this review has made me think to order another one now, for the inevitable day my old one wears out.I have a rather large head and found many caps didn't fit comfortably. This one is very elastic and is great</review_text>
Package missing.  It's never be received.  So I cannot rate it</review_text>
This swim cap is easy to use and thick enough that I can't imagine it ever ripping or tearing</review_text>
I bought this as a Christmas gift for my brother in law, but after he opened it, we all tried it on. I have very fragile, long hair and normally swim caps rip the hair out when I'm trying to put the swim cap on or take it off. This one came on and off so easily, without any hair-pulling</review_text>
I'm on my 5th cap now I think.  Silicone is great and lasts forever.  Unlike rubber (which can snag hair) and latex (which some people are allergic to) silicone fits smoothly over wet hair, has a glossy finish so it looks great and doesn't lose elasticity. I have a some advice if you want to try this product that I've learned overt the years:1. Always rinse and hang dry.  I've left wet caps in my gym bag and after a month of two of neglect, it develops black spots. I don't know if it's mold, it doesn't wash off...and you'll have to buy a new cap if you don't like the spotted look.2. Pull it on gently.  I've ripped one when I was trying to stretch it over my head because my long nails cut right through it. It's not cloth so you have to be careful. This goes for latex and rubber, too.3. Wet your hair first.  If your hair is dry when you put it on, you will trap air under the cap.  And since it's not a permeable material, the cap will start to come off while you swim because of the air trying to escape inside.4. Pick a fun color.That's it.  Have a great swim</review_text>
I had trouble getting water in my ears before wearing this cap.  Now no problem!  It keeps my hair fairly dry, or at least drier than with other caps I've tried.  It's easy to put on and take off--no hair pulling.  It's lasted well so far.  Much better than wearing a cap with a chin strap.</review_text>
My husband is a truck driver and has this 61oz thermos for work. This thermos is wonderful. It keeps the coffee hot all night. I am replaceing it after many years because the handle broke. Other then that it still works. I am so glad we found this stainless steel thermos because we went through so many glass lined ones before finding it. My husband won't leave to work without it. It takes a beating and is well worth the money</review_text>
This gun was my second gun i purchased via online. It's good that it comes with extra little add-ons but the laser-sight scope doesn't work and you really have no use for them. What i like about it is that it is an M4 design. Other then that its pretty accurate for about 20 feet and starts to drop or curve.  The adjustable hop-up is nice.  I use that feature to shoot around corners if you face your gun sideways and put the hop-up on it will curve like crazy. [...]</review_text>
As a U.S. Army soldier who recently came home from a year in Iraq, I was excited to see a M4 rifle which looked exactly like my rifle I had by my side everyday in Baghdad. Once this arrived, I was blown away by just how lifelike this weapon is. Every detail is exact, and the weapon functions much like the real thing. I wanted to teach my son about weapon safety, and you can do no better than to start with this model. It fires at a high pace with a good amount of accuracy, and I was surprised to find that one is able to 'Zero' the scope, again much like the real thing. As this weapon is INCREDIBLY lifelike, I would recommended a parent take into consideration where this weapon will be used. If the two orange segments of the weapon are painted black, no one, soldiers included, would be able to tell if this is real or not. All in all a great product at a great price</review_text>
2 of my friends own this gun I cream them in airsoft battles all the time i have yet to be defeated by this gun with only 200fps this gun has a 20 ft range. I own the MK1 carbine that fires at  500fps  goes strait through a bird feeder and can nail any target up to 200 feet away dont waist your money on this drop it once and it will break the mk1 carbine is full metal spend the extra money and get a quality gun</review_text>
I got this gun yesterday and well im very happy . this assault rifle looks beautiful.I was very disappointed to find that my model  didn't come with a laser, instead it came with a mountable mini flash light witch in my case never turned on yeah.........The rifle has 3 settings safe, single and full automatic.the electronic sight works. is actually a small aiming guide created with a  red ligth the only problem that i found is that after you installed it u will friend quite difficult to look throught it b of where is located at,for this tipe of guns i strongly suggest to buy a full face mask b this bb hurt and it will live a mark.if u buy this gun i also advise to reed the instructions carefully if you are  a parent pleace take your time and reed everything.Mine the M83a2 model came with 4) 0.12g bottle of bbs=8000bb's and an extra magazine. in conclution a wonderful product i palyed with the gun for about 12 hours and so far so good but time will tell, as i sed before TAKE GOOD KARE OF YOUR GUN because they are made mostly of plastic and if you  push them to far they will brake so be responsable safe and have fun!!</review_text>
I bought this gun for my son for Christmas.  It stopped working about 5 days later.  The manufacturer would not work with me concerning an exchange or refund because it was past 30 days (ordered in Nov. for Christmas).  My son is very disappointed</review_text>
Well they say that this IS THE PLAN..........  if anything happenes to the machine in 2 years they wil fix and/or replace....  Hopefully I never have to use it........</review_text>
I really hate to exercize.  But I like this stepper.  I suggest you place it near a wall to help your balance, but it's a pretty good bargain and sturdy piece of equipment for a light to moderate fitness person.  it won't work for those of you who use a stairmaster on level 23 or anything, but for those of us who NEED to exercize but rarely do, this is a godsen</review_text>
My mini stepper broke (the cable snapped) after 3 months of pretty hard use.  I e-mailed the company and sent them the original order information and they had a new unit in the mail that day.  They didn't send me a replacement part but a replacement stepper.  It's a bummer that it broke but the quick resolution was great.  I've been using the new one for a few weeks now and no problems yet</review_text>
I got this to help keep the water and dirt from shooting up and landing on my new Topeak rack and what ever I have on it. It does the job and adds good looks. It comes with 2 screews and had it on in seconds. I have 26 inch wheels and with the rack and fender no more wet back or packages. It sticks out 5 inches past the rack</review_text>
I have owned a full-size, auto open Gustbuster umbrella for six years.  It has exceeded all my expectations and works perfectly, even in the strongest of winds and heavy rain.  The auto open has never been a problem, and I like the larger size because it keeps more of me dry, not just my head & shoulders.  Well worth the extra money.  I know people who buy $10 umbrellas and have to replace them when they turn inside out.  Won't happen with this umbrella.</review_text>
I was told by a co-worker about the umbrella and how great it was, especially when it is raining and windy.So, I decided to order one, it has lived up to what my friend told me. When the wind in blowing, no worry that your umbrella will turn inside out and break</review_text>
Clubs and other items fit well not to hard to put togathe</review_text>
Very good. Some tee's even withstood more than 6 holes. What I like about these tee's is that you can use them short or long as well.</review_text>
I first saw the "Sumo Wrestler" squeeze horn on a friend's bike and thought it was a crack-up.  It is not only fun it is also easy to attach to your handle bar.  Every time I ride my bike and honk at passerby's I get a good laugh, as well as a laugh back.  I have even had a bike storeowner ask me where I bought the "Sumo Wrestler", so he could sell it in his store.  If you have a great sense of humor and want to make other people laugh this is the squeeze horn for you</review_text>
I like this product personally, not only for its good quality and less energy consumption but the cool outlook</review_text>
I took this cot to a 5 day music festival recently and was amazed with how well I slept on it. It made all the difference to get deep restful sleep every night. The low profile made it easy to fit in my small tent; and while others may find it too narrow, I appreciated that it did not take up all of the floor space of my tent.It takes a bit of muscle to get the aluminum legs into the frame, but once it is put together it is very sturdy.I preferred using this to an air mattress because of its compact carrying size,  weight and ease of use (and lack of deflation!).A wonderful addition to my camping arsenal, I look forward to bringing it with me on future camping endeavors</review_text>
Great for the traveling softball team! If you are responsible to bring your own bases, these are a good value and light weight</review_text>
Not much experience yet - 1 day.  Bought for toddler, assembly took about 30 minutes.  Fender not mentioned in instructions - need to put in place first before bolting forks to frame.  Had to snap frame caps in place better to slide into forks, and bracket still not lined up real well.  Includes 2 allen wrench/nut wrenches but need 2 allen wrenches of a different size (that is, 2 that are the same size, but different from the included) in order to attach suspension - and can't use without doing this!  Smooth rounded bolt heads, so don't think you can use a wrench or pliers.  Better have 2 allen wrench sets handy, or borrow from someone.Still, looks good and the toddler seems happy with it.</review_text>
Not only are kids surprised about this toy but parents love how durable this trike is. You can take this anywhere, it is easy to move and relocate.Wether you are camping or going on a family bike ride. Girls and boys love this because the tires don't burst or go flat after riding in the alley. You can take this bike through gravel in an instant and the tires are fine</review_text>
We absolutely love this table and use it for everything from tailgating to family car-camping.  It can be mildly (and I stress "mildly") annoying to set up, but the benefits WAY outweigh the costs -- once it's set up it's sturdy (even in dirt) and extremely helpful.  We do alot of camping at spots that don't have picnic tables, but even at the ones that do, it's nice to have an extra place to put things or assemble meals.  We're going to buy one for the people that we camp with after watching them try to prepare a meal on top of their cooler and flat rocks.  And whenever we go tailgating, my dad always asks us to bring it since it fits nicely into the trunk and is sturdy enough to entrust bottles of liquor!</review_text>
Very light weight.  Convenient.  Sturdy.  Easy to setup, breakdown, and carry.  Exactly what I was expecting and will use it again and again for outdoors events and maybe even inside if we need an extra table top at the holidays</review_text>
This Tricycle has an original design,it seems that is going to last because of its construction and it catches everyones atentio</review_text>
It's the best thing since sliced bread. I really like the way that it keeps my coffee hot all day. The last cup was just as hot as the first</review_text>
I'm 43 and this is nothing like the weak pogo stick my little brother had when I was a kid.  I surprised everyone in the family (even myself) when I ordered it.  When it arrived, I discovered I had the Gravity Games version, which I think looks better because it isn't red.  It was fully assembled, too.  The spring was so stiff, I was afraid to get on it at first but I took it to my little brother's house and we had a blast with it.  You won't catch me doing any extreme tricks at my age, but it's plenty fun just to bounce around and try to stay bouncing.  Indoors, I use it as an exerciser by just trying to balance on it.  It's quite a workout.  Don't let the stiff spring intimidate you, once you start bouncing, you will appreciate it.  I've already had so much fun with this pogo stick, it paid for itself on the first day.  (The looks on people's faces when they see a grown man bouncing on a pogo stick make it even more fun.)  It is well constructed and I expect it to last a long time.  But like I said, I won't be doing any extreme tricks with it.  If you try hard enough, you can break just about anything.  If you get too crazy with it or don't pay attention to what you are doing, you can hurt yourself too.  I get enough of a rush just taking it easy</review_text>
The stick will bruise up the insides of you knees, but after a while you get used to it, and not even notice them.  this stick is NOT ment for children NOR anyone under 120lbs.  The stick is ment for tricks.  If you are only buying this stick to bounce on, don't write a bad review when you find out the spring is insanely stiff.Only buy if you're into tricks.  For that purpose, it's awesome</review_text>
Holy cow, amazing! Though the stick has been modified the knee banging is still there! Once you bounce on it for a while it wont hurt any more. But beware, dont buy this for some one under like 13 or 14 the spring is so hard you need weight or leg muscle or both! to use it, im 156 pounds and just standing on it the spring wouldnt sink, if you get this and dont plan to do like extreme pogo you prolly wont like it. The stiff spring is good for getting some big air though! Its a bit heavey and tall but you can still so all sorts of technical stuff on it. I love this stick and is the best for extreme pogo stuff. Oh and one more thing, this beast is durable! Once you just pick it up you can feel the power! Its also a plus its anti-rust! I left my baby out (not a real baby, my stick) in the rain over night and she still shines and nothing was damaged! If you dont believe me go to xpogo.com and watch some videos! Have fun</review_text>
Just a brief note to our customers. The Super Pogo clamp (the piece above the spring)is now shaved down on the sides. This modification is not shown in the photo. The sides of the clamp are now even with the square chrome plated tubes... no more knee bumping!Because of your feedback the Super Pogo is better then ever.Enjoy!Bruce TurkGeneral ManagerSBI Enterprises</review_text>
Tis a great pogo if you're a little older or a little bigger....try to be over 150 lbs. if you want to get some serious air. This pogo is very strong...probably the strongest on the market. But, I have seen a couple of these break. It just depends what you are going to do with them. Mine broke because of the tricks I was trying to do. But If you just want to have fun bouncing and you're too big for those bite size pogos....get this one</review_text>
This is the best pogo available for the extreme pogo enthuisiasts. Since I bought it I have been able to go up about 10 stairs and jump off about 4-5 stairs. I've also jumped over garbage cans and bar stools. It's been a lot of fun. I've been trying to do a 360 barspin, but I haven't gotten that yet. It's been a big hit at college, especially at 146 Easton in NB. Except for banging up your knees alittle, I think this is the best pogo available for the adult child. I highly recommend it</review_text>
This pogo stick gets great air.  Ive been kickin some crazy jumps.  Its very durable, so you dont gotta worry about it breakin.  If your gonna get a pogo stick.... i recommend this one</review_text>
I bought this pogo stick for my 13 yr old son for Christmas and he was very excited to get it.  He had a hard time jumping on it even though he is in the weight range.  He is having a major problem with it bruising the inside of his knees.  I think the design of it needs some work even though it seems extremely durable.  The spring and bars around it are too wide and they are rubbing against his legs. I wanted to take it back but he insisted on keeping it. Just need to solve the bruised knee prolem. ..</review_text>
I bought the Eos to replace a small Cateye light that I had used as a helmet light until it unexpectedly died on me.  I commute by bike and I got over 3,000 miles of solid-on or flashing light from the Cateye, but I expected more.  The Eos costs about the same as the Cateye unit and uses the same AAA batteries (I prefer AA for runtime, I'll put up with the weight - this is the only reason I didn't give the Eos 5 stars).  However, the Eos' light is *bright* - nearly as bright as my 10-watt halogen main light.  The runtime is quite good - I got over a week of commuting from the provided alkaline batteries before switching to rechargables.  The light doesn't seem dimmer on the rechargables, unlike some other LED lights.  The Cateye required some ingenuity to mount on my helment - the Eos comes with a proper helmet mount in addition to the handlebar mount.  It's clear that the light was originally designed to be mounted on a headband, which is fine for me.  The battery compartment is secured by a small screw with a knurled edge for grip, and seems reasonably waterproof.  I've used it light rain with no problems and I don't expect the eventual downpour will cause any trouble, either.Bottom line - I'd buy it again.  This one's a winner</review_text>
Cyclists recognize that headlights can be roughly placed into two categories: (1) "See" lights that provide sufficient illumination to actually see where you are going and avoid obstacles, and (2) "See me" lights that are really only about being seen from the front.I commute with an HID light that is much brighter than this one, but I like having a backup light, and also like having a flashing helmet mounted light that I can point in any direction to get the attention of motorists, particularly those approaching me from the side.The Princeton Tec light is one of the few LED lights I've enountered that truly qualifies (albiet, barely) as a "see" light.  On the highest setting, it produces a very well collimated beam that is just the right intensity and width to make it suitable for night riding at reasonable speeds.  The light is less suitable at the medium setting, and unsuitable for that purpose at the lowest setting.I have the same gripes as Kent about this light.  (1) It should have been designed to use AA batteries.  If it were made to use AA batteries instead of AAA batteries, the light would be only marginally larger and heavier, but the burn time would be greatly extended ... enough to make it suitable for ultra cycling events.    (2) The duty cycle of the "flash" mode is too low.  The light would be far more visible if the flash rate were increased by at least a factor of two or three.  Those complaints aren't a knock on the effectiveness of the light itself.  Just suggestions for improvments that could make a great light even better</review_text>
LED headlights are getting better all the time. This little guy is a one Watt Luxeon LED with very good power regulation. Regulation means that the light gets the most from a set of batteries and keeps the light at a given brightness instead of dimming as the batteries weaken. The Princeton Tec EOS has three brightness settings and a flash mode. I actually find the flash mode to be too slow to be useful on the bike and it flashes at full power but these are minor nits. I'd also prefer if the light used AA instead of AAA cells. So I guess there are two things I don't like about this light.But the positives far outweigh the negatives. The light is small and is supposed to be waterproof to one meter. (I don't ride under water so I haven't tested that feature!) It's easy to operate and the batteries are easy to change. The light pattern seems to be just right for my riding. I use this light on my helmet but it also comes with a handlebar mount. I run the light at the lowest power setting most of the time and that's fine for reading my bike computer or cue sheets. The middle setting is better for general riding, spotting road signs and potholes and things like that. At the highest setting, you get the brightest beam but of course that eats through the batteries quicker.I'm pretty sure the circuit in this light was designed by Willie Hunt, a real guru in bike lighting circles. And yes, I'm enough of a nerd that I actually keep track of things like that. Anyhow, the Princeton Tec EOS is my latest favorite bike toy</review_text>
I actually like this bench.  I have to be honest that it is slighty poorly constructed and holds only 300lbs but it works as a bench for me.  I am currently piecing together a home work-out gym.  This is a great addition but it will need to be replaced in the future.If you are looking for a bench that you can prop up in your living room instead of playing video games this is a nice purchase.  It's a weak in certain areas such as the leg curls and the preacher curl but it has 2 inclines, level, and I can decline it too.Short and sweet essay:Cheap mans bench.  Functional but you will need to replace it later</review_text>
I ordered this bike for my little cousin as his Christmas gift.  He absolutely loves it!  He rides it around in his house all the time (since it's too cold to ride it outside right now).My boyfriend who assembled it, put it together in about 10 minutes using very few tools.  He said that it was really to assemble.I'd have to say that you really do get bang for your buck</review_text>
we gave this gift to our granson age 21/2. we were very pleased that this bike was such a good quality for the price. our granson loves it and its the perfect size for a 2 or 3yr old</review_text>
The bike and the delivery service were excellent..the only disappointment I had was..when I looked at it a week later on line it was $10.00 cheape</review_text>
it's OK if you are buying it for small kid. Easy assembly, good look, Kid loves it. but, This is for very small kid and may not last for 2 to 3 years for growing kid. Although it has adjustable seat but not very balanced after much height. I would rather have little bigger than this one.</review_text>
If you have to lug 40 plus pounds of gear around, get a decent pack. This one fills the bill nicely</review_text>
I've been using this product for nearly 1 month now, and I absolutely love it!  Along with healthful eating, this DVD is great for losing weight. I have already lost about 7 lbs.  I recommend this product to everyone</review_text>
The bag was nice and as described except it was way too small for my 5/8" thick yoga mat.  The description should have included a note that it only fits 1/8" or 1/4" yoga mats and is not suitable for thicker mats</review_text>
This is a great bag, easily accomodates my extra thick and long yoga mat. The fabric is durable and the breathable mesh section is key for those hot sweaty yoga classes.</review_text>
The SportTube has met all of my expectations.  I needed one that would hold 2 pairs of skis and poles, which it does beautifully.  Add to that the wheels for easy rolling and, best of all, the fact that the tube's length can be adjusted so that it will accommodate whatever length skie one has.  This is especially great as, now that ski lengths are sized so much smaller than in the past, a typical ski bag would have over 12" of wasted bag at the end of my 163cm skis.  After 2 ski trips with it, it shows no damage, and appears to be pretty "bullet-proof".The SkiTube really consists of two pvc/plastic tubes, one slightly smaller in diameter than the other that slide, one inside the other.  It has a built-in handle that is quite long, to facilitate easy gripping for lifting/pulling.  It has a TSA acceptable closure/lock, and will also accommodate various keyed or combination locks (not included).The SkiTube comes with a shoulder strap that attached to the handle, but I found the SkiTube a bit cumbersome to carry (although no moreso than a regular ski bag).  An optional handle to attach to the end of the tube to facilitate pulling is offered as an option, but I did not get this and so far, have not wanted for it either.The only drawback to the SkiTube is that, since it is rigid, it can't be folded up like a regular ski bag, and so takes up quite a bit of space.  However, dealing with the storage issue is insignificant, compared to the security, protection, and ease of transport that it offers.</review_text>
Just did two road trips with this case, carrying 5 pair of  Nordic race skis and 5 pair of poles.  The  longest skis were 207cm,  (the wheels are recessed into the bottom of case and do take out some space, so 5 pair of 207's wouldn't fit).  Also at that length the case is extended very close to it's maximum so it starts to act like a hinge in the center which is unfortunate when your packing light weight nordic racing equipment that needs more support.  The case comes with one clevis pin to connect the two telescoping halves and the alignment of the holes doesn't allow for a second.  I stiffened up the center by drilling and adding a second pin.  On our last trip I saw several of these cases and mine was the only one that got munched in the airport conveyor belt, two out of four corners were caved in a bit but no broken equipment.  The wheels and center handle both worked fine.   Bottom line: This case will be great as is for typical alpine equipment. For long classic racing skis, I would buy it again but it would be nice to see it evolve a little by stiffening up the center connection and reinforcing the corners</review_text>
Setup time , around 45 minutes. ( Because i had to drive down the road to my uncles shop to drill two new holes in the butterfly arm. )The only thing that stopped me from putting 5 stars as a rating, is i had to drill two holes in one of the butterfly arms Cause the two holes that were there, were on the wrong side. It was a FACTORY error, There was a washer that was missing, just one, it was allright though. Besides that, this thing is mega awesome. You can work out every muscle in your body with this thing. I am very pleased, and for the price. You will NOT find a better deal!!!!!!!!! On this weight bench, it can only hold 350 pounds of weight, that includes the weight of the person. I weigh 235 pounds so i can only put 115 extra pounds on it.If you don't want it to rust like me, use this tip, everywhere the metal rubs on metal, like the bench press bar hitting on the rest, i wrapped a little Duct tape on it, where the leg press is at, i wrapped more duct tape to stop it from rubbing it there. To get weights for it, it is good to goto a local store to buy some weights. It is $70 and more to mail weights to your house, as you may have figured allready, it does not come with weights.I caught a sale at Sear's and got 160 Lbs of weight for around $80. I'm also a big fellow, 6'3" , when im benching i have to push the butterfly bars out so my elbows dont hit it, but besides that, for the price, this is a steal!!! Enjoy, it is well worth it!Ciao'</review_text>
I received this weight bench today.PROS:Had it put together in 2-3 hours. No parts missing. I'm very happy with my purchase. At the price I paid, it's an very good bargain. Very sturdy. Lat bar and side butterfly attachments a nice plus. Plus it folds up!CONS: (All minor)The bar catches at the top of the main beams do protrude out a tad too far into the lift trajectory while doing bench presses for my 6'2" frame. I'll replace 'em with shorter versions. Must remove Lat Bar Frame to do fully exended leg lifts</review_text>
The machine itself is of decent quality, a bargain for the price.  The company however has basicly no internal packing material in the box and the box itself is thin cardboard which is not appropriate for such a heavy item.  The box was destroyed by the time it reached my house and I can't blame the shipping company.  The machine itself suffered damage on 5 parts in shipping.  I have yet to call the company for replacement parts</review_text>
I am very very happy with this item.  However, I only gave it five stars not because of the product but because of how the package came.  The box was tattered and looked like it would have fallen apart any second.  Also, I had to run to Lowe's to pick up additional nuts and bolts in order to finish setting up the bench because they were not in the package.  Still, for such a heavy piece of equipment, it came in record time, really really fast. I use the bench three days a week for my strenght training sessions.  A really really good buy for the price.  Trust me, I researched tons of other benches before deciding on this one.  You are not going to find another bench with all this equipment for this price.  Like another reviewer wrote, you would end up having to pay around $250-$400 for all that comes with this bench.   If you are looking for a good home gym to start out with, this is it.  Not to mention, it really doesn't take up that much space and as it states in its description, it can be folded.  Also, it is of good quality.  Very sturdy, something that I am sure should last me for years.  HIGHLY RECOMMEND!!!  DON'T EVEN THINK ABOUT IT FOR ANOTHER SECOND.  BUY THIS BENCH.  YOU WILL NOT BE DISAPPOINTED.</review_text>
The Valeo Neoprene Waist Trimmer does help slim your waist. While using it with exercise (and sensible diet) will help improve your outcome as it does help you sweat more but exercise is not necessary if you just want a slimmer waist Why?  The neoprene waist trimmer works on the concept of training you to suck in your gutt.  Wear the neoprene waist trimmer for just a  few hours and you will notice immediate results. The longer you wear it (it takes 21 days to form a habit), the easier it will become to suck in that gutt giving you the look of a slimmer waist. I do not recommend wearing this 24/7 or while you sleep (give your body a chance to adjust to sucking it in by itself)and each day you put it on that you try and pull it just a little tighter.</review_text>
This is a great product to use if you already or are going to start exercising. It helps with posture during workout and after a week of continuous use, I lost 5 inches around my belly. It is a great product if used while exercising but not for little chores here and there</review_text>
This product definitely works.  You still have to workout & eat right, but using it in conjunction will definitely help you see results.  I started wearing the trimmer at the gym & I have noticed a significant change in my stomach.  I measured my waist before I started using the product & two weeks after and I had lost an inch.  I just bought one for my boyfriend.</review_text>
First off, these belts do not "melt" fat from your waist. If you notice, your "love handles" are often times cool to the touch, which means that there will be limited bloodflow to the area. A belt such as this will do ONE THING: Help stimulate bloodflow to the area, which will INCREASE the CHANCES of burning fat from the love handles. They - like everything else - are totally useless if you do not exercise and maintain a proper diet.Also, a loss in inches does not equal a loss in fat. To measure the fat loss of the area you need a caliper, not a tape. These belts are by no means miracle workers, but can be of some benefit to those who are having problems with the love handles</review_text>
I ENJOY KNOWING MY GLOVED HAND WILL STAY ON THE CLUB AND NOT SLIP,THANKS IN PART OF THE TECHNOLOGY BUILT INTO THE GLOVE! THEY ARE ALSO COMFORTABLE AS WELL</review_text>
Price: 7$Great buy for the price. Even if you did pay full price.Tried others like Nike, Footjoy, etc. Didnt like the material. These however, dont feel like plastic, very airy (hands hardly ever sweat) and grip like a, well a reptile. Dont hesitate to buy</review_text>
It's bright, mounts real easy, and lasts quite a while.The only modification I would make, is to give it different levels of brightness. Other LED lights I have come with 3 levels and a flash cycle.That's it...Otherwise, it's a great inexpensive bike ligh</review_text>
The seller of this product made a quick delivery.  However, when putting the product together one of the holddown brackets broke because it was make out of plastic.  Product still able to maintain its purpose, and is used often.  Thanks for th4 product</review_text>
This is a good product it works well, easy to use. Im just lazy.LO</review_text>
There were no installation instructions for the Ab Roller and one of the screws became stripped during installation, but the price was excellent, and the product is easy to use. I have never used an Ab Roller before, but I found it to be a great assistence for sit-ups.  This is a simple yet useful product.</review_text>
This item is fun and durable. I could do all sorts of things on it  (in the water) and nothing happened to it! It held up to 300 pounds, which is crazy!The double valve makes it so the mattress can't really leak. This mattress gets wet very easily, so if you want to stay completely dry do not buy this item. If you want it to support about 3 people, make sure you blow it up a lot. I recommend it for everyone of all ages, espeially kids! Its just like any other water mattress out there, but it doesn't pop! My only concern was that when I got to the pool and sat on it in the water, it seemed kinda flat. So make sure you blow it up A LOT! It may seem blown up but it might not be</review_text>
All the BSN products have above average taste--my fave is the chocolate coconut.  This stuff is the perfect in-between-meals snack or a hedge against  those cravings that knock you of your food plan. :</review_text>
I agree with the above post concering the above-par flavors of these protein mixes.  My favorite is the  Banana Cream Pudding.Regarding the chocolate fudge pudding (CFP) flavor:  I am currently using this flavor and I would definitely recommend using milk instead of water.  Usually with protein mixes you can decide whether to use milk or water (except with a fruit punch-ish flavor i suppose, because that would be weird..) but when I take the CFP with water it just doesnt seem to blend as well.  I also don't get the full "pudding" experience as I did with milk, but i guess that's to be expected.Like the previous review pointed out, they do blend well with a spoon.  Stirring at an insane rate to make sure clumps don't develop isn't necessary with any of BSN's protein/mix lines (syntha-6, true-mass, and LDP)</review_text>
well i think the stuff needs to be tested better i got the bell pump and it was broke and i don't have the money to send it back so im stuck with it im realy not happy about this bell pum</review_text>
I ordered the product on Saturday, and received it promply on Thursday with standard shipping.  Everything was in excellent condition!  There were no scratches or anything, and the blade is of extremely good quality, with kanji symbols engraved into it.  The metal accents on both the sheath and the handle are nicely made.  DEFINITELY worth the small $12 price tag, and easily exceeds the quality of many other swords.  The point is also sharp, and is capable of being handled, which makes this sword good for both using and displaying</review_text>
The sword is very good and I received it in good conditions. The sheath got some scratches, but the sword itself is strong</review_text>
I have been practicing with this for about a year. I wanted to improve my snowboarding and surfing, well I went snowboarding yesterday for the first time this year and did notice some difference. I wanted to improve on my control of speed and turning so I mainly stayed to the practice area. Last year I would just go straight down the hill and usually wipe out to stop, I have since learned this is not proper. I would say I was more aware and confident on the snowboard than last year and I think my practice on the bongo board is the reason why. I still would like to try out my surfing to see if there is any improvement. Overall this is a valuable training aid if you use it regularly and wisely.</review_text>
I've had the Bongo board for a few days now and am very happy so far.  Very solid construction! One great feature is that the axis of the roller stays connected to the board by a stretchy cord that runs along the length of the bottom of the board.  This prevents the roller from dangerously flying off across the room if you lose your balance.  (I have seen other balance boards where the roller is not connected and this could be very dangerous, since it could fly off and break something inside your home.)  The roller is stopped on either end of the board by two trucks so it won't roll completely out from under you.It is very difficult to do at first! Beginners definitely need some chairs or something to hang onto, or a spotter.  My friend who is a long time skateboarder tried it and thought it was also pretty tricky to balance - it is a different feeling from skateboarding.It comes with a booklet describing the right 'form' and suggested ways to use the board and some tricks to learn once you get advanced.</review_text>
I really enjoy using my Bongo Board.  It's a lot of fun, and it really helps with strengthening lower muscles, as well as developing balance and fine motor skills.</review_text>
If you are a runner or cyclist and have not done much in the way of improving your lower body balance, this Bongo Board will make a huge difference!  I had to stop running marathons 5 years ago due to an imbalance in my hip muscles.  (If I had known about this board 5 years ago, I would have saved myself many trips to physical therapy and my massage therapist!)Yes, I have (and use) an exercise ball and balancing pillows, but this Bongo Board really works the adductors, abductors, quadriceps, hamstrings, calves, etc.  Using the board, makes the muscles start working together.  It is a real good workout, just trying to balance on the board!  After a couple of days, my hip pain has disappeared!  My hip feels great!  I can't wait to start training for my next marathon.Pros: If you want to improve your lower body balance, coordination and strength, try the Bongo Board. It worked for me!Cons: Be patient, it takes a couple of days to actually be able to balance on the board.  Make sure that you start with something to hold onto, like a wall or back of a couch</review_text>
The Bongo board is extreme fun. Be prepared to scare yourself until you get your footing, but once you loose the fear the fun doesn't stop!! Careful not to break an arm or your head</review_text>
I purchased this February 2007 for my 6yo son, 48inches high.  He is good with his hands and coordination.  Fully charges in about 6 hours.  Very fast and fun.  Quiet.  We haven't tested offroad, as I don't want to break it.  This is leaps better than Barbie jeeps (6mph), this goes 18mph.  As fast as a quick bicycle.  Very cool</review_text>
Just got the minimoto dune buggy for the kids for Christmas 2005.The kart is very sturdy and well made. Real heavy duty tires that will take a beating. Has actual replaceable/adjustable rod ends on the steering system just like more expensive gas powered karts. Initial charge out of the box took a bit longer but I believe it is fully charged from dead after about 6 hours. Ride time on a fully charged battery is about 45 minutes but considering the speed this kart runs at (18 miles an hour) those 45 minutes are a blast. Very quiet so the neighbors wont mind a bit about the hours and hours your kids will spend buzzing up and down your street!Highly recommended!</review_text>
yeh um i have'nt gotten this i'm still waiting for a review so will sum1 reiview it plz so i can see if its worth i</review_text>
I have an 11 year ols son and it gives us much enjoyment together</review_text>
It inflates easy, is very stable, and has reasonable storage space (in the front under the net and behind the seat). Some issues I had with it were that the hull and valves tear easily when cold (under 40F).  I've had two places in the hull tear, and two valves.  The good news is that super glue works amazingly well at repairing both of these (when given enough time to cure).  This kayak has given me 20+ good trips since September and despite issues, is still going strong.  If you have more money to spend, I would get a higher quality kayak.  but if you're on a tight budget and/or are a beginner you can't beat this kayak for under $100</review_text>
This has proved to be a nice item for family recreation.  I have several of these for group outings. The kids just love them.  The kayaks are quite stable, easy to manuever, and a novice can easily handle them.Compared with  canoes and hardshell kayaks they are more forgiving, much easier to transport, but quite slow.  You can plan on traveling about 1 mile per hour without current. You will not be able to make much progress up stream or into a stiff wind.They have done well on afternoon outings on tame rivers and lakes, but definately not built for big water or whitewater. The kayaks have proved reasonably durable, but I have had to patch several pinholes.</review_text>
If you want to have a blast buy one of these kayaks immediately.  We have had our two years and have floated down over a dozen rivers ranging from the Merced high up in the High Sierras to the Deschutes in Sunriver, Oregon.  Inflates with a portable pump in three minutes and is so stable you literally cannot tip it over.  If you don't want to get wet, you won't.  The paddle is included and works perfectly.  Both my wife and I absolutely love these kayaks and she even gave up her ocean going one.  They deflate within a minute and fold up into a small space.  The inflatable compartments have a special valve that will not leak unless you pull it out and away from the boat.  It makes inflating and deflating a breeze.  One of the best bargins I have seen over the past couple of years</review_text>
I was very happy with my first trial use of this Kayak.  I was going along with no worries until I saw a 5-6 foot alligator about 20 yards away.  This made me think that maybe this wasn't the right place for an inflatable.  Other than that it was a breeze to inflate and use.  I'm very happy with this purchase. I just need to do some more research about my locations first.  Pretty crazy rookie mistake</review_text>
A high quality product!  I was not one bit disappointed in the ease of inflation, light carrying weight, and durable paddle.  I was in the water in minutes enjoying my ride.  Best handling on calm waters.  The back rest is really supportive.  Great buy for low-cost investment introduction to kayaking</review_text>
Wonderful invention for the family summer vacation. You WILL get wet because water drips from the paddles.Not a REAL kayak, but great for the money. Excellent quality. Extremely comfortable. Gets up good speed to cover some distance. Paddles are light but quite sturdy. Cup holder snuggly holds that important bottle of water. Cargo carriers work well.</review_text>
I purchased this stroller for my husband to use - but I am trying to take it back for my own use!  Folding is easy, but takes two hands.  The brake sets and releases with ease and it stears like a dream.  My rather tall 2 year old is very comfortable when sitting in it; however, he would prefer sitting more upright.  I have tightened the seat adjustment strap as far as I can, but he still is reclined a bit too much.  I think I can modify it if I just take the time.  The only negative I have found is that it won't fold flat enought to fit in the trunk of my Grand Prix.  It is light enough for me to lift it into the back of my husband's truck, and would fit nicely in the rear of a SUV or mini-van.  Overall, we are extremely pleased with our purchase</review_text>
We love this stroller.  I checked out a whole bunch on line, along with ones that my friends already owned and ones that were available at one of our local and over-priced baby stores.  I also spoke with the people at the Schwinn/In-Step company before buying, and it had all the features that they promised.  The best thing about it is the swivel canopy.  You can unsnap it and drop it down in front of baby when the sun is coming in from the front so baby doesn't get it in his eyes.  The second best thing is the swivel wheel in front.  When walking, you can unlatch it and the front wheel turns freely.  When running, lock it into place for safety and control.  For the price, this stroller can't be beat.  (Easy assembly, too.</review_text>
After reading about the drawbacks to this stroller, I was hesitant to order it without first testing it myself.  I received it a few days ago and was pleasantly surprised.  Many of the drawbacks listed in other comments were not that major.1. Re: size of stroller when folded - My car is a 2000 Honda Accord, and the stoller fits fine in the trunk IF I TAKE OFF THE REAR WHEELS.  The other jogging stroller model I considered also required removal of the rear wheels.2. Re: stroller reclining too much - The angle of inclination can be adjusted  by adjusting the straps at the back of the seat to almost any angle you want.3. Re: difficulty of folding stoller - Yes, the stroller is hard to fold completely with only one hand, but it mostly folds by itself.  I think most non-umbrella type strollers will require both hands to fold.Overall, this is a great stroller.  For traveling though, another stoller is definitely required</review_text>
Good1. Smooth ride for my little one2. Well made, good construction3. Attractive4. Light enough (as far as jogging strollers under $200 go)5. Front and rear wheels locks quickly easily and securely6. HUGE hood for shadeBadFolding / portability is HORRIBLE. If you have a small trunk you're counting on it fitting in, dont. It's very bulky, even "folded", if thats what you want to call it. I have a minivan with no 3rd row seat so I'll get by just fine. I just dread the day I HAVE to fit into my wife's Toyota Corolla =\Otherwise, its a great stroller!</review_text>
They are Foosballs.  As a novice, they seem correct, weighted just fine, and roll normally.  I paid around $6, which was very reasonable.Our table gets very heavy use, and these seem to be holding up just fine.  The balls get marked up from my table quite a bit, so the white isn't white for long.  I suppose the soccer-like balls are nicer to look at, but after heavy use on our table, I'm sure it would just be marked up from banging around on the surfaces as well</review_text>
Works great. Just plug it in to your usb port and hold down a button on your suunto watch and it automatically downloads into your suunto software program. That's it</review_text>
If you have a T series suunto this is a very nice option. You can really have useful piece of data to analyze after workout.</review_text>
Perfect fit on my rear basket. Very versatile with or without a basket on rear rack</review_text>
Purchased this product last week. Money well spent. Good quality, absolutely leak-proof and held liquid at same temperature when poured into the thermos. Easy to drink from at any angle, no spills. Very satisfied with this thermos and would highly recommend</review_text>
This thing keeps coffee hot for half a day at least.  Great no spill as well.  Perfect for mountaineering</review_text>
The Thermos E5 travel mug is everything Thermos says it is.  It seals tight with zero leakage and is easy to open to get drink. Unlike travel mugs with the access hole near the rim, you can drink from any where on the rim. It keeps coffee hot for hours.  It is very impact resistant.  Very good travel mug!</review_text>
If you like to take your time with your morning cofe this mug will keep it hot all day</review_text>
This is the best travel mug I've ever had.  Yesterday I poured coffee at 7am and around 3pm it was still luke-warm.  This mug is totally worth it</review_text>
This mug is without question the best I've ever used for my coffee while on the way to and at work. I've tried quite a few others, and this is absolutely a fantastic product! It keeps coffee hot for hours, does not leak or dribble, and the drink from any angle top shows that someone actually thought about it in the design process. I can't speak highly enough about this mug! I have the mug, and will be ordering the 20oz E5 beverage bottle and also the tumbler in the very near future! FANTASTIC product!!!</review_text>
My husband and I got this bike for our 3 1/2 year old daughter for Christmas and we're all very happy with it. I was a little leary about purchasing a bike online, but all of the parts were there and my daughter is riding like a pro (as much of a pro as one can be with training wheels!) I would definitely recommend this bike...especially for Dora lovers!</review_text>
nice, easy to assemble. Good price $40.  My 3 yr-old can already ride it, better than 12" bike</review_text>
My child loved the Dora Bike it was perfect in every way. We are completely satisfied.</review_text>
This bike is super cute and the look on my goddaughter's face was absolutely priceless when she opened it. She rides it all the time and it is perfect</review_text>
My daughter is a rough and tumble 4 yr old who was desperately in need of a bigger bike.  This was a great purchase for an even better price.  In spite of the crashes and miles (she cycles while I jog) already logged on this bike, it has held up wonderfully to this point.  The only thing I have to do from time-to-time is retighten the nuts that hold the training wheels in place.  I didn't have to put the bike together (my husband is a technical genius), but he had it put together in no time at all.</review_text>
The bike is very cute, however it didn't come with any parts assembly for the seat so my daughter was very dissappointed on christmas day when she couldn't ride her bike</review_text>
A lot of parts to assemble with weak instructions, but after you get passed that, it is a very sturdy machine that works very smoothly.  not as heavy as i thought at about 50 pounds so u can move it around.  its clicks are very close to eachother, and with a quick release latch gives u confidence in moving up a notch.  im kicking the pads higher than ever now</review_text>
Great stretching maching for the price! Assists with stretching to 190 degrees. Solid construction that will last for years</review_text>
I was a little sceptical at first but my first time on it I knew it was money well spen</review_text>
this is just what we were looking for--we wanted to increase our kicking range and this has helped</review_text>
These are the best googles I have ever had.  I have tried many.  Very comfortable, anti-fog, no water in.  Great - buying more soon</review_text>
the product is good, and the color is suitable for teenagers. pretty good, I like it. And of course it make impervious to water</review_text>
My Daughter swims 2 hrs a day, 6 days a week, & she loves these goggles. I think she has 4 or 5 pair, all the same model, only the color is different</review_text>
When I needed a new pair of goggles, my friends from swim team recommended that I get Speedo Vanquishers.  I assumed that they knew what they were talking about, since the majority of them had been on swim team for years, and WOW did they!!! I LOVE my vanquishers. They let in no water, they don't fall off when I dive in, and I never have to worry about the straps breaking.  Now, I won't use any other kind</review_text>
They don't fog up and they don't let water in.  The length of the straps and the nose strip are very adjustable to fit anyone.  And they look cool :</review_text>
Great googles, have used them for years! Fit like no other. Prompt shipping! Great service! Great communications</review_text>
I'm not used to wearing goggles, as I just started swimming a lot this year.  But after trying several cheap ones, these worked very well.  They definitely kept the water out and did not fog up, and they fit pretty well also.  I had them on pretty tight, but I may have been able to loosen them a little</review_text>
These work well, but leave marks around my eyes that last all day.  They fog fairly easily, but at least I don't lose my contact lenses when I swim.  I didn't pay attention to the instructions when I used the first pair, and I found that the coating on the lenses scratched easily.  They will last longer if you are careful cleaning them.</review_text>
The mirrors are small and take a little getting used to, but once a rider becomes accustomed to the viewing area, they work great!  They are small and compact and are out of the way when you don't want to use them.  The bar ends are stable and are great to lean on.  I love these</review_text>
My 4 year old daughter loved the looks of the bike and the size was a good match for her. She took to riding it fairly easy with the training wheels on. The only trouble she had was the back peddle breaks but after a few days, she seemed to have no more problems and is enjoying her bike</review_text>
Wonderful, my grandchildren LOVED them. Purchased at daily "Special" price with Free shipping-they were delivered the next day.  The only problem, I only ordered two</review_text>
I use this for dumbbell bench press, military press, back extensions.. and a lot more.  It works well, you can do incline, decline as well as flat bench workouts.  I like the light weight of it and it folds so it can be stored away. Even with it being light, it is quite sturdy too.  It works for what it was designed for and I loved the cheap shipping</review_text>
If you are looking for a light weight, water absorbing, and dependable towel this is the one. I bought my first one years ago and have used it on all my backpacking trips; so have some of my friends that have forgotten theirs. I recommend washing it a couple of times before the first use to soften it up a bit. Do not buy this product if you are looking for luxury, this does it's job, period</review_text>
This ball is very good quality. I like that I do not have to worry about it bursting on me. I also like the material, your skin does not stick to it and is easy to clean</review_text>
This is a big and I mean big ball.  When I received the ball from Valeo, I thought they sent me the wrong size.  I hadn't fully inflated it, even though it looked full.  Valeo told me it should be 29" when fully inflated.  If I had inflated my 65cm ball to 26", I wouldn't have needed this size ball.  I'm 6'2" and I think the 65 cm would have worked for me.  Regardless, this is a quality ball and works quite well for ab exercises, etc.  I am pleased with the product; just make sure your'e tall before you order this size</review_text>
This gym-quality roller comes with a weight attachment.  You'll enjoy the comfort-grip handle and the ease you'll have switching the weights</review_text>
I am very pleased with the product. Changing weights is very easy and quick. Accomplishes the goal I intended</review_text>
I have to say i took a risk by buying this product after all the reviews but im glad i did cause i saved some money doing it. I got everything on time actually sooner than expected. I like the feel good grip really well built and the ease of putting the plates in it. im overall really happy with it and would definitely recommend...</review_text>
This excellent accessory is not only a Wrist exerciser, but a complete Forearm Strengthener. Simple to use, with no spring or moving or breakable parts, it looks like it will resist the hardest workouts and continuous use.I bought one eight months ago and I loved it. I use it at home and even at the gym, since it is small and very light, so it fits in my backpack taken about the same space than my gloves.With simple rolling movements and as you gradually increase resistance by adding weight plates to it you strengthen hands, wrist, forearms and upper arms. I have considerably improved wrist stability and holding power, and also feel an Increased range of motion and flexibilit</review_text>
Device arrived w/o the plate that enables a weight to be attached to the rope. Don't bother trying to first get help from the manufacturer as Amazon.Com advised when I reported the problem to them. GoFit's website doesn't include an 800 number nor any way to contact them via the Internet.  The device arrived w/o any manual, parts list, instructions or any information on how to contact them if you had a problem or question.</review_text>
If you don't have a full hour to work out each day, this DVD gives you shorter workouts to help you fit them into your busy schedule</review_text>
First of all I have to say that Cathe is the BEST instructor out there. All of her workouts are great and they will definitely give you results!!!!! I reach for this DVD often as I don't have much time on weekdays to do other Cathe's DVDs that are usually over 1 hour long... This DVD is also perfect for beginners and intermediates...I recommend Cathe 100%. If you want results then don't look any further!</review_text>
this gun is so crazy!it hurts bad once i had my thumb on the barrel and pulled the trigger on accecident but i shot my thumb and it hurt for the rest  of the day.pros.looks goodhurtsfunconssupresser does nothinghard to cockall in all great gun buy it NOW!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
This gun is awesome for the price. It has a very sturdy fell to it and shoots fairly hard. The clip holds 26 rds. and you get 2 of them so you'll never run out. This gun is the greatest pistol our for under $25 and if you don't buy it you're stupid</review_text>
Wow this gun is amazing. It is very accurate. The gun itself is light. It came with exactly 1 metal silencer (made to improve accuracy) and TWO Magazines. This package did not come with BB's so of course you have to buy BB's. There is one slight thing I don't like which is the release magazine button. It is right under the trigger frame and you have to push down on it. It's not really a button rather it's a lever. Overall this gun is the gun to get for anything, because it is cheap, light, accurate and holds 26 rounds each! I would say this gun shoots about the same or more as a KWC Desert Eagle which I have too and for the price of this gun, the KWC Desert Eagle is no match</review_text>
This is a great gun with good power, accuracy, and clip size.The extra clip and full metal silencer ia a great addition.But be careful with the silencer my sister turned it on to tight and the gun broke</review_text>
This is a great gun. Very powerful and durable. It has a full metal silencer and is a HUGE gun. And to answer ur question if u read the description not only can the gun use .12 bb's it strengthens the fps to 320</review_text>
This gun not only is better than Marui, but it's about 1/3rd of the price... at least. It comes with a full-metal mock silencer (the rest of the gun is hard plastic) AND an extra clip. UTG is easily one of the best Airsoft makers around. And for the price, you really can't beat this deal!!!!</review_text>
it kind looks like it is and i might buy it if it is. let me know</review_text>
This jump rope's grips are good and supple and nice on the hands.  The cord gets very tangled when not in use but gets untangled during jumping.  The jump rope has a nice adjustable length feature.  The computer lacks flash memory and it defaults to 130 pounds for the calorie calculation so you have to set it to your weight each time you turn it on.  Understandable for the price.  The computer lacks the ability to set the countdown timer to seconds, it only does minutes.  I like to do 30 second high energy jumping and I can't keep that up for 1 minute so no seconds feature is not good.It takes about 700 jumps for me at 180 pounds and 6'5 (it only takes weight input though) to get 100 calories to register.  I do sets of 100, not too tiring, and then walk around the kitchen 4 times and then do another 100</review_text>
I highly recommend this product.  Although I'm new to the jumproping business, I think that both beginners and avid jumpropers would enjoy this tool</review_text>
I am a jump rope nut. I knew a guy who had bad knees and lost 75lbs jumping rope every day instead of running. It always lingered in my mind that jumping could be the best way to exercise. It burns more calories per minute than running and has less- yes less impact by far than running. Most folks don't realize that.After a bead rope and reading up more, and going to boxing gyms, I realized a speed rope was the trick. However, I also like gadgets. So, I got the Tanita digital jump rope. It's ingenious- counts calories and rotations. But it wasn't fast enough. It sells on Amazon, and I recommend it as well.So I got a Buddy Lee professional metal, super fast rope. I love it, but it's $40- also from amazon.I just got this one- the discovery rope and LOVE it. It takes a little setting up and then it's the fastest rope I have. And I find it very motivating. You see, in addition to counting calories, it also has a countdown timer. You set how long you want to jump (not counting the time spent huffing, puffing and panting til you become more conditioned...) and it will keep track. It also counts repetitions. It is also half the price of the very reasonable Tanita model.The timer is very sensible, because you don't have to watch a clock or even be near one and of course when you're jumping you can't exactly look at your watch.I highly recommend this. I've bought 10 of them to give to friends as well. The only thing I wish they had (although it would add a lot to the price) is a pulse function built into the handle with a beep option so you could gauge your intensity without even looking. (Hint: free idea Discovery!)But my heart rate strap and watch work ok for the task. TOld you I love gadgets</review_text>
This is a hard nylon version of the yawara stick. There used to be some impressive versions of these on the market, but now there's this one and two others, one aluminum and one wooden, both functional but rather less inspired. The more common pocket stick is the kubotan, which is just a shorter, skinnier yawara stick, usually configured as a keyring. Kubotans come in many shapes and materials.As Don Rearic* writes, you can think of a pocket stick as a knife, but with two differences: You can thrust, but not cut; and you can target bony areas. Also, to the extent that poking holes in people is bad legal hygiene, the stick is safer than the knife. You can strike with the "pommel" of the yawara in a hammer blow or with the "point" in a reverse hammer blow or even a sort of rapier thrust, bracing the tip with the thumb. You can also use it to trap or lock joints, if you know what you're doing.Anything you hit even moderately hard is going to hurt. This thing can break bone, pulverize muscle, and shock nerves, all without skinning or fracturing your knuckles. Yes, the product description says it's non-lethal, but if you whack someone in the head with it, you could kill him. And "just" breaking someone's bones is no joke, either. Before you try it out on friend or foe, do everyone a favor and take a few whacks at a piece of 3/4" plywood. This should give you some respect for what this tool can do.Unlike many weapons, the yawara stick won't extend your striking range. You have to get up close and personal with whatever you're hitting, which usually means it can hit you. If you're too timid to close range, a pocket stick probably won't do you a lot of good.This thing is like having big, indestructible knuckles on each end of your hand. Highly recommended.*Please use Google for more info, as Amazon doesn't allow offsite hyperlinking.</review_text>
More of a toy than a bike.  Training wheels clearly say "do not remove."  Returning this.  Fortunately Amazon's return policy is awesome.  Thank you Amazon.  Ordered a different item to replace this from you</review_text>
These are really great gloves.  I use them at least twice a week, sometimes three times a week.  They are really comfortable, easy to get on and off and have just enough padding.  A few other people in my kickboxing class also have these gloves and one of the ladies has been using her gloves for at least a year.  If you are into kickboxing and are looking for a good pair of gloves, these are GREAT.Note:  You should make sure that you get the right size for your hands.  I actually looked up the Harbinger website and they tell you what to measure and what size you should get</review_text>
I use this mug primarily so that I can have coffee at the office without having to depend on the gross communal pot that nobody ever cleans.  It is quite satisfactory for that purpose, as it is convenient, easy to clean, and portable.  I always pour the coffee into another mug after steeping to stop it from continuing to steep.It loses one star because it is only an okay French press.  The filter leaves a little more sludge than it ought even with a pretty coarse ground.  But it's certainly passable.  On a camping trip, this thing would be heaven, as it is very durable and easy to clean.The bottom line:  If you need a portable French press, this definitely will do the job</review_text>
This was originally purchased to solve how to solve the "what is a light weight way to make GOOD coffee while backing" problem.  I tried many things from taking the tea bag style single coffee bags to actually taking a lexan french press and even cowboy coffee.  I like good strong coffee but I am not a huge fan of 3 dimensional coffee which is what I get with cowboy coffee.  This cup/press solves everything and it is multi purpose and light weight.  I now use it at home a lot also and at work.  Hot water is pretty easy to come by in most places.  All I need is a sample of my favorite coffee around.  At home, it is the easiest way to make one cup of coffee.  Just scoop in my coffee, dump in my hot water and take the cup with me.  Wait a couple of minutes and start drinking.  It is really great when leaving the house.  Since I am a bit of a coffee snob, I never have to drink just whatever people have around or what they like.  All I need is hot water.  When backpacking, I actually store a zip-lock bag with my coffee inside of the cup to save space.  This cup is the only cup I take in my pack, i.e., no extra drinking cup.  I drink water from my Nalgene or bladder.  If I need a cup I use this one.  On cold mornings this makes an insulated "bowl" for hot cereal before my cup of hot coffee.  The handle is strong.  I have hit the trail with coffee in hand and just clipped in on the outside of pack when empty.  It has never cracked or broken.  Also, since this is a french press, clean up is easy.  A couple of  ounces of water, a couple of swishes around and spread out result.  No garbage to pack out and no impact to the environment.  The best of both worlds.  Did I say I loved this cup</review_text>
I bought this in 14 ounce. Great glove, well built, and was made with the hand and proper punching form in mind. Can't say enough about this glove. I spend about 6-8 hours a week in mine. Huge difference in this and the $30 everlast training glove that I also have. I was still getting sore hands with those after working the heavy bag but have no problems with the pro gloves. If you're serious about boxing or care about your joints, spend the money</review_text>
Work your arms, chest, shoulders, and back and begin to see improvement almost right away.  Unlike many pull-up bars, this one doesn't need to be attached to the doorway</review_text>
This product will hold my weight (200lbs) without any problem. It has begun to leave surface marks on the doorway where it rests so it's probably a good idea for a user to place a thin towel or something in between the unit and the door.</review_text>
Finding the right door jam for the bar took a little time (I have thick molding around most doors) but once I got it properly mounted I have used it extensively. The various grips allow for multiple levels of difficulty as well as different muscle concentration</review_text>
My main concern when buying this product was making sure I didn't have to permanently attach it to anything.  I simply wanted a pull-up/chin-up bar that I didn't have to mount to the wall.  This did exactly that.  It feels a little light, but holds my weight steadily.  I'm 180lbs.After using it for a while the assembly did get a little louse, but I tightened it back up and everything was just fine.  I haven't used it to do any of the other exercises, and probably won't.  It's a great purchase.  Also, slips under the bed when not in use</review_text>
This works great for pullups and pushups, but it says it can also be used as a sit up bar.  Can anyone explain to me how to do that?  I can't get it to hold my feet securely no matter how I place it in the door frame.Directions were pretty vague, but still easy to put together by looking at the picture.  They should include instructions on how to properly use the bar for the various exercises you can supposedly do.  No problem with parts</review_text>
Many different exercises to do besides the ones they show you in the manual. Took maybe 5 minutes to put together and the instuctions were very easy to understand. It clearly defined which different screws went where.Great purchase</review_text>
Relieve your back pain by spending only 3 or 4 minutes per day on this inversion table.  The machine is lightweight and stows away easily</review_text>
My son gave me this for Christmas, having picked it from my Amazon.com wish list.Like all Victorinox Swiss Army knives, it's a brilliantly designed gentleman's multitool. I wanted the altimeter and thermometer features for my occasional travels to Colorado and motorcycle camping.Since my home state of Indiana is pretty flat, especially the northern half where I live, the altimeter's chief value is as a barometer - if the altitude goes up, the pressure is dropping and stormy weather is coming, if the altitude goes down, the pressure is rising and good weather will follow.Likewise, I haven't done any real outdoor stuff since Christmas, so about the only temperature readings I've seen have been straight out of my pants pocket, which I can report is a pretty consistent 84 degrees Fahrenheit.I love gadgets and this is a cool little gadget</review_text>
I love snowshoeing.  I do it on regular basis and own multiple pairs of snowshoes, including some more expensive products.I bought these because I wanted to have a backup set for when guests come to our cabin.  This is perfect.  I love them.I wouldn't use these to climb Denali, but are perfect for recreational use.  And the price is right.</review_text>
I was offered this item from my Gold Box and while I think the kit is well-made and well-thought out, I'm a little puzzled because I live in Southern California and there's no way in blazes that I would ever need these.Some days the Gold Box is weird</review_text>
I like this gun alot. At first when i saw it i thought it wouldn't be so powerful, and i would just use it as a secondary weapon. It still is my secondary weapon, but i still use it alot, sometimes i will put awat my mp5 and use that instead. It holds a dedcent sized clip for a pistol and shoots at about 200 fps. and will go for about 75ft. Its like a sniping pistol! The only disadvantage is that when u try to take out the mag. in a fire fight it dosn't drop u have to pull  it out, so that waste some time in a fight.  I also wouldn't use it as my primary weapon because u have 2 cock it every time, but if it was a semi automatic i would defenatly use it.  Another bad thing about it is that sometimes the BB's jam, and then u have to take the gun apart to fix it.  I think it's a good secondary weapon, and that if someone is relatively far away(25-60ft.) u can snipe them with it.  It is defenatly a good buy</review_text>
The title pretty much stands for my review.When I first bought it, I was thinking, "This is prolly some cheap piece of Chinese plastic that will break after 5 shots."  Well, the plastic part was right, but about 120 shots later and this thing is still firing like like a motha!Larger-er gun.  Not like a Desert Eagle or anything, but a reasonable size.Mag doesn't fall out when you press the butting, but its not impossible to reach up and remove the mag.Base line: Buy it.  Even if you don't think you need it.  Resell it to some kid (like myself) for 10 bucks.  Or keep it and use it as a back-up in warfare</review_text>
Bought this one for my son to plick around with.  It never did shoot.  Even if it did, it wouldn't last long.  Looks good so I gave it a 2.  Do not buy one if you expect BBs to exit the little hole in the end</review_text>
This is the same stability trainer my physical therapist has in her office. I bought my own so I could do the exercises at home. I really like it</review_text>
We bought this bocce set over a year ago, and we've been very happy with it.  The balls are a full 110mm, and have the size and heft that the cheap sets lack.After a year of heavy use and abuse in lots of different environments, the balls show very little wear.The carrying crate is well-constructed, and seems to be made to last.  It's a little awkward to carry any significant distance, though, so you might consider a nylon carrying bag if you travel with them very much.All in all, a wise purchase</review_text>
I recomend this jump rope to anybody who's serious about there health and looking to get in shape</review_text>
I am very pleased with the performance and quality of this rope.  It is exremely fast</review_text>
I bought 20 of these for my girls high school tennis team that I coach. Price was a major factor in my decision and I was pleased with the quality.Two items: first, the end caps fall off and get lost.  Second, adjusting the length of the rope is fairly easy but there are no instructions that tell you how to do it properly</review_text>
great rope for a great price.  easy to adjust length.  smooth action with the ball bearings</review_text>
This is a good jump rope for people at pretty much any fitness level.  The only problem is that it is quite difficult to adjust.  If you are about 6-1 or 6-2 you won't have to adjust it at all.  Once that task is completed, you will find that this rope offers a smooth and challenging workout.  It hurts a little bit when it hits you, but that just offers more incentive for you to be perfect.</review_text>
this rope is fine.  can't say that it is any better or any worse than any other jump rope.</review_text>
It looks great but the sheath doesn't fit well with the sword, so it's hard to pull it out. The free stand is a little unstable but can't complain with it because it's free.  If you're not a Kenshin fan, it might not be the best sword for you</review_text>
I love this sword. The blade is sharp, and the sword itself is well taken care of. Over all, I love this sword</review_text>
I received the item within 2 days. Everything was accounted for and the blade was perfect. I would definitely order again</review_text>
Im not gonna get into the details with yall  so imma cut it short i bought 1 got it 2 day dec 11 and ne 1 who is thinkin about buyin 1 i say they should cuz i think its a great sword 4 the price u gettin it at [THE END]I APPROVE THIS SWOR</review_text>
To the battojutsu master, the sword by China is a better buy. I purchases both and the one by China is better. Don't expect to swing it around a lot though. It is not a full tang sword so the blade doesnt go through the hilt. It is a nice sword and as a fan of the manga and anime I had been looking for a sakabato for a while. It is a wonderful replica and even though I prefer Aoshi's kodachi's are better. To anyone who is a fan of the show or just a sword enthusiast, this is a great buy for the price.</review_text>
THis is a great sword it is real cool it is very clean and shiny i love the detail i cut my brother's hand off heh heh heh just kidding</review_text>
I love weapons and because of that i have bought many a katana.  I also happen to love anime so this was a great oppurtunity to combine those interests.  Most katans i buy basically just look good and begin to wobble after about a week of just display use, the wraps around the handle have a tendancy to become on wraped and the hilt begins to just basically fall apart after a while but this weapon is extremely well crafter for being a production sword.  I cant say it looks alot like kenshins but the fact that it is a sakabatu is amazing and the blade its self impresses me just as much handle.  The scabbard is just as supurb as the sword and makes for an over all nice package well worth the money.  For a sword being bought over the internet for this price it is a great find and worth the money.  If you like ruroni kenshin i suggest buying this and if you just like katanas in general and would like a nice cheap well crafted one for display or for just the hell of swingin it around this is a great one to get =</review_text>
I ordered this Sword because I loved Rurouni Kenshin and I freaked out when it arrived cause it was so cool. But for all those who are wondering, the sword's edge is Not as sharp as i thought although you can just sharpen it yourself. But it is nicely made and firm.</review_text>
Bought this for my daughter (20mo's) for Christmas.  She absolutely loves it!  My 4 year old son is actually able ot use it as well.  Yes its a little small for him but for my daughter, the products intended audience, it's great.  To all the nay-sayers I have no idea what you are talking about.  Is your child some kind of a gargantuan?  I wish I could scoot around on this thing</review_text>
I purchased this for my 2 year old daughter. She is small for her age and the bike/scooter will work for a couple of years hopefully. It would be too small for toddlers that are a lot taller. For our purposes, it's great! She loves it and feels like a "Big Girl" on it. She can easily scoot around safely on her own. It has a wide base so it can't tip over and is very stable. After opening many frustrating xmas boxes and toys I was extremely happy with the packaging of this toy. I just had to open the box and slide it out. No assembly! We'll get lots of use out of this one</review_text>
I got the Scuttle Bug for my 2 yr. old daughter and she just loves it!  Anytime we have little ones over, the Scuttle Bug is the first thing they go for.  It's perfect since she moves it with her own feet and can go at any speed she wants to and it's in her control.  It's safe for the floors which is even better.  Its a great way to get them started before riding a bike, even a tricycle since her feet can't reach the pedals yet.  Friends of ours had one for their little one and our daughter liked it so much, we had to go out and buy her one.  It is great!</review_text>
We got this for our 19 month old when her big brother got a regular razor scooter.  She loves it and is a speed demon on it.  I read the reviews and most said their child was too big but my daughter is 98% in height (she is taller than most 2 year olds) and has no problem using her legs to really go!  I'm glad I ingnored the other reviews because it's my daughter's favorite toy</review_text>
My wife and I couldn't believe how expensive bike trailers can get, and since we are both college students our budget is limited.  We bought this becuase of the price and I have been suprisingly happy with it. The setup is extremely easy and fast, no tools needed. and my daughter (16 months) seems very comfortable in it. One drawback is it doesn't work well with a helmet on her</review_text>
Since we are not serious bikers, we were not willing to pay big $$ for the trailer.  This one fits our budget.  It is easy to toll and runs smoothly.  The only issue I had was that once I put the trailer on, I cannot put the kickstand back.  This is somewhat troublesome because we cannot just stop anywhere we want</review_text>
Recieved this item and it was very easy to put together. It is very compact when folded and not in use. I love it! It is so easy to take the kids when biking, it rides very nice and you can't even tell it's there</review_text>
Very good price. Easy to assemble and restore. Run very smooth and steable</review_text>
I pulled this trailer on a 32 mile ride on a very remote part of the Great Allegheny Passage rail-trail.  I had it loaded with camping gear (no kids in the trailer), and it worked very well. The trailer is not designed for hauling gear, but it did a fine job.  I was not on a paved path at all, the tires were great, no problems going through a few bumpy areas and muddy areas.  The trailer tracked well behind my bike, no problems. The trailer has a good sturdy welded frame</review_text>
I was a little hesitant to purchase the least expensive model, but I'm glad I did!! It's wonderful. Installation was so easy- I had it done when my husband got home from work! The kids love riding in it. We have 2 kids, both around 30 lbs and they fit comfortably. Plus, there is a storage area in the back. We pack towels,snacks and juice and go t o the pool!! I highly reccommend this model rather than spending more money!!</review_text>
I love a good workout and have been in and out of gyms and various home programs since I was in high school. This is the VERY BEST thing for people who find themselves strapped for time, or who just really aren't the gym type, but need a REAL workout. I have to enjoy a workout to keep at it and I DO ENJOY THIS ONE. Granted, you won't get ripped using this system, and I would recommend some additional form of cardio that helps target the lower body (like an eliptical or stair-climber), but I actually get a little sore from the upper body portion of this workout (which targets chest, triceps, biceps, deltoids, lats, shoulders, and mid-back). The bands are simple tools, and after having used the likes of Nautilus equipment I admit I was skeptical, but the bands deliver WHEN USED PROPERLY. I have done a few other Pilates and Yoga home systems and this tops them. The video cuts out all the mystical, glitzy crap and gets straight to the workout, which features only the instructor who explains very simply what to do. Best of all - no dance hall music! Great price, great product - an all around winner. Now, be advised: You will need a door that closes snug in which to secure the band ring. Also, I was a little disappointed to find that the video comes in VHS format only and I had to have a friend burn it to DVD before I could use it. But it was worth it</review_text>
For the price, this light is hard to beat. Over the years, I have used approximately twenty different bicycle lights by brands such as Cateye, Cygolite and Planet Bike. While some of these were significantly better than the Bell, they were also three to ten times as expensive. If you don't mind the large mass of four AA batteries on your handlebars and have under twenty dollars to spend, the Bell Night Trail bicycle light is the way to go.The real downside to having the batteries in the enclosure is the hazard created when the housing becomes dislodged during an impact. While this has not happened with the Bell light, it did occur with a Planet Bike light while riding through traffic in NYC. The distraction was extremely dangerous. Losing half of the batteries was not fun either.Fortunately, the Bell light has a sturdy enclosure where the top half slides backwards to open. This makes it almost impervious to front and vertical impacts.  However, the internal latches never quite give you a clear indication that it is closed. Rather, you must squeeze the top downward and push forward simultaneously until you can't move it further.Much like the headlight, the taillight compares well to more expensive lights. Similar to competing products, it has various blinking modes as a well as an always-on setting. Due to the design of the lens, light escapes from the sides and top of the light. Such side lighting is crucial for riding in urban areas.The build quality is good but not on par with the $100+ lighting systems. But again, the selling point of this light is overall value. Some of the nicer features include a bright Xenon bulb paired with miserly LED lights that can blink for hours. Unlike some of the MR11-based bulbs (parabolic track lighting bulbs), the lens assembly has two ports on the right and left sides. This spreads light perpendicularly to the path of travel, which is a nice feature when in traffic. These features combined with a very modest price make this light an excellent choice for the budget conscious.ProsValueBrightnessCombination of LED and Xenon modesDecent build qualitySide lighting on headlightConsQuestionable design of battery compartment (top half of headlight)BulkyLEDs could be brighter</review_text>
I had no quality control problems reported by others. Frame was clean and went together without problems. I did have to think some to attach the net to the frame using bungee cords provided. The instructions aren't much help. The picture on Amazon is of a net attched with individual clips. The new method is to use continuous elastic cords, three for the top, three for the bottom, plus two more for the back panel. Start at the middle of the frame (where everything folds together)and work up to the top threading cord every third hole in net, use another to go across the top, third to go down to the middle of the frame again. Do same for bottom half of net. Once I got it figured out went on quickly. The pitchback works wonderfully. Note, it is very large!</review_text>
This is a great product, all of the bells and whistles which are actually functional and improve security and ease of use.  Would recommend to all cyclists</review_text>
Give your back the gift of a truly great stretch with this inversion table.  It's easy to use and simple to assemble.  Your back will thank you</review_text>
I love this inversion table.  It was easy to assemble, gives me a great back stretch, and the price was exceptional and it shipped for FREE!  This is a great value</review_text>
This is actually the first review I have ever left.  I highly recommend this bottle.  Water tastes very clean compared to plastic bottles.  It makes a big difference!  Every time I have taken it out, someone always seems to complement on how cute the design is as well.  I'm very happy with this product.</review_text>
I hesitated before buying this water bottle because it's so much more expensive than others out there.  But I do think that it's worth every penny.1. water tastes clean2. the bottle does not smell3. water is kept surprisingly cold for a long tim</review_text>
*****This is an upscale designer water bottle, top of the line, and so much fun. The designs Of Sigg's water bottles are gorgeous, from the plain, solid color bottles, to the ones with intricate designs. They are simply beautiful! I switched from regular plastic water bottles because of health concerns, thinking it take more work to maintain. These do necessitate regular cleaning (I clean mine every day), but having something so beautiful to drink from makes the cleaning fun. Sort of like my rings, glasses, and watch, I now consider my Sigg personal water bottle a vital accessory, reminding me to drink more water, making a statement about my values, and expressing myself with a special design. Yes, all in a water bottle!Sigg of Switzerland water bottles are very high quality, made of light aluminum on the outside, slightly insulated, and covered with a special powder coat on the inside that prevents any leaching whatsoever, unlike plastic and polycarbonate water bottles. They are light, durable, and perfect for any activity. Well water tastes spectacular in these bottles, just like from the tap.I bought this particular top because I don't like sports tops, and I don't mind unscrewing the top when I want a drink. It is totally leakproof, which is important to me. The top is pretty and can be hooked onto a carabiner. I like carrying mine, though. I get comments on it all the time, "What's that? I love it!"Sigg makes their personal water bottle in .6L and 1L in this style. I have both. I use the .6L for sports activities because they are smaller. When I won't have to carry the container, I like the larger bottle.They are expensive, but they are so durable that you can plan on them lasting many years. I consider them both an accessory and an investment in my health, so they are well worth it value-wise for me.Highly recommended.****</review_text>
My husband bought this ball for me as a mothers day present when I was 6 months pregnant.  It was the only thing I could sit on comfortably with my off balanced condition.  The oval shape is perfect for sitting on and bouncing.  After baby was born it was even better than a rocking chair for putting the little one to sleep he loves it and it was also a great workout tool for getting back that pre-pregnancy figure.  My only complaint is that the hand air pump is a little difficult to use and it takes a while to get it aired up your hand will get tired and you will need to take a break from pumping</review_text>
I have a large home gym with around $30k of equipment.  This $400 set is my favorite and most used item.  I have one set for me and one for my wife and they fit neatly on the stand.  They are very easy to use and are the most comfortable dumbbells I've ever used due to the padded grips.  I admit that I had my doubts at first.  I was worried they the grip wouldn't hold up, the weight selection pins would bend or the weights would fall on my head.  After 4 years of regular use, my fears were unfound.  The grip is intact and the weight stacks are absolutely stable.  I've tried the newer adjustable dumbbells on the market, but this is still my favorite.  The weight selection seem much more secure than the nautilus, and the grip is more comfortable.  It's my opinion that these are still the best adjustable dumbbells out there</review_text>
Completely compatible with bb gun. Holds enough bbs to practice for quite awhile. Durable and sturdy</review_text>
This product was not what I had expected. It makes loading easier, but not by much. First of all the Speed Loaders hold around 100 instead of 120. Also it will take some getting used to before loading a pistol magazine right</review_text>
very convenient, very fast. just go slow when you're loading, because if you go really fast you can end up jamming, or it can end up not loading right. so if you go slower, you're actually going faster</review_text>
THIS IS A MUST BUY. Some airsoft guns take 3-5 minutes of painstaking work to load. But with this it will only take around 15 seconds. If you get an airsoft gun with a mag without a bb resavor this is a goodsent.it's only .89 cents, what do you have to loose</review_text>
having this speed loader is a god-send. i have an extra mag for my beretta m92 so i dont really need it for battle...but for those whose have the  same gun i do, it is a real pain to load each pellet one by one...this makes it much much easier!!</review_text>
Sold gloves, great price.  Everlast does not disappoint.  Great sparring gloves, fit good for a 6'2" bloxer.  Delivered on time, would recommend</review_text>
All I can say is that they are very comfortable. There is nothing more to say</review_text>
These are great gloves. There tight fitting and very comformtable. Great for hitting my bag</review_text>
Go to a sport store and try on some gloves to find your size. Most people will fit a 10oz pair of gloves. From wrist to top of middle finger 17cm. From thumb outstretched to side of hand 15cm. A 10oz will fit those dimensions. Getting a Velcro type pair of training gloves is important. With laces, and you will not be able to tie up on your own. With Velcro you put on one and the other you use your teeth. It is easy, just hold the Velcro in your mouth and twist the wrist and wham, a pair of gloves in ten seconds flat. With lace-ups you will be all day getting ready for your workout. Of course these are just training gloves, you will probably want lace-ups for the real deal. You can learn various bandaging to strengthen your hand and wrist bones if you want, but the gloves should be enough. When you are finished you should leave them open to air. The gloves come with the thumb attached to the knuckles (as they should be) with air pockets covering the palm area. You can buy other martial arts gloves with the thumb area exposed and loose and also `elasticated fist protectors' for more lightweight punching that is especially good for the speedbag workout. Get you 80lb bag and you will be learning some exercises that will keep you lean and mean. Enjoy</review_text>
This easy-to-assemble weight bench allows you to work both your back and abdominal muscles.  This piece of equipment is like several gyms in one</review_text>
I was able to put this bench together by myself and was surprised how simple it was.  It is sturdy enough and easily adjusts.  The price is great for this home version.  I suffer from a lower back injury and mentioned this bench to my doctor and she agreed that starting off slowly but consistently will help anyone strengthen their lower back muscles</review_text>
If you suffer from lower back pain, this is the machine you've been waiting for.  Before thee Ab/Hyper Bench came along, you had to use a roman chair in order to work your lower back.  But roman chairs aren't made for home use because they're too bulky considering that they really aren't good for much else but that one exercise (unless you're a pro bodybuilder).  Personally, I find it difficult to climb into position on a roman chair, even at the gym.The Ab/Hyper Bench, however, is easy to use and has several purposes.  Back raises, crunches, curls, leg lifts, and you could even use it as your bench press.  This unit is not built like one of those crappy informercial workout widgets.  This is heavy gauge steel that was built to last.  The padding is pretty durable too, and the moving parts feel solid and move smoothly.The only draw back I can see is that people (particularly men) with short legs may have trouble leaning over against the flat pad.  I have a 28" inseam and when I lean over the hip/knee pad... well, let's just say that it's a little close for comfort.  And that's at the lowest setting.  Aside from that one detail, I've got no complaints.  Invest in one of these to strengthen your lumbar region.  Between sets, walk around to the other side to do some incline sit-ups or dumbbell presses.  Cheers</review_text>
This bench is simple to assemble.  I would like to see pins with spring-loaded retainer pins, because the pins that come with the model only slide in but can slide back out just as easy.  The use of this model is easy to perform.  The situps arrangement might be difficult for shorter-legged users to comfortably use.  The bench is also a little short for situps for taller or larger framed individuals.  Overall though this is a nice basic bench for the price.</review_text>
Delivery: the item arrived promptly and was well packaged; there was no damage.Assembly: uncomplicated and took under 30 minutes; instructions were straightforward; the bench can be easily folded and stored away.Country of origin: China.Construction: the steel frame is fairly light, but sturdy; no rickety parts; every single joint is thoroughly welded; the bench does not rock or tip during exercise; paint job is A+; padding is a little on a flimsy side and I do not expect it to last as long as my previous bench; the manufacturer specifies 250 lbs as a user weight limit.Dimensions: the seat is only 28.5 inches long, so decide for yourself whether this is adequate for you; I would estimate that anyone over 6 ft tall will have difficulty using this product for sit-ups.The vertical component of the bench (tilted 40 degrees and used for back hyperextension exercises) has adjustable height and will accommodate just about any sized human (but do not forget the 250 lbs weight limit); it does excellent job isolating the lower back muscles.Overall appearance: it looks like a quality product overall, from stitching to glossy finish; the design is certainly compact and clever for what this bench does.Price: $100 for a bench like this, including delivery, is a good value.Rating: 4 stars; there are nicer products out there, but they are all bulkier and more expensive</review_text>
I was very pleased with this purchase. It was for my guy, for Christmas. He'd been looking for an inverted bench, but put off the purchase until after the holidays. His 5-year-old daughter helped me with assembly. It did take a couple of tries on getting the foot plates and the actual bench in the right orientation, but all in all it was very simple to assemble. It is heavier (read: sturdier) than I expected it to be, so I was quite pleased about that! If any complaints at all, I do not like the lack of padding on the bar behind the knees if you are on the incline bench. The ankle bar padding is great, but additional padding on the knee bar would be more comfortable with extended repetitions. It would be simple to add more padding or a towel, if it is too hard on the back of your knees.</review_text>
I was looking for a machine that can help with both my back and abe during my recovering from back surgery. This is an excellent buy for around $100, does everything I am looking for without taking too much space or burn a hole in my wallet.</review_text>
Add some extra weight to the bottom , if you're an extreme boxer.  Otherwise with a 70 or 100lb bag, it's great.</review_text>
It is a convient stand that allows both the training of the heavy bag and the speed bag necessary for improving one's boxing or martial arts skill.It has limits regarding the mobility of working the heavy bag in a 360 degree radius, because of the platform and weights required to stablize the stand. If you have the space I suggest two sperate training locations of the speed bag and heavy bag. If not this product will serve its purpose.</review_text>
This Heavy Bag stand is a pretty good piece of equipment.  The heavy bag part of it definitely requires add'l weight (hint: bags of sand are much cheaper than the amount of barbell plates you'll need to keep this thing from moving - I use 200 pounds of bags of sand to keep it in place.  Also be sure you get a double end heavy bag too (i.e. one with a bottom D-ring), otherwise you'll get too much bag swing.You can also put a true double end light bag on this portion of the unit, which is a nice change of pace from the heavy bag.   (The light double end bag is the small inflatable that has two bungees holding it at about chest level and reverberates like mad when you hit it.)The speed bag platform is a bit flimsy, especially on the earlier models where the "drum" or rebound board is two pieces (the latest versions of this model use a single piece drum).   If you become moderately proficient at the speed bag in any amount of time you'll outgrow this aspect of the unit.  Part of the problem is that the single vertical pole to which the speedbag drum attaches will flex when you get the bag moving really fast, and that can throw off your timing.  Use the smallest size speed bag possible to minimize this inertia.  Lastly, the speed bag platform doesn't really adjust high enough for people over 6'2" in height, and if you're over 6'1" or so you're going to need to use a small or xtra small speed bag to have it hang at the correct height (i.e. belly of bag at mouth/chin level)</review_text>
The previous review is absolultely correct about the weights.  If you don't have weights on the legs the stand it will, in fact fly about your basement.I'd also recommend a double-ended bag (i.e., with a D-ring on the bottom of the bag).  It decreases bag-sway.  I'm just using 2 bungee cords to tie it down to the stand but that seems to work out pretty well (instead of a proper Shock Cord).  Very helpful for practicing kicks.On top of the weights, I've also added 2 40-lb bags of water-softening salt on the front-legs for even more stability.  There's nothing special about that kind of salt, I just happened to have them around.  It looks a little Rube Goldberg, but for the price I'm willing to live with it.The speed-bag stand is nice.  Loud, but nice.</review_text>
I ordered the 4790 heavy bag stand recently.  I have limited boxing experience, but I'm not brand new to the sport.  I'm a 215 pound heavyweight, and before I put weights on this stand to hold it down, I was bouncing it all over my basement with an 80 pound bag attached.  Just add the weights and this is a great stand.A REAL plus to this stand is that the legs are nice and wide, and don't protrude too far out. This allows for some great movement with the bag, and gives a good chance to work on footwork and body movement in your bag workouts.You won't go wrong with this one, especially with free shipping!!</review_text>
I was pleasantly surprised at the quality of these skates at such a reasonable price.  I was an avid roller skater in my youth and it has been almost 20 years since I last donned skates.  It must be like riding a bike because within minutes I was whipping up and down my driveway.  My neighbors will probably forward the footage to You Tube.  Anyway, the skates are smooth and quite sturdy.  They worked equally well on the pavement as well as inside on my hardwood floors.  Skating is so much fun... and great exercise (too fun to FEEL like exercise, however).  My 10 year old son was amazed by my turns and backwards skating (as was I).  Love, Love, Love these skates.  Makes me wonder why I waited so long to get a pair.  Happy skating!!</review_text>
I purchased these skates because my daughters wanted me to skate with them.  Since I wasn't sure how many times I was going to use them, I wanted an inexpensive pair.  To my surprise, these skates are of excellent quality even though the cost was under $40.00.  I have used them a few times already and they are very comfortable and have good support.  Great Value.</review_text>
I brought this for my wife as a stress reliever. It is difficult now to find a normal roller skates and not those roller-blade contraption.This skates have somehow reverse the process of aging and rejuvinated her. The last time she wore skates was almost 20 years ago.......The skates is strong and runs smoothly. My wife wished she could have done this review personally, but she is too busy skating outside</review_text>
I have a female softball team.We train at a field that doesn't have bases.And these throw down bases are just phenomenal. You can just throw them down and they don't move. Nice quality...and when we are finish we just packed them back and go!!!So I really recomend them</review_text>
The product and the people at Midwest Sports were great. However I brought this through Amazon and I had an issue with the shipping cost.  Their customer service sucks. Ths customer service screen type is so small it can not be read plus they do not offer a direct phone line.  when I did get hold of them they refered me back to Midwest to slove the problem. I felt like a ping pall ball being bounced from one company to another. I could not get this problem resloved.I would not recommend Amazon at all and will buy things directly from now on</review_text>
Works absolutly GREAT! Don't be confused about "spray, splash and let dry" beacouse it's realy best way to keep your goggles clear. Usualy I was not able to see anything after 12-15 laps. Now after 35 laps I CAN SEE 100% CLEARLY.</review_text>
This is by far the best anti-fog spray I've tried.  I use it for my paintball mask.  It used to fog up, then I got shot...  This prevents any fogging in the mask and lasts for a long time!    A+++++++</review_text>
1. Apply the solution on the goggle inside and stay for 30 seconds.2. Quickly rinse it with water.3. Fully dry.4. Put on the goggle and swim. However, don't put off and dip your goggle in the pool until you finish swimming.This really works.</review_text>
Goggles are a great item to use while swimming in lakes, and chlorinated pools.  They protect the eyes from polutants and chemicals in the water.  But as anyone knows who has worn goggles, they tend to fog up rendering one's vision about as good as seeing through a dense fog!  I've tried spit, oil, soap, etc, and nothing works as good as this product.  Simply spray in on the inside of the goggles and you will have nearly fog-free seeing.  Use it each time you swim for maximum effectiveness.JIm "Konedog" Koenig, Lap Swimme</review_text>
Don't rely on someone to hold your feet anymore when you do sit-ups.  This bar is much more effective, and you'll get a much better workout</review_text>
I bought this because I don't like doing situps that much.  My feet tend to move around and then pretty soon I am flopping around the floor not really doing any good.This solves all that.  You just slip it on the bottom of a door and do your sit-ups with it.  Then you can fold it up after use and it's almost completely out of the way.  It holds your feet really well, and allows you to do sit-ups a lot easier (well the sit-ups are still hard).It lost a star because when you are using it, if you are putting a lot of pressure on the bar (which you shouldn't...but can if you get tired, etc) the door can be pulled out.  If you had a solid door this wouldn't be much of an issue.  Also when you fold it up, the bolts touch the door, and it's possibly after having it for awhile you could put little dents/scratches in the door.Overall, it makes situps a pleasure to do again</review_text>
I'm gettng a "six-pack".  I never thought that I could say that. But having this wonderful sit-up bar so conveniently located in my bedroom has made the difference.  It was so easy to install and is so easy to use that it practically became a part of my daily routine without my even realizing it. I especially like the way the bar flips up and out of the way when I'm done.  This is one of the best investments in myself that I have ever made and I recommend it highly.</review_text>
I first heard about Bag Balm from one of the girls on the MTV reality show Laguna Beach.  She said she uses it for her chapped lips.  I don't know how often one would get chapped lips in California, but I live in Chicago, and I definitely know what it feels like to have dry, cracked lips to the point of bleeding.  Ever since I started using this daily, I have not had to endure that kind of torture.  THANK GOODNESS!!!  This product is a miracle, and I cannot believe more people have not discovered it.  Tried and true since 1899.  I have a couple purse size tins to keep on me and other various places.  I'm planning to get the 10oz tin to refill</review_text>
I have used this stuff ever since I found a mini tin of it in my mom's closet.  I don't use it on my pets though, I use it as lip gloss!  It keeps my lips smooth and hydrated and isnt sticky.  I layer it over lipstick for a great shine. Try it as a chapstick as well for dry chapped lips. It works wonder</review_text>
This cooler is excellent! I've got 4 of them now that I use when I go deer hunting. They are just under the 62" maximum dimension for luggage (almost every other cooler is just over) an I can put frozen meat inside to within a couple inches of the lip and be just under the 50# limit for excess weight charges. I put a few layers of bubble pack on the to take up the extra space. I have had meat in these 48 hours and as long as they remain closed (just opening for the TSA inspection) the meat has stayed rock hard. I've traveled with them in the winter and summer with the same results. 2 of the chests have traveled wth me for 4 years, round trip to Indiana from Southern CA; each round trip is 6 airline segments, so that's 24 flights and all are still solid with no missing handles, cracks or damage.These are absolutely the best coolers for the traveling hunter!!! I carried almost 4 deer home from Indiana this year and everything stayed perfect. Last summer I carried home an antelope from Wyoming in late August, across the dessert with just bagged ice, with daytime temperatures near 110, and everything did fine.And of course if I can trust my wild game meat in these coolers, which is very hard to come by and to replace, you can count on them for your regular cold or frozen neeeds!</review_text>
Best cooler I have ever seen.  Arrived promptly in excellent condition</review_text>
I looked several places to find the best bench for the money.  It is very sturdy and will adjust to 5 different positions.  Very happy with purchas</review_text>
I just received it today and immediately assembled it.  It was quite simple to assemble and it seems to be very sturdy.  However, the adjustment holes did not line up with the spring loaded adjustment pin -- I had to make some minor modifications.  Other than that, no problems yet.</review_text>
This is a great bench for the price.  It was fairly straightforward to put together ... took about an hour.  It is well padded and very well made.  I think most people would enjoy this bench ... men and women alike</review_text>
This particular bench provides a lot of stability with its wide frame.  It's cushions are soft but durable.  This bench is useful in many ways including for the incline, decline and flat bench press positions.  It's very easy to move from location to location based upon its wheels at one end and a handle at the other end to provide the best possible hand positioning during transport.</review_text>
Very substantial bench, I bought this for my son, but everyone in the family can use it</review_text>
I've always been a bit iffy dealing with sellers on Amazon as opposed to Amazon directly, this this company did a great job. It took a little while to get the tag, but the quality was fabulous. I got a medium purple star for my Morkie puppy, and it's a perfect size, perfect colour, and perfect weight. I was worried about getting a medium for my puppy since she's so tiny, but it turned out to be just fine. My only complaint is that the silver hoop that you attach in order to hook it onto the D-ring of the collar is pretty tricky to get on. I had to use pliers to get a good grip. But, best of all, they didn't mess up the engraving! I'll be buying from them again</review_text>
My 6 y.o loves these roller skates. Skates around the house almost all the time. Boot is supportive, but not stiff. Feels like real leather. True to size. She wears a 13 in all her shoes. Tried Roller Derby, will stick with Chicago Girl</review_text>
gave these to my little cousin and she loved them put them on had the wheels adjusted and she was off</review_text>
I purchased these to teach my daughter to roller skate-I loved the comfort and they are cute too :0</review_text>
We ordered these skates for my 5 year old daughter, who has discovered roller skating.  These skates are great for kids who are just starting, as well as kids who have mastered balance but are still learning the basics.  We will let her use them in a rink setting, but I believe that they would be ok for regular outdoor use also.The wheels do not turn freely, so she can skate and not be all over the place.  I don't know if they can be adjusted to allow easier turning in the future.The make of the skate is very well done, seems to be a very sturdy product.  We ordered about 1 1/2 sizes too big to give her growing room, and with a pair of thicker socks, she has no problems!Very reasonably priced, especially since her feet are growing and won't be in this size for a great length of time~</review_text>
I like to take exercise walks but on many occasions, the only time I have to do that is after dark. Some of our streets do not have sidewalks or good lighting, so it concerns me that I could be hit by a car whose driver didn't see me. As a driver, I also know it can be very difficult to see pedestrians at night, especially if they wear darker clothes.I've used reflecting safety belts but I wanted something that more surely grabbed driver attention so I attached a Bell Night Shield Light to a reflective belt [using a short length of the universal guy tool -- duct tape!].The Bell Light gives intense red light flashes from about 7 LEDs, 1 in each "ear" and 5 in the mid-section. A single control button combines both the on/off function and the choice of six or seven flashing patterns [some faster or slower, some repeating and other "rotating"]. The result is much improved driver awareness of my presence... I notice cars staying wide of my position. [My wife says they veer away because they think I'm nuts... but that works for me too. :=)]In addition to the belt clip built into the light's plastic body, the product also comes with hardware to mount it to a bicycle tube. This mounting has a quick-disconnect so you can take the Bell Light with you if theft is a possibility.I highly recommend this low-cost Bell Light for night walking or riding safety. After several months of usage that span dozens of hours' use, it's working flawlessly and I have not needed to change the 2 AAA alkaline batteries.The one design change that would make this Light better for my purposes would be if it had two control buttons: one solely for on/off and the other to select the flash pattern. Then I wouldn't have to cycle through all the flash patterns every time I wanted to turn it on and off. But this is a minor annoyance</review_text>
These little babys light up the night to ward off those pesky SUV's. Good stuff. The red shield does need to be taped on as hard landings can jolt it loose. I use on front(handlebar) and back. Will buy again</review_text>
I bought this light because I was tired of the short life of AAA batteries. Batteries LAST in this light. The beam pattern is always good. The only thing I would caution anyone about is being sure you like a battery pack on the back of your head. It does not lend itself to reading while reclining, and may not feel too comfortable for a person who is used to front battery headlamps.</review_text>
I'm a runner and my schedule forces me to run mostly at night on work days.  A large part of my nightly run is on unlighted streets.  I needed a light to see and help be seen. I tried carrying a small flashlight but found it to be a pain in the....wrist!  I run hot and never wear a hat in the winter, even though I live in Montana, so I was hesitant to try it due to the increased sweat factor and the potential for fogging up my glasses.  I got one as a Christmas gift. (If I hated it, I wouldn't be out the bucks!)  It's wonderful!  It is so light that I don't notice it is there.  The stap is quite adjustable so a person can make it as tight or loose as one wants.  It can be easily adjusted for the bare head, over a hat or even over a bike helmet.  Unlike many other brands, this light is also adjustable up and down.  The 3 different light level settings each for the HyperBright and the SuperBright LED's make it quite adaptable for different needs.  I've found that the HyperBright medium setting works best for me even in remote unlighted areas.  The colored light battery life indicator ensures that I don't run out of power in the middle of a run or change batteries prematurely.  The ability to see and avoid road hazards greatly improves the enjoyment of my night runs.  When I first started using it, I planned on switching the light off on lighted streets to extend battery life.  I soon discovered the number of cars (inadvertently or not)swerving at me decreasing tremendously as well as the number of courteous drivers moving over for a safer distance increasing when I kept the light on in lighted areas.  I highly recommend the Zenix IQ!Cons:The on/off button is impossible for me to use when wearing gloves.Just like any other battery powered device I've ever owned, the batteries don't last nearly as long as the owner's manual suggests.  Low temperatures really zap battery life but that is to be expected.  Luckily, AA batteries are inexpensive</review_text>
I recieved my stability ball quickly. The only thing I suggest having on hand is a pump-- this does come with the adaptor for the pump but no pump. I did not expect it to come with a pump though, so there was no disappointment there</review_text>
Excellent quality; much easier to put on than the cap I used before</review_text>
Just the perfect cap!. It fits like no other swimming cap. It won't pull you hair when removing it, neither will slip a bit from your head after swimming several laps or flip turning. Very resistant material, and a great finish. Awesome colors!</review_text>
I have used this cap almost daily for over a year. It still fits snugly and is very comfortable. Writing this review has made me think to order another one now, for the inevitable day my old one wears out.I have a rather large head and found many caps didn't fit comfortably. This one is very elastic and is great</review_text>
This swim cap is easy to use and thick enough that I can't imagine it ever ripping or tearing</review_text>
I bought this as a Christmas gift for my brother in law, but after he opened it, we all tried it on. I have very fragile, long hair and normally swim caps rip the hair out when I'm trying to put the swim cap on or take it off. This one came on and off so easily, without any hair-pulling</review_text>
I'm on my 5th cap now I think.  Silicone is great and lasts forever.  Unlike rubber (which can snag hair) and latex (which some people are allergic to) silicone fits smoothly over wet hair, has a glossy finish so it looks great and doesn't lose elasticity. I have a some advice if you want to try this product that I've learned overt the years:1. Always rinse and hang dry.  I've left wet caps in my gym bag and after a month of two of neglect, it develops black spots. I don't know if it's mold, it doesn't wash off...and you'll have to buy a new cap if you don't like the spotted look.2. Pull it on gently.  I've ripped one when I was trying to stretch it over my head because my long nails cut right through it. It's not cloth so you have to be careful. This goes for latex and rubber, too.3. Wet your hair first.  If your hair is dry when you put it on, you will trap air under the cap.  And since it's not a permeable material, the cap will start to come off while you swim because of the air trying to escape inside.4. Pick a fun color.That's it.  Have a great swim</review_text>
I bought this swim cap for my wife for Christmas and she loves it</review_text>
I'm an experienced meditator, and I have found the Drishti Meditation Bench to suit my needs wonderfully!  It is sturdy and it is just the perfect height for meditation.  I also appreciate the angled nature of the seat, which keeps my posture in alignment.  I would definitely recommend it</review_text>
Good fiting, the only reason I do not rate it with 5 stars is because I just got it and do not know how would be the wear with the time</review_text>
Good quality and versatile.  I was using them on my clubs and then gave them to my husband for his clubs when I found a camo set for my clubs.  They fit my clubs and his nicer Nike clubs as well</review_text>
This bed is very confortable, but holes developed within 3 months.  Order a second one, hoping the first was just defected.</review_text>
This bed was everything it said it was.I have really enjoyed this bed and would tell all my friends how easy it is to set up and use</review_text>
I sleep on this bed every night. It almost feels like my regular bed which is also an air mattress bed. Easy to move around, I put my foam mattress topper on top and I sleep like a baby. Can't say I notice a large amount of air lose, but all you have to do is turn the switch and add air, simple.</review_text>
I got this just to add to my strength training workout. I was a little skeptical at first, but my trainer added it to my program so I had to buy one. I really enjoy using this for exercises where I was holding two dumbbells. It made things a lot easier, and it has also been easier to incorporate into my squats and lunges. I would definately recommend this</review_text>
They are good gifts to my friends who love outdoor activities. It's easy to handle and easy to use. I love it very much</review_text>
Stationed at Ramstein AB, Germany, we needed to get a Yankees ballcap quickly for our son who got on the Yankees little league team towards the end of the season.  We got the cap in under a week, and were very pleased with the price and product.  Thanks</review_text>
ain't nothing like rocking a Yankee Cap.I have had so many over the years.Rooting for another trip to the World Series&Hopefully they can Win it all this year</review_text>
I bought my juggling clubs 20+ years ago, and now my daughter is learning the art.  Naturally, she needs clubs, too.  These are excellent clubs for beginners, but they are good for the experienced juggler as well.  The clubs are well-balanced, solid (as is a necessity for any juggling equipment!), resilient, and brightly colored for performance.  The grips are firm and clean, which is great for any juggler.  At some point, my daughter might want some foam tape for the grips, to give them a softer feel (and to give her less bruises on her palms), but that would be a luxury</review_text>
This is a great product.Easy to set up and will take a lot of abuse.My daughter uses it for pitching and batting practice and I use it to practice my golf swing.It is very large so it can contain even the wildest pitches.For the price I highly recomend it</review_text>
Despite the other reviews, I found this net to be perfect for practicing in the back yard. If you don't shank them, you don't have to worry about the balls going through the net. My six year old doesn't even hit them through it. The net is not designed to keep balls in, that's why they go through, you are supposed to hit the balls into the HUGE black target area and they drop right to the ground. If you're a 1/2 way decent golfer and can keep a ball on target for the 6 feet you are away from the net, it's great.And finally, if you can set up a tent you can step up the net with ease</review_text>
The Gerber folding shovel is really top notch.  Its quality construction is much like any other Gerber/Fiskars equipment I've owned - it doesn't disappoint.The shovel I have is actually a little more agressively pointed than in the pictures, so I'm not sure if Gerber has addressed this as an issue or if the pictures were off.The top of the handle is high density polycarbonate plastic and has a horizontal design like a spade should have.  You can still use the verticle part of the steel handle if you wish, but there isn't much of it.  The plastic will absorb some shock compared to steel-only, and it won't freeze to your hands, etc.  The polycarb handle folds down on itself, so that it actually has 3 segments (instead of several designs which have 2 segments).  This means you can stow the shovel in the included cordura nylon belt pouch which is no bigger than the shovel head itself.  The handle pivot point locks and since it's square, doesn't rotate or twist easily.  The steel which connects the blade to the handle fits nicely inside the A angle cutout of the handle, so when collapsed it is really thin.The blade is high quality steel with the hinged handle connected at the top.  This does limit the depth of the shovel a little, but I don't believe it's much of a factor, except maybe in really solid soil where you lose a little verticle travel when the ground butts up against the hinge.It's very compact, light, comes with a solid belt sheath (easily convertible to pack carry) and stows away easily since it's so thin.  I can put it in the side pockets of my doors or in the very small space above my rear wheel well without any problems (Trailblazer 4x4).I really can find no fault with this item, it delivers on all fronts: usability, quality, compact storage, and rugged design.  I will almost certainly be keeping one in both cars and in my 72 Hour survival kit.  They are even reasonably priced.  5 Stars</review_text>
The mylar blankets were perfect for our scout troop.  They arrived well packed and two days early!  Great company to deal with</review_text>
this knife is very sharp thick and sturdy and is usefull in many ways ive seen lower quality knives sold for much more it should work for most practical and defencive situation</review_text>
I couldn't believe the quality of this knife after reading one of the reviews. I bought this as a gift for my husband thinking it would be an ok knife. What a surprise! I would reccomend this knife to anyone who likes hunting or any outdoor activity. The handle is solid and sturdy and holds everything you would need to survive if you really needed food and fire for a few days. I love it</review_text>
This knife is very strrong. I didn't have the chance yet to try it out but it looks good. The compass on it is pretty cheap compared to my cousins other one. the handle is metal so the button on the sheath scratches the black paint a little-bit, luckily this doesn't affect the use of the handle. Compared to other knives i saw like this one the sharpeningstone on it is cheap. Even so this knife looks like it was worth $85.00.I gave the fire-fighter to my bro. it takes some getting used to to unlock the blade. the handle was plastic. Pretty good for a free knife- good for widdling</review_text>
I purchased the small/medium pair and they fit really well, but because of a manufacturing error there is a thick seam inside of the gloves that didn't get cut. It chafes against my finger a lot. They're a great pair of gloves. Really smooth fit, hard material on the knuckle, and the strap keeps the gloves snug. The under belly of the gloves are open, this feels a little airy than what I'm used to. Nice though</review_text>
They're a bit bulky and tight around your knuckles, but otherwise these gloves are great. They have plenty of padding and can be tightened so they don't slip off</review_text>
It's hard to explain but this stuff does what it claims. I am extremely focused when I take this and motivated and get great pumps. This is one of those rare products that lives up to the claims.</review_text>
I just started this stuff this morning and only took 1 scoop which is half of the reccomended does and OMG! THis stuff makes you feel so Alert and Focused.....my workout that normally has sets like 12-10-8 ended up being reps of 15-15-15  I had intense focus to keep pushing harder.Definitely worth the money.!!!!!!</review_text>
I never write reviews, but this time it is worth it. I am a 27 yr old male firefighter with several years of casual bodybuilding experience. In september of 2006 I decided to intensify my regular weight training routine. I combined cardio and weight training with protein supplementation. At the end of October, I decided to go full weight training with no cardio and add new supplementation to my diet. I chose NO Xplode and TwinLabs AminoFuel 2000 (tablets and liquid depending on my time needs).Let me just say that I am a very skeptical person and I went into this being wary of a placebo effect. I am stunned by the results. I am already motivated to go to the gym, but when I start pumping, it is like I am on crack or something. I used to feel drained halfway through my routine, and sometimes I would feel that "mental block" halfway through a set on a heavy lift. Not with this stuff. I seriously feel like I can go all day. I lift more and go through full sets that I would otherwise "self-defeat" on. I start lifting and I just fight to do more in the middle of a lift. It's freaking bizarre! I just get this boost and I get super aggressive in the lift. In september I was putting up 185 bench. Now I can set at 245 (10/10/6). I don't look that much bigger to me, but I guess that's cause I look in the mirror every day. I do get comments like "that big guy like you" or "you're pretty big so...blah blah", and my Captain calls me "Mr. Strongman" (which I think is retarded but flattering anyway). I have to admit, I have never lifted this much before and its pretty motivating!Anyway, I bought one bottle here and another from a friend who didn't have the discipline to keep up on the water demands (a gallon a day!). After writing this I am going to buy four more 1.81lb bottles of this stuff.I dosed as follows: (215 lb 27 yr old male) 2 scoops every morning on an empty stomach with a serving of amino fuel tablets or liquid. On training days, I take an additional 2 scoops one hour before workout along with amino fuel. I do the amino fuel twice a day on non training days and three times a day on workout days(add a serving one hour after workout). I take in 300 grams of protein per day mostly from whey, but I eat all other meals as normal: Nitrotech after a work out, and ON whey gold standard for other meals.Oh, by the way, I am doing a straight mass building program for six months, and then a cut-muscularity program for the six months after. My point is that I am going strictly for size right now, so I am not discouraged by my remaining fat (13%BF). My strength gains have been proof enough for me. Next up is HMB supplementation. Hopefully that will work as good as the research is screaming.Good Luck! And remember-"The mind is the limit."-Arnold"Great spirits have always met violent opposition from medicore minds." -Albert Einstei</review_text>
I've been using NO-Xplode for 5 weeks now, and it has increased my performance in the gym noticably. The mental focus you get from this is amazing, all I can think is one word: "Gym". My sister now takes it at the Gym for Cardio, though that's not my cup of tea it's her choice, I would think it fine to use for cardio. The Nitric Oxide (NO), a crucial supplement to all bodybuilders/weight lifters; widens your blood vessels and accelerates blood to muscles. This is extremely good for working out, I would also suggest taking protein for your pre and post workout, maybe even a little when you workout.I first had the Blue Raspberry flavor and after about half the bottle was done it was very hard to drink because the taste just seemed gross. Most people do not like the Blue Raspberry (I've read a lot of reviews before purchasing). I am now taking the Fruit Punch which in my opinion is 10x better and tastes good.If you have a very sensitive CNS (Central Nervous System), I would not take this product unless you only took 1/2 - 1 scoop. I am very sensitive to anabolics so I limit myself, just be careful with this as it can get you "too hyped" if you take too much. If you are comfortable with a cup of coffee or two espresso shots then I wouldn't even be concerned about having a sensitive CNS.The downside many people say is that this product makes you go to the restroom very badly. Well, it does usually make me take a trip to the restroom, but it's not as extreme as people say. I actually like it, having a clean system before I hit the gym. It's not like Ex-Lax, if you have to use the restroom it will probably be within 30 minutes.I would recommend this product to anyone who is SERIOUS about weight lifting. I would not suggest giving this to anyone under 18, but that's only my opinion - it's up to you.The Rival to NO-Xplode is SizeOn, I've never tried SizeOn because I've never been dissapointed with NO-Xplode.. No wonder it was rated the #1 product of the year :</review_text>
I picked this up after I have used all kinds of supplements, Animal Pak, Amino Acids, Nitrix, all kinds of protein and other stuff. It helps to pump muscles very well and you can see yourself changing already after a first week of working out. However, you have to work hard to get most of it and also drink a lot water. It says to consume around 120 oz for best results but if you can drink even more. Do not stop drinking creatine on non-training days, drink a scoop and a half mixed with water. Also, do not forget that drinking creatine will not get you very far if you do not drink protein together with it. Buy Ultra whey protein and brink 2 to 3 shakes a day mixed with milk. I usually drink one shake in the morning, one after practice and one before going to bed. That said I think I gave you all best diretions how to use and good luck!!! Work HARD if you wanna see results</review_text>
Me being a small guy (just shy of 130) and wanting to bulk up a bit decided to head to the gym and try out some supplements. NO was one of the first ones I picked up, I consumed the max dosage of 3 scoops and within 20 minutes I had enough energry to do anything. I  did several more intensive exercises with little to no fatigue. Its almost as if your body isnt under much strain at all. I felt pumped up from begining to end and am quite pleased with the results. However there were a couple of problems. I didnt notice a dramatic mucsle gain and im not "bulging" with muscle (for those of you wondering my diet is correct for muscle growth, yet I did gain a meager amount. And of course the taste is bad. At first it seems bearable but once you get to the bottom of the glass you get the powdery residue of chemical gunk. Almost made me want to puke. Other then that though it was a great product. I dont reccomend grape either :(</review_text>
ive been taking no-xplode for about a week and a half no on an empty stomach an hour before workouts (three-scoop dose). this product works as advertised and my workouts have been much more focused and intense. i have also experienced signifactnly bigger pumps although they last only about an hour into my workout (not the 5+ hours advertised) but this is the only problem. i have experienced no side effects. the only flavour i have tried is lemondae and i think it tastes decent</review_text>
VEry good product,Has a lot of space, easy to mount, and keep the bags inside dry. We drove 16 hrs in one day, most ot the time it was rainning and nothing inside got wet. I recommend it</review_text>
My daughter loves the bike. The only problem we had was with the shipping... the wheel was bent (I assume it was due to shipping). We had to take it to a bike shop to get it straightened</review_text>
I had my knife for 10 years, and would still have it, if not for the 2nd instinct of putting it in my back pocket whenever I leave the house. One night I was heading for a flight, at the airport, going thru security; when I realized I had it on me, I had no choice but to throw it out. So had to get another one</review_text>
I've had this watch for about a month and I love it! So far thebarometer has been right about the weather a few hours ahead. Ihave not had the opportunity to take it to the mountains, whichis the main purpose for my purchase, but the big screen is easilyvisible and the features are readily accessible. If you are lookingfor a great outdoor watch, give Highgear a chance</review_text>
I hate being lied to. On the Amazon website, under product description it said that the watch could stand an altitude of 29,500 feet(9,000 meters) and that was one of the key facts that made me buy it, buy when I got the watch and reviewed the manual it said that it only endures 6,000 meters. If it really was good up to 9,000 m you can go up to mount Everest and the watch would still work, but in a couple of months I'll be at Chopicalqui summit (6,300m) ant the "Highgear Summit" will not be able to accompany me, because this summit will be too high</review_text>
Strong...compact...easy to operate. The stand did come with the scale broken. I thought about returning it to Amazon, but called the manufacturer instead. They overnighted a new scale with no questions asked. Have had three stands over the years. This is the best so far</review_text>
Forget lugging a cooler out to the deck when you don't have the time, energy or ice! This product will get you through a dinner out on the deck with friends; In Style. I also have the two-bottle wine carrier which is great for even indoor meals with white wine. Check it out, alot of 'bang-for-the-buck'</review_text>
Well it has been five days hasn't arrived but I will keep you updated...so far well it's a cool product but the shipping isn't great thats my only complaint</review_text>
I carry my tea or other drink to school in this regularly. It's also great for making drinks at home, because you can forget about your tea or coffee for a half an hour, even uncapped, and it'll stay quite hot. The size is a little large because of the dual-layer insulation, but that makes it work better so it's an acceptable tradeoff</review_text>
Another American icon now made in China. I'm sure it'll still work as well as the older made in America bottles. Slightly disappointed this one doesn't have the "pour through" stopper the 2 quart bottle has. These do everything they say...keeps coffee hot all day, and completely unbreakable. I'll get over the China thing, it's just one more thing</review_text>
I have this bottle in pink and can't say enough about it. It is the best bottle I have ever had. It won;t break, even though I drop it ALL the time. And it keeps coffee piping hot forever.Last week I took ice coffee in it to work and at 4PM there was still ice in my thermos. Nobody who sits near my desk could believe it.It is the perfect size too - cause it fits in my bag and doesn't leak all over my stuff when I'm on the bus. I love it...love it...love it</review_text>
it was a good buy it also got here in time i would continue buying from this websit</review_text>
I wish they had a picture showing how this folds flat. This makes it so easy to store. We use it in our RV, as it takes absolutely minimal space.I find that my ankles don't swell if I put my feet up on a small stool like this on long trips.The plastic is very strong, making the step quite sturdy</review_text>
I am very satisfied with this product.  It is sturdy and meets my needs in weight lifting.  It is very compact when stored.  All the parts were received in the package and the instructions for assembly were easy to follow.  The product was received ahead of the stated schedule for delivery</review_text>
This trike is VERY sturdy - even more so than some of the other Kettrikes our family has purchased, which is saying something.  The tough part is already assembled for you when it arrives (yippee!) but I should say that the remaining directions are kind of sketchy.  Not difficult, but take some time to really study the pictures (it's a German company so there are not detailed written English directions).....sometimes they toss a part on there and it's not easy to see what they just did or exactly how they did it.Anyway, so far it's beautiful and looks like a long-lasting, well-made product.  I am very pleased</review_text>
I was a bit apprehensive purchasing this hat, since the price was so low. However, it arrived in a very short time after order and the quality is excellent. Looks just like a hat that would sell for $20 in the stadium store.</review_text>
The cap arrived in good order.  I have to admit it's of a better quality than I expected for the cost.  The 4-star rating represents the good value for the price.  A 5-star rating would go to a top quality wool cap, at a much greater expense</review_text>
Great Price and Great Product.  Jansport has always had quality products. Can't go wrong.  Lots of space and compartments</review_text>
I got this for my 8-year-old son.  It is just the perfect size to carry all of his work and whatever other things he needs.  The pockets help him organize things so he knows where they are.  He has had problems with the straps of other backpacks breaking, but this one is very sturdy and has not had any problems</review_text>
This is a good backpack.  It is very sturdy.  I got it for my high school son because he ripped through his first backpack for the year in less than a week.  We paid about the same for that backpack as we did for this JanSport backpack.  He has had it now for a couple of months and his holding together just fine.  When he first got the backpack he said the shoulder pads were very hard but now he says they don't bother him anymore.  Maybe he has broken them in or just gotten use to them. If you are looking for a good and roomy no frills backpack for school, this one has worked out great for my son.  I had a JanSport years ago when I was in college and I remember it being a good choice back then too.  This Big Student Backpack is a great choice for the money.</review_text>
The Jansport Big Student Backpack we purchased has been utilized daily for 2 mths and is terrific!  It holds all of the books, musical supplies, and accessories any adult or teen would need on a daily basis</review_text>
I am very happy with my purchase of this backpack. The color is great, and it has plenty of compartments but not so many that you don't know what to put in them. I especially like the mesh holder on the side, I put my water bottle in there so I don't have to carry it around. I'm a graduate student so I have a lot of materials I have to lug around, and this backpack is perfect for it. The straps are very sturdy and don't cut into my shoulders. It is very comfortable to wear</review_text>
This bike rack is much easier to use than the last one I had.  I have 3 kids so loading and unloading was more of a workout than the actual bike rides!  This has made it much easier and is also more secure with the built in lock.  The only drawback is the need to buy bar adapters for children's and women's bikes, but it is worth it</review_text>
This product needs some work.  The buttons are too close together (and no, i don't have fat fingers) - it's very easy to push the wrong one.  Which might just take you into a complex menu that's not easy to get out of!  The pixels on the display are ridiculously large - i had to purposefully blur my eyes to decipher the numbers.  It kind of seems like someone's invention prototype that they fashioned in their garage.  The stitching was partially unraveled (is this what "stitching may vary" means?  It wasn't the colored stitching....) on the velcro strap used to hold the thumb sensor.And yet I was still optimistic!  I glued the velcro strap, got used to the buttons and the display, and i actually loved it for the first dozen uses or so.  And then it stopped working...  Every time the main part (that wraps around your hand) was moved even in the minutest way, the unit would somehow reset itself, the display boldly announcing the product name and then informing me that all of its stored information had been reset.  I was so sad!  So much so, that i bought another one, thinking i'd just ended up with a dud.  But the 2nd one also stopped working after only a few uses.  It just suddenly displayed 3 vertical lines, and wouldn't turn off.  The only thing that ever worked well on this thing was the actual heart rate sensor, which i found to be quite accurate.Luckily, Amazon is giving me a full refund for both, one of which was a bit past their 30 day limit.  Thank you Amazon!  I'm going to try the Mark of Fitness one.  It looks like an actual company made it instead of some incompetent electrical engineer wannabe.</review_text>
for the price i was pretty impressed with this item. since the ninja almost always used a straight blade ( yes i'm a real ninja, seriously) that is why i bought it. even though it is not full tang, the handle is not wooden ( it's very hard plastic ) so it can't be broken very easy</review_text>
But it says the Steelers on it!It's Plastic, not metal.Sorry for the cheesy review, I gave it as a gift...Hey he liked it!</review_text>
this is a strong and roomy hammock that is great for the yard or car camping. it is well designed and can take the weight of a large person (250 lbs) but note that the fabric will stretch accordingly.it takes some practice to get off and avoid hitting the ground.a good buy for the price</review_text>
I love my hammock!  It's very comfy and quite easy to put up and take down.  The first time I assembled it, it was very difficult to get the hammock on the frame, but since then the canvas has stretched a little, or something, and I haven't had any trouble.  I don't think I'd want to take it on an all-day hike, but it's not too heavy to move around.  The book and drink holders are convenient, and even the inflatable pillow (which I expected to be dumb) is shaped just right for comfortably supporting my neck and head</review_text>
Okay, I am a female and have been walking for more than 10 years now, and needed to step it up without a gym or in home machine...After my first try of this vest, I realize it makes you hotter because of the material its made of which is vinyl-like. So be prepared to heat up much faster when wearing this vest.My shoulders are what notice the weight the most- I figured that. They get sore within the first minute of wearing the vest. But then again I also do not use a backpack to school for that same reason-- I have weak shoulders that get very sore very quickly.But those are the ONLY 'negatives' to this vest-- otherwise I wouldn't even notice I was wearing it at all!I just hope it helps me to lose my extra weight. :</review_text>
Comfortable and really easy to use.  Weights are easily removed and put back in when ready.  Really good product for the money</review_text>
I am so very happy with this grill the adjustment for hieght is good and the Rotisserie works very well. Only thing I think would be a little more helpful is heavier stands at the bottom. But I won't give up this grill. Love it!!!!</review_text>
This is a great grill if you want to feel the old Western backwoods feeling of little house in the prairie days.  It keeps the meet high off the fire while keeping a tender and moist.  Multi use makes this a fun camping accessory.  While it is a little cumbersome to bring along you and your guests will enjoy the taste of your food as well as the feel of olden days camping</review_text>
The problem with paddling gloves are seams - these gloves have all the seamd in the right places - where they don't bother yo</review_text>
I am happy with the kayak gloves.  I have been using them everytime I go kayaking</review_text>
These skewers are a very cost effective way to reduce weight and increase security. By trading away "quick release" ability you cut the weight of the cam and lever. By losing a little convenience you'll save 50-80 grams for only about 15 bucks. One of the most favorable weight/cost purchaces made.You also gain a little security. I might dispute the ads claim that it will PREVENT theft, but I think it WILL help lower your odds of trouble. Thieves who eye your wheelsets will look for easier targets than your bike. I have always U locked my frame and cable locked my wheels to the frame and stationary object and I still had two fronts and one rear stolen before I bought these. In the year since, I haven't had any issues yet. (I still use the same precautions).Possible objections to the use of these would be that you cannot change a wheel "on the fly" or that it will slow you down putting the bike onto a cartop bike carrier. For me it is well worth the trade. You can always carry your old QR skewers when weight is not a factor. And the fact that you are slowed down means that any possible thief is also slowed down. Just like a "Club" antitheft steering wheel lock on a car, hopefully the thieve will just go for the easier target, someone else's property</review_text>
My wife and I both enjoy using the Home Door Gym.  I recommend this product to anyone who doesn't have time to commute to a remote workout facility or someone who doesn't have space for workout equipment</review_text>
This is my first diving computer. I was pleased with its functions and ease of use. It logs all your dives and you can transfer them to your computer. It really simplified logging all my dives.The computer will track your every aspect of your dive and you can set warning for depth and time.  It tracks your dive time, surface time, no flight time, ascending speed, recommended safety stop and mandatory stops.Overall I am very happy with it and every diver should have one.</review_text>
Wonderfull watch! Great sales experience. I bought that for my wife, and I called the vendor asked to expedite the shipping. It was delivered ahead of schedule, on time for her anniversary. Excellent price and smooth purchase. I definitely recommend and would return to purchase more. The product itself has all the required features and functions that a professional diver would expect</review_text>
i have to say that i LOVE this mat. the combo jute and rubber make it nearly impossible to slip. only thing is... the jute and rubber are rubbing up against one another and kind of crumbling and flaking off where i often place my feet causing bald spots on my mat. haha. weird, huh? so now you know. other than that the mat is visually very pleasing</review_text>
I ordered these gloves in tandem with a Heavy Bag for my father on Father's Day.  He's had difficulty staying in shape and working out with different fitness programs I've designed for him.  The Heavy Bag is right up his alley, and with the gloves he can work out longer and more intensely and get a real cardiovascular experience while he relieves some stress.  I'm not sure whether this is an endorsement for the gloves or the bag, but he really seems to enjoy the fit, fabric, and force with which he can punch</review_text>
I was looking for an elliptical to help me lose some of my extra baby weight yet could still fit in my budget and in my house.  This one is somewhat smaller than the other models I have seen.  It is very quiet and I can use it while the children are watching tv without distracting them, or hear them play without noise from the machine.  There are a few programs to select from but there is no option to enter your age and weight in order to get a truly personalized workout.  This would not be for the diehard workout fanatic.  But, for the SAHM who needs a good daily cardio workout while the kids are around, it is perfect.</review_text>
I bought this snorkel and used it and I must say that it is incredibly good.  No water gets into this thing!  However, my friend bought the Aeris Barricuda (The Cuda Dry) and we put them next to each other and they are EXACTLY the same product with only the painted-on brand name being the difference.  I mention this because the Cuda Dry is $10 cheaper.  Consider yourself in the know..</review_text>
Just the perfect cap!. It fits like no other swimming cap. It won't pull you hair when removing it, neither will slip a bit from your head after swimming several laps or flip turning. Very resistant material, and a great finish. Awesome colors!</review_text>
I have used this cap almost daily for over a year. It still fits snugly and is very comfortable. Writing this review has made me think to order another one now, for the inevitable day my old one wears out.I have a rather large head and found many caps didn't fit comfortably. This one is very elastic and is great</review_text>
I bought this as a Christmas gift for my brother in law, but after he opened it, we all tried it on. I have very fragile, long hair and normally swim caps rip the hair out when I'm trying to put the swim cap on or take it off. This one came on and off so easily, without any hair-pulling</review_text>
I'm on my 5th cap now I think.  Silicone is great and lasts forever.  Unlike rubber (which can snag hair) and latex (which some people are allergic to) silicone fits smoothly over wet hair, has a glossy finish so it looks great and doesn't lose elasticity. I have a some advice if you want to try this product that I've learned overt the years:1. Always rinse and hang dry.  I've left wet caps in my gym bag and after a month of two of neglect, it develops black spots. I don't know if it's mold, it doesn't wash off...and you'll have to buy a new cap if you don't like the spotted look.2. Pull it on gently.  I've ripped one when I was trying to stretch it over my head because my long nails cut right through it. It's not cloth so you have to be careful. This goes for latex and rubber, too.3. Wet your hair first.  If your hair is dry when you put it on, you will trap air under the cap.  And since it's not a permeable material, the cap will start to come off while you swim because of the air trying to escape inside.4. Pick a fun color.That's it.  Have a great swim</review_text>
I bought this swim cap for my wife for Christmas and she loves it</review_text>
I had trouble getting water in my ears before wearing this cap.  Now no problem!  It keeps my hair fairly dry, or at least drier than with other caps I've tried.  It's easy to put on and take off--no hair pulling.  It's lasted well so far.  Much better than wearing a cap with a chin strap.</review_text>
A great little case for your cellphone,wallet,keys ect.anything you might want to keep dry and secure or buried in your backyard. I have the clear/red one which is all clear with a dark red insert</review_text>
I bought to use when I run with my snowshoes instead of lugging around my ski poles.  They are compact, sturdy, and cheap.  Much better than paying $65+ for Atlas poles at a local ski shop</review_text>
Gave it to my husband for xmas. Works great. Adjustable height allows my kids to use it too.</review_text>
Great Pole for the price.. You can't turn off the Anti-shock. Also,they only ship 1 per Big Box</review_text>
I have a stabilty problem and the hiking poles help a lot in walking.There was a recent article in the FMCA (Family Motor Coach Association) magazine singing the praises of all the additional health benefits these trakking poles have.The only critcism I have from ordering via Amazon was there was no way I could select black rather than red, so I have gregarious red</review_text>
We bought a pair of these at WalMart on a whim since they were so darn cheap!  We used them on the Appalachian Trail and on a hiking trip through the Swiss Alps.  They work great and have held up fine under rather stressful conditions.  While they're a bit heavier than the fancy name-brand poles, they're no less rugged and only a fraction the cost.  What's not to like</review_text>
My primary use for this was to give me something to help me stay upright during geocaching, and to have something for bushwhacking.  If you are into Geocaching you will understand!  [...]After falling down the side of a hill and getting a bit scratched up, getting this Hiking Pole has worked very well to keep me balanced in weird places.  Also, it's handy for moving branches out of the way (i.e. bushwhacking) when necessary</review_text>
Great product and very functional. It fit just right with the Ody's factory rack and cross bars. No need to buy extra hardware and the silver color matched very will with the Green Slate color of the Ody. A little penalty on gas mileage but more aerodynamic than the other boxes on the road. Very convenient as to, you can open the box from either side and you cannot pull the key if it is not latched properly</review_text>
Great product. very easy to install. Holds a lot. Wind noise not that bad.Easily holds 4 or 5 pairs of skis as well as additional luggage. Though you can not put very heavy stuff in it. Weight capacity is stated at 110 lbs and needs to be spread out. Other item to take note is my skis are 170cm and not much room for anything much longer.</review_text>
Bought this for my 9 year old grandson and was afraid that it wouldn't work well enough for him and his 8 year old brother to use.  I haven't had very good luck with toys lately and I thought a pitching machine for $29 was asking a lot.  However, it worked just fine.  I had purchased an extra set of balls so there would be enough for two rounds before the gathering up process.  Seems the extra balls were a little heavier and fired better than the balls that came with the product, so the boys chose to use only the one set and pick-up after each round. (they have a lot more energy than I have)  They had a great time practicing their batting and I got credit for getting an awesome gift</review_text>
With the recent birth of my new daughter, I wanted to get back into shape, so she wouldn't think of me as "old fat Dad." Well, my loving wife got me this weight set, and I am very pleased with it. The kit consists of two dumbbell handles with collars (about 3.5 lbs. when put together), eight 2.5 lb. weights, and four 1.5 lb. weights. The plates fit on the dumbbells quite easily, and the nut-like collars ensure that they won't fall off.I am very happy with these weights. It is quick and easy to change the weight of each dumbbell, and when it is together, it stays together, rather than the plates rotating and threatening to unscrew the collars. Also, the plastic container holds the plates and handles nicely and when the pieces are stowed away, it makes a nice small package for storage.I have had these weights for a year now, and am quite happy with them. If you or someone you know wants to do some light weightlifting to get back into shape, then I highly suggest that you get this set. Looks great and works great</review_text>
This table is very lightweight and easy to use, but not very sturdy. It would probably last longer for someone using it only a few times a year - but for weekly use, it only lasted me a few months before one of the hinges came apart. I don't think I would buy it again for frequent use.</review_text>
I really like everlast slimmer belt because it feel so great on my tummy. I hadn't wear for work out yet, but I will try to later on when I have time. Regardless, I think it's a good product for the price, plus the shipping is fast compare to other slimmer belt that I tried to order</review_text>
I use this product on the treadmill every morning and it has really helped me loose inches.  It's a fast and simple way to help you loose weight while supporting your lower back</review_text>
We purchased these blankets to keep in the car for emergencies. Thankfully we haven't had to use them. We also used them to line our rescued black lab's dog house for added warmth in our N.E. PA. home. We then used it to make a shelter for some free range kitty's that took up residence on our porch. We lined a box with the blankets. The kitty's are nice and toastie. This is a great product at a great price !!!</review_text>
We have not had a chance to use the blankets, but they look very good</review_text>
It's a durable rash guard, thick fabric and the design is simple and at the same time original.  One of a kind</review_text>
Bought this from The Rack Warehouse via Amazon and it was back-ordered for 6 weeks.  When it finally got here, it was missing a screw.  In spite of this, assembly was pretty easy.  It has a wide, four leg base which keeps it reasonably stable.  If you walk into one of the bikes, it shakes quite a bit, but doesn't fall over, or drop bikes on you.  The four feet are threaded for height adjustment on uneven floors, and are made of a hard rubber so they don't scratch our wood floors when we slide it around with the bikes still loaded.  The free-standing rack is much easier to move than the kind you have to tether to the floor and ceiling.The oak looks really nice.  Its as if our bikes are on display.  We've got three bikes on it most of the time, and are quite happy with the performance.  You can adjust each arm independently to set it for a level top tube (road) frame, or a sloping (MTB) frame.  The bars are coated with a thick rubbery material and do not damage the bike.  The drawback to this system is that if the cables on your road bike run under the top tube, they will be pinched against the bike the whole time it is stored.  I have some bumpers on my cables that I keep on either side of the rack arms to prevent it from smashing the cable against the frame</review_text>
This product works as needed. I use it in the doorway of my dormroom quite effectively. I easily holds my weight (180 lbs) without using the supplied mounting bracket (just used the friction pads.)</review_text>
I recently purchased a Giro Nine helmet from Amazon.com. They gave me an option to have free shipping as long as I did not mind waiting 7-14 days. I picked that option and actually received my helmet in only 3 days!!!!The product itself is great. The helmet is comfortable and light. The strap is padded so it does not rub against your chin. The helmet keeps you very warm. There is no ventilation like some other helmets, but that is fine for me (I am always cold, not hot).I have not had any major wipe outs yet, so I cannot comment on that aspect of the quality. The pink, smog, and white color is cute; but it can easily get scratched. I store my helmet in a small case to protect it while traveling.</review_text>
After reviewing this treadmill in Consumer Reports- we decided to purchase this- and it arrived on March 1st.  This treadmill has been making 'squeeking' noises since the very start when it is on any incline higher than 1.5.  I have contacted Customer Service- my husband (who is very mechanical) worked on it for over two hours with no resolution and now I am waiting for them to have a "service tech" call me- who is now two days past the date they told me I could expect a call.  If this squeek was not an issue, I would be very happy with the treadmill.  It runs well and is easy to use- and I would rate it highly.  However, as it is defective and no-one at Ironman seems to care to resolve the issue, it is very frusterating</review_text>
Does everything I need it to do and then some, would purchase it again</review_text>
I am very pleased with my treadmill which I recieved January,2007.  It is a high end treadmill and was one of the ones recommended in a recent Consumers Reports.  The price was decent and weighed less than some of the other ones recommended.  You will need two strong people to lift and/or slide the box. It weighs approximately 232 pounds.  But once it is together it can be rolled to another area in the folded position.  The assembly instructions were pretty straight forward.  Everything went together nicely. I am a fairly handy female.  I think it helps to lay out the parts, so as not to put the wrong screws in place and then have to go back and change them.  One thing I would strongly recommend would be to go on the [...] and download the Users Manual and read it before it arrives.  I did this and when it came I already knew what to expect.  Hopes this helps.</review_text>
More than exceeds my expectations. This is a fantastic unit. Extremely heavy duty. Only negative - box is huge and extremely heavy. Delivery went as far as my driveway. Took me and my son to slide it into house and it wasn't easy. If you're on a second floor, make plans to get help. Helpful tip - I assembled in my den but wanted to put in my bedroom. It has wheels and you can move it similar to a handtruck, but I wanted to slide it sideways thru the door. Too wide to fit the other way. Went to Home Depot and bought a set of those magic mover type discs. That did the trick. Was extremely easy to maneuver thru bedroom doorway. Suggestion - when you order, buy some "walk n' lube" too. Treadmills need to be lubricated every 30 days or so. Very difficult to find locally. The treadmill is great. I'm a big boy and it handles me with no problem</review_text>
I tried out a lot of different units, and read up on what I should look for. I need a unit that's not going to fall apart on me. I had kept hearing about this model, and read lots of good things about the company in places like Consumers Guide. I thought it was great when I tried one, but Amazon had the better deal and I didn't mind waiting to get it. I've used it now for about about 2 weeks, and I can see why I kept hearing good things about it. It's really built like a brick *********, and there was a lot of attention in the details. Everythings right where it needs to be, it's nice n' quiet, and looks good. Overall, I'm quite happy with it.</review_text>
I don't normally write reviews, if something works the way it's supposed to, why bother? But something happened the other day that I needed to share. I got the treadmill as a gift for my daughter who is on the track team at school. She's been doing so well, we felt she earned it. She has been pushing herself hard for the last week, due to an upcoming race. A few days ago, while she was running, the safety key was pulled off because she got to far from the front. She tried to just put it back on and start it up, but it wouldn't. She got off to go reset it, but she slumped to the floor and passed out! After we got her to a doctor, he said she just over-exerted herself. But thank the Lord the unit didn't start back up when she put the key back on. If she had passed out while it was still moving, she would have broken her neck! Sara uses it every day, and loves it. We've never had any problems with it, though we've only had it for 6 months.</review_text>
This product was in excellent condition when it arrived.The company from which it was purchased, "Sports & Outdoors", delivered the product quickly and I'm very sastified with both Amazon and the seller</review_text>
If you want to step up your workout, slap on a waist trimmer.  They really make you sweat around the middle and this ultimately leads to a smaller waist.Also, this is a legitimate uni-sex product. I worried that the waist wouldn't be small enough for me, as I am a petite woman, but almost the entire length of it is the "fuzzy" velcro, so it would probably work for even a 20" waist, if there is such a thing.Great product at a dirt cheap price!  Get one for yourself</review_text>
This was my first introduction product to the world of nutritious flax seed.  This product from Now Foods arrived within a few days on a standard order.  The flax seed was very fresh and delicious.  I recommend this for other customers for quality and value</review_text>
VERY HIGH IN INCREDIBLY IMPORTANT MONOUNSATURATED FATS!,IN A NUTSHELL: SUPER FOOD SUPPLEMENT LIKE BREWER'S YEAST - LECITHIN - WHEAT GERM or COD LIVER OILOver 5 times more Monounsaturated Fat than Polyunsaturated Fat! --And -- over 20 times more Monounsaturated Fat than Saturated Fat!BUT THAT'S NOT ALL ---Flax Seed is a nutritionally complex food. Flax Seed contains a very a high concentration of alpha linoleic acid (ALA) an omega-3 essential fatty acid plus fiber, lignan and many naturally occurring vitamins and minerals. Increasingly, recent studies have revealed that Flax Seed does help reduce serum cholesterol levels, fights cancer and controls blood glucose levels.IT IS IMPORTANT TO BUY WHOLE FLAX SEEDS & THEN GRIND THEM:Buying flax seed unground, keeps it fresh, and retains all the nutrients while on the shelf. However, it is important to grind the flax in a coffee grinder before using, otherwise the flax seed will most likely pass through your digestive system intact, and you will not have received the benefits of consuming them.It is important to AVOID ground flax, since no matter how wholesome, and fresh the flax was when it was ground, it loses its nutrient value, and turns rancid very quickly, even when purchased in a vacuum sealed container. In essence, a vacuum sealed container is only useful if you use all the flax as soon as the container is opened. That of course assumes that it was sealed as soon as it was ground in the first place.FYI - Traditionally, "Golden Flax" is higher in oil than the ordinary yellow flax which is traditionally higher in fiber.BOTTOM LINE: ONE OF SEVERAL BRANDS I CONSUME DAILY - BUT I PICK GOLDEN WHEN I CAN GET IT!This "Now Flax" is an organic food supplement which can enhance human health when used daily, and a truly excellent value. However, given a choice, I would spend the extra .20 cents and choose the "Golden Flax" product because Golden Flax is traditionally higher in the beneficial oils that are the reason for consuming flax in the first place.</review_text>
This table was what we needed. It is wide enough and does the trick as a kitchen. The only thing I had a problem with was that it was too thin for our kitchen gear pole (it holds paper towels,lantern,cooking utensils,garbage bag)would not tighten down as thin as the table. So it wobbled around a lot</review_text>
It was what I expected. Yes, put in legs you must have strong muscles</review_text>
A little difficult to put together and the read out doesn't work but a good piece of workout equipment and not a bad price</review_text>
A little tough to put together in some aspects but well made, easy to use, and fairly easy to move</review_text>
We love this "Twist & Step Trainer" because its lightweight, and fits in a small space.  Its sturdy, and gives a good workout.  Also, its quiet, so the one using it doesn't drive the rest of the family crazy.  The monitor is good too--we like keeping track of how many steps we take as well as # of minutes.  It wasn't hard to assemble either, and was reasonably priced.  All in all, we're very happy we bought it</review_text>
I ordered the wrong set of bands for my wife and had to cancell this order. Their customer service was very understanding and helpful The lighter bands we purchased are being used daily by my wife</review_text>
I have returned the package to the seller.  The reason was that I needed light resistance and I ordered the wrong one.</review_text>
I bought this knife on a whim and it worked out well for a little while... but then I lost it. This knife is a little to small to not have a clip or something to keep it attached to you.</review_text>
Swiss army knives are simply one of the best pen knives around!  I ended up shopping price and this was the best I could find</review_text>
These cards are awesome. We use these in our poker club and they are great. Every high end club that I have played in uses these cards, and for good reason. Although any brand can be marked or damaged, you really would have to work hard to deface these. They are also washable, so dirt, etc., comes right off. I play at least once a week, for about 6-7 hours, and we have been using the same cards for two years and they seem just as fresh as when we got them. I will tell you that if you are not used to these cards, you might not like the way the feel.....at first. But then, you will love them. You should keep in mind that there are two different sizes. One for poker and one for bridge. The bridge cards are smaller to help you hold them all in your hand. If you are used to poker cards, make sure you get the right size, or they will feel dwarfed in your hand. If you play in a home game, these cards are a must. You won't have to buy another set unless someone burns them. In the long run, you will save by not having to replace your decks. Also, keep in mind that this cards glide very easily, so go easy when you start dealing until you get used to them. Best of luck at the tables.</review_text>
Loved its look and feel... while I don't know much about using a compass, this one has all the parts needed to be a top notch "explorer".  GPS is for sissies</review_text>
I ordered this originally from HSN, and the product is made of plastic.  Flimsy, not sturdy, and having to pull-out and rotate the handles can be difficult for someone with arthritis in their hands.  I used it and liked but then it got the point I would not adjust it to do the different exercises and I sent it back.  Don't waste your money and time on this</review_text>
What could be better than a near-life-size image of Mia Hamm hanging on your door or wall</review_text>
This is the best machine to use for losing weight!  You feel great, look great, and have a happier life!  It is so easy and fun to use.  I used to have the slimmer gazelle and have now switched to this one.  The pistons are a great addition and provides an extra workout.  But if you are just starting out I would start with the lowest level.This machine is also easier on the joints.  The difference between this model and the other models is that it feels sturdier and has the power pistons.  The only flaw I found is the exercise video it came with.  It is this women who I dont even know doing the workout routine.  I want Tony Little!!!  I had to buy his workout video because Tony Little is the best in getting you motivated!  You can get the video at his website: www.tonylittle.com  Overall, the Gazelle Power Plus earns an A plus in my book</review_text>
This is a very nice product. it is very good if you need to lose a few extra pounds.aerobic level A+calorie counter Bquietness Bsmooth glide A+durability B+overall A</review_text>
In May of 2005, I cut sodas and fried foods from my diet and greatly reduced sweets.  I began walking in June, but I live in a high desert area and it becomes extremely hot during the summer. My walking routine was at best erratic.  Weighing 230 lbs, I found working out at the gym to be an uncomfortable experience. I began looking into home equipment. My husband was supportive, but somewhat hesitant because at the time I already owned an elliptical trainer with powered incline that was serving as a very large clothing rack.  I had also recently donated a power treadmill to charity because it too was taking up space and not getting used.  While shopping one day, I saw a Gazelle in a local retail store.  I was surprised by the range of motion and cardiovascular workout the machine offered.  I purchased the Gazelle in July of 2005.  It is now October of 2005. I currently weigh 150 lbs.  Up until 1 month ago, the Gazelle was the only piece of workout equipment I used to lose the weight.  I found the Gazelle gave me an excellent cardiovascular workout and I also liked the stretch from the range of motion this machine allows.  In addition, I found the workout to feel extremely natural.The only downside to the Gazelle is that since I purchased it 4 months ago, I have had to repair it twice.  2 weeks after I purchased the product one of the welds broke on the swing arm.  FitnessQuest was very helpful and sent a repair part with no hassle, but delivery took 2 weeks.  One month later a bolt holding a foot pedal broke causing me to fall and slightly injure myself.  On examination, the bolt had worn away due to friction.  Once again I called for a repair part and received it in 2 weeks.Other than when I have had to wait for repair parts I have used this machine every day since its purchase.  In the event that the machine breaks again after the warranty expires, I will most probably spend the money and purchase another one.  The workout is that enjoyable and the results have been that good.</review_text>
When I first purchased the Gazelle, my partner Jim was very skeptical. But once I showed off my new nice tight buns courtesy of Tony Little, he became an instant Tony fan. Now, we both have our very own Gazelle and we are having a blast! yeee haaaaa!!!I recommend this to all people; little, small, fat or big, Tony will get you pumped up! So buy this thing, and rock out LITTLE style! oh yeah.Thanks Tony!-Bill & Jim in PA</review_text>
If you buy any trainer I would recommend this computer to train with. It is easy to operate,gives instant information,not hard to setup and works well. It is particularly useful if you track your workouts.</review_text>
The kit arrived sooner than expected.  The included videotape demonstrates all practical exercise routines and many specialized exercises for more athletic people.  Even warm-up exercises are demonstrated.  Door attachment instructions, and basic exercise instructions, are also included in printed form.This exercise kit is especially good for women and for seniors of both genders.  Beyond that, men and women who travel a lot will find the kit easy to take along.  Almost anyone can benefit from regular use of this kit</review_text>
For price it works great.  I use it for my boat but also found numerous other uses.  Such as draing the antifreeze out of the car overflow container.  Works for lawnmovers, ATVs or anytime you have a fluid that needs to be sucked out</review_text>
What a difference to be able to lap swim and see the clock, the wall for turns, and/or my kids when they're in the pool!  These fit well, although I find there is some fogging that I need to rectify after every 10 laps.  I highly recommend to anyone who wears glasses and swims</review_text>
My little sister is an avid high school swimmer, who always had difficulty seeing the clock for swim intervals. The coach was always forced to put her in lane one, and she still had to squint to see the clock. Poor girl. Eventually she decided to purchase a pair of prescription goggles and picked these. They are of the same quality as discounted non-perscription goggles you may find at big swim meets, and I think Amazon has the best price.I recommend these to anyone that wears glasses and enjoys swimming. My dad recently purchased another pair, as a recreational swimmer</review_text>
The goggles fits great! I can swim in it a whole hour (I only have class for an hour) and it doesn't fog.It's great!</review_text>
This product fit a desired need for fishing excursions and was exactly what was wanted</review_text>
This bottle works extremely well. It keeps coffee hot for hours and it's leakproof. You won't be disappointed. I've had several personal thermos containers and not one has done as well as this one. I plan to buy another one if the other colors become available.</review_text>
I had this vacuum bottle for two months now, and my experience has been only positive.  I have experienced no leaks, coffee remains hot enough to enjoy drinking 6 hours later, and it is easy to use one handed.  It is approximately the size of a bicycle water bottle, and will fit into many of the same holders, including the bottle pockets on my messenger bag.  I've been pleasantly surprised as how little the coffee has stained the interior of the bottle and cover, especially since I haven't been meticulous about cleaning</review_text>
I used it to mount my Delta Airzound Bike Horn on a recumbent bicycle</review_text>
Great watch!  This watch has many functions and it takes some time to learn them all.  I highly recommend this watch to any outdoor enthusiast or to any gadget guru</review_text>
The mat is really cute, and does not slip at all. The only thing I don't like is that it is a little too long and it would be nice if it was slightly thicker</review_text>
I'm SO happy I bought this mat! I love the color, design and the energy of it.I also got a matching bag for it from ebay.I'm not only using my mat for youga but also practice meditation on it... and everytime I'm having troubles in my yoga practice I look at my mat and smile.</review_text>
I have used bycycle mirrors before, most of the helmet mounted, I recently purchased a new helmet and did not want to mount a mirror on it, so I looked for a mirror that could mount on my glasses. this one fits the bill, with one small exception...I would like it better if it were just about an inch longer, it can be a real strain to see in it at times. But it does do the trick, and it has a lot of adjustments, making it easy to aim. Overall I would recommend this mirror!</review_text>
Very nice protection for heavy bags training. Nice grip also. There is one thing I have to say though - these gloves tend to run small, I mean, my hands are medium amongst Americans and I had to squeeze them into these gloves every time. I don't know what would happen to those who have bigger hands</review_text>
Any sword that is only $15 is in fact very dangerous. These swords are called wallhangers because they are only designed to by hung on a wall, not swung. The reason is that underneath the handle is a very small piece of metal that connects to the blade itself. (Called the Tang) In a real martial arts sword, the tang is normally a thick piece of metal that is almost the thickness of the sword itself. If you swing a wallhanger too often or too hard it can break at the tang, and fly off and hurt someone.If you want to learn more about how dangerous these wallhangers are do a google search on the words: anatomy of a wallhangerAny sword designed for real martial arts practice- like Iaido, starts at $250 not $15, and should be bought at a reputable Iaido store. (sorry I am not allowed to recommend web sites here).So be smart, either hang this sword back on the wall, or throw it out before your baby brother/sister hurts someone</review_text>
This was a good sword I was expecting some plastic or paper sword for a price like this but instead you get this nice sword delivery took only 3 days and my package was brought in perfect condition and I now have a Hattori Hanzo swor</review_text>
Man...at 24.99$ this sword is an absolute STEAL. It REALLY does sell for 60$ on other sites around the net. I mean, you could pay that much for a REALLY authentic version of the sword, which would include a leather handle and the lion symbol on the base of the sword. But hey, im a huge katana fan and a huge kill bill fan and I admit this is ENOUGH. Only thing I wish came with it was a stand. For a better display. The sword is pretty sharp to. I tossed a apple in the air and sliced it clean in two! Awesome product, awesome price. I'll be back to get the last samurai sword from this same seller to. Got it to me within 4 days</review_text>
I was looking for a reasonably priced sword and this one fit the bill perfectly.I was curious to see what I could get for $20 and I was pleasantly surprised.if you're looking for an inexpensive sword for display or practice, I highly recommend this sword</review_text>
the goggles didnt fit me very well and a lot of wind went around them. I they didnt fit anyone in my family either. I think the material is a bit too stiff to allow it to comform to one's face. Otherwise I would rate the goggles highly.</review_text>
The same brass nozzel works with white gas or the primus butane fuel cylinder. Included is the sturdy metal pressure pump for use with the liquid fuel bottle. I recently swapped the brass burner jet using the Primus wrench (both included) and lit it using lamp oil (similar to kerosene) which also burned well. A nice combo that can use local fuels.The compressed Primus fuel is convenient for trips of a couple days and allows simmering, and is availabile in major outdoors stores. If you get the little Primus lantern, it will also use these Primus compressed gas bottles. The lantern provides a nice way to use every bit of the fuel</review_text>
This Stiga T0070 Table Tennis Racket is really NICE. I liked it so well, I also purchased one for a FRIEND. You can't beat it fot the MONEY.</review_text>
I purchased this paddle for my wife, while I purchased the EuroTech.  The EuroTech is great for me for strong spin, Control, and Playing deep off of the table.  My wife plays closer, and is not as hard of a spinner, but the control of this paddle and the balance of the weight is great for her.  In a matter of a week, she loves using this paddle (we play a few days a week) vs.  a couple of other "el cheapo" paddles.  I give this a 5 star rating for entry players and players that play close and don't use alot of spin, but if you are a spinner and a deeper player, it is worth the extra few bucks to upgrade to the even better EuroTech</review_text>
This system is the best for your money. It is great because if you set the safety bars right you don't need a spot. all you need to complete this system is a bench that rolls in and out with leg attachment. Like the one Powertec has. Oh and of course the bar and weights</review_text>
My friend got me this for my birthday.  It was good, decent paint that you could rely on.  The only problem I had was they somtimes blew up in my barrel, but that isn't a problem, really.  It is also accurate, and relyable.  If you want good, inexpensive paint, than I recomend getting this</review_text>
I got this item days before I would have expected to! What's contained is a basic sword-cleaning kit. The letters on the box look kinda faded, and I'm afraid to touch the box for fear of splinters. I'd recommend finishing it somehow. Otherwise, very nice</review_text>
I discovered Boeshield when I was a Marine Electronics editor (for national magazines) in the early 1990's. The folks at Boeshield gave me 2 4oz cans that I hoarded for years before the Internet came along.I guarantee Boeshield out-performs any lubricant for protection and freeing up frozen parts. Buy with confidence</review_text>
I have a small garage shop with not a few cast iron tools sitting around.  During certain times of the year I have a problem with humidity and surface rust.  This Boeshield T-9 spray is a good solution!  Though I used to use a lot of WD40 and steel wool to keep the rust at bay, this stuff is way better.  While  the surface is rust free, spray the T-9 on and let it sit a while and then rub it off with a clean rag.  The surface is then lubricated and coated to prevent further rust.  Wood GLIDES across the metal after a treatment of T-9.  Buy some - you will love it!!!</review_text>
Rust will not form if you use this stuff.  Contains no silicon</review_text>
If you are looking for a good rust preventer, this is the best.  I use it on my shop tools and am totally rust free</review_text>
i cant actually give any stars yet cuz i havnt goten it yet, but theyr making me. so5 because its digi-cam and has the tilted holster on the left side(best place& position 4 your handgun)-1 because of shipping/timei ordered this vest on 26 aug. i only just got told on 21 SEP! that they finally decided to ship the friggin thing.  they say it should take about 2 weeks 2 get here. gggrrrrr!!!!   any way it better be good.  it should be.note about what pattern to choose:digi-cam, new camo pattern used by usmc made up of squares 2 screw up infrared nite vision. they cant focus on it.  & it just looks awesome.u may know about the digital acu pattern by the us army. the bluey greeny tan stuff.  its meant to messup nite vision 2, but as usual, the army screwed it up. tsk tsk tsk. its supposed to be universal camo 2 make u blend in any where. maybe so. but no universal camo will ever beat a pattern designed for a specific environment.  u'd b better off with the older woodland and desert patterns. also the acu is very unflattering.if u must have a pattern for both woody and sandy/dry grassy environments, try the older 6color desert pattern from the 1st gulf war, with the big brown splotches and little white roks. if nothing else at least it looks cool.a guide 2 patterns:buy a woodland pattern for wood/grass/just plain green environmentsbuy a desert pattern for sandy/dry, dead grass environment.buy the 6-color desert "chocolate chip" pattern for a mixed environment.  (stik w/ woodland 4 a green area w/ dry grass mixed in)buy the army acu for a halloween party.black for urban/nite or if u just cant make your mind up.-----------------------------------------------------------------------well it finally got here on oct 2 (42 days after ordering)pretty cool works well, adjusts welljust a few notes 4 anyone elseits got everything like it sez in product descriptionthe webbing itself has digi-cam on it, not just olive drab like in picture, other than that, its all same.  has 4 mag pouches stuck on it & u can replace holster w/ 2 more pouches, or put them on a belt cuz theyve got belt loops on the back.the "radio pocket" is too small 4 anything bigger than a cell phone, so put your radio in the "id pocket" (the one w/ the shotgun shell loops on it). the shotgun shell loops are removable (velcro)6 pistol mag pouches(2 removable on belt, 1 on removable holster, 3 fixed on webbing.  i dunno who needs 6 mags 4 a handgun so u can carry leatherman etc. the one attatched 2 the holster is long enough  2 carry a AA maglite in.  mag pouches on sides are a little hard 2 reach.looks awesome w/ digicam uniform.Also since last review, i personally tested camouflage on my yard (woody w/ lots of bushes) & ACU was [...]</review_text>
If you are looking at this light, you are probably already familiar with the technology.  Basically HID is the top notch light.  Power consumption, durability, and light output etc.This light is made for racing mountain bikes off road at night.  I personally use it for commuting over dark snowy bicycle trails through the Wisconsin winter.  I was a little reluctant to part with the money, but I must say it is worth every cent.  I can also vouch for the crash resistant mounting design (long story.)If you are a little wealthier than me and/or if you are a weight queen, you may be interested in the higher end models which pair the same light with lighter battery technology.  The smaller battery technology would also be a better option if you intend to helmet mount the light.If you are night biking only infrequently and in areas that have street lights, you can probably get away with a cheap LED light which will generally make you visible to others.  But if you need to light the path your biking on regularly, this is definitely the way to go.  It's much cheaper than getting injured, and you will get home faster with this awesome light on your bicycle.One usage hint: I found a little grease on the mount makes it easier to pop the light on and off.</review_text>
I got my first Vector about three years ago, from REI. Yes, it is large. Not a problem for me as I am large.I am on my third Vector; the first two, for some strange reason, leaked water, the first during an incredible monsoon rainstorm in the mountains of Arizona, the second while taking a shower. No, I did not submerse the watch, nor push any buttons while the water was 'on'. Fortunately, REI accepts returns with no questions. It is a testament to how nice this watch is that I continued to replace the watch. Perhaps I had models from a bad production run, as my present Vector has lasted for over two years with nary a leak.The good: I have found the digital compass to be very accurate and useful. Remember that it must be calibrated from time to time, and don't forget about declination.The barometer is VERY useful. The barometer function is constantly operating, and accounts for a nice little symbol in the upper left of the display showing pressure trends over the past few hours. This is very useful if you understand barometric pressure trends and their likely results. If you do not, look it up and learn, as you will find it to be very useful if you spend a lot of time in the brush. Remember that the barometric pressure must be calibrated against absolute sea-level readings from time to time, especially during rapidly changing weather conditions. Once you understand the relationship between altitude/changing weather, you will master the complexities of both the barometer and the altimeter, and understand just how simple they are, and how reliable this device really is. I have checked it against my high-end GPS and other barometers many times, and it is very accurate indeed.The temp is useful if you need to know the temperature; like all such devices, it will have to be taken off of your body for about ten minutes before you will get an accurate reading.The bad: the lens is plastic. If you have any experience with fine coated-glass, you will do fine with this: DO NOT, EVER, wipe any dust or dirt off of the face. Use a lens-pen, with a fine blower-brush. Or wait until you've stepped under water with it. Put simply, it has been my experience that if you keep your grubby paws off of it, and don't try to 'clean' it with your cotton t-shirt/flannel shirt/etc, and instead use methods used for fine coated glass elements, it will look like new forever. Mine does, and it has been in desert dust and swamp mud.The battery does, in fact, eventually lose energy! In normal use, you can expect a year or more from the battery. If you are one of those fellas that shows everyone that he meets his "neat digital compass", or actually rely on this as your primary compass in the brush, it won't last nearly so long. The digital compass is the primary energy-sucker, likely as much as the backlight. Use the compass only when needed (you should have a base-plate compass anyway...Suunto also makes some of the best of these as well).As for the review stating the watchbands give out, I find that remarkable as I have never had a problem with mine, and I wear it constantly, day in and day out.All in all, and in spite of the fact that I had to return my first two, I heartily recommend the Vector. Tough and useful</review_text>
I gave this watch to my fiance & he has really enjoyed tracking our altitude gain on bike rides.  I've appreciated knowing the temperature.  Can't wait for ski season</review_text>
This may be the 'outdoorsy' ubergeek watch. It's big, it's ugly, but has functions to make the fattest Swiss Army Knife sit in the corner sobbing in jealousy. Overall, I like it but there are a couple of things that sound better than they are.The timepiece: Outstanding. It has HH:MM:SS DD:MMM, of course, with a year setting to avoid leap year issues. This should go without saying in a modern digital watch. Stopwatch with lap function (not that I ever use the lap function, but I'm sure someone is interested). Countdown timer that can run up to a 24 hour countdown (very easy to set). Three daily alarms. Special kudos for the alarms, this is one of the loudest watch alarms I've heard, and I've missed too many watch alarms to not appreciate this.The Altimeter: largely eye candy, but kind of neat. Over four days, my bedroom went from 100m above sea level to 25 m below sea level (by the maps, about 40m ASL). Not surprising because it is driven by the barometer, and I never recalibrated it, but a graphic demonstration of the importance of calibrating it when you want/need it.The Barometer: Yup, it's a barometer. The part I like is the little display that shows the rising/falling trend, especially as this is always active (even in normal 'time' mode).The Thermometer: Take the watch off to get an accurate reading as the sensor is too close to the wrist.The compass: Easily the best 'special' feature. Accurate, precise (enough for orienteering, not for surveying), easy to use. It can be programmed for a declination, but knowing me, I'd forget to reset it, so I do declination the hard way. The sighting notches are small but servicable. The spirit level bubble is unique among digital watch compasses to Suunto, and greatly enhances accuracy and confidence in the compass. An outstanding wrist compass.The package: Big. Really, really big. But the controls are very easy to use and seem fairly resistant to accidental button pressing (a problem for me with other watches). The battery has a shortish (12-18 month) life, but has a hatch, so you don't need to take it to a jeweller to get it replaced without ruining the water resistance. The display has large characters and high contrast to the back ground, and the display light is just right, readible, even, and glare free, but not an emergency flashlight. Personally, I'm going to swap the resin band for a velcro strap, but the stock strap isn't bad, just not great.Overall, not a watch for the office or a suit but very good as a watch, compass and barometer, and about what you could expect as a thermometer and altimeter. Well designed, thought-out, and manufactured, but really big</review_text>
This is the second Suunto Vector watch i have owned. Only because the first one was lost. The only two draw backs of this watch is battery life and my band broke twice in two years. Seems to me they could offer a much longer life battery and a band that would hold up alot better. the battery lasts about 6 months only.For the price of this watch ($230) you think tehy could do alittle better.Other than that i love the watc</review_text>
I'm very hard on my gear and this watch has withstood it all. It has all the features you could ask for in a watch plus a few you would never expect. Large easy to read numbers for when your in difficult situations or akward positions and even while scuba diving (note: it says not to press buttons underwater, but its still readable without the backlight...usually) are a great feature and although it's a large watch, it has a certain style all its own.  I think the compass is my favorite feature great while orienting yourself with a trail map. Also a great conversational piece while breaking the ice in the board room..."my watch helps me predict the weather":-D...ok maybe not the best thing to tell your boss, but still an amazing watch:-)</review_text>
Though it requires more space than we thought, this is a great way to practice Tae Kwon Do at home. Its adjustable to different heights and easy to move by rolling across the floor. But it requires a good deal of space around it for someone to take a big step and swing their leg/arm without hitting anything but the Kid Kick</review_text>
I don't know anything about golf clubs, but I've been using these clubs for about 3 wks now and they are doing pretty well. I am a new golfer and I'm getting the fundamentals down. These clubs are a good starter set, without taking a hit in your checkbook. I may come back a re-review these clubs once I know a little more about the game. That way I can tell, how well they hit</review_text>
I like this low impact workout.  It's a switch in pace for Cathe but it's still a fun and challenging workout.  You will definately burn fat and calories here.  The step workout is about 29-30 minutes and then there is a toning segment too.  It is more geared toward a less advanced exerciser, but everyone will get benefits from this.  The cardio features faster/slower intervals and has lots of interesting-but-doable combos (e.g. "around the world," "rocking horse" - which aren't new). It's mostly low impact, but does have some higher-impact bursts.  In the toning segment, you will use a stability ball for almost all of the exercises.  You also need some weights too.  I enjoy doing this, and as I said earlier - it is fun and motivating.   Go get this and do it 4 times a week along with other dvds to keep up your interest</review_text>
fast delivery and the sword looks GREAT!  I gave it as a gift to my friend that loves the Ninja Gaiden video game and he hit the roof!  it is very accurate to the one in the game, which is very impressive.</review_text>
Good quality gloves, light and easy to wear.  The only thing is that it gets crumbled towards the ends of the finger openings after a while.  But this does not affect the punching and grapping much.  The pads towards the front of the hand are soft and make it easy for your opponent when punching him/her</review_text>
This is a great baseball bat for playing in a confined area. It has a little weight, but nothing significant enough to hit a homerun or break a neighbors window. This bat will deteriorate if left outside through the elements. The durability is the only reason this item did not receive five stars in this review. Even with the bat being a bit weathered, I can still find use for it. It has been monumental in training both my dog and my 2-year old son. When I pick up the old bat, they know they have done something wrong, so usually they hide. Thanks EA, my son has finally stopped playing with his food</review_text>
The mat was exactly what we wanted. It came promptly and was great!  I would not hesitate to order from this company again</review_text>
I wear these shoes for pretty much everything but running.  As other reviewers have mentioned, these are extremely comfortable with a wide base to provide plenty of traction and grip.  The rubber soles and canvass uppers make them very flexible while still providing some support.  These shoes are great for martial arts as well as normal everyday use.  I often just wear them around the house because they are so comfortable.  They do tend to show sweat stains very easily, but it's understandable being that they're made from white canvass</review_text>
I had them in days of the order. They are as described. I did have to add som e memory foam, but other than that just great</review_text>
These shoes by far a worth every penny I paid for them</review_text>
I have a pair in both black and white. They are good shoes for doing martial arts when you might need to wear shoes.  The two earlier reviewers state in detail so I will not need to repeat that.  The one obvious thing is that they go well with a Gi/Dobek. The shoes are easy on and easy off so it is perfect for a trip to the dojo/dojang.  Not just for kung-fu anymore</review_text>
I doubt these shoes because of friends in shaolin who swore by these shoes and I wanted shoes to use for capoeira. Well, the grooves on the bottom of the shoes make it very difficult to slide your feet backwards or spin on the ball of your foot because of an insanely large amount of friction so it does no good for me in capoeira but obviously they weren't made for that. There is an incrdibly large range for friction so if you need to keep your feet on the ground these shoes will definetly do that for you.Also - these shoes are INSANELY comfortable. Since I've bought these, I wear them nearly every opportunity I have. They're light, the padding on the bottom is perfect for your feet from the first time you put them on to the last. And stylish.Only drawback to them would be if you have any need to slide your feet backwards or rotate your feet it may be difficult - but, other than that its a wonderful shoe</review_text>
I've been using these shoes for Shaolin Kung Fu for over 10 years (of course not the same ones). I've tried other shoes, like the Pine Tree, or the black slipper like ones. Feiyu is the best for Wushu style training.The Reasons:- Feiyus are wide at the bottom, allowing for good balance when doing jump kicks, kicks and stances.- They have rubber soles with lots of groves in them, which keep you well grounded when doing low stance work. You wont slip like with the taichi/cloth shoes.- They are made with thick soles which give more cushioning and bounce.- Shoelaces allow you to adjust the shoe to your foot and wont fall off while you kick.- Very comfortable and light. You can climb walls/trees with these or just walk on the street.- Shaolin monks from the Shaolin Temple in China use the same exact ones.- Style magazines have rated these as being very stylish affordable shoe. Many people are buying them just for fashion purposes.I have absolutely no complaints about these shoes. I never buy anything else. I literally use these until they get holes at the bottoms, and even then, they still make a great shoe and provide me with the quality I need</review_text>
What can I say?  They are load bars for Thule Racks; they work.  Amazon found the cheapest price around, and the vendor shipped very promptly.  I would trust Rackbarn for future purchases of this type</review_text>
This is the first weight bench that I have bought, and I have been pleased with it.  No, it is not a "commercial gym" bench, but it certainly does just fine for my home training.  The preacher curl pad is a little flimsy when you are curling a lot of weight, but other than that, I really like my purchase</review_text>
I got this about a week ago.  Assembly was pretty easy, took less than an hour.  The only problem I had was that one of the pins that hold the uprights in place had some stripped threads.  I called the customer service number and they sent me two replacements which I received within a week.Bench press:  The bench has four positions:  flat, decline, and two incline.  The uprights are adjustable to four different heights.  The bottom part of the seat is also adjustable to flat or two different incline positions.  While doing incline bench presses at the higher of the two incline positions, it's nice to put the lower part of the seat up at it's highest incline position, as it holds you in place so you don't slide downwards while doing your reps.  There are also a pair of extra barbell holders located lower down on the uprights;  if you can't finish a rep, you can dump the bar in there.  The bar will come to rest about an inch above your chin, so you don't have to lift it very far to get it in there.  That's a really nice safety feature.  Overall, it's very comfortable and works great for any sort of bench press, incline decline or flat.  There's nothing that gets in the way, the uprights are adjustable to get the bar at the right height, and the bench has a really solid feel to it.  I use a 6' standard bar, which works fine.  Of course a 7' bar would work as well.Squat rack:  You can use this bench for a squat rack.  The lower bar that holds the uprights together is curved, so you can stand between them.  You just flip the bench forward (It stays in the straight up position).  Then you raise the uprights as high as they go and turn them around backwards so they're facing the correct direction.  They're tubular, so you just take the pins out and turn them around.  Ideally, the uprights could go up a little higher, as you have to squat down somewhat in order to get under the bar.  But, you're doing squats anyway so what's the point in complaining that you have to do an extra 1/5th of a rep.  Besides, it's infinitely better than picking the weight up off the floor.Leg attachment:  This is removable, which is nice because it's not in the way when you're not using it.  It has two different heights, I found the lower one best for leg curls, and the upper one better for leg extensions.  If you try using the leg curl attachment on the upper height, the padded bar wants to roll up your legs as you do the exercise.  On the lower position, there's no problem.  The padding on the bars is very thick and comfortable.  For leg extensions, the bar goes right across the front of your ankles and stays there throughout the exercise.  Same with the leg curls - once I got it at the right height, it stays in the same place on your legs throughout the exercise, with no rolling back and forth.  The bar that holds the barbell plates is 1" in diameter, and there's an adapter sleeve included for Olympic plates (2" diameter).Preacher curl bench:  This goes in the same place as the leg attachment.  I originally thought there was a problem with the barbell holder which sticks out from the front of this, as it wouldn't allow me to get a full extension at the bottom of the movement.  But I found that if you move forward on the seat so that your legs are under the preacher bench, and the middle of your biceps are about even with the top of the bench, it works just fine.  There's no interference from the barbell holder at all.  Even though that barbell holder is only a few inches wide, the bar balances just fine on it, and it's a handy feature.Overall, I can't find anything to complain about with this bench.  After a little experimenting around to find the correct position to be in when using the preacher curl bench, and which height the leg attachment needs to be at for the leg curl to work correctly, everything works fine.  The bench is nice and solid, and the padding on the seat is thick and firm.  The replacement part I needed was received quickly, at no charge, and with no questions asked.  I'm really happy with this purchase.</review_text>
Nice to have a photo of the boys from Boston who broke the curse of the Bambino once and for all</review_text>
Really like the look of the bag and all the storage space. Unfortunately, I haven't used it on an airplane yet.</review_text>
The gloves have a tight, solid feel, and are made of good materials. The manufacturer describes a new feature, "Innovative curved finger design that offers a natural, flexible and comfortable fit". That sounds good, but does not add any real comfort to the glove. You still have the excess padding when making a fist that makes it more difficult to grab the bar.Pros:Solid feel; good padding; good materials, overall design and craftsmanship; the "No Sweat" wicking system seems to work and there is no dark residue left on the hands after the workout, which is not the case with most manufacturers using cheaper materials.Cons:Excess inner padding affecting the grip; no "easy-off" feature offered by many other manufacturers; a wrist wrap that takes some tweaking to be comfortable</review_text>
The suitability of these gloves depends on what type of lifting you enjoy. With padding on the palm and fingers, your entire gripping surface is cushioned. Such padding is common on bicycling gloves where hours of continuous pressure and vibration can cause numbness and pain. Yet, most serious lifters would probably forgo comfort for better control provided by unpadded gloves.Traditional weight lifting gloves are made from durable but supple leather to prevent calluses and improve grip. The latter becomes critically important when perspiring. In my experience, having no padding is best - especially when lifting heavier weight. Basically, the compliance of the padding reduces your level of control. At the same time, there is an undesirable absorption of energy, albeit a miniscule amount.The quality of the materials and construction of the Harbinger 1250 gloves is the best I have seen. Clearly, the expense in making these gloves is significantly higher than in other products I have owned by Nike and Gold's. Unfortunately, the generous use of thick split leather and padding provides insulation that causes excessive heat buildup. With heat comes sweat. I find myself taking these gloves off multiple times during my workout to let the sweat evaporate. It would be nice if there were perforations or large vents on the back to mitigate this problem.While these gloves might be ideal for certain lifters who prefer comfort over control, I would counsel gym rats to purchase other gloves with less or no padding. Kudos to Harbinger for making a quality product, but these gloves aren't for everyone.ProsSuperior materialsExcellent double stitchingComfortable wrist wrapConsExpensiveExcessive paddingNo perforations to dissipate heat and perspiration</review_text>
I have been using Harbinger wrist wrap gloves for inline skating for over a decade. The new gloves are more comfortable than the last pair. They were a little snug out of the box, but broke in within 3 uses</review_text>
I am very satisfied with this product.These are my first gloves with extended finger length, which I find now as a big plus especially when doing wrist curls.  Wrist wrap works great for me with weak wrists.  Padding is very good as well, without it interfering with normal hand fold.  I read some reviews commenting on how uncomfortably warm they would get when used; I personally have not felt it; what I do agree with is that taking gloves off is not easy. I found that pulling fingers out first is the less difficult way.  I actually wanted to buy the newer model which allows for machine wash, but Amazon did not have L size in stock.These minor details do not demerit the 5 star rating though</review_text>
These gloves are comfortable, but I didn't realize that they were 3/4 fingers and that was a little hard to get used to. They are also really warm. But I would buy them again</review_text>
This is an excellent product, made for my training needs. Is not the first time I weard this glove brand and I just have to say that I am very satified with the performance</review_text>
If you have a Wave, you will wear out the wheels.  These are what you need</review_text>
The Speedo swimcap is awesome...I love it. It makes swimming so much more enjoyable with not having to worry about my hair..If I were  to replace it I would replace it with a regular cap, not one for long hair....but there will be a next time!ThanksNormaJeann</review_text>
These workout gloves are the real deal.  They have rubber on the palms for grip and cushioning.  A well made, well designed glove.</review_text>
Great gloves for working out.  Take a few weeks to break in, but provide great grip and cushion.  In fact, use them weekely for mountain biking as well.  And they've still held together</review_text>
I purchased these gloves, based on my son's wish list.He had used this type previously, for about 4 years.The new ones seem comfortable & durable.He is quite pleased with them</review_text>
I've had a pair for a little over a year and they are the best gloves I've ever used. I've destroyed every pair of gloves i've owned (Harbinger training grip's, Nike's, and Atlas) and these have really held up. They are starting to come apart right now, but they have been used 4 times a week so it is expected. It took about a month to really break these gloves in, but once they get broken in, all of the thumb pains will go away, and the rubber will start to loosen up. They are really worth the extra $</review_text>
I have the first iteration of these gloves which were only a little bit different and am now ordering another pair for backup.  This is the best pair of weight lifting gloves I've ever used.  My first pair has lasted more than 3 years now and they are tough as nails.  Comfortable, well built and leave your hands so smooth you'll never get another callus again</review_text>
The gloves at first seem very stiff and actually uncomfortable to wear but once you get over the break in time, these gloves are great.  Very comfortable and dont feel awkward at all.  The rubber padding really helps with grip, so much that you dont even really have to think about slipping when you go to lift.  also make heavy presses a little easier on the hands</review_text>
I bought these for my daughter who played tee ball. She loved them they were very durable and size was gret fit</review_text>
This pitching rubber is solid and of good quality to last many years of backyard baseball games</review_text>
Just woke up from the incredible nap I had after doing sit-ups on this mat.  It is extremely comfortable and easy on the back.  When doing push-ups, however, I noticed that there isn't much support for the knees.  But do you really need a mat for push-ups?  Overall, I recommend it for the average workout person.  For those hard-cores out there, you may want to invest in a thicker, more padded mat.  I like it because it is easy to transport and makes a quick and comfortable bed after a late night out</review_text>
A kind friend brought over the flag pennant knowing my love of the Cardinals and of bright, cheerful things in general.  This baby is no pushover, either.  It's nearly a square yard of flapping, screaming Card Fever.  I have three poles outside my window, and this pennant fits nicely via the top sleeve so that neighbors can't help but notice that a Cards fan lives in their hood.  One or two of them have teased me, saying that my Cards banner seems to be slightly larger and hung higher than the traditional US flag (the "Stars and Stripes Forever"), but as I tell them, that is just an optical illusion due to the color red being so prominent on the banner, both on bird and background, what you might call the "field."Even those who don't follow the ballgames will recognize the familiar red bird, its good nature and its competitiveness with other birds.  The cardinal, as we all know, has staying power.  It's the team that boasted over the years such Hall of Famers as Stan "the Man" Musial, and Grover Cleveland Alexander, not to mention Cy Young himself, Dizzy Dean, Rabbit Maranville, Leo Durocher, the Fordham Flash Frankie Frisch, and Enos Slaughter, just to name a few.  The banner is as big as a magic flying carpet; let it take you away on a never-ending tour of imagination and baseball firepower.First thing in the morning, I will order another one through Amazon.com, and take my chances.  Which if my neighbors and/or fellow Cards fans shall I gift with this red surprise?  Not everyone has the big personality it takes to display a red flag outside your front door, especially here in dim, foggy old San Francisco, where our own ballteam has plenty of vociferous boosters.  Well, we'll see.  In the meantime, let the red bird soar and to all who know better, better luck next year</review_text>
You always hear reviews say "if I were to loose this I would buy another one."  Well, I bought one when the model first came out and it worked great for more than a year, then it was lost in a cross country move.  After a few weeks I realized how much I was missing it for many every day tasks. I have now purchased my second blur.  They are great knifes. the only drawback is you cannot sharpen it yourself with the serrated section, but that will get you on any knife.  Spring assist functions great without any unintentional openings.  Safe, Fast, useful.  Highly recommended.</review_text>
You can't beat a Ken Onion Knife. This one is great! Smooth action, no-slip grip, and sharp enough to shave with. Highly recomended</review_text>
The knife holds a good blade even after some abuse. The thumb button is a little small and a bit tough on the thumb after repeated openings but does open the knife very well. The textured handle provides a very good grip but works like sand paper on anything else in your pocket. If I lost it I would buy another one</review_text>
For perspective, my last pocket knife was a Kershaw Sapphire with a plain blade, so this was a step off the beaten track. The handle is wide enough for a comfortable grip but slim enough for my pocket--the sandpaper-like insets snag my jeans but hopefully that won't turn out to be a bad thing. This is by no means a small pocket knife, the blade is large, but stable, and a good balance for the handle. If it wasn't as slim as it is I wouldn't even try to carry it.The speed safe was a little bit of a surprise, I thought it would be a lot less forceful than it is. To be honest, I wouldn't bring this out in public (the Sapphire was as exciting as a butter knife) because of the attention snapping it open is likely to attract. If anything, that's the only downside to it--it looks as useful as it is. Don't be surprised if you get a "is that even legal?" reaction</review_text>
I have had this racket for about two years. My racket has just recently broken though and it sucks. I would advise you that if you do end up getting this racket to not let anyone but yourself use it for it MAY break! :</review_text>
This is a really nice bench for the money.  Easy to put together.  The only drawback is the lat attachment is a little noisy.  Otherwise, a good investment in exercise equipment</review_text>
I looked everywhere for a good bench at a decent price. This has every thing that I was looking for, and the price was great. It is very sturdy and well made. Thanks sooooo much</review_text>
First, this style board is much nicer looking than the other.  It sits in my corner and doesn't draw much attention.  Second, it's very simple to use and helps condition balance.  It's fun too, why sit and watch TV when you can be on this?  Sounds goofy but it's good stuff.  Last, the only downfall is that the base has a sand-paper like finish to help it from slipping on the roller.  This is a good idea, but it wears down after several months.  However, you can fix it pretty quick with stick on sand-paper or skateboard grip tape.</review_text>
OK, so let me start by saying that I am a little older than middle age and I am not training for a marathon.  I bought this jogger for running in the 30-40 minute range, a few times a week.  I was a little concerned in that there is a whole series of joggers in the $300 and up category, but I thought I would try this model.  I have only used it a few times, but find it to be very functional and meets my needs precisely.  I have nothing to compare it too, but it does assemble easily and tracks smoothly.  I think the documentation could be a bit better, but that is a very small gripe.  The jogger arrived within a few days of my ordering it - even with Super Saver shipping.I saw some consumer report complaints of joggers that would not track straight, and I can definitely say that this one is just fine.  It pushes smoothly, and has adequate room for your feet when either running behind or alongside.I am sure that there are some qualitative differences with the really expensive ones; but I would definitely say that if you want a good jogger, and a good value, this may be the one you are looking for.  For a jogger who is out there several times per week, but maybe not training for a marathon, this seems to be an excellent choice</review_text>
I did a lot of reading about all the major jogging strollers. I do about 50 miles a week, and also own a BabyJogger, which I also like very much. This one was for our vacation home, so I didn't want to spend another $300+ for an item I would only use part-time. I also didn't want the size of the B/J, which is quite long and too big for our little beach condo. But I wasn't sure what to expect for a cheaper jogger. I have to say, this has been a wonderful item. It is just as light as the B/J -- which is a real help since we also have to carry it up and down steps -- and moves almost as easily. The built-in drop-down rain shield is a real help given Miami's frequent showers and fast-changing weather. The sun-bonnet is huge, very important with all the harsh sun down here. It is very** comfortable to run or walk with, and  maneuverable enough that we even use it as our regular out-and-about stroller. It assembled easily and folds up pretty well -- yes, you have to remove the wheels, which is a pain, but not a big one. The fully adjustable handlebar is great, esp. since my partner and I are about a half-foot different in height. About my only complaint is that they cheap-out and make you pay an extra $13 for a storage net underneath, and don't even really have one to fit this model -- this is a silly omission for any item aimed at serious or even semi-serious runners. But all in all we're very happy with it, the price is right, and it's competitive with the Baby Jogger. The B/J is definitely faster, but not much. I would definitely recommend this model if you want a high-quality jogger and budget is any consideration</review_text>
This is a great product for the price and it absolutley works on carpet, it holds your paws down with sufficient friction and you can do a pretty good practice - on or off the mat. Of course it is better ON the matt for added stickiness but off the mat, you have to think of knee support without the matt. It does get warm wearing them for a whole practice. Also, they do tear up - as in, the blue little bits and pieces of the glove start falling off. I do however recommend it, it's a great little yoga accessory and very handy for travel & hotel room asanas!!</review_text>
I gave the Yoga Paws as a gift.  They have since been used in an apartment setting with excellent results.  Fit was good.  Shipping time exceeded my expectations</review_text>
I love all of Cathe's DVD's, this is not for the beginner, this is definetly an advanced workout. Her cues are right on, and as always she is movtivating</review_text>
We have not used our red sports chairs as yet because we bought them after our football season.  Some people had these chairs at the Rose Bowl and they really looked comfortable and they were the right color so we asked where they got them and they said their daughter got them online. So we can't wait for football season to start again so we can use our chairs.</review_text>
If you purchase this wheel, you should get a yoga mat to roll the wheel, otherwise you can can seriously hurt yourself if you try to roll it like the bodybuilder on the box. You really feel it working on your abs and shoulders with the mat. I bought it because it was very inexpensive, portable and easy to store. This is an excellent piece of equipment that can be used alone and/or if you work out in a gym</review_text>
I find "On a Roll @ Home" extremely easy to follow, because the instructions are simple and step-by-step.  There are also great pictures to illustrate the movements.  I find that the roller exercises not only increase my core strength (the area around the center of your body - front & back) but also help keep me flexible and improve my balance.  I am a 57 year old female. I had breast cancer and lost some movement in my pectoral area. There was a particular exercise ("Snow Angels") in the book that increased my flexibility.  An added benefit is that I feel very relaxed and focused when I concentrate on doing the movements.</review_text>
He is always into air time...snowboarding or skateboarding.  He loves this toy</review_text>
i used this product last weekend, and thought it worked well.  steve and i were able to compare our jump time to each other--though i wish we didnt have to share the air pod.  meant loaning it to him after every run.  a lot of people on the mountain liked it and had never seen anything like it</review_text>
I tried out the AIR POD last weekend on my first trip to the mountain this season.  I never heard of Tech4O before, but they have a nice site with some other really cool watches and stuff on it.  I'm still not sure how it works, but it is so cool.  AIR POD can tell the exact second you leave the top of the kicker and measure your airtime until you land.  Me and a friend of mine had a little comp to see who was going bigger off the same kicker and the most air I was able to get was 3.45 seconds.  Even when we didn't totally stomp the landing or washed out a little bit, the AIR POD still recorded our air time perfectly.  The strap was a lot more comfortable than I thought it would be and the light made it easy to check my air even when it started to get dark.  The last couple of seasons all I did was hit the rails and boxes in the park, but those got old.  Getting an AIR POD really makes getting bombing the mountain for huge airs fun again.  I'm defintely gonna keep it my bag with the rest of the stuff I always bring to the mountain</review_text>
This bag is awesome everything fits, and I'm a girl so I stuffed the bag up!! My camping fit, and all my clothes, camping gear, towel, everything, i only wore a spare bag for my money and things i wanted to have handy and thats it... !! excellent bag!! I highly recomme</review_text>
I was very satisfied with this backpack.  I took it on a vacation and had no problems at all.  A great bag for the money!</review_text>
The backpack is great. By far the coolest you can get for a 17" notebook. On the down side, it doesn't exactly fit any 17". I had to adapt it to my brand new Dell, which is a little bigger than average.</review_text>
The bottle is durable, and a good size.  Its also easy to carry around, much easier than those big nalgene bottles.  Good for travel, at work, or at school.  Im pleased with the product.</review_text>
This Nalgene is a great size--not big and bulky like the 32 oz bottles.  The mouth is just as wide, though, preventing the "glug, glug, glug" effect of smaller mouths when full.  It fits in virtually every cup holder</review_text>
I started swimming about 6 months ago to get in shape. Pool chlorine really bothers my eyes; even a little exposure will cause hours of discomfort. I tried 10 or 12 different goggles in a variety of sizes and styles. For my face, the Hydrospex is the most effective. It keeps ANY water from reaching my eyes - all of the others leaked to some degree, regardless of price or configuration. My 10-year-old swam competitively this summer, and she also tried quite a few alternatives before settling on the Hydrospex Jr.These Speedo goggles have stood up to 5-7 swims per week for 5 months now with no signs of wear. The headband stays adjusted, the gaskets form a great seal around the eyes, and the anti-fog feature is a nice benefit. I've dropped them in the parking lot, and they ride around in my workout bag continuously, as I swim at different locations on different days, but they still look new. I've bought a 2nd set in case I ever manage to lose or break these - I don't want to be without them!Just a note - some of the other goggles that I tried were also Speedos, and others were also respected brands, but the Hydrospex are by far the best fit for my personal facial shape. Be aware when selecting goggles that each design will fit people differently. It doesn't make a particular brand or model "good" or "bad", it's just what works for an individual. Shop around and try different styles until you find what works for you . Once you find the right fit, you should experience no leakage or discomfort. For me, the Hydrospex are just the right ones</review_text>
I really like these goggles. They work well to keep water out of my eyes and the tinted colors helps with seeing underwater. I highly recommend them</review_text>
Great Price on a sharp tool we use to trim the root ball on Japanese maples</review_text>
I like the head cover quality and appearance. The only slight negative is that the covers fit a little more snuggly than I would like (need to work them over the head a bit) and my fairway woods are the old Haig Ultra's that are quite small. This is not bad though, and I will get use to it and they will probably loosen up</review_text>
This umbrella has an excellent cost/benefit ratio. It's big enough for the days of heavy rain and/or for two or three persons, the color is great because it looks diferent from most umbrellas, the material is good also.The only complain i have is that it is a little loose in the ends so it is kind of easy to have one of them out, anyway they are also easy to put on the rigth place.</review_text>
This does a far better job on milkshakes than the regular blade.  Was worth the price.</review_text>
Oster has made great products for Years, This special Blade makes Smooth and Creammy Milk Shakes, Just like I used to drink as a Kid.I use this blade on a 1950's Oster model 448 Bee Hive Blender.This is a great addition from Oster</review_text>
We bought this for my boys age 7 & 10 for Christmas and they absolutely love it! They have been playing street hockey with it and it is perfect for their age. We like it so much that my husband & I went out and bought us some hockey sticks to join them.</review_text>
The delivery was fast with this item.  I had found this item at other sites but was not able to purchase it as they were out of stock.  The set is good for younger just starting hobbyists.  I found the net slightly awkward to put together alone.  The only thing I saw wrong with this whole transaction was that the package came delivered to the front door and you could see exactly what the product was by the pictures on the box.  This was a Christmas present and thankfully I got to the door first.</review_text>
These darts were not to bad the barrel on them where a little big though</review_text>
I PURCHASED THIS KIT FOR MY SON IN FLORIDA. ITS GOT A GREAT CASE AND STORES EASILY IN A CLOSET.  THE CONTENTS ARE ALSO WHAT HE WOULD NEED IN CASE OF AN HURRICANE.  I ALSO ADDED A FEW OTHER THINGS WHICH FIT EASILY INTO THE CASE. OVERALL I THINK IT WAS A GOOD PRODUCT</review_text>
I bought the aqua fitness belt to wear while snorkeling.  Since I am not a strong swimmer, it helped me stay afloat so I could concentrate on seeing the beautiful fish and coral reef off the shores of Belize.  It worked beautifully and I am very pleased with my purchase. Delivery was prompt and I was able to track the progress of my purchase</review_text>
our kids have a blast with this- great way to entertain a bunch of kids</review_text>
Table is good quality and size for putting inside a tent room.  Chairs are a little small for full size adults, but will do the job.  Good quality materials and workmanship and price is good too</review_text>
My personal trainer recommended this one and I really love it. I'm at an age that flexibility is non-existent and trying to maintain range of motion is a high priority. Pilates stretch bands lost their elasticity -or worse yet, snapped and hit me. I've even maneged to break tubes. This seems more likely to last, and consistently allows for increasing range of motion</review_text>
Knife blade very functional.  Don't know yet how well the blade will hold an edge.  Carabiner seems well put-together.  One more small, straight-slot screw driver would have been nice.  Internal opening needs to be about 3/4" wider to form a better handle. I really like the finger contours.  A hole at the base would have also been nice to secure keys from sliding up and down the gate (maybe in place of the bottle opener).   Overall, I like it and carry it everyday as my key ring</review_text>
I really like this rear carrier. I have bought 3 of them. One for me and two for friends. We all love them</review_text>
The Jr Golf Clubs exceeded my expectations in quality.  They are excellent clubs at an excellent price.  They are top quality.  I received the clubs very timely and couldn't wait to give them to my son as a gift.  Definately a great bargain and I never had to leave the house</review_text>
I knew I would like the bike, as I've been using an identical one at the local gym.  Ordering and delivery was fast and painless.  Assembly was simple.  Then I was disappointed to find severe vibration at low speed, which I thought might be the same as that noted by a previous reviewer (flywheel problem).  The bike was useable, but clearly not right.I contacted Schwinn directly, who were helpful, but did not seem all that knowledgeable about the bike or its problems.  They immediately offered to set up a tech visit to fix it, but called back the next day to say that they have no techs in this area (New Mexico), and that the only solution was to return it to Amazon.  I said I'd see if I could diagnose the problem first, which, not surprisingly, they thought was just fine.After removing the chain guard, the problem was obvious.  The chain was so tight I'm surprised it hadn't snapped.  Poor quality control on the assembly line.  Adjustment of chain tension at the flywheel end is fairly easy, and cured the vibration.  Hopefully there will be no more problems.CONCLUSIONS:  These are great spin bikes, and seem well made, but quality control may be an issue.  One of two IC Elites at the local gym had a warped flywheel on delivery - a manufacturing rather than assembly fault presumably.  In contrast, ten older Schwinns have had few problems.  The lack of any service availability here makes me wonder how easy it will be to get warranty work done if needed.  I guess I should ask</review_text>
I initially purchased a Velocity spin bike because of its lower price (about $150 less), but after a few weeks of buyer's remorse, it was back to the bike shop to exchange it for the Schwinn IC Elite. This bike offers an amazingly smooth and stable ride, which is well worth the extra money.I also appreciate its extra features. I've only had to use the emergency brake twice, but both times I was happy to have it. Just check the specs of other indoor cycles, and you'll be amazed at how many do not offer a standard emergency breaking feature. When you're spinning a 25-40 pound fly wheel, you really need the ability to make sudden stops in the event of an emergency.Having an additional water holder is great, because I always drink at least 2 while riding, and I don't want to have to stop mid-ride to reach for another drink. Many indoor cycles offer only one (if any) and aren't built to accommodate add-on holders.I ride using the adjustable foot harnesses which are comfortable and sturdy. I haven't used toe clips with this model.It's a comfortable bike overall, but I do question the 4'11" "compatible user size." I'm 5'3" and could use an additional half inch forward adjustment. However, I've found that I can compensate by using the handlebar's center protrusion when riding in a neutral position. Shorter users should probably give the bike an in-store test run to make sure it won't cause neck, shoulder, arm or back strain.The specs also state that it's compatible for users up to 6'8". My husband is 6'8" and he is able to ride very comfortably without straining his back or knees.The saddle is okay on its own, but I prefer using a gel cushion cover for added comfort. The seat width is standard, so it was easy to find a suitable cover.After 3 years of use, my schwinn has held up perfectly, without needing to be serviced. It's a great product. Highly recommended</review_text>
I did my homework and investigated various brands and models of spinners in person.  I went with the schwinn ic elite because, at the time of purchase, it was be sold for less money than the model below it, the ic pro.  I had originally planned to purchase the ic pro but that made no sense when the better model was cheaper.  I wanted a gym quality spinner that i planned to ride regularly and would not need to ever replace.  I read many reviews on amazon that talked about the equipment being good starter equipment and if the buyer actually wound up using it, they'd upgrade later.  That's not my style.  If I'm buing it, I'm using it!  The ic pro and the ic elite are both built to last a lifetime.  I didn't order from schwinn because i would have incurred an additional charge for delivery and installation, mandatory, plus a hefty new york sales tax.  Had i ordered directly from schwinn, who send a nautilus representative with the bike to put it together, the trials and tribulations that followed would probably been avoided.  First, amazon sent the wrong bike.  They sent the ic pro instead of the ic elite.  I had to request a replacement and a pick-up of the incorrect bike.  I had to tip the delivery people to help me get the very heavy/sturdy bike back into the box for return shipping.  The correct bike came a week or two later.  The bike comes mostly assembled and I had no problem putting it together. It really just requires putting on the stability bars and pedals.  Unfortunately, when I got on the bike, which is supposed to be gym quality, it provided a terrible ride.  The wheel seemed to wobble, it was noisy and there was some sort of grinding going on which made the whole bike vibrate.  I requested a serviceman come out an fix it.  Customer service people were nice, but somehow the service order didn't make it through to the service department for a few weeks.  I finally got a serviceman out and he said that the wheel and it's assembly would have to be replaced.  The wheel gets assembled in china and this particular job was faulty.  He ordered a new wheel be shipped to me and another ten days went by until the serviceman could return to replace the wheel.  We opened the box of the replacement wheel and found that schwinn had sent the wrong wheel!  Again they sent the ic pro instead of the elite.  New wheel ordered, another couple of weeks to get service.  The wheel replacement did the trick and the bike rides like a dream.  I am now totally happy with my spinner.  Four stars instead of five because it took a couple of months to get happy with my purchase.  I purchased the it on April 5. Today is June 16, the red letter day that the bike finally works well.  For me the cost savings purchasing through Amazon was worth a couple of months of inconvenience.  I might have felt differently if it were winter when I'd rather stay home and ride than go out to the gym.</review_text>
My family has used this product for YEARS (50+  years) as a diaper rash for infants.  There is NOTHING that works better than this stuff!  I've slathered it on my daughter's bottom when the diaper rash had broken down the tissue of her bottom to the point it was practically bleeding and, within 48 hours, the rash was well-past the point of on the  mend.Obviously, because it's packaged for veterinary use, the company cannot comment on whether it can be used for humans; however, I've taken it in to my child's pediatrician and been given the go-ahead.  I've even had my 70 pound boxer eat an entire tube of it with no side-effects!  Yikes</review_text>
This is one of my favorites... perfect fit, nice details, great cargo and water capacity. 100% satisfied highly recomende</review_text>
Great stuff for long distance hiking needs.  Truly believe that it beats BodyGlide</review_text>
As a runner with heavy legs I always use a lube to prevent chafing.  I have used them all and this one works best by far.  If you read the ingredients you will find that it has an antifungal which helps keep away jock itch etc.  The product also washes off in the shower with soap and hot water.</review_text>
I had the worst trouble with blisters.  No amount of taping, lathering on stuff, etc. helped.  For me, this is the one.  I do ultra distances at a very slow pace (can anyone really go that slow).  This lasts me until my next sock change (I keep large tubes for the beginning of the race and small ones for my drop bags).  I also used to suffer from athletes foot, but since I slather this on my feet in massive quantities now all the time, no more athletes foot either (just a side benefit to the no more blisters).  Give it a try and you won't go back</review_text>
Tested before order. Very helpful for players with elbow problems. Great vibration dumpening.</review_text>
I received the product in a timely manner and the chair serves it's purpose. I can't wait to use it in Costa Rica~</review_text>
It appears that Schwinn read about the minor problems sited in the numerous reviews of the older model 213, fixed every single one of those problems and added a walk through design.I did a lot of research on-line as well as going around to every large retailer and professional dealer in Nashville, TN.  Based on my research and discussions I bought the Schwinn 231 sight unseen and have never been happier.  Granted, I've only had the bike for a month now but so far this bike compares quite well with bikes I tested that cost 2-5 times what the Schwinn 231 costs.It is completely stable, virtually silent, and more importantly, it's very comfortable.I'm a really big guy, 6'3" and overweight.  And this bike fits me and my wife.I just started working with an exercise Physiologist who has the top of the line expensive gear in his club (Cybex, LifeCycle, etc).  The Schwinn 231 is the recumbent bike he is now recommending to his clients for in-home use.  He even plans to add a few 231's to his exercise floor.If you're looking for the biggest bang for the buck in recumbent bikes, my research and experience so far tells me the Schwinn 231 doesn't have any competition at it's current price point of $550.PS: Cycle Sport and Fitness have the bike for $550 and free s&h</review_text>
The product itself was just what I wanted.  However, they were out of stock and did not deliver in time for Christmas.  When advised that the item was not yet available, I remarked that I would like free shipping if I could not get this item for Christmas.  I had no response one way or the other from the company.I would be hesitant to purchase again from this company</review_text>
I gave up trying to find a watch with both a compass and a thermometer, since none of the temperature watches seemed to work well (according to all the reviews).  I then looked at only watches with compasses, plus the usual set of timers and alarms and stuff.  The Enduro seemed to be the best combination of cost and value.My first day with it, I was driving in an unfamiliar city at night on a poorly marked road and the compass helped me determine I was going the right direction.  (Soon afterwards, I found a route sign.)I have since used it kayaking to orient our group, so that feature seems to work fine.The rest of the features are as easy to use as any watch I have had and I doubt I am using them to their full advantage.Also, it's easy to read and I think it's one of the more stylish of this type of watch.So... I feel like I got more than my money's worth here.Note that I have had the watch for only one month now, so time (sorry) will tell.  But, so far so good</review_text>
The included pump has no real value. You might enjoy playing with it in your bathtub. The ball is well constructed. If you need a pump, consider the "Yoga Exercise Ball Air Pump" by ATAFA</review_text>
Of the 12 batteries advertised and ordered as such. Vendor made a switch with out notitfying me. Otherwise ok</review_text>
The package came on time. It was packaged securely.  I was extremely satisfied with the whole process and have no complaints.</review_text>
I am very interested in frisbee and it makes the game so much more fun when the disk you are using works well and feels good to throw. These disks definitely work well and I like the feel and weight balance. They are not the best I have ever used but they are high on my list</review_text>
This is an excellent all around disc. The price i paid was great ($7), and it's been lasting great</review_text>
There's nothing more graceful than the flight of a brand new Discraft Ultra Star. These discs are really fantastic, no other Ultimate disc i've played with compares</review_text>
I've played with many different discs, and the discraft ultra-star is definetely the best. I could throw this one much farther and much more accurately than the Wham-O. It also seems to spin very fast without effort. It is easy to catch as well: the rim is wide and curls slightly. The material is tough enough to avoid getting too scratched, firm enough to avoid bending and warpage, and yet flimsy enough to not hurt your hand too much. The price is also good; most discs cost a few dollars more.Conclusively, if you're thinking which disc to buy, stop thinking. The discraft ultra-star is the only one I would use, whether I'm playing a serious game of ultimate, or a simple game of catch</review_text>
This is by far the best disc that i've ever thrown.  It has a nice rim size, not to big so you can throw a much easier forehand.  The size is right on the spot.  It also has a real nice underside that is perfect for a nice nail delay. The colors are also good, since there is a nice range, and the star in the middle looks sweet in the sunlight. Much better than any whammo or innova Ultimate disc.  Highly reccomended for anyone that wants to play a good game of disc</review_text>
This disc is certainly the best I have played with.  It's rim is lower than those made by Frisbee, which gives the disc a much nicer feel.  It flies well, and the material is also good: not super-soft or thin, so it doesn't warp easily, but soft enough that it won't hurt your hands when catching a fast throw.  I recommend it for all players, but especially those more experienced and Ultimate players</review_text>
Actually you can't judge this flashlite till you get your hands on one of them, even in day light it working, let alone in the dark, it just lights and lights.The batteries are quite expensive, but the quality is great. I love i</review_text>
At first, I was regreting that I ordered this skateboard because I heard ordering online wasn't the best thing to do. But, when I got it and tried it out, it was awesome and amazing. It's a nice skateboard - i'm just learning right now - but it's still great. All my other friends who can skateboard said that the board was pretty nice and really worth it if i got it. It's as good as the ones they get in the skateboard shops - and pretty nice considering the price. It's great! Get it! Great to use going across the UCLA campus and what no</review_text>
I ordered this skateboard for my niece for Christmas and I was very pleased with the product.  It was packaged well and appears to be a very well made and sturdy skateboard.  After Christmas, my niece told me that her friends who are "skaters" said that this was a very good board and that she was lucky to have it.</review_text>
I bought this item for a Christmas gift and after he opened it he was thrilled and it was hard to get him off of it to open the rest of his gifts.</review_text>
For the past couple of decades, the only real name in pocket flashlights was Maglite's MiniMag. Used by police and professionals alike, even honored with design awards, the MiniMag pretty much ran the show since it's introduction in 1984. Sure, the light output was just decent, and the "beam focus" feature was a gimmick no one really used, but for a well-engineered flashlight, it couldn't be beat. Until now.It's the classic David vs Goliath tale - the Fenix P1D-CE is small even on a small flashlight scale, keyring small, silly small; picture a cylinder roughly half the height of an aluminum soda can with the diameter of a nickel: that's the kind of small we're talking about here. It doesn't even look real; the size combined with the perfectly smooth and exquisitely faceted exterior gives the impression that this is perhaps a 1/2 scale mock up of an actual flashlight.The disbelief continues as you remove the Fenix from it's slightly-larger-than-a-cigarette-pack box. The P1D-CE without a battery weighs in at 27 grams, or the weight of 27 paper clips. More precisely, that's less mass than an iPod Nano. That's *less than one ounce*. But the feel is without question the cold and unyielding touch of heavy-gauge Type III aluminum, and the lens is not just actual glass, but perfectly flat and coated optics-grade glass. The size might not be serious, but the engineering certainly is.Yet all the dimensional absurdity is just the prelude to the light itself - this is where the real ridiculousness begins: The light is phosphor-white (similar to an HID car headlight in color), but plainly speaking, there is more of it than is physically possible from an object this size. It would make more sense if someone were standing behind you with a spotlight, or perhaps if the Fenix were nuclear-powered. The P1D-CE produces *more than twice the total light output of a 4 D cell full-size MagLite*. Point the Fenix at the ceiling of an unlit room and the area is lit with more ambient light than a 15 watt light bulb. License plates and street signs hundreds of feet away blaze to life in the night. Shine it in your eyes and you're legally blind for the next twenty seconds. That is of course, unless you turn it down...As if the Fenix engineers weren't content with an alien-technology light source, the P1D-CE also includes "modes" which give you a range of lighting options. You probably don't always want to walk around with the flashlight blazing full-tilt, so there are low, medium, and high settings. Twisting the head of the flashlight turns it on, and twisting it off and on again moves it into the next mode. There's also "strobe" mode, which flicks the light on and off quickly for a stroboscopic effect, and SOS, allowing you to send an emergency signal automatically without further touching the flashlight at all.And all of this is powered by - (drum roll) - one battery. No fumbling with giant family packs of box store batteries just to get some light, a single 123A lithium battery (sold overpriced at your local store in the "photo batteries" section, find them online at less than $2 each) powers everything. Battery life varies wildly between the modes - low mode will net you over 10 hours, while high can suck the cell dry in less than an hour. But the key here is "intelligent" circuitry; Unlike flashlights of old, where you could determine battery life by how bright the light was, Fenix employs a power regulator circuit - no more slowly fading light over time, leaving you to wonder if the flashlight is really as bright as it could be; the P1D-CE is just as bright as when the batteries were first installed for nearly all of the total runtime. That means that on the low setting, the ninth hour and beyond is just as bright as the first few minutes. And since it's a lithium battery, months of shelf time doesn't make a difference.So what is Fenix's secret? It all comes down to LED technology, and the Durham, North Carolina-made Cree LED in the P1D-CE is a fine example. Just as you can buy an LED light bulb for your house which uses less than a tenth of the energy of an incandescent bulb, the same concept works just as well with flashlights, and people are starting to notice - these super-small, super-efficient LED flashlights are all the rage nowadays; Police departments are actually doing away with the old full-size Maglite and replacing them with newer and better mini LED lights, of which the P1D-CE is by a large margin the brightest and most versatile. You're only $70 away from dumping your vintage incandescent antique and joining them. Five tiny but beaming stars for Fenix's remarkable introduction to 21st century lighting technology.(Addendum: What about the new LED MiniMag? Maglite's new LED series of MiniMags have less than half the light output of the  Fenix, and their "energy management" circuit doesn't quite live up to it's name, so the light gradually dims over time like most other flashlights. LED MiniMags are also larger and heavier than the incandescent originals, still use a plastic lens prone to scuffing, and still use Type II aluminum that collects nicks and scratches over time. Powered by regular AA cells [and with no brightness options], battery life is at most four hours until completely dead, plus there's no polarity protection; should you accidentally place the batteries in backwards, the light will be destroyed. The LED MiniMag is a definite improvement over the original, but not quite on par with the Fenix.</review_text>
I have bought from Amazon since 1998, and this is the first review I have done.  This light is amazing - it literally blinds you!  It is brighter than all of my other LED lights, and I have a few.  It is on my keychain and goes everywhere with me - I like the "bear claw", you can easily remove the light from your keychain for use.  Go ahead and buy this one - you will not be disappointed</review_text>
The light performs as advertised and noted in earlier reviews.  My sample comes from month #2 of production.  Early manufacturing issues seem to have been ironed out, because I can't find anything negative about this light.  It is as bright on low as some very expensive 1x123 lights I bought only a few years ago.  They served me well, but the Fenix is my new EDC.When incandescent flashlights first were invented I'm sure they were very expensive (adjusted to today's dollars).  Design and manufacturing improvements eventually gave us the well-made and reliable Maglites (and similar from other companies) that can be bought cheap on every street corner today.Just several years ago a well-made high output LED flashlight cost over $100.  The Fenix P1D-CE is a milestone along our path from that pricey beginning to the ultimate goal - a pocket size light that has multiple output levels, puts out tons of brilliant white light while never needing a new bulb, and is affordable.  The P1D-CE deserves milestone status because it is twice as bright and costs half as much, while still being well manufactured, compared to lights available right before its release.Will the performance and price of LED lights continue to improve?  You can bet on it.  Right now, though, the P1D-CE is the benchmark for this class of lights.  Buy it if you have the need and about $70 to spare.  Buy a rechargeable RCR123 setup to power it if the light will see frequent use.  If your service needs are more occasional then use standard 123 batteries.  Buy them for $1 - $1.50 each in bulk on the web instead of for $5 each locally</review_text>
The other reviews are on the mark - this is a great little light.  I have other Lithium powered lights and this one may not be as bright as some of them, but its so small I have no excuse not to always carry it.  I have only one bit of personal experience to add.  I've have found that if you turn the bezel just past where it goes off (maybe 1/8 turn past) you can operate the light one handed just like a tactical light - hold the front of the light inside a curled finger and press the back with your thumb for momentary operation.  This may be unique to my particular unit, so YMMV</review_text>
This is my favorite carry flashlight, it hardly takes up any room no matter what pocket you put it in. On the high setting it lights up a broad area that few lights of any size can match, and I have a large collection of Luxeon-based lights up to 5 watts and one K2. The K2-based light runs two CR123 batteries and tends to get hot, which the Fenix doesn't.Since it runs on one battery it's easy to tuck another battery away in case you really need a lot of light for a long time. The strobe is very impressive, looks like it's projecting 135+ watts. The SOS is a little slow, but it's usable.When you get good at twisting it for on/off you can one-hand it without a lot of fuss by setting it for a minor twist. If this is is a portent of the future, I can't wait to see what other Cree-based offerings come along from other manufacturers. Highly recommended</review_text>
I was expecting alot from this little light - maybe too much.  As the owner of several hundred dollar plus lights, I eagerly anticipated a light that promised to outshine them for only $70.  Needless to say, I was a little disappointed.  It doesn't seem any brighter than my HDS EDC U60 on high mode.  There's also a giant black donut that surrounds the hotspot.  I love all of my Fenix lights - they're a steal for what you pay for them, but honestly I was expecting a bit more than what I got.  On the plus side, it's extremely tiny and lightweight, the extra modes are neat although I generally only use the high setting,  it seems very well constructed, and it looks nice.  I like clickies so the twist head bugs me a bit, but I think the idea was to pack as much light into a small and affordable package possible.  At that it succeeds immensely.  If you don't own an ultra-bright CR123A flashlight yet, grab this one.  If you already have a nice light, you may be a little disappointed by the hype.</review_text>
You will be amazed at how bright this little flashlight is. I own several LED flashlights and this one beats them all hands down. This beast is powered by 1 CR123a battery and has 5 settings. primary, maximum, low, strobe, & sos strobe. Fenix claims a 50,000 hour life Cree LED.My only gripes with the flashlight are. It's rather expensive but worth every penny. The holster is fairly cheap (nylon & elastic). The unusual way to switch between settings. Twist the bezel on to turn on the primary light, twist it off and on again quickly to change to the next output and so on.These are all very minor and have no effect on my rating. It is a very top notch flashlight. There are rumors about loose threads on the bezel which could cause water to leak but mine did not have this problem.On a final note. If you do purchase this flashlight you should also invest in a Protected RCR123a Kit, it'll save you a fortune in battery cost. Also if you plan to hook it up to your keychain get the natural color that way scratches won't show up so easily.</review_text>
I've been hooked on flashlights for going on four years and this light may be the ultimate culmination of flashlight development driven by the good folks at the candlepower forums. I've spent up to $350 on flashlights that frankly don't do what this one does namely, offer an insane amount of brightness out of such a small package. with three brightness levels and two strobe levels and an easy user interface, making this little sucker work is a piece of cake. I believe that the low output setting will offer something like 21 hours of usable light, imagine some kind of disaster with the need to have a really long run time.I'm writing a few of my impressions because I had become burned out on flashlights until this one came along. Imagine being out in a dark forest and you  hear a sound, you flash your light 75 yards down the trail, you light up a bear and then you make a run for it. It's got two strobe (one fast, one slow) positions both useful in emergency situations where it's important to attract someone's attention, this littls sucker will do it all and it literally disappears into your pocket, or you can use the handy belt holder that it comes with, what a bargain.In case you were wondering, I don't work for and having nothing to do with fenix other than owning two of their lights</review_text>
I believe that the Zippo pocket handwarmer is made by the same Japanese company that makes the "Peacock"- The Hakkin company of Japan.The hole pattern on the top of the Zippo warmer has a hole patterm similar to the chimney on a Zippo lighter.  The Peacock has a hole pattern shaped like a Peacock, and is more elegant.The Zippo filler flask is ok, but the one supplied with the Peacock is superior.  It is a funnel with a valve that fits on the fill area of the unit.  When the funnel is rotated 90 degrees, the valve opens and fluid is inserted with no spillage.  Not so with the Zippo filler flask.The bag for the Peacock is a drawstring closure, where Zippo uses velcro.  The Zippo bag has a big Zippo label on it, where the Peacock does not and is more formal (I prefer the simpler style). The Zippo bag is black, while the Peacock bag is green (shows less pocket lint than black)The burners -- Both units share the same burner - which Hakkin offers individually.  However the Zippo burner is stamped "Zippo" as is the base of the unit with a huge "Zippo".The quality of the Peacock & Zippo is superior to that of the Jon-E.For the similar price of the units, get the Peacock.  The Zippo is a close second due to cosmetics and accessories.Also, any brand of lighter fuel can be used (you don't have to use zippo fuel)</review_text>
Works very well.  Long lasting.  Not as warm as I had hoped</review_text>
The pocket heater came quickly from Chelsea watch and worked great out of the package. It's made in Japan and has a quality look to it that leads me to believe it will work for a long time. It gives out enough heat to keep my hands warm and will last a full day or half a day, depending on how much fuel one puts in. lights easily and stays lit.I love it</review_text>
Compared to other "similar" warmers I have used in the past, this device shows typical Zippo quality and attention to detail. Easy to fill, using the included measuring device for half- or full-day warmth. Easy to light, with a color-change heat detector on the cap to verify ignition. And, just as advertised, produces abundant warmth for hours. No leaks, no problems, just heat. My wife loves it for her hands and even tucks it into the small of her back when she is extra chilly. Highly recommended</review_text>
After having purchased an inexpensive piston rower (which was not so bad,by the way) I tried in a fitness shop some magnetic rowers and I found them much better. So I shopped around and I tried the Tunturi R30, The Kettler Coach, the Fitness Quest Integrity 3000, the Water Rower,the Lifecore R900, the Life Span  and the Body Craft VR 100. I found that the Body Craft has the best value for money ratio. It is built very well, its ergonomics are handsome, the workout is fantastic, and the price is very acceptable.I particularly like the position of the footpedals and of the handle-bar,which I think is perfect.It also looks like it is very durable and it will last forever. I am very much satisfied, and would recommend it to everyone looking for a classy rower at a very honest price</review_text>
Bought this as a way to exercise through the Cleveland winters.  Easy assembly.  Have owned it for about two weeks.  Easy to work up a sweat.Two negatives: the fan is louder than I anticipated and there is no way to disengage it necessitating high volume of music/TV while rowing.  Polar heartrate monitor does not report accurately when exercising.  Heart rate OK at rest, but with movement it jumps all over.Overall - well worth the $699 - let's hope it lasts</review_text>
There aren't many exercise routines I can do without getting bored or hurt (bad knees) but rowing is reasonably low impact but great all-around. This machine is a great value given its variable levels of magnetic-assist resistance on top of the basic air resistance. It folds up nicely when you need the floor space, runs smooth, and isn't too noisy. Best of all, it got this lazy-bones back to exercising regularly and, after one month, I can already feel the difference</review_text>
Very easy to assemble and seems very robust.There are a good spread of exercise levels from gentle to tough but evenly graded in between. This machines action is very smooth,the pull action is progressive and there's no whiplash of the belt on return.The ergo's are perfect for me (5ft 7ins )but a much taller person would also fit easily.Can't fault the seat and it's great to have the cool air directed at you, so all in all I would say this machine is a good buy and great value</review_text>
Installation was a breeze.  Took less than 10 minutes from opening the box to installing the lock cylinders.  I finally used the ski rack yesterday and it worked great</review_text>
I found this product to be a good solution for what I needed it to do--Carry my families ski's up to the slopes. There's not a lot of noise from wind aerodynamic issues, even at high speeds. It holds the skis firmly in place, and has a very easy to use open button & close snap. Although it may not be made of metal, it's sturdy enough that nothing moves in it.This was by far a better option that several other systems I found, which offered too many parts & not a whole lot of value for the price they wanted. The factory installed ski rack which would have cost $300 was roughly the same size and was not as good a deal as this rack for my 2000 Dodge Durango.In response to the previous two reviews, I must note a few corrections.Firstly, the rack DOES hold two snowboards, I tested it with two of my friends snowboards on my last trip. In order for them to fit, one must face down and the other face up, one on top of the other. The individual who posted that it does not obviously didn't think to try stacking them.Second, In response to the fact that the bar could simply be twisted--you're joking right? It would attract attention if an individual attempted to twist off the bar. On top of that, in order for them to twist off the bar, they would have to break the board/skis in the rack in the process, and that would defeat the purpose, would it not?The only problem I had with this was the FM1 adapter which was required to install this carrier on my factory bars. The instructions for assembly didn't provide any information for any vehicles besides imports. (Domestic cars are out of luck since this is a Sweden based company!</review_text>
I recently just purchased this rack to haul at least 2 snowboards. In the description it states that 2 boards will fit. Well to my dismay, I found that only 1 board will fit. I am a big Thule fan and have bought a roof rack and accessories to haul my bikes plus kayak. To me, this carrier is not up to the traditional Thule quality. I feel that it could have been made better and larger to fit what the description calls for.</review_text>
We got rid of our standard Queen-sized bed to make room for our kid and have wanted a replacement since.  I finally pulled the trigger after a lot of research and I couldn't have been more pleasantly surprised.  Let's face it, buying an airbed is a bit of a craps shoot.  So YMMV, even with this one, but I'm going to lay out my impressions:The Good:*Sturdy construction.  Has held up despite being wedged against two chairs  and on the other side a steel filecabinet.  It hasn't leaked yet, though it did include a patch kit.*Fills fast with the included Air Pump.  I would say about 2 minutes.*Deflates fast using the pump to reverse air flow.  You can also pull the pump out.*Comfortable. The pillow top has a nice feel and it is fairly firm.*Comes with a nice carry bag and really isn't too heavyThe Bad:*The pump is a little loud.  Fill it up before you put the kids to sleep or dampen the sound with a pillow (don't cover the pump!).  For the volume, you would think it would fill faster too.*Could use a more firm fill setting.*Cord could be a little longerOkay, so the "bad" is pretty much picking for nits.  I'd say that this easily rivals the queen Aero I've used before at a friend's house.  For the price, I didn't expect anything nearly as rugged and Aero had better pay attention to the new competition.  Even at the lowest prices I've found for Aero, the Wenger is a better deal.  And I've seen mixed reviews on Aero quality.All airbeds have faults and I'm fully expecting this one to not last forever, but with the repair kit it should be well worth the cost until I have to replace it.  For the money, I was surprised at the quality of the construction.  Don't hesitate to buy it instead of the competition and have that spare bed for the holidays or emergencies.  I figured for sure it would spring a leak when it was rubbing against the steel file cabinets or the caster wheels on the chairs in my office (2 nights!).  It's nice to be surprised by quality in a good way now and then</review_text>
This parrot horn is humorous, well sculpted, and a good size. It never made it onto the bike as the macaw fell in love with it. The company was a pleasure to deal with. We received the horn promptly, in a sturdy package.</review_text>
It is so nice to find a product that fits exisiting products.  The 72QT marine cooler was hard to find this summer, but Amazon had it.  It replaced an old cooler seat on our boat perfectly</review_text>
only lasted 1 throw before there were teeth marks, only a couple more and it was destroyed. I recommend JAWZ for dogs who love frisbee and are tough on them</review_text>
The product was exactly what I thought it would be. Does good. Just wish there was better grade of models to choose from</review_text>
The stepper is tough to use at first but that's probably because I'm out of shape.  I've used it several times but not on a regular basis. The only probably I have is that it's hard to maintain your balance at times.  Otherwise, it's a great little exercise medium for the price and I like it because it's small enough to put away anywhere</review_text>
At first it was hard to get used to the stepper. I started using the post of my bed to keep my balance and it worked much better. I like this product. It is small and easy to store. It gives me a good workout when I am unable to make it to the gym.</review_text>
This is the first stepper I bought, and I don't know if they are all like this, but it's a little hard to step on, meaning I have to use all my might to get each step to sink down. But it's convenient and the price is grea</review_text>
I live in a tiny apartment, so this was perfect for my daily workout! It's so small and compact, I can use it everyday and then easily store it out of the way. And the workout? I can really feel the burn in my upper thighs. I usually work out 30 minutes a day while I'm listening to the radio. It's perfect for anyone who lives in a small apartment or dorm. And it's very well-built too. Like the other users have mentioned, it does tend to squeak a bit, but it wasn't enough to really annoy me, especially with the music playing.</review_text>
sometimes simple is the best. These adjustable weights are easy to increase or decrease.  The Velcro that attaches them is very nice, because as compared with another brand I tried, these are better because the velcro just hooks onto itself, there is no loop or anything the strap has to go through in order to secure it in place.  For a person recovering from surgery and limited bending right now, the less work to hook the weights in place the better.  A very good buy, and less expensive than some of the others out there</review_text>
These weights can be adjusted at 1/4 lb increments, and they don't scatter little metal granules like the Bell wrist weights that I used to use.  You might consider wearing a thick old sock under them at the wrist...[cut out the toe] to prevent chafing... since the terry cloth lining is good, but not at the harder edges</review_text>
I thought this was a great dagger, and the blade was fairly sturdy to boot. As a fan of Knight's Templar weapons I enjoyed this piece and was satisfied with my purchase</review_text>
My daughter bought this with a gift certificate she received. She absolutely loves it</review_text>
I got tired of wearing a wristwatch, but still need to know the time, so this is a good idea. I bought the product as soon as it came out, so I have used mine for over two years now. I was attracted by the altimeter, but have found that it is wildly unreliable: either that or my desk is going up and down berserkly. My desk is at an altitude of about 270 meters, but I get readings everywhere from 240 meters to 350 meters. I wrote to the company asking about it, and their reply boiled down to: "Live with it." Also, the thermometer is usually very slow to react to big temperature changes. It is very good for slight variations in places like a closed room, but if you go from indoors to outdoors, plan on waiting half an hour to learn the outdoor temperature. The `current weather' display is always good for a laugh.Overall, I enjoy this, but I hope their next model is better.PS: shortly after I wrote this review, the clip broke, and had to be replaced for twenty bucks. May 2006.</review_text>
This is an excellent club for grooving your swing.  After just a few practice sessions, I was completely confident with the driver.  You learn the importance of tempo, swing plane and proper mechanics.  The accompanying video is helpful in the appropriate use of the driver.  The swing tips video is also worthwhile.There are lower priced alternatives; however, at a fraction of the cost (Refiner Driver - which is what I used to replace the Medicus after I accidentally damaged it)</review_text>
This Yakima roof rack system works great and I highly recommend it. I bought one for my Mazda 3 and have use it, along with a Yakima roof rack for 2 cross country ski trips (I live a Florida, skiing is far away). The rack hasn't shifted an inch and was relatively easy to install. Yakima has a product guide on their site to make sure you order the right pieces for your model car</review_text>
Works as advertised. I've only used them for about a month so far, but they certainly make lifting much more comfortable. I expect them to last for at least a year or two; when they do "burn out", I'll most likely buy another pair.</review_text>
Very good glove i love the wrist wrap it has helped my weak wrist. i also feel my wrist getting a lot stronger. I on the other hand have been using these gloves for weight lifting and they are great i get an excellent grip of the bar. They are also pretty comfortable. would recommend! wouldnt expect anything less from HARBINGER</review_text>
Besides weightlifting, I used them as wrist supports during computer work and they worked quite well. Very durable</review_text>
To those who are new to step as I was, don't get frustrated!  The footwork may seem very fast and confusing at first.  Just keep doing it; the steps WILL come to you eventually.  At that point you will really begin to enjoy all that this series has to offer.  The longest of the three videos has a 55 minute running time.  I'm amazed at how quickly the time goes!  The other two run for 45 and 35 minutes.The Transfirmer series features CALM, polished instructors, accurate cueing, good music, correct counts, adequate warmups and cool downs, weights, aerobics, upper/lower body work, abs AND stretching in ONE pleasant session.  There is a thoroughness and consistancy that I have found to be missing from many other exercise videos.My ONLY complaint is the bulkiness of the Transfirmer.  There's not much time allotted on the dvd to move it from one position to the next. Because of its size and the rubber stabilizing treads, you must lift it to move it rather than drag it.  This could be helped by placing handholds or holes on the sides units to make them easier to lift. Once positioned, it's also critical to make sure that the two units are joined properly so that you don't go flying!  I'm getting quicker at this, but I still miss the first few reps sometimes.Please note that for maximum effectiveness you will also need to purchase a set of 3, 5, and 8 lb dumbells.  I prefer weights with longer necks as many exercises require you to place the weights on your shoulders.I've tried many of the most popular exercise videos.  This one is BY FAR the best.  The claims are true.   Done as directed, you will see and feel a noticeable difference in your muscle tone and definition  after the first ten sessions</review_text>
In my personal opinion these tapes are cued extremely fast. I had a hard time keeping up, even after several attempts. Grrr. Very frustrating for a beginner seeking inspiration. Very disappointed! Pricey item down the tubes.</review_text>
I finally caved in and bought the transfirmer system with 4 videos plus I bought jiggle free buns and arms to go with it. I have been doing this program for about three weeks and can say that I feel FIRMER indeed. I don't follow the meal plan that they suggest either and have almost lost one dress size and my clothes are fitting better.The Transfirmer system is basically a step system. If you have done step workouts in the past then you will have no difficulty becoming acclimated to the system. However, since this is a much higher step, you will experience more muscle burn (especially if adding weights). Interlocking the two "steps" keeps the Transfirmer from sliding around during lunges - like my old step did. As someone else mentioned, this is a very sturdy piece of equipment and I was impressed with the quality of it. You can use it for any step workout.The videos concentrate on getting the job done and are borderline boring at times. The instructors don't offer the perky motivational conversation or explanations on how muscles are being targeted like Kathy Smith and Denise Austin. This may be a plus though, because after repetitive use, that kind of chatty conversation can become annoying. The exercises are heavy on lunges and squats with and without weights. They also offer modifications to use until you can build up to your maximum level. These workouts were refreshing because they mix and match low-impact floorwork with step training and weight lifting. So you never get that jittery feeling after jumping up and down for 45 minutes like with other step workouts.One more plus is that these workouts do not take alot of space. I gave this sytem five stars because I think it is offers a great approach for longterm fitness and diet</review_text>
The FIRM Supercharged Sculpting workout is a highly stylized workout with electronica, artistically designed sets and a clean, sleek mood. This is a combination of traditional weight training with aerobics using the necessary TransFIRMer. Most of the exercises are recognizable as traditional exercises like plank or sit-ups and squats.The lunges seem easier to do with the TransFIRMer, although weights are used throughout most of the exercises to give them a little more edge. The workout is followed by a brief stretching segment, but if you want to totally relax, there is a "Bonus: 8-minute Stretch Workout."This set also includes two additional DVDs: The FIRM Ultimate Calorie Blaster and The FIRM Aerobic Body Shaping. If you have any issues with your knees, you may need to try various workouts to see which ones you can manage. I found the Ultimate Calorie Blaster DVD was hard on the knees."The TransFIRMer was designed with multiple uses in mind and has 5 different configurations to take each workout to the next level." ~ pg. 6The TransFIRMer can be positioned in five different ways to increase the possibilities:6" TransFIRMer - The green section can be used alone8" TransFIRMer - The blue section can be used alone14" TransFIRMer - The blue and green sections used togetherSide-by-Side TransFIRMer - The blue and green sections placed next to each otherIncline TransFIRMer - The green piece fits into the blue piece for a convenient and stable incline."You can adjust the intensity of the workout depending on how high you step." ~ pg. 7The workout booklet has some interesting rotation calendars so you can plan out 21 days. There is also a section on healthy eating tips, an eating plan, 21-day diet plan, list of 100-calorie snacks and list of 200-calorie snacks. A substitution list makes the diet easier to follow especially if you are eating out and want to still keep to the diet plan.For years I couldn't do the FIRM workouts because I kept forgetting to buy the equipment, but now with the step at home I can try out most of the new workouts and have fun working out. The 2-piece step is also easy to arrange and is very sturdy. The low-impact exercises work well with the step and the incline is used for push-ups, cardio, arms and ab exercises. If you are buying this step to also use with other workouts that use a step, they say that is not recommended.~The Rebecca Review</review_text>
I have been using the Transfirmer series for three weeks now and have to say that while it has the potential to be a great product for me, I have wasted my money.  I have been exercising regularly with personal trainers for four years and have excellent fitness, so I am not new to rigorous exercise.  I thought I could save my money and use these DVDs at home instead.  While the weight portions of the videos are great, the step and aerobic portions are difficult to follow.  What would make it easier to follow is if the instructors did more repetitions of the same move rather than constantly adding steps and switching back and forth between moves.  There is nothing in the DVDs to help you slowly and clearly learn the steps prior to beginning the work out.  Also, the camera angles do not do anything to help a beginner learn the moves. They claim the steps are easy to follow, yeah right</review_text>
I'm a lover of FIRM videos for a reason: They are the best out there. This series is no exception. The moves are good, and the music is great. The only reason I didn't give this five stars is because the new TransFIRMer is large and somewhat difficult to move into new positions. That said, it's by no means a reason to not buy the system. The new box allows for new moves that stretch and tone parts that the other boxes weren't able to get to. Overall, it's a good purchase</review_text>
I really like the setup that the Firm has developed. The steps are versatile and the workouts can be pretty tough. (but fun</review_text>
Purchased this for our 7-year-old for his birthday.  He can handle the size of it fairly well, with room to grow.  Hefty construction, can hold my 200lb husband.  Graphic is an applied decal - brightly colored and "cool" according to the 7 to 12-year-olds at the party.  Wheels and trucks appear durable, and have handled smooth and rough surfaces well.  Deck has agressive tape and concave surface, both making for secure footing while onboard.Overall, an excellent value for the money.  I'd buy it again</review_text>
This skateboard I bought for my 13 y/o son is awesome!  He says it's a really smooth ride and the look is really cool!  Also, the price couldn't be beat!  I strongly reccommend this purchase</review_text>
My son was very happy with this.  It is a perfect set-up for the beginning skater</review_text>
I would normally wear totes from abercrombie or hollister. When I saw the black crazy dots I thought it looked really cool! This is the best backpack I have ever found and I wish that I figured that out a long time ago. Bit you know what they say it is better late then never finding that out. Overall JanSport mad another great, durable, and cute backpace. I reccomend it for anyone that needs a new, stylish backpack</review_text>
i use this bag while attending classes in college and it is perfect for all my needs</review_text>
I always liked JanSport bags for their durability.  I bought one for my husband 5 years ago.  He uses it to go back and forth from work, to rock concerts and when we go rock climbing.</review_text>
I ordered this backpack as a temporary solution. I thought it was cheap ($20 item, around $10 shipping), but now I realize it isn't.Maybe I will start with the negative aspect of the product: Too simple, only one big and one small compartments, with the small one being the front pocket. In addition, The straps are small. I am big, but I see many larger people than me around and to be honest if you are aroun XL or XXL size it would be quite uneasy to put the backpack over a jacket as its straps are simply too short.The good part: it looks durable, does the business, and now I will keep it as a spare since I now have another one(Not JanSport:) but sill, the price somehow appears to be alittle too much for me. For the same amount I gave I could find a real nice Adidas or Nike (original ones:) back in my country</review_text>
This is the best. I have always used Jansport backpacks they last forever</review_text>
This is a great backpack it has plenty of space for all my stuff</review_text>
In these days and times backpacks, bookbags, etc have become so outlandish.  This is a classically styled all american backpack.  No bells, no whistles, just a good ole standbye bag! Hard to find now-a-days.</review_text>
I bought this pack for hiking. I find all JanSport products to be of good quality. I don't like lots of "bells & whistles" on a day pack and this one is pretty basic. It is a decent size to allow me to carry all my necessities and some extras but not so big to tempt me into over-packing.A larger pack would be preferable for a winter hike to carry bulkier items. This pack is fully functional and if it lives up to previous Jansport packs I've owned, then it will be around for some years to com.</review_text>
The backpack was very good, however, it was packed in a box that was wayyyy to big and i have to incurred additional charges since it was shipped out of the US to the Caribbean. I will really like it if you guys can send make your packages much smaller. ThanksRemo</review_text>
This is a nice looking, sturdy back pack for most elementary school children. The only drawback is, it's a bit small.I bought it for my middle school son. He loved it, but could not fit all of his books and school supplies in it. My fourth-grader, who is notorious for tearing up back-packs, uses it every day. It's a perfect fit for him. It is holding up quite well</review_text>
The product was a big success at the going away party where it presented.  Only problem was I am a Military member living overseas and had to send the itme to a stateside address and then have them forwarded it to me...lost time and a little $$.  Wish more products would be sent to APO's, it's the same cost compared to a package sent to the house next you in the states so there is no excuse...but the product was great...would buy again</review_text>
This is truly a revolutionary workout system.  It is fun, easy to set-up and use, and offers a full range of workout possibilities from low to high intensity.  Highly recommended</review_text>
This recent purchase was for a gift. I have had mine for about 2 years with almost daily use -- doing maintenance around my (rural) property -- yard work and equipment usage and maintenance. It is very reliable under hot, cold and wet conditions. I use the low beam (3 LED) most often. However, it does not take long for the light output of the 3 LED to get noticeably weaker using alkaline batteries.  The high output long range single LED seems to last longer even when the 3 LED light is diminished. I've switched to NiMH rechargeables which serves me better since I can charge the batteries often (and not have to put up with using the weaker light output until I had close to exhausted the alkalines).  As for maintenance of this headlamp, I occasionally wash and submerge the whole flashlight in a sink to clean the straps.  (I wish the straps were removable so I can just put them in the washer.)  Recently, one of the 3 LEDs started to blink (like a strobe light) and then died.  I sent it back to Princeton Tec and they sent me a new one immediately.  I am quite pleased with this flashlight.</review_text>
The scarf I received was absolutely what was ordered.  My husband, a great Liverpool fan, was thrilled!  Thank you</review_text>
Easy to assemble,quiet and smooth with an acceptable single gearing it seems to be a great relaxing bicycle</review_text>
I bought this bike to have something to ride but not too often. I changed out the handle bars and seat and I must say for the price, it's a great bike!The ssembly instructions were okay and the bike went together w/o incident. I would recommend this bike for someone not too serious about riding and doesn't want to spend too much. So enjoy and ride on![...</review_text>
the bike meets my expectations.  It is well built and I get a good workout on it while parked in my over the road tractor trailer.  It fits between the bunk and the gear shift just fine.   I use a folding chair tosit on.   It's like riding a tricycle as compared to a bicycle when comparing it to a standard sized stationary bicycle.  I like it a lot</review_text>
Okay, I am a geek I admit it. I saw this at the local Brookstone store and had to have it. I saw the box cover showing a guy using a computer with this under the table. Burning calories and using the computer? What could be better? I tried out their floor model with one of their desks there. It actually worked pretty well, I decided to take it home and try.Yes, I am able to use the computer and exercise at the same time. I use it in the morning before going to work. I can browse the web for about 30 minutes while I use the mini-bike. It really does work pretty well.The design is good on this thing. It will tell you how fast your going as well as how many calories it thinks you have burned. The screen is setup so you can easily look down and see it. Its actually quite heavy, which is good, you don't tend to push it around. Everything seems to be constructed well, except for the straps that hold your feet onto the pedals. They are made out a flexable plastic. The floor model at Brookstone was already broke. If you are careful I am sure they are fine. I am sure someone tried to jam a pair of workboots or such into the floor model and destroyed it in the process</review_text>
This is the best bowl for camping and hiking.  I don't like eating out of aluminum, but this is just as light, and titanium is too expensive.  This is just the right size, and it nests inside the Alpine cookset.  It also doubles as a small pot -- if you're heating something for yourself -- and works with the MSR handle.  I highly recommend</review_text>
the item arrived on time in perfect condition, it was exactly as they said it would be. i am pleased to say that i will definitely buy from this vendor again. thank you for the excellent service.</review_text>
Purchased the tent as an upgrade for more space and comfort. Haven't been camping yet but did set it up to make sure it was all there. It was complete and also as exactly as described with plenty of space</review_text>
It has a middle volume but can contain many things. It is very suitable for a short-time outdoor use.Although it just has two pockets, a primary one and a mini one on the top, it's enough. It's very fast, I believe it can never broken with a regullar weight</review_text>
Took this brand new pack on a 3 night,4 day trip through the Sierras.  I had my sleeping bag and bed roll straped to the bottom and had a tent wedged between the front panel and the pack itself.  This pack was big enough to carry all the gear I needed for 4 days.  The trails had major climbs up and down trails carved into granite.  My pack weight was about 40lbs. The pack held together great.   The extra lashing points on the front panel are handy when used with carabiners for small items such as water shoes, flashlight, sierra cup. My only real gripe is with the two side mesh pockets.  They are rendered useless because the bottom adjustment/cinch straps are on the outside of the mesh pockets and the only thing you can get in there is a flat map.  What I ended up doing was cutting two slits in each pocket and passed the the adjustment straps through the slits on the inside of the pockets.  That gave me the use of the pockets back.  In addition, the mesh pockets have little to no elasticity.  With a full pack, it was still tough getting an item such as Sierra cup in the mesh pockets and impossible to get a 32oz water bottle in there.  Anyway, for the money this pack is a good deal.  I thought for sure this pack would've been in shreds after the trip.  Well, after inspecting it after the trip, no rips, no bad seams, nothing torn or broken.</review_text>
Similar to the other reviewer, my seams ripped the first time i used it.  I don't like top loading as well, but it seems pretty common.  Would avoid and spend an extra $20 and get something else.It does fit into carry on regulations, however.</review_text>
This machine is more of a strider than an elliptical.  Its advantage over Tony Little's machine is the smaller footprint.  Nonetheless, it beats sitting in front of the television.  No variable resistance is available.  Heart rate is measured on the grips.  Exercise cannot be performed without holding onto grips.  The readout gives calories, cadence and speed.The machine is very quiet and sturdy if you fit the weight limit (200 lbs or less).  I would not go higher as this may wobble.  It's big advantage is that it folds easily and fits under the bed to save space, unless you need a clothes rack.Not exactly for the advanced athelete but for a beginner or intermediate fitness fan.  This will more than fit the bill.PROS:PriceQuietStorableCONS:Lack of resistanceNot a true 'elliptical motion'Not for the advanced fitness afficianado or triathelet</review_text>
We have the original (without heart rate monitor) in our San Francisco apartment and love it.  Easy to set and convenient to put away when not using it.  A good aerobic work out without making a lot noise (no complaints from downstairs and no need to turn the TV way up).  The include mat protects the carpeting and the wheels make it easy to move out of the way when done.We have this new one in our house in CT.  Very solid and quiet to use just like the original.  The heart rate monitor is a nice upgrade. Highly recommend this.   You can work out anytime (no excuses) and it takes up almost no room foled up.  Well built and seems like it will last a long time</review_text>
I've had by strider for about 3 weeks now and am very impressed. The assembly was not too tough and the instructions were very easy to follow. Total assembly time (while watching the World Cup) was about 20 minutes.The machine itself is sturdy enough considering it folds up. I am a 195 lb. 6 ft. guy and it works just fine for me. It is very well designed so there are very few moving parts that could possibly break. It is very quiet and the display is refreshing in its simplicity. It tells you the time you have have been working out, the number of strides, your heart rate and an approximation of calories burnt. That's it.For those who complain that it does not give an intense enough enough workout, you are looking at the wrong machine. This is a strider not an elliptical devise meant for triathletes. If you want a killer workout, you will need a $900+ elliptical or join the local gym.All I wanted was a machine I could pull out of the closet of my office, and get in a 30 minute workout before heading home at the end of the day. This suits the bill just fine</review_text>
Pros:1.  This product is awesome if you don't have a lot of space2.  Solid steel frame3.  Very inexpensive (compared to other machines)4.  Reliable machine for starters5.  Easy to put togetherCon:1.  No resistanceOverall, I'm pretty impressed with this machine. When the weather is horrible outside or when you don't want to head out to the gym---this is perfect to have at home.  I get a pretty decent workout for what it's worth.</review_text>
I recommend this stroller to anyone!  I have 2 boys (5-16mo) Total I have bought 5 strollers and this one works the best. my husband loves the height adjustable handle, he is 6 ft 2, and the ease of folding it. The stroller make turns like a sports car and goes over any surface with ease. I had no trouble at the mall even with narrow asiles. I wish I would have found a stroller like this 5 yrs ago!!!! I LOVE IT</review_text>
I really like this stroller.  It's just what we wanted and a great value!  It was no trouble to put together.  The only problems I had were trying to air up the tires and the straps that hold my son in could be padded to be more comfortable.  I really love the adjustable handle on this stroller.  It rides like a dream.  I like the cup holder on the tray for my son, but my cup holder is too shallow to keep my water bottle upright.  I recommend this stroller</review_text>
This jogger is awesome!!  I looked for a very long time and picked this one off of Amazon.  I love it.  The swivel wheel is great and has the option to make it stationary.  I love the extra pad on the seat.  My daughter can fall asleep easily in it and the ride is very smooth.  I would encourage anyone to buy this.  The handle is great, adjusts to any level that you need.  The storage is big and I love the baby tray.  My daughter loves to nibble while we walk.  I love the colors too.  This is just a great stroller.  The only thing is that it doesn't fold as flat as I would like, but that goes with the teritory of joggers</review_text>
As a competitive swimmer who goes through caps very quickly, this is more than I'd usually spend on a cap.  However, I bought the pink/purple cap and I love it! It's nice and stretchy and still very sturdy, and I like how I can change the color. The only thing I could complain about is that the pink side faded some the first time I used it</review_text>
I purchased this as a gift.  Several people warned me about ordering this product.  I am glad I did not listen.  My husband absolutely loves this item!!!!  He is on a mission to raise his chest back to where it use to sit when we got married.  He has used it since Christmas and I am starting to see the difference.  I don't know about the previous brands put out as AB LOUNGE but this product is GREAT!!!!!!!</review_text>
I am a 5.0 ranked player. I was participating in a tournament yesterday, and my head raqcuet was being restrung. So i Go over to my club and get the Babolat Pure Drive Andy Roddick racquet. And what a nice surprise. Serves, at least 20-30 miles faster. Sweet spot is HUGE!! Volleys were nice. Over heads, awesome. The only issue i had with it was the weight, which i didn't feel while playing, but now i have a sore arm. Ill get used to it after i use it more.If your a big server and a big baseline player, then  this is for you. Volley's are alright, no problems. But if your big on the net game, go for the flexpoint</review_text>
The Babolat pure drive Roddick plus was purchased recently by me on advice of my teaching pro. I am a former Division III college player who now plays doubles only and found that this racquet does not have the touch of my previous Prince racquet. The sweet spot is very small and it it not a good volley racquet. If you are a high level USTA 5.0 player who hits the sweet spot consistently then this racquet may be for you provided you are a singles baseline player. If you are a serve volley player skip this racquet</review_text>
This is the best training option from Polar. You find here 90% of what do you need to run or ride looking for fitness improvement or serious training. The IR interface is nice. Once the watch itself is a little bit bulk is not a good option if you want it to daily use wearing shirts for example</review_text>
I have had the S625X for almost 2 years and it has been fantastic.      I have tried several of the GPS based solutions and they are *much* less accurate because they loose signal and they take time to start. The Polar software is also very stable and useful</review_text>
I've been using this product for half a year now and am most happy with it. Heart monitor function works flawlessly, watch is comfortable to wear with clear display. It also includes a bunch of useful features such as the different fitness tests and the link with PC, where you can download training information and upload exercise sets.What I am not so happy about is the accuracy of the foot pod. Even though it has been callibrated carefully, it deviates by 5% from actual distance run. But I would nevertheless recommend this product over some the GPS based sets that some of my co-runners have, as these seem to be even much less reliable</review_text>
Have owned this for 2 years - and would simply not live without it. Compare with previous HRMs this is both simpler to use, in particular since all settings can be managed from the PC via the interface - and a lot more fun.Please notice: S625X is really the jack of all trades - as it can be used for both running, biking as well as other sports (swimming for example). The distance measurement is fairly accrurate - and certainly useful when pacing yoursel</review_text>
You do not need anything else. If you are a frequent runner or want to train correctly for your next race, this is the one. The only thing: it is a litle complicated, you have to spend some time reading the owner's manual. It has so many functions. Don't get me wrong. Easy to use once you know how to do it</review_text>
bought this knife for a friend. it is small and sharp. but mainly bought it for the looks, very bright and colorful. though i think this would ware away pretty fast if was put to much use.</review_text>
I'm mostly a kitchen knife collector but was so impressed by Kershaw/Shun Ken Onion that I decided to try a style of knife (sport) that is his usual forte. I'm just as impressed with the design of this knife as I was with the Shun/Onion knife. It's compact, it's attractive, and sharp enough to shave an arm with. I have the rainbow chive and I am still amazed that as much as I've used it,  the surface and coloring is still intact and gorgeous. I'm now a believer in Speed Safe, and have my second Ken Onion (leek) on order. 50 dollars for a small pocket knife? (I hear people complaining)  Absolutely, it's well worth the price, but anybody who knows knives knows that the truly good ones are never inexpensive and last a lifetime. You get what you pay for, and this one is well worth it</review_text>
My first Kershaw knife.  But not my last.  In fact, my second Kershaw has already been ordered. Blown away by the quality of this product.  Extremely smooth operation.  Outstanding fit and finish.  Sharpest knife, right out of the box, I have ever purchased.  SWEET</review_text>
I like this knife very much; it's size, shape, fit in the hand, and pocket clip are all just what I wanted. It has a nice edge and the Speed Safe assisted opening feature is fantastic. My only complaint is that the safety is placed in such a way that makes one-handed opening difficult with the safety engaged. I want the safety engaged because the assisted opening is so easy to activate and I don't want the knife springing open in my pocket. This is only a minor quibble, though. I do enjoy the knife very much; it is a good size to wear with jeans for light duty day-to-day use, which is what most people need a pocket knife for anyway. I use a different, larger knife for heavier duty use</review_text>
It took me a long time to accept the notion of paying more than 10 bucks for a knife.  This is a great deal, though.  Very, very smooth opening and closing action, keeps an edge very well, and is shipped to you super sharp already.  What I really like is the ability to keep it on you almost all the time since it is very small and light.  You have to be careful opening and closing it the first few times though (read: don't buy this for your Cub Scout).  Overall, definitely the best deal I've seen in this price range</review_text>
This knife is wonderful! I'm one of the last people to get something that looks this "girly," but there was something about it that appealed to me. It looks cute and innocent, with the pinkish rainbow sheen (mine has a lot more green and blue than the picture), but it's wicked sharp. Since it is spring-assist, it opens lightning quick and can be deployed instantly for opening boxes or what-have-you. I like carrying mine with the pocket clip, but it comes with a safety lock so you can carry it in your pocket without fear of having it accidentally open. Very essential for the times when I'm wearing dress pants and can't have a knife showing.It is very small though. It is perfect for kids or someone like me who has very small hands. Though I do have problems opening the knife with the thumb stud. It's just small enough that my thumb will slide to intercept the edge of the blade. Fortunately, it has index-opening and with one flick of my index finger, I can open it.I carry larger knives in my jeans pockets on a daily basis, but if you need something discreet and stylish, you can't go wrong with the Ken Onion Rainbow Chive. It certainly looks inconspicuous, but it's incredibly useful for many applications</review_text>
Even though it's a relatively inexpensive pocket-knife, I poured over reviews, compared the more trendy Benchmade, Spyderco, Kershaw knives, and went over every option on the Swiss-Army.  Why not the more expensive knives?  Because I wanted a compact knife with more than one blade.  I also wanted a more options than they had to offer.  Yes, I'd be a lot cooler carrying the lastest Spyderco or Benchmade - but I'm about practicality.  I was a little concerned about how well it would hold an edge.  The more expensive knives have a stronger, denser, carbon-based steel, but it comes at a cost.  They're a little more prone to rust.  I read up on the Victorinox, and although it might be a slightly softer metal, it is virtually impervious to rust.  It being a compact folding knife with multiple blades that I plan on using outdoors quite a bit, this was a concern. So far, I've used it quite a bit and it remains super-sharp as the day it arrived and of course, absolutely no rust, stains, or discoloration.I chose the harvester over other Swiss Army Knives for the following reasons.  I wanted the silver metal exterior with the texture, not the slick red plastic that tends to scratch. The silver also makes me feel like it is more durable and looks much more expensive.  The small pruning blade - I use this one most often.  The hook shaped point of this blade makes opening anything very simple.  The saw - wow. The teeth are extremely sharp and arranged in such a way that they rip thru wood.  I tested it on a scrap piece of 1/2" plywood and even though you can only make small strokes, it wouldn't take long to saw thru a decent size limb.The awl is perfect scratching a starter hole for nails and drill bits.  The overall size of the knife is not too small and not too large. You barely notice it in your pocket.  The overall build quality is excellent.  You feel like you're getting more than your money's worth.The only feature I sort of miss is the lanyard attachment. It's available in other knives, but it's a tradeoff in size and options that were important to me.That's my review. I use the heck out of the thing and am extremely happy with it.  You will be too</review_text>
Bought this knife so I'd have a good quality basic knife to carry around while I'm camping.  I didn't need some Rambo-style knife for that, so the combination of the features, quality and price of this knife really fit the bill.  Unlike many other small knives, this one has a very substantial, solid feel to it.  Very happy with this purchase</review_text>
I have several of the swiss army knives, including the 4.5 inch Trekker, and a Fieldmaster.  Both those knives are great but too hefty to be in your pocket all day.However, this knife is what I was looking for as a daily knife to carry around with me.  It feels extremely solid, even more so than the Trekker.  The blade is sturdy, and the quality of the construction down the spine of the knife is seamless.  It has significant heft for a 3.5 inch knife and it would take a lot of torque to bend the blade even a little.  The knife looks great.  I much prefer the color and grip material over the black of the Trekker or the classic Red.  This will be my first choice for a knife to carry on me while hiking.To sum up, if you are looking for your first Swiss Army knife or one to carry with you hiking or day to day, I recommend this one over all others.  The only thing it is missing is a Phillips head screwdriver, but beyond that you would do well purchasing this knife</review_text>
Wiffle Ball is the best in the worldI play it everydayIm on a real wiffle ball tea</review_text>
I did not purchase these from the above seller but I did come across a pair at the local salvation army.  It looked like they had been used to wipe away tears but had held up pretty good.  They were really yellow though, I thought they would be more gold colored</review_text>
I was hoping for more of an around the wrist type Lanyard but this is around the neck and the clasp was not to my use. I needed it for the use of carrying around USB Flash Memory, but the clasps where to large to fit into the holes made for smaller Clasps. I would say these are still nice for the gym teachers and ref's out there that need them for the whistles</review_text>
This is the perfect mat for my Power and Hot yoga classes.  It's sturdy with the right amount of thickness, especially on your knees.  It lays flat without the edges rolling up.  I'm 5'7" and appreciate the extra length.  I've been practicing Yoga for a year and have purchased 4 mats during this time.  This one is my absolute favorite.  I won't go back to the others</review_text>
I couldn't wait to get this "upscale" yoga mat.  At first glance it looks like it is great quality and offers tons of stability.  The problem is it is way too slippery!  I can't hold a downward facing dog without having to adjust all the time and forget about holding a lunge!  I finally just threw the mat to the side and finished my yoga on the carpet.</review_text>
I'm only 5 ft 9 inches but I always seem to fall off the edges of a mat during classes.  This mat really keeps my attention on the class instead of repositioning so much.  The extra thickness is great - I see other people doubling their mats to get the extra cushiness</review_text>
I have had my mat for two months now and I am totally in love! I get sweeaty palms during practice and down dogs have always been tricky to stay put. As of yet I have not budged one centimeter during any posture. Amazing!The mat is very thick and heavy. A bonus for us with stonger vinyasa and ashtanga style practices. It feels very stable with enough give without being mushy.I love this mat so much I am going to buy one for my husband. We both tend to dig holes in our mats from "jump-backs." No nicks or holes yet.A friend of mine has had hers for a year and still loves hers too. I highly recommend this mat to any serious yogi or yogini</review_text>
The mat is awesome! It provides great support better than the other yoga mats that I have used. It's thicker for better support unlike the thinner mats</review_text>
Living in the Puget Sound begs for time spent on the water. However, being a frugal sort of family, we're not likely to ever purchase a "real boat". We found a good price on these fun little items and have been enjoying the water all summer. How do they size up... they float well (grin), they paddle OK, the blow up quickly with a hand pump, they pack nicely in our car (two of them) and they store nicely on a shelf in the garage.  That is just what we were looking for. We take our two girls with us when we go and the eldest (seven now) can paddle the kayak by herself (with one of us in the boat of course)if we let her. You won't find this to be a replacement for a real kayak, don't even think that way or you'll be dissatisfied. But think of this as an economical way to get more time on the water and you'll be thrilled!  OH... and prepare to get a little wet, there's no drain and you're sitting in the BOTTOM of it.  Does restrict it to the warmer days.  AND, the clips to store the paddles aren't very helpful and get in the way while you paddle. Design issue, you know</review_text>
Overall, I think this is a good product that does just what it promises...helps you to easily spool line onto your fishing reels under the appropriate tension. This will keep your line tight on the reel, maximizing the amount of line it can hold and preventing line from digging into the spool under the load of a fish. I would point out that the instructions attached to the bottom of the unit are lacking when it comes to spinning reels and do not mention or illustrate that you can (and should) rotate the spool holder bracket 90 degrees so that your spool is facing sideways to your reel. You also should flip the spool of line on the bracket if it looks like the line is coming off twisted instead of loading smoothly. Most good fishing lines come with instructions that explain this process that is specific to spinning reels.The battery-powered line stripper has worked fine for me on heavier trolling line (30-50lb.), but I haven't used it on thinner lines yet. The instructions and product descriptions do not mention it, but on my model, the line stripper also has a revolving sharpening stone protruding from the end for honing hooks--a nice added bonus! This exact stripper is sold separately on Amazon.com under the name "Berkley Pocket Line Stripper/Hook Honer"--look it up for a closeup photo and more details.The package I received came with two spare orange rubber wheels for the line stripper, but it also came with two black rubber grommets on the spooling bracket that are not depicted or used anywhere in the instructions, illustrations, or on this unit...and they have to be removed to insert the bracket into the base. Not sure what's up with that. Lastly, everything breaks down and stores together so it can be hung on a wall until needed. Set up takes only seconds</review_text>
I just bought an acrylic sphere and this dvd and i was blown awayat how easy it is to learn how to do things that would literally seem impossible. I find it kind of like a mix of magic, juggling, and dancing all thrown into one! I would highly sugjest buying this, it is entertaining to watch and even more fun to learn</review_text>
Fast paced video is fun to learn with fun to watch, I went from knowing a couple of tricks to performing 8 -10 in a few weeks with this video. You will find yourself doing things you didn't think possible very quickly with this one. The performances are fun and inspiring. There is a wide varietyof skill levels displayed, so whatever level you're at- you can find something for you on this video.</review_text>
This is a good item for limited exercise.  Easy to use.Kinda' like minimalist Yoga!  Like all exercise equipment if you don't use it you lose it!</review_text>
I was a little surprised at the warning when I first read the instructions, but once you fill the MEGA ball with Ice you really won't want to toss, kick or throw this thing anyway.  It's 9lbs when filled.  Plus the plastic is hard and I imagine would crack of you drop it on another hard surface, or worse it would crack bones in your foot if it landed on it.  Even so it was great fun passing and shaking the ball.  We used the Strawberry Rival ice cream mix packet along with a mixture of heavy cream, half and half and milk. YUMMY. Took 30 minutes total to freeze.  I would recommend the smaller ball for smaller children to help with, even though that is 7lbs filled - still a bit heavy.</review_text>
I got this ice cream ball as a gift.  It has been a great success.  Fun to use, really works.</review_text>
I bought this for my boyfriend for Christmas, and we have been making ice cream ever since!  It's great for him and his roommates and when they have friends visiting.  The ball works very well and its really easy to use and clean.  I highly recommend this to anyone who enjoys ice cream or having fun</review_text>
Worked great for the kids. The only problem we had was that is wasnt enough. All three of my kids fought over the ice cream. Of course we made more but it just wasnt fast enough. My advice is to buy big soft cookies so they can make ice cream sandwiches and then they wont fight over wanting a BIG bowl full. Enjoy. We really do like it</review_text>
This is a nice little icecream maker. Simple, efficient. Just one thing. The recipe that comes with this is lame. It's worth it to look into a better recipe. At the very least use real cream</review_text>
My teenage kids made the best ice cream and they enjoyed the process. I enjoyed watching them as they rolled it back and forth, telling jokes and playing word games. Also, it was a good deal for me because they did all the "work" and I got to share the ice cream! I was afraid that the ball would leak or be messy, but it really wasn't a problem. The Play & Freeze Ice Cream Ball is fun and produces delicious ice cream. Great gift choice</review_text>
These grips were ordered for my wife and she likes them very much. You may have to work them a little to get them on.</review_text>
I am totally pleased with this purchase.My tennis game has dramatically improved because of this product.Having the tennis balls at arms length away while I practice my serve has vastly excellerated my progress.  I can now play a respectable match with those who have been playing years longer than I have</review_text>
excelente producto, aunque si hay un poco de olas el agua entra rapidamente, debido a que la punta no es muy alta, pero es perfecto para lagos tranquilos</review_text>
If you are looking for a sturdy, easy to assemble, rack that will hold 6-8 pairs of dummbells, this is a good one to buy.  I have a small home gym and needed just this size rack.  In 30 minutes I had this rack put together and it is very solid.  For the price you can't beat it.  I am a personal trainer and I have seen a lot of equipment.  This is a great buy, especially compared to some of the flimsy racks that are marketed for home use</review_text>
Great Dumbell Rack. I was suprised at the quality for the price...Wal</review_text>
Made very well for the price.  The three racks are ~32" in length. Holds about 9 sets of dumbbell max. Easy to assemble and easy to access weights due to the slight angle.  Could not ask for more.  I chose this one after many searches; good product</review_text>
For the price, which was a great deal less than any other same capacity rack, the Apex dumbell rack is hard to beat. The tiers are recessed which allows for easier access, yet the rack is built so that it does not take up any more space than a rack with vertical tiers. The rack seems to hold up well, and it will easily hold up to 7 pairs of dumbells, Recommended</review_text>
The rack is easy to assemble, it looks "gym" quality and is reasonable priced.  It's perfect for a home gym set-up.  I am extemely pleased with the quality and ease of assembly</review_text>
I bought this stove primarily to use for emergencies or when I experience a power outage but I like that I can also use it for camping (note, it is not a backpacking stove, it's too bulky and propane is too heavy for that). I was a bit surprised that the base is a lot larger than it looks in the online picture. This stove can accommodate 12" and even 14" pots and pans. While this may seem like a positive, for me, I wish it was slightly smaller. At least it can be stored in a cupboard vertically.I also wish the stove came with a carrying pouch or case, but it does not.The stove performs and functions perfectly well and seems sturdy and well built so all in all for the price, I'm happy with it despite the few negatives I've mentioned. Small propane tanks are cheap and readily available for about $1.50-$2.00 which is a real plus</review_text>
Pefect for the emergency power outages. Compact, stores in very little space; and provides enough heat to boil water quickly, or to heat up a can of soup</review_text>
Besides all the phun of 4-square and dodgeball that can be had, these balls also smell REALLY good....I'm not kidding</review_text>
we have had this since my son was in his crib and he loves it.  we have tried others like the aquarium and the rainforest versions but neither have the movie that projects on the ceiling like this one.  he is now 20 months old and still loves it.  it really soothes him to sleep and if he wakes up in the middle of the night, he just pushes the button to turn on the birdies.  i don't know why they don't make more of these soothers with the projector.  the others are not nearly as good because they lack it</review_text>
The people selling this $30.00 item for $119.00 - 130.00 are "disgusting".  I want to throw up on these people.  Please do not buy from these people.  Go somewhere else, leave amazon if you have to. Boston_Bookworm and Hotwheelskingdom-- Boo! Boo!  Gross exploitation</review_text>
My daughter has loved this since she was 5 months old. Even now at 15 months she must have it playing when she goes down for naps or the night. In the morning she is able to entertain herself with the music and the fluttering birds for 30-40 minutes. This is a GREAT product and will be buying another for the little one we are expecting</review_text>
We bought this when our daughter was 3 months old and she STILL loves it over a year later!  She uses it so much we've almost worn it out! At first I thought the mechanics were kind of loud, but I think that either goes away with a little use or we've just gotten used to it.  Now it's not noisy at all.  The best feature is the projector. It's not too bright or too busy.  All the songs are soothing, even the bird chirping is soft.  It has 3 volume levels, but we've never used the loudest one. We replace the batteries every few months or so.  The only thing I wish it had is a remote control to turn it on from afar so she doesn't have to get up.  But other than that it's perfect.  But it's got a long play on it, so that usually she's asleep by the time it's done. We've got the Ocean Aquarium (older version) at Grandma's house, it's okay but it doesn't have the projector and the bubbles are really too loud and distracting.  ** By the way **  This is NOT $99!  We bought ours for about $35 I think.  I don't know why Amazon's listing it for so much</review_text>
I've owned this for about a year now and here's what I like:  LOVE the projection on the ceiling, music volume levels, music choices.  My son continues to love it and use it to calm down to fall asleep.  The only thing I would change is I wish it had a remote to start it over again.  Also, we ended up buying a battery charger because it does use the batteries pretty quick.  But I love it and would buy it again in a heartbeat.</review_text>
This is such a cute soother, I found it in a magazine ad and looked it up on the internet to check out the parent reviews, and it sounded great so I ordered it on the Babies R Us website (for $30).  It is great, has 4 musical and 2 soothing sounds option for baby's listening pleasure, and also has the option for the light-up moving birds and even a light show on the ceiling!  The only drawback to this product is that the mechanism that moves the birds around is a bit noisy, makes the music hard to hear.  But overall a great product</review_text>
I found this product to be great.  My baby was fasinated by the projector at night and has saved me countless nights</review_text>
If I could rate this 10 satrs I would do it!  My daughter LOVES this!  She is 6 months right now but it has been in her bed since the day she came home.  Every time I put her in her bed she turns her head right to it wanting to see the baby birds dance.  The music and sounds are really relaxing and the lights are super.  I also have the mobile in the Flutterbye Birds and it is super too, but the music is not as soothing with the mobile.  The mobile music is more "fun" sounding and it also shines a light downward on the baby which is not too good for trying to go to sleep LOL.  The ONLY thing about this soother that is lacking is the remote that the mobile has.  With the mobile if she starts to fuss after the music goes off I can hit the remote from the doorway without her seeing me but with the soother she sees me come in and turn it on.  But with as much as she loves the soother she doesnt fuss at me for not picking her up after it turn it back on - all her attention is on the birdies.  Get this... you'll LOVE it!</review_text>
it's quite pretty in my livingroom and high tech with no staples BUT the wire metal is very soft. a sharp dart easily digs in and bounces out. i had to dull my darts</review_text>
I've played darts in many bars, and in many homes.  The Blade III  is an awesome board!  Very few Bounce Outs, and a good Bristle board, plus Winmau is a name in darts you can trust.  Bristle Dart Boards can be used with either Steel tip or Soft Tip Darts, but the Bull is a bit hard for Soft Tip. otherwise, i cant find anything to complain aout</review_text>
In my opinion, this is a top quality solid bristle board that seems true to normal wear under our cricket matches. Any dart player knows the bull eye target on all dart boards are prone to wear down first and expose the ring metal rendering the board useless because of bounce outs or dropouts. If I may add, if such a company were to design a dart board with a synthedic polymer or sometype for the small bullseye which gets hammered more than any other area of the board, the concept might rectify the problem of premature wear for any bristle dart board be it regulation or amatuer. Albeit, i like this board as any of the dozen quality made dartboards i have purchased in the past</review_text>
These BB's work great.  If you use a gun that requires high polish BB's.  You can't go wrong here</review_text>
This bowling ball has a very nice color and feel to it. I took it to the local bowling alley to have the holes drilled for my daughter and she loved it. She was always complaining about using the bowling balls at the alley and I wanted to get an affordable bowling ball that was of good quality but would not break the bank. This is certainly worth the money.</review_text>
I have owned and used the Smooth Fitness 5.25 Treadmill for about six months. I've had lower-cost treadmills, and you do get what you pay for. (Though I don't see that spending $3000 gains all that much.) This one is definitely worth the price. It's comfortable and stable, and a pleasure to use. My significant other and I put around 30 miles per week on it, so we're not heavy users like runners in training. We both use the power incline and vary the speed a lot.It does not have a built-in fan, or fancy programmed routines. I put a six-dollar clip fan on it and I don't miss expensive electronics to break. I just want to walk on it! And it fulfills that function very well.The one feature I wish it had was a set of sideways wheels. I had a heck of a time getting it into my workout room because it only rolls forward, and I don't have 40" doors in my house. (Does anyone?) It's difficult to fold it up, keep it folded, and get it through normal doorways. Other than that, I am very satisfied with it</review_text>
My wife and I have owned the Smooth (Keys Fitness) 5.15 Treadmill for over 2 years.  We have not owned another treadmill, but before committing to this one, we tested many other brands in this price range.  The Smooth brand is definitely the smoothest ride you can get without paying significantly more.Each of us runs about 2-5 miles daily, and when maintained as prescribed in the owners' manual (occasional lubrication and belt realignment), the 5.15 handles it easily.  The ride is very comfortable, compared to other treadmills and running outdoors), and we have no doubt that this treadmill would handle more vigorous running with ease.We have had a few problems with the 5.15.  Within the first year, some of the soft-touch buttons on the control panel stopped working, and the circuit board had to be replaced twice.  This involved working with about 25 screws each time.  Then, about a year later, the arm-mounted toggle switches stopped working.  These are small auxilliary switches for incline and speed levels, so they weren't vital.  They were easy to replace without tools.Then, at about two years, the belt tore slightly at the seam, along one edge.  The treadmill was still usable, but the loose piece of belt smacked against the plastic housing loudly on each revolution.  This wasn't terribly difficult to replace, but it certainly wasn't fun, requiring disassembly of the entire platform.Service Notes:  Outside of the 'parts and labor' warranty period, when only parts are covered, customers pay for shipping the parts to and from Keys Fitness.  Most Keys' service technicians are knowledgeable, and are perfectly willing to guide you through a long repair process, providing frank and helpful advice along the way.Today, the 5.15 still works as it did when it was new, over two years ago.  Nothing else has been diminished, and nothing else has shown wear.  When things have gone wrong, Keys has provided us with good customer service.  Overall, we're happy with our experience, and we'll probably buy a Smooth treadmill next time.</review_text>
we have one of these and love it!! we take it on the boat, it cooks, we swim.  Great for hot dogs and buns and a lot more.  we take it on road trips to Schliterbaun.  Food keeps hot in there for awhile, so when we're ready to eat....</review_text>
We ordered an exercise seat cover on July 1 (Saturday evening) before the 4th of July (Tuesday) holiday.  It was delivered Thursday (July 6).  Estimated delivery was July 8-13.  Our 93 year dad really needed this for the exercise bike he received on Father's Day.  We could not locate this item in any store in our small town. Thank you for such wonderful customer service!</review_text>
These shoes are great in the summer.Great support and they also look great</review_text>
These fins are great. They are comferatable and are very reliable and flexable. They work great in the water. I own several US diver sets.They are all great</review_text>
If you are a snorkeler, then you know what you need and this fin better be on your list of gear!  It gives you maximum thrust for your kick.  It's got style, comfort and power.  It's design makes it easy to carry and it travels well.  You can't ask for much more</review_text>
This is by far the best snorkeling fin I have ever used. Most fins cramp your feet within 10 min. but you can snorkel all day in these and they have a lot of snap. A+</review_text>
Excellant Cooler.  Shipping was fast.  Reasonably priced coolers and shipping.  I used two of them to bring back fresh caught Alaskan fish.  Not only did they survive the luggage handlers, everything was still frozen after 18 hours without any ice.  Buy with confidence on this one!</review_text>
This knife is perfect in terms of sleekness (no bulge knife cutting into your pants) and just having the few tools I most commonly need. I use the knife, corkscrew and bottle opener all the time when camping, and the tweezers are surprisingly handy too</review_text>
This is the pocket knife I carry when travelling. You have what you need. It is thin, ligh.You have a blade for peeling and cut a fruit. A corkscrew for that special wine you will have in your room at a discounted price. Sometimes I use the cap opener and as far as I can remember I have used once the can opener. In other words do not go for those mini or maxi pocket knife, have your &quot;waiter&quot; with you</review_text>
This is a favourite among our players. I recommend this blue grip more than its fellow colors bacause it's the best surface. Among the surfaces presented, white and blue hit the top. But there's something about the blue. We could be wrong, but this is the result of tries and feedback.This overgrip is favourite among Babolat Pure Drive Team (Standard, OS and Plus) users</review_text>
I received a Polar S610 as a gift nearly three years ago, and am back for another: I'm buying one for my husband, who finally thinks it's something he'd like to have, too.  I use it religiously--if I forget it when I go for a workout, I feel I'm not 'getting credit' for my exercise.  I upload (with a Polar IR receiver--not included with the watch) all of my workouts and set weekly goals for time and caloric expenditure that I can easily track on the calendar.Having had mine for three years, I sent it in for a new battery and replacement of a button I had knocked-off about a year ago (local watch shops won't guarantee water-tightness if they change the battery), and bought a new chest strap/transmitter a couple of months ago, but it continues to work very well</review_text>
I have owned my S610i monitor for just under a year now and I firmly believe that this heart rate monitor has delivered the features exactly as described by the Polar company.  The bundled software, though basic in nature, does allow you to view several informative charts and graphs, which gives you an extensive workout history to base your progress.  To realize the full potential of the S610i monitor, you definitively will need to read and reread the owners manual, as well as the software's help section.  Alas, such are the torments of technology.I like the S610i monitor for several reasons, one being the large amount of exercises you can track, another being the 50-meter water resistance, and finally the multiple user features.  However, the dim display leaves a lot to be desired for an old pair of eyes like mine, hence the four stars rating out of five.  As far as any durability concerns, I have only had to replace the red button, which was expeditiously sent to me free of charge by Polar after a simple Customer Service e-mail.  Nonetheless, this is a very solid performing monitor and a basic level scientific device that gives you some invaluable information on your overall health and provides tangible feedback to achieve your exercise goals.My exercise plans now take me to another level, which include the incorporation of jogging and then running.  The S610i monitor is not really geared for that type of workout, so I will upgrade to the S625x monitor in 2007.  The S610i monitor will go to my wife, not that the blue color pleases her, but we workout at home so it should go unnoticed.</review_text>
This is my third heart rate monitor; I decided to upgrade to a model that could upload workout data to a PC, and this was the least expensive Polar model with that ability. Specialized versions that can double as bicycle computers cost only a little more, but I don't ride much anymore, and my road bike already has a computer, so I decided those capabilities were worth nothing to me.Pro:* The s610i works. Period.* The "WearLink" chest strap is more comfortable than other chest straps I have used.* It comes with logging and training software, and you can upload performance data to a website run by Polar for comparing with friends.* It works with either "sonic" or infrared connection to your PC or PDA. I use infared. Transferring data for a one-hour workout takes only a couple of seconds, and the watch can store many workouts between uploads.* You can set the watch's time, date, and other variables from the PC, which is much more convenient than trying to program it with the buttons on the watch itself.* It is easy to get extra parts, so that you can keep a heart-strap at home, and another in the gym, for example.* Though I will never be a competitive athlete, I find that this monitor, and the knowledge that it logs all my workouts, help me stay motivated. I work out harder and more often, as I feel the watch is looking over my shoulder, and I don't want to leave a blank spot in the automatic training diary.Anti:* The watch's software design is terrible. You have to click buttons over and over again to get anything done, and it's not always clear which button will have what effect.* The documentation was clearly not written by a native speaker of English, and many passages are opaque. You will end up figuring out how to use features of the watch by trial and error. I failed to log most of my first workout entirely because of bizarrely phrased directions about how to pause the monitor.* The watch is garish and looks silly with a suit.* The software is PC only and doesn't seem to export everything if you want to analyze your heart rate data in other software, or on another machine (it will export some of the information that was recorded, including heart rates, but not others, including time stamps or workout descriptions).* Polar's USB/Infrared adapter, which costs extra, is completely incompatible with Macintosh. You can buy software that will analyze Polar's data on the Mac, but you can't use this adapter to move the data over. Instead, you need to buy a serial to infrared adapter, and a USB-serial adapter, and connect them together. This is slower and somewhat maddening.* If Polar were to publish all APIs and make their drivers and software open source, they wouldn't lose a dime in hardware sales, and people who would be able to make much better software for their monitors, running on many more platforms</review_text>
I bought this computer because it is wireless and you can see MPH, odometer and time all at the same time.  The wireless works well.  I question the accuracy of the computer.  It seems off at high speeds.  Also, the readout has a 3-4 second delay.  So when you change speeds, the computer takes a few seconds to update the display.  My wired cateye does not seem to have this problem.  For a serious competitor, I think you would want to spend a little more. But for recreational biking it works fine</review_text>
I looked high and low for a sports bag for all of my basketball needs.  Finally, I discovered the HoopSaq and I couldn't be happier.  I love being able to carry by shoes, clothes, basketball, and drink all in one bag.  Before I always had to carry my ball seperately because typical gym bags aren't designed with the space for a basketball.  I bought a really few big gym bags before that carried all my equipment, but I was always lugging a bag too big not to mention that my shoes, clothes, and ball were mixed together.  It was always a mess when I'd play outside and get water and dirt from my shoes on my clothes.  I love this bag, and any series basketball player should own one themselves</review_text>
If you are wanting to show the sportsfan in your life that you went the extra mile to for their gift......this is right for you!!  My brother was really touched that I did that for him</review_text>
"Product Description"24" Smoothly finished adjustable (6-3/4) wooden drum.  Powder coated enamel brackets for superior durability. Hand wraps, Bag gloves. Leather speed bag with swivel, Jump rope.This product is a great deal. It may be shipped with a vinyl speed bag even though it says leather. My package shipped with one mounting bracket and a chipped particle board. BUT IF THAT DOESNT HAPPEN TO YOU AND YOU RECIEVE WHAT IT SHOWS IN THE PIC, YOURE GETTIN A great DEAL.!!!black handwraps instead of the tan ace bandages they send you would be nice for starters. an</review_text>
This boxing set is a good value compared to if I would have bought each item separately. However, you only really need the boxing bag, gloves and that spinning thing to attach it to the ceiling. That other piece of equipment that you mount on the wall is very large and was not really that useful to us. Maybe it would be to someone else, but you can just use that spinning thing and mount it to a beam and use the boxing bag that way. That other mounting wall bracket is heavy and takes up too much room. But I bought this whole set anyway because it was cheaper to buy all this together than to buy it separately.. and it's good exercise!</review_text>
This little backpack is the perfect size for my 2.5 year old.  He loves having his own backpack to take when he stays with "Auntie."  I hate the cheesy character bags; he is very fashion forward with this bag!  I actually went back and bought another one for my 7 month old for when he's big enough for it</review_text>
The dimensions are clearly stated above. I had also seen this bag in a bookstore once, so I knew what to fully expect. I use this bag to hold my purse items... I like having a bag I can strap over my shoulders when I need my arms free. I am also able to pack a textbook and notebook in it when I need to. This is a versatile mini-backpack that is also super cute looking. It has a bunch of little pockets throughout to securely hold items like a cell phone, small bottle of water, cd/mp3 player & headphones, credit cards, lipgloss. If you are looking for a huge, clunky backpack to hold tons of stuff, then this bag is not for you. Also, this bag is definitely for a female. I could not see it on a man</review_text>
I purchased this whistle for scuba diving. It is very loud. You can even hear this whistle underwater! I like this whistle because it is all plastic so it can't rust and it provides a lot of noise in a compact package. Every diver should carry some sort or noise alert system. If you are like me and need a very affordable solution this whistle will get it done</review_text>
Did you just break the bank buying your dream gun but have no dough for optics?  Never fear! Leapers will save the day!For about $30, you get a decent red dot that will get the job done w/o the bells and whistles.  I use it on my Remington 11-87 and it still shoots 3" slugs accurately after approximately 150 of very punishing rounds.  I got a second red dot for an AK-74 and the scope is more accuarate then the rifle.This is a great scope if you plan on messing around at the range but I wouldn't put it to the test if you plan on hiking/hunting with it for days on end.  The green dot option has been lost on me so far but I guess it's usefull if your being "tacti-cool" at night or something.My only problem so far is the pin to one of the flip-up lens cover worked its way out and I used a picture frame nail to replace it.  Otherwise, bang for the buck, you can't beat it</review_text>
good lens. Is a little bigger for my paintball marker (tippmann a-5) because I cant put it right with the loader. The 2 lens covers are too big, so if u wanna open and close them u will have problems with the space. Also, it comes with special adjusters to fit in the marker's rail, BUT it has (I dont know why) 2 diferent screws to fit it, the front one is lower that the rear one, so I couldnt make it fit lined up. Be carefull if you want this for a paintball marker</review_text>
I love this belt. Its bigger than what i needed but great. I have no problem with the velcro and i wear a 40-42 waist workout belt usually. Plus its light wieght. Great for walking, running</review_text>
You got to be kidding right ~!?? If you are an Intelligent Human Being, use common sense please ~! LOL You can not loose ONE body part by wearing this kind of gadget! LOL ~!!! You got to loose entire body fat mass by cardio work out, plus eat good. PERIOD. Gee, I could come up with TONS of silly Gadget like this to become a millionaire  for silly consumers !! can not believe people actually spend a penny on these things ~! LMAO~!!! People are cute~!</review_text>
works well in an urban enviroment. i also use one while on my bike. compass works fine as long as it's level. the clip is real tight and secure. tadah! you get what you pay for but for me it's worth every inexpensive penny</review_text>
I have nothing bad to say about this compass. It is very compact, the thermometer is accurate and the compass works perfectly when HELD LEVEL. It's not a state of the art digital, GPS, high tech item. You need to hold the compass level for it to work properly. I have one on my bike. I love it</review_text>
I love this body roller!  The foam is dense and holds up to my body weight perfectly.  The fabric cover is a great idea!  When it gets dirty, I just take it off and throw it in the washer.  It is light weight and easy to carry into the gym or use in any room of the house.  It is a great massager for all body parts, I love to roll out watching TV in the evening time.  It it also a great item for improving balance and strengthening abs.  There is a lot you can do with this roller.  For the price ($11.95) it is hard to beat!  I definitely recommend this product.</review_text>
Damn, Its just an umbrella but I don't think you could find a better one anywhere</review_text>
I got this bottle so I could get super saver shipping, and I'm glad I did. It holds 1000ml of water, so if you remember to empty it twice a day, youll be getting over the 8 cups of water a day you're supposed to drink. The only problem I've had with it is that it's not spillproof and will leak if its upside down, but I carry it in my backpack and as long as it doesnt tip over inside it's good.</review_text>
For the money, it definitely serves its purpose. Has enough room to carry all the stuff you need to the court. When not in use it is foldable, unlike other bags</review_text>
I JUST OPENED BOX AND WAS SURPRISED TO SEE THAT IT IS 24IN, WIDE...NOT 30 AS ADD STATES...SEEMS FLIMSY ...wOULD RETURN IF NOT SUCH A HASSEL...</review_text>
The mat works fine for my rowing machine. The price is better than many I have seen</review_text>
I purchased this mat to place under my treadmill to protect the floor underneath and prevent any slippage. The mat is well constructed and large enough for just about any treadmill. This one is a larger than most would need, but I thought I needed the extra length (I don't). It is strong enough for light to medium use. If you were especially rough on this mat you could wear it or tear it fairly easily. But it does what it's supposed to and you get what you pay for. I'm very satisfied with it</review_text>
Item purchased was a gift. Recipient said it was exactly what he wanted</review_text>
Title says it all.  I bought the X-Large (that's my normal glove size) but should have purchased the Large (the gloves stretch slightly)</review_text>
These definitely do what you would expect and are fairly comfortable (although you may have some sore shoulders the next day ;-). I wasn't sure if I should get the medium or the large and wish I had gone with the smaller size</review_text>
I've been riding with a FlatBlocker Max in my back wheel of my mountain bike for about 4 months now.  It has really performed well.  I've got a standard Slime filled tube in front, and both wheels have Slime Tube Protectors.  Every time I need to add air to the front I check the back and it is fine.  My riding is almost exclusively off-road in the New Mexico desert around Albuquerque with lots of Cholla, Prickly Pear and the dreaded goatheads.The only downside I can see is that some folks might think the tube is heavy.  Personally, I ride for exercise so I don't care about carrying around the extra weight or any effects it may have on acceleration</review_text>
This tube is preforming well. I have since had the unfortunate pleasure of riding thru a trail with massive amouts of glass, However the tubes dint even get scratch, I Love them</review_text>
This was my first Kershaw Ken Onion knife and I love it.  I carry it with me all the time.  The belt clip can be removed or flipped upside down by removing two allen screws.  It's it small enough that it doesn't feel bulky in the pocket, yet has a large enough blade to do any type of cutting.  The tungsten coating has also prevented further abuse.  I absolutely love the speed safe feature, it makes opening the knife incredibly easy (and fun too).  I have yet to see any problems with the knife opening inside my pocket, there is also a lock to prevent the blade from opening. I plan to make more Kershaw/Ken Onion knife purchases in the future!</review_text>
I use it as an everyday pocket knife. Very fast and sharp from factory so like the previous person mentioned be careful when opening it the first time. I bought it to replace my old Swiss Army knife as an everyday pocket knife. It is light and relatively thin so it is easy to just clip it in your pocket and you barely feel it. A very sleek-looking knife although the finish seems it might get scratched easily if you're not careful</review_text>
I've got a relatively small knife collection (maybe 15 blades), but this is the one I tend to carry every day.  I've got a few Kershaws, and the speed-safe opening is what initially attracted me to the brand.  That said, while it's a cool way to open the knife, I've ultimately decided it's mostly a gimmick.  I find it's just as fast, and somewhat easier, to open the knife with the thumb stud.My collection has 3 other kershaws: two chives and an avalanche.  The leek is the best size for a carry/defensive knife.  The blade is long without being cumbersome, and the shape is sleek and manageable.  The knife is also good for chores, although for anything really heavy, I'd use a bigger blade like the avalanche or the blur.The black finish is nice -- although truthfully, my leek is titanium oxide (rainbow).  One of my chives is black, though, and the finish is sleek and holds up well.This knife is definitely worth the price</review_text>
This is one of the best one handed opening knives i've seen.  Kershaw's Speed Safe really is speedy.  Having the options of using the index opener of the thumb stub makes it a rather versital tool.  You get it sharp and thats how it stays.  Overall, its a really study, reliable, and useful tool.  Definately worth the price and you'll have it a long time.</review_text>
been on my hybrid for 3 months. Works great with my suntour/shimano stuff. Not the lightest or best looking chain, but it works</review_text>
Nice fitting bib, only flaw was the logo. It wasn't on properly and took a swim in the first wash..</review_text>
This mat is wonderful.  It's much thicker than typical mats so it's much more comfortable.  This is especially important if you're doing pilates or yoga moves that involve the spine, such as "Rolling like a Ball."  Also, the velcro closures make it very easy to transport.  It's the perfect mat</review_text>
This comforter is a good deal for the price. I received it within 2 weeks, although when it got here and I opened it, it smelled like plastic from the transfer applied to the front. A few runs in the washer took care of that though. It is very warm and very thick, almost too thick to fold. Overall, I am happy with it</review_text>
This gun is wonderful. When I took it out of the box i emeadtly began to play with it. it has alot of firepower. I would recomed gettng he extra mags.Defnaty rccend</review_text>
As soon as I got this gun I knew this was an awesome gun. This gun shot so far, it hit my friend on his back porch. I was amazed at how fast and far this gun shot. This gun is easy to work. This gun can compete with Tokyo Mauri's aug for one fourth of the price. I would recomend this this gun for beginners and veterans. I was very pleased with this gun.</review_text>
ive only had it for a couple days now but so far this thing totaly dominates any airsoft gun ive used or seen. full auto is crazy, especialy when compared to a mini...wow..it also shoots around 280-300 fps, and is very acurate. low mag tho and the battery doesnt seem very good</review_text>
In the description it says it comes ready to play. Does this mean that it is already charged? Maby thats why the people who charged for more than 4 hrs didnt work and the dude who chareged for 10 mins worked. U should propbibly try to see if it works w/0 charge before charging just to make sure. :-</review_text>
I use these dive gloves to cover a artificial hand. Being of light weight they go over the hand and fit very well. a great glove for me</review_text>
These chairs are very comfortable.  They hardly weigh anything so they are easy to carry around.  Used them for a big, 3 day music festival and they did the job very well</review_text>
These tires certainly meet their billing for being resistant to flats. We put them on my girlfriend's road bike. She flatted frequently due to county roads, 150 mi/week schedule and her weight. No Flats since! Now I don't worry about her rides as much. She has had the tires for 4 months. I'll get 'em next! Not much heavier, but a little, and quite comfortable...</review_text>
A great mat even though it is on the heavyish side.  So what, it's not THAT heavy.  Slippery at first, that goes away.  Bravo to Manduka for making this long mat which keeps my face away from the studio floor and my feet still on the mat</review_text>
This mat seems to provide padding equal to 2 or 3 standard mats stacked together</review_text>
For anyone tired of slipping around while in downdog, this is the mat you want.  The thickness took some time to get used to because with thinner mats there is slippage that you can to your advantage such as when moving into cobra, and with the manduka you have to force yourself forward thus getting a better sweat because your not cheating anymore.  Which you won't realize is cheating until you do cobra on this mat.  The price intially may be a litte off setting, but it is sooooooooooo worth the price.  I wish I had bought this mat sooner.  I recommend the 85 inch to have room to move, I use the whole mat and I'm short.  Do buy a sling or case since the mat weighs about ten pounds and it has to be rolled very tightly</review_text>
I'm 6'6" 225 lbs. and have been doing yoga for a few years. This mat is nice and long as well as a little wider and thicker than the standard mat. Yes it's heavier than a standard mat and I found it to be unpleasantly slippery at first, but I recommend it highly. If you ever find yourself stacking one mat on top of another to get the padding you need, or running out of room on your mat, then please buy this mat now and you will thank yourself later.Pros: Longer, thicker, widerCons: A bit expensive (I think it's worth it), slippery at first (goes away after a few classes).NOTE: You might want to periodically roll the mat from a different end to get rid of the teacher-tripping curl that develops over time</review_text>
The 85" mat is probably best for 2 different situations: if you are tall like me (6'3") and you don't mind carrying some hefty extra weight around to class, or if you want to do yoga at home (or wherever) and you don't need to ever move this mat.  It is heavy (like 10 lbs) because it is so dense - but that is a good thing!  It is a solid mat in the sense that when you twist your feet your mat doesn't bunch up like thinner mats.  It also gives you great padding for the hard floors.  It is obscenely long - which gives you room to stretch out, and also has an additional advantage of giving you some extra space in a crowded studio - call me selfish but that's a nice bonus.  It is very sticky unless you are really sweating, but at that point you would probably have a towel.  I use this on carpet and hard floors and it works great in both cases.  Yes, this mat is expensive, but didn't you just spend $100 on those shoes with the little shox on the back?  You should consider your yoga mat just as important - and buy yourself the best</review_text>
I love that I don't get water in my ears anymore. The one drawback to swimming was that I always spent the rest of the day jumping on one foot trying to get the water out of my ears. These are so comfortable I forget I am wearing them. At the end of the swim, I pop them out, put them back in their handy carry case and that's it.</review_text>
This is a great foosball table, the only drawback being the price, but if you play a lot of foosball this is the table for you!  It says it can be put outdoors, but the table is best used indoors.  The playing field is straight and has no flaws, and the players themselves are well made and dont break like on the cheap foosball tables</review_text>
My grandson has been most pleased with this beginners set. Good luck with your purchace. j. hudso</review_text>
I ordered these clubs for my twin 7 year olds for Christmas.  They are a little long for their age, but will be a great set for them to use and grow into.  They can carry the bag, which has it's own stand and a nice cover over the driver and irons.  They have already used the clubs and really like them.  I was really happy with them and they made a great gift.</review_text>
This is a really neat set of clubs for a child. The driver is a little on the heavy side, but otherwise the clubs swing beautifully and are very easy to handle for an average 10 year old. The putter is a simple design and has proven quite accurate. The bag is a heavy denier and quite rain resistant. It comes with its own built in stand and double shoulder strap for ease of carrying. My 10 year old handled this set very well. All in all this product is great value for money, good looking and gives a good game of golf.</review_text>
I use my Pelican case all the time, I love it.. It protects my Nikon Pro Series Camera Bodies, and carries all of my equipment with no problems at all.  I can actually seal the case up in the cold air condition, and then open it up after being out in the back of my truck in the heat and it is still cold inside... That is a seal!!  I cannot brag enough about this case.   I wheel it in to the photo shoot and I know that I have all my Gear at my finger tips..  It is amazing.!!</review_text>
I purchased this watch/heart rate monitor about a month ago and have since used it pretty often. It is a pretty neat gadget since it combines a watch, a calorie counter, a heart rate monitor, and a chronometer. It also has a light, which makes it nice. I bought it mainly for the heart rate monitor feature and am pretty happy with it overall. It reads heart rate fairly accurately; my only complaint is that you can not be moving very fast in order to get an accruate reading. If you are running at a  moderate/fast pace on a treadmill it has a hard time picking up a signal and sometimes it displays nothing, sometimes the reading is unreasonably low (i.e. 65bpm when I know I have to be in the 150s or 160s). But if you slow down to a walk where you have better control over how you position your fingers over the sensors, you are most likely to get an accurate reading.Overall I'm happy with it and will use it for a long time</review_text>
This product was surprisingly accurate, quick and easy to use.  I compared it to the heart rate monitor at the hospital's cardiac rehab lab and it was within 1 or 2 heart beats both at rest and in full run mode.  Much more comfortable for women than a chest strap monitor</review_text>
I work out at curves 3 times a week, and you have to track your heart rate. I just use my watch to count the beats. I was able to set my own lowest and highest beats per min. and the watch lets me know if I'm running low or high.It also wakes me up in the morning so that I don't miss my curves appointments !</review_text>
The watch is a good product and like the look/color of it, but it would not work on me.  I called Reebok and was told that some people it would not work on because of the nerve endings.  This was not disclosed anywhere and would have reconsidered since I had been struck previously by lightning.  When I was going to return it, there was a 15% restocking charge on items opened.</review_text>
I was doubtful if a heart rate monitor without a body strap would work, but my wife assures me that she has had it tested at her gym and it is extremly accurate.  Great product</review_text>
I recently purchased this product and was dissapointed that it doesn't continuously take your heart rate.  You have to push down on the two silver buttons above and below the screen with your index and middle fingers to get a heart rate reading.  If I would have done my research beforehand I wouldn't have been surprised at this, I know.Anyway, now that I have it I am pretty pleased with the product.The pros of this product are as follows;I really like not having to wear a chest strap transmitter.I like that it is slightly "girlier" looking; I have the blue model, and I like it better than my very basic, big clunky Polar model.I like the calorie counter.It is as accurate as my Polar model with the chest strap;  I used both watches during my last workout on my elliptical machine, and everytime I took my heart rate with this watch it was usually within 2 BPM of my Polar Watch.  At the most, a few times the difference between the watches was 4 BPM.The only drawback to this product in my opinion as I've mentioned before is the fact that it does not automatically and continuously take your heart rate.  Once I get used to that I think I'll really enjoy this watch</review_text>
When this first arrived I thought boy have I wasted my money, but my 10-year old grandchild loved it and so far it's held up very well. ****</review_text>
I was very pleased with this product; I purchased it for my granddaughter and she really likes it.  I'm also impressed with the quality; it's very sturdy and I believe will hold up very well</review_text>
I bought this for my 10 year old daughter only because my 8 year old had asked for one and I felt I should buy them both a hopping ball. Well, I'm glad I did because she absolutely loves it! This ball is the perfect size and is great exercise for the kids. They have so much fun hopping around the house and outside even on the grass! It's pretty sturdy too</review_text>
given as gifts to a 6 and 4 year old who immediately jumped up on them and started hopping around the house, and then the yard.  A simple, safe, quiet toy using large muscles for exercise and balance.  Great way to blow off some steam either indoors or out.  Their mother had enjoyed this toy when she was a child and it still has great appeal to the next generation.  For smaller children, think of a smaller diameter, these children are long legged and so the 24" was perfect</review_text>
Once again we bought our two boys (7 and 3) way too much for Christmas. Out of everything we got them though, the Hoppers are what they play with the most. We are very pleased with their construction and durability. I expect my kids to be playing with these for several years. The only thing I would add would be a recommendation that you have a heavy-duty bicycle style pump on hand for inflation.  It took us forever to get the right amount of air in them using a small sports ball style pump. It was one of those... "We should have thought about this..." but didn't moments!Overall, one of, if not the, best purchases we made this Christmas.</review_text>
My son (age 6) has lots of fun with the Hopper.  It is colorful and seems to be very durable.  Good value for the money</review_text>
Well constructed even though they were made in China. The Grandkids thought they were the best presents and had a blast with them</review_text>
My 6 year old wanted Santa to get him a pogo stick , well that wasnt happening all I could see in my head were his teeth going bouncing...aaaaaa but I found this instead. I had bought one for my oldest 15 yrs ago and was so happy to see they were still around. He loves it he can bounce inside or outside. He gets great exercize at the same time he is having fun. (A hand pump with a ball pin is needed to inflat ). I highly recomend this for your bouncer... a safe easy to use and fun toy.</review_text>
I must admit I am always skeptical when things appear too good to be true but once in a while they are.  I was looking for a back up pair of neoprene gloves.  I got these and was amazed at the quality of these gloves.  I have bought big name neoprene gloves and these were just supposed to be a just in case pair.  I have to tell you that NOW they are the primary ones I use and I love them.The finger tips fold back for baiting my fishing hooks and unlike the other pair I have they have large patches of velcro to hold the fingers back not just little slices that always seem to come loose</review_text>
Got it in good time. It works very well for what it was wanted for</review_text>
Nice product but it did take almost a month to ship.</review_text>
A little steep with shipping but all was great.  Great Gift for nephew. Great service A+++</review_text>
At first, I was a bit leary ordering a piece of exercise equipment through the mail, and an inexpensive one to boot, but I could not be more pleased. This peice was relatively easy to put together (I did it one evening while my husband was out of town.)It is a great peice of exercise equiment too--the first I've ever stuck with using--now for almost three months. The only criticism I have is the instructions did not provide any information about the computer--it works, but I'm not sure if the measurement is in meters, etc.Overall, a great value!</review_text>
This is a great product.  This will be my second cross trainer.  My first cross trainer was purchased 7 years ago and have trained for 5 bodybuilding competitions with it. My first cross trainer has alot of hard miles and still works fine. I purchased this one for my wife</review_text>
this elliptical is easy to assemble, easy to use, quiet while using, and a good workout. It is a good investment for your health and takes up little room</review_text>
After recieving this item, I was able to assemble and use this device in less than half an hour.  It is very easy to use, and even if though I don't notice a difference in adjusting the tension dial, it still does well to give me a good cardio work out.  My only complaint about this product is that after a few uses, an odd squeek developed that is mildly annoying</review_text>
I was very apprehensive about purchasing an elliptical for only 90.00 but it turned out to be the best purchase I have ever made towards fitness equipment.  It is sturdy and works great!</review_text>
Since it arrived has been used daily with no issues.Make sure to keep a lube material handy, not something like WD40, something with a little viscosity.  I've added a little about once a week to keep the squeak down and it works fine.The computer is simple but does exactly what it says it will</review_text>
For the price this is a very sturdy elliptical maching. I like the feature which enables you lock the bars into place or use the bars like a tradtional elliptical. The computer moniter is easy to use and efficent. The wheel design allows for a smooth workout, many elliptical are nowhere near a smooth as this one is. Don't let the shipping price keep you from getting this model it is well worth the price. Also the item arrived in 2 days and it is large and heavy which explains the shipping cost.</review_text>
I used my Leki Travellers for a hike across northern Spain to Santiago Campostela, about 160 miles total.  I have a torn ACL in one knee and arthritis in feet/ankles.  Combined the Leki poles with Z-Coil walking shoes and had no problems (unlike several fellow walkers with normal knees & feet).  I'm sold on these sticks; they really DO relieve the burden on knees and ankles.  They're light and folded easily so they went into even smallish luggage.  They improve the workout with upper body exercise...I just fly!  They're my best walking buddies</review_text>
Love my new LEKI.  They are lightweight, pack easy and have both pavement and off road tips.  I use them on my daily walks.  My husband loved them so much, I am getting him a pair for Christmas.</review_text>
nice heavy duty net & poles and rope.. the only downfall are the stakes used to hold the poles they look like 12" nails and come right out of the ground, so i went to home depot and bought anchors $40, no problem</review_text>
The instructions were clear and made for an easy set-up and a nice net. Breakdown was also very easy and everything actually fit back into the carry case</review_text>
For $80 bucks this is a great value! The net and poles are made very well for the price. We are ocassional players and find that this set suits us just fine. The only reason I didn't give it 5 stars is because it took me a lot longer to set up than was advertised. It's possible that my lack of experience in setting these things up that had something to do with that. Overall I highly recommend</review_text>
As the husband of a beach volleyball devotee, I can honestly say that this set is going to make me a hero this Christmas.</review_text>
This item is great for the cold winter, helps keep you very warm. I would definitly recommend this item for people who have to spend several hours out in the cold.</review_text>
Thank you for offering this product.  It arrived quickly to my house, just in time for our ski trip.  They worked great as foot warmers and hand warmers.  They stayed warm for many hours. I would recommend this product to anyone who doesn't like to get cold</review_text>
I carried this sword at the Texas Ren Fest for 5 weekends and always received compliments on it. The hilt is large and bright silver, and truely stands out in a crowd of swords.Bare in mind that this sword is just a prop and is probably no good for sword combat. But it's a fine crafted item that is sure to look good on your hip or mounted on the wall</review_text>
I like this sword. A LOT! It's well-constructed, it comes with a nifty leather scabbard with shiny silver trim, and it looks good. Excellent for costume, display, or reenacting, but I don't know if the blade was manufactured for "practical" use (theatrical or reeactor sword fighting). Still, it's a good prop. Did I say I like this sword</review_text>
My freestyle kick was horrible until I picked up the Zoomers-Blue.  I've been training with these fins exclusively for the past few weeks. Swimming with the Zoomers has definitely given my legs a much better workout.  When I swim without the Zoomers, I've noticed that I'm able to keep my legs up higher and am much more efficient</review_text>
We recently purchased this item.  It was easy to assemble.  The frame is sturdy and portable with wheels.  It met our needs perfect.  We love it</review_text>
I'm fit and athletic and I don't mind a little blood rush to the head...if you are too than you'll like these boots.  It takes about one minute of hanging to get comfortable on the ankles - then after that it's almost like meditation.I hang about every other day for 10-20 minutes at a time.  I usually do it with only socks on for a bit of extra cushion.  Feels great, good stretch, very relaxing.  And if your strong enough, just hang from a pull-up bar as they are cheaper than 'special' bars and just as strong.And it's fun to get the ladies into the boots!!;</review_text>
they not the easiest boots to put on, but once they on, they are secure and comfortable to wear</review_text>
I do upside down situps with a 50 pound vest on and a 25 pound dumbell in each hand. I weigh 185 pounds. No creaks bends or falls, great produc</review_text>
I got these along with the Teeter Hang Ups door rack.  The boots are sturdy and comfortable.  Feel confident in getting them.  They work</review_text>
I wanted one of these for a long time.  I just didn't know it.  I always loved the Hangup Boots, but never bought them because I didn't want the big inversion table.  Then I woke up one morning with a drive to get the boots and just find something (a jungle gym perhaps) to hang from.  And then I saw this rack that hangs in your door.  It was perfect!  It installed easily in my studio doorway.  It can be used for pullups or just something to stretch out with everytime I walk in and out of the room.  Our daughter is constantly climbing on  it and inadvertantly getting great exersise.  I did get the inversion boots as well and try to find ten minutes a day to hang upside down.  It gets blood to the brain and takes pressure off the spine.  You can get a totally different work out being inverted.  I highly recommend this to everyone, but especially fellow yogis.  Yoga is great for working out back problems and this rack (paired with the Hangup boots) really helps with strengthening and lengthening the back.  Cobra pose without a floor!I am glad I didn't hessitate in getting this.  I use it everyday</review_text>
Being a bodybuilder, I hoist heavy weights all the time; a major stress especially when it comes to squats.  I ordered the boots when I realized I had shrunk to 5'10.5" from being 6'0.5".  I was thusly very happy when after approximately 5 weeks of hanging (5 times a week, 10-15 min intervals) that I am nearly back to my original height (6' 0.25").  I highly suggest this product as a supplement to good [emphasis on good] chiropractic care.To those who have/will order this product, don't be discouraged if it seems to hurt your back at first; that's totally normal because your back is trying to readjust while the discs [which cushion the vertebrate] start rehydrating.  Also, it will take some time to find the strap tightness that's right for your legs.  Generally, tighter on the top strap and looser on the bottom is a good combination.p.s.  Hang from a real pull-up bar and make sure you have someone to spot you if you are not strong enough to pull yourself back up the bar to unlatch yourself.</review_text>
Seem to the best value on the market. I didn't research too much, but found them to be the apparent best value</review_text>
Playing "Hand and Foot" with friends makes this gadget very handy.  We use 5 decks and this keeps the cards really neat in their piles.  Glad I got it.  Sometimes it is hard to pick up the card but with practice, it should get easier</review_text>
it is a very good product. fits and feels great. but cannot be used in conjunction with the gloves for a heavy bag.</review_text>
Decent product, worth the $20 I paid. The gloves look good, are comfortable enough and not very difficult to take off. The Diamond-Tac Palm seems helpful for my grip so far, unlike with other gloves I owned before. Don't even need to use chalk.The reason I give it four stars is that the metal ring through which you thrust the wristband may hurt your hand when bent backward and that after about 5-6 workouts the seam on one of the pinkies cracked (easy to fix though; on my previous GNC gloves, the material ripped after the first workout!)P.S. The bonus CD is worth giving a look, but nothing special.</review_text>
We use this cooler, along with a small microwave. when we travel by car on  dayhiking excursions.  It gives us a nice little "kitchen" in whatever hotel/lodge we stay.We haven't used the warm function yet, but it does keep food plenty cold. You do have to be careful about putting food right at the air outlet inside, as fragile foods can freeze a bit at times.  Other than that, it is plenty roomy.The instructions say not to use ice in this cooler, but when we will be away from power sources for a while we pack up ice in zip-top plastic bags and it works fine.  It is well insulated, light enough to shlep even when filled.The fan is not so quiet, so we try not to place it right next to the bed.The Auto connector plugs into the A/C adapter, and we have used it on occasion to power auto cell phone chargers and the like. That is an "off-label" use, but handy nonetheless.I've also used it as an extra fridge around the house on the occasions. It seems to do fine when on for an extended period.You can't leave it on for very long in a car with the engine off.  That will drain the battery. Not a good thing.A very useful cooler, all-in-all</review_text>
but the cooler didn't come in it's original box. It's a nice big cooler which my son needed. I received the order in less then a week after ordering</review_text>
I received the stroller last week and very happy with it!  The customer serive is also very helpful to answer all my questions.  I have been searching for a double stroller for some time for my 2,4 yr old and a new born.  I was first looking at a light weight umbrella style, but my kids are all uncomfortable sitting inside after trying in the store.  I didn't find any local store that carry this double stroller to try on.  I was encouraged to see all the positive review on Instep stroller and decide to buy it anyway.  The price and value is unbeatable.</review_text>
I'm what ya' might call a "stroller hog."  I currently have 5 strollers (including this one), however, this is the only Double Jogger I have.  The others include (a Snap-N-Go for the carseat only, an umbrella stroller, a Jeep (Single) Jogger Stroller, & then a Baby Trend SitNStand) and although I really like my Jeep Single Jogger & the SitNStand, this one is by far my favorite. It's AWESOME!!  I LOVE how EASY it is to push and manuver...the swivel wheel is a MUST.  The only thing I have found so far that I think could use improvement is the sun shade...it's very short and really doesn't do any good at all (I have a 7 month old, so she still tends to take naps during my walks, and the sun gets in her face/eyes a lot).  BUT...I fixed that problem by getting a Rayshade Sun Shade and now the stroller has no "flaws" at all. It was SIMPLE to put together...I did it by myself in just 10 minutes.  Bottom line...I LOVE it and would HIGHLY recommend it!  OH and I was suppose to get this in 2 days and I got it overnight...so that was a nice welcome surprise.</review_text>
This stroller is a life saver. I can actually enjoy shopping now with my 3 and 1 year old without them trying to climb out of the shopping cart. They are both strapped in and can lay back and nap or sit up and enjoy the ride.I wish it had some sort of cup holder for myself but the ride is exceptionally smoothe for the riders and myself. The only downfall, it is a little heavy and awkward lifting it into the back of my van, but what can you expect for a double stroller. All in all I would highly recommend this stroller to anyone</review_text>
I gave this stroller a 4 because there is no parent consol. Other than that it handles very well</review_text>
We have not yet been able to use this outside of the home, the true test will be to get it through public doorways!  Everything is great and is a nice quality stroller</review_text>
Love this stroller!!!I was actually able to put it together by myself while my husband was at work. Instructions were very straightforward and easy to understand.Works like a dream. Great color. Kids love it.Amazon was fast and the best price on the web (as usual)</review_text>
This stroller is great!!!  I researched double joggers for quite some time and did not have a big budget for some of the higher-priced ones, but did find that this one got great reviews.  I just received it in the mail a few days ago and let me tell you--I love to go walking now!  I can put both my kids in it (ages 2 1/2 years and 5 months) and no longer have to put my 5-month-old in the Snugli carrier.  Also, it makes walking my dog easier, he just walks right next to it.  It has a nice, smooth ride, and barely feels like I am pushing any weight.  It folds up nicely and fits into my SUV perfectly (a Honda Pilot).  It also has a little soft console for water bottles, keys, etc.  The canopy is nice and large and covers them from the sun.  My kids really enjoy riding in it, it is roomy and has great 5-point harness restraints.  The ONLY drawback I can see is the angle of the seats...I have them reclined forward as far as they will go and they are still at an angle where my kids seem to be lounging back.  My 5-month old does not mind; however, my toddler gets antsy sometimes and wants to sit up.  For the most part, though, they are content for the entire ride and don't try to sit up.  This stroller is perfect for fast-paced walking or strolling around.  It is probably also good at the mall or other places, but I know after about 45-60 minutes of sitting back my toddler will reach her limit and want to get out!  Luckily, I have a different stroller for those occasions!!!  I highly recommend this stroller--you don't have a spend a fortune to get a great stroller</review_text>
This is a great stroller.  I get LOTS of inquiries about this when I am out and about.  It's VERY easy to push and maneuver.  I love the swivel front wheel, and I use the lock mechanism for walks/jogs.  I would really like to see a hand brake, but the wrist strap on this model is definitely helpful for hills and rollerblading.  The seats are easy to adjust, great pockets and cup holder.  The sun shade is upgraded to a curve, which is really great.  It's a little bit tough to collapse, but not too bad.  It fits into the back of my minivan fairly well.  GREAT value for the price, and it's definitely a step up from the regular model.</review_text>
We love it.  It is easy to push around.  The kids seem to be comfortable (I did put a small towel under the seats so the kids can sit at a more upright position.)  Easy to close and open.  It takes up a lot of space in the van but it is expected.  We have enjoy it very much.  For the price we paid for, it is a great stroller.</review_text>
Love Love Love! It is easy to manuver and extremly light weight. I have a two year old and six month od and they both are extremely comfortable for long excursions</review_text>
The only odd thing I noticed about it is that it has to be very wet to work but it does work</review_text>
I've had this heart rate monitor for about 8 years now.  I really like the way it works and I've never had any problems with it.  I use it about every-other-day for my aerobic work-out.  The only thing I've had to do is change the battery.  When I first got it and when I change the batteries I have to get out the instructions to re-set everything, but other than that, it's great.  I'm planning to buy a second one for my husband.</review_text>
Durable, lightweight and a breeze to carry your things to the gym. It hangs on my shoulder and doesn't fall off (just one of those little things that makes the difference). Also comes in a variety of nice colors</review_text>
Just got mine yesterday- came really fast!!  I must say that we had a cheaper version of this that fell apart right away, then we had a Nike one that lasted a few months, but when I saw this made by Jansport, I knew I should grab it because they make well made items.  It is made from a very thick material and I trust that it will last awhile- I'm even ordering a few more now!!</review_text>
I works well as a book bag and not as balky as many backpacks are, as long as you do not need something larger.</review_text>
Just what I was looking for.  Easy to put together and easy to use. Gives a good workou</review_text>
Like other reviewers, I also posted this review for the identical product sold directly by Amazon - which is where I purchased it.Let me start out by saying that this rower is not perfect. It is, in fact, flawed. As you may have noticed, I still gave it a five star rating and I will try to explain the reasons for doing so.Reading the reviews here, I noticed two complaints: One pointing out that this machine doesn't perform to the same standards that professional gym rowers do and the other regarding assembly of this machine.I researched the various rowers available in the market for quite a while. I spent a lot of time and effort driving around and trying various models before purchasing this one simply because I tend to be an informed shopper who wants to get value for his money. During my research, it became very evident that my favorite rower is a Water Rower followed by Schwinn's WindRigger - both were extremely smooth in their operation. Both were also about $1000! At any rate, these sophisticated rowers gave me a benchmark against which to compare the Integrity and it should surprise nobody that the Integrity doesn't really come close to the performance of either of the other two rowers. And it shouldn't, given it substantially lower price.And this is exactly what it important in considering this rower: You cannot expect to get a professional-grade rower for such a low price just like you cannot expect to get the comfort and performance of a Rolls Royce if you are buying a Honda. Nonetheless, what you DO get from Integrity is well within the parameters of what I would expect for about $200.The machine is reasonably stable, it is reasonably smooth, and it does provide a great workout. The noise level is also not too bad and actually seems less than that of the WindRigger. The electric monitor is basic and provides speed, time, calories burned, and distance. It also provides an option that continuously cycles through all these functions so you cant track all of them during your workout. The seat is comfortable and slides smoothly along the track and the whole thing actually has a pretty professional look to it and doesn't appear flimsy. I was also quite surprised by the level of resistance this rower provides - it is much more than that of the Schwinn WindRigger. In addition, resistance can be adjusted pretty easily.I think my only disappointment is that the air-flow created during operation is not channeled toward the person using the machine to aid in cooling him/her down - but this is certainly a flaw I can live with. As a potential buyer you should also be aware that the rower tends to slide across smooth surfaces such as tile - which means you need to have a non-slip mat under it if you intend to use it on such a surface.As I said before, I also read that at least one person had a problem assembling this rower. I cannot confirm this problem. Assembly was extremely easy and quick - even though the instructions are not the greatest. However, it should be quite clear to most people where parts go and what needs to be hooked up where. Winding up the chain onto the gear wheel is a breeze, too. All you need to do is unhook it from the retracting cord that you hooked it up to one or two steps before. I suppose the person who wrote the instructions could have switched these steps to make it more logical - but as I said, the instructions are not great.Taking all these factors into account, I think Integrity provides a fantastic product for a very low price. It does exactly what it is supposed to do and it does so in a surprisingly good manner. However, as with any product, your expectations should be realistic and if they are, you will not be disappointed. If you expect a gym-quality machine - you will not get what you are looking for. If, however, you are looking for a basic functional rower without all the bells and whistles of high-end products, then this is probably the best deal you can get</review_text>
So far the rower works fine, although I have problems with my shoes slipping out of the foot holds. Assembly was relatively easy, although the instructions could be more explicit</review_text>
This rowering machine is just what I wanted.  It is very affordable and provides a good work-out.  It moves smoothly, the readout is clear. No problems with it.</review_text>
I have never ordered something like this from the web before, but after reading the positive reviews here decided to do it. I could not find a rower in town for less than $800.This rower is sweet and arrived in Idaho from the east coast 6 DAYS after I ordered it (from amazon). It was easy enough to assemble and works great. I am a middle aged woman, weighing around 175 (under the max.rower limit of 250) and feel safe and comfortable when I'm rowing. Also, the seat is cushioned and it glides easily on the track.I do not find it loud at all and kind of like the cool swishes of air when I'm rowing.You won't be sorry ordering one of these and I think it's a way more fun way to get in shape! Get one.</review_text>
It was easy to put together. The shipping was fast. The only weird thing is that the feet are not stationary. Your feet tilt forward when you slide into the catch. And, it does not show a split, and I still haven't figured out how to see the speed in meters alone and not mph. But if you just want to exercise and not record numbers, its good</review_text>
Hi! I just posted a review for the same product (but shipped by Amazon), and I thought that I'd copy review here for your convenience.Quick note though: The one sold by Amazon has free shipping so definitely take a look.Why I Bought itI like to workout about 4-5 days a week, but I live in LA and it's sometimes hard to get to the gym if I work late or if there's traffic. Also, my neighborhood is not so nice, so I prefer to avoid jogging at night. Enter the Fitness Quest Integrity 3000 Air Rower.AssemblyIf you can assemble Ikea furniture or a coffee table from Walmart, then you can assemble the rower. You put in about 4 pins, and then hook a strap from the rower to a bungie cord under the seat. Finito. As far as tools go (despite what the instructions say) all you need is two wrenches. Use a socket wrench (about $10 at Target or Walmart) and you'll be done even faster.QualityThe rower is of surprisingly good quality for the price. It's made of a two piece aluminum frame and feels sturdy. At first, I was a little skeptical about the chain connecting the rower handle, because it looks really small and cheap-o. But, after a 30 minutes of hard rowing, I could tell that the chain was more than adequate. One reviewer on the Target website said that the chain exploded into a million pieces while she was rowing. Maybe she had a faulty chain; who knows. All I know is that I can row 150 pounds on the weight stack at the gym, but there's no way I could shatter that chain simply by rowing. As a stress test, I even rowed as hard as I possibly could, and the rower was fine.PerformanceThe performance of this thing is really great. The resistance level and smoothness is as good as the cardio rower I use at the gym. This is an air rower, so the resistance increases the harder you pull. Additionally, you can increase the resistance by wrapping the tension strap around its base one time before connecting it to the cord under the seat. The seat slides very easily, and the foot pads swivel to allow your ankles a little more freedom to move. Also, the rower folds vertically for easy storage. When it's folded, the rower is about 4 feet tall and takes up about 2 square feet of floor space. It easily fits in a closet or in the corner. Although, it's too wide to fit under a bed.ValueGreat value. My buddy has a rower that costs twice as much, and the difference is hardly noticeable. The performance is great, and if you buy the Amazon item you get it tax-free and with free super saver shipping. I looked at a couple of other rowers (mainly piston rowers) and nothing even came close to this level of quality and performance for the price.IssuesThe only negative thing I can say is that it is a little noisy; even for an air rower. (For those of you who have never used an air rower, the resistance is created by a big fan which makes a "whoosh, whoosh" sound when you row.) The noise isn't terrible, but it prevents you from hearing the TV or radio clearly... even with ear phones.SummarySo all in all, I think that this is a fantastic value. The quality is great, and the performance is fantastic. I highly recommend this product.</review_text>
Bought the pack for a 23 day trip to Africa. I would highly recomend this pack to anyone. Carried on the plane easily stored. Holds any thing you can think to pack with very little stress on your back</review_text>
I bought this for my daughter to use for college based on previous reviews praising roominess and good support.  The backpack is great with lots of different compartments and shoulder and waist straps that really help balance the weight.  My daughter is able to carry her laptop, numerous books, gym clothes, and a huge waterbottle to get her through the day.</review_text>
I've been a JanSport fan for over 20 years and have owned various backpacks and packs, and I always come back to JanSport.  You just can't beat the quality and durability of a JanSport.  I have to say without a doubt the Odyssey is an outstanding pack for what it is designed for.  It has tons of room, is well thought out, loaded with features, and most importantly, comfortable to wear even fully loaded.  I use if for commuting every day and frequent travel for work.  I can load it up with my laptop, an extra sweater or light jacket, my portfolio and still have plenty of room for all of those extra things you need when traveling.  If you're looking for a high quality pack that's versatile, loaded with features and comfortable, look no further.</review_text>
I have had many backpacks for school and am always left wanting more space.  I like to have different places to put different materials.  This gives me the opportunity to do so.  I like the fact that I can put my Ipod in a section that is not likely to recieve the weight of the many books I use.  I would say that the area where you hold the smaller items, such as pens and calculators, is nice.  You have dividers where you can hold many different things.  Overall, this is the best pack for school I have come across</review_text>
This is the best, Jansport has always made an outstanding product. This is the third one I have owned. Plenty of room and just right size</review_text>
I bought this pack as a substitute for bulky roller bags. It works great but if you stuff it to the maximum you may have to compress it down a bit for some overhead racks. The separate compartments give you plenty of flexibility and it will accomodate a shirt folded as received from most laundries. The padding is excellent and the weight distribution makes it very easy to carry.I will also use this as a day pack for hiking although it has more space than generally needed for this. The organizer section works well to carry cell phone, PDA or any other miscellaneous items.Construction is excellent and it is versatile enough to accomodate a wide range of uses.Great value at the price charged</review_text>
I needed a replacement for my Targus backpack that I used to haul my 17" powerbook.  This pack is lighter, smaller (which is a good thing; the Targus was huge!), yet has as much useful pack space as the Targus.  I vastly prefer it; the only question is that of durability, but as my last Jansport pack lasted 5 years and my Targus only lasted 1.5 before blowing a zipper, I'll give Jansport the benefit of the doubt.Supremely comfortable, two water bottleholders, a bladder slot, and plenty of pockets.  Top notch</review_text>
These are great!! I have flat feet, if you have this problem, then, you should own a pair of them! No cons! Though, you have to be careful taking them out of the shoes</review_text>
AVAILABLE FOR ONLY $36.99 from Downtownbooksellers on the AMAZON website! Do NOT pay more!</review_text>
This is the world best kickstand and comes in black and alloy. It is light, easy to fit and has a great spring. I now have one on all three of my mountain bike</review_text>
Very well constructed. The ratchet release ankle feature is well worth the extra money and feels very secure. I did notice in the exercise booklet that comes with this unit (which was written for all types of inversion & not necessarily for this product) that an inversion chair is recommended for lower back pain as opposed to an inversion table. For myself I am thinking I should have bought an inversion chair, because as a two time back laminectomy surgery patient (L-4 & L-5)laying flat on my back causes discomfort and, I have experienced slight discomfort using this product when returning to the upright position to dismount. I have experienced professional physical therapy traction while on laying my back with my thighs pointed up 90 degrees and my calves resting on a stool parallel with the table and the traction pulling from my hips. I always felt great after those treatments, but I don't feel that using the table. In all the research I did prior to purchasing the inversion table I unfortunately found nothing that clearly recommended the inversion chair for persons with lower back pain. I do have a gripe about the delivery of this product. It came in two large boxes, one each about a week apart and someone has to be there to sign for it. That was a scheduling problem for us and would have rathered they came at the same time. This is a high quality product, but for my lower back ailments I think I should have purchased a inversion chair instead</review_text>
I am new in the inversion therapy arena and have limited knowledge (both theoretical and applied) in this field. However, I felt compelled to try it out after reading a bit about is as I was in desperate need to stop taking pain killers for my back (when I sleep) almost every other night. I've been using the Teeter F9000 consistently for about  3-4 weeks (every morning). Results were immediate! From the first day itself, I've noticed my back doing much better. I don't take painkillers any more and I can't tell you what a relief it is not to inject my body with poison (painkillers). I combine the inversion with some back and posture exercises that came with the machine (free CD) and the combination has worked its wonders. So far so good! I am extremely satisfied with this purchase. The machine quality is much better than I expected and I am glad I've spent the extra money for the padded leg area.</review_text>
I couldn't be happier with this table.  I hemmed and hawed for over a year as I researched all of the different tables.  While I debated over spending the money on an inversion table, my back continued to worsen.  It finally occurred to me that for what I was spending on my chiropractor to perform traction on my back (I have a herniated disk), I could probably buy a few of these tables.  Now that I have it, I'm thrilled.  Others here have written great, in-depth reviews and I don't need to repeat what they've said.  I just want to say to anyone debating the merits of getting an inversion table - just go ahead and do it</review_text>
This is truely an amazing piece of equipment for back and body health.  I suffered from a herniated disc while I was pregnant, and   had some difficulty "taking it easy" on my back post-partum as I have little children at home to take care of.  After spending many hours and $ with a chiropractor, I realized that traction is a very healing process for keeping the spine in alignment and the disc properly hydrated.  Everything you read about for the positive healing aspects of inversion are true.  I had the opportunity to use the Teeter Hang Ups with the ankle release for a while, and I must say I am extremely pleased with the F9000.  Although the quality of the both the ankle release table and the rachet system is the same, the F9000 is worth the extra expense.  The ankle release is harder to release because it requires a stronger pull from the handle.  Plus, you have to reach all the way to the ankles after a good inversion stretch.  For anyone needing inversion because of stress or injury to the back, I just don't recommend bending to the ankles.  The ankle release requires two movements - one hand is needed to pull the ankle handle release, and the other hand is needed to lift the piece away enough to get your feet out.  The rachet system is completely different.  The rachet system is a push button that releases the hold on the ankles, and with the same hand, you simply move it away from you.  Not only do you not have to bend all the way to your ankles (just to the knees), it is also a simple, easy release.  I wondered if I wanted to spend the extra money for a rachet system, but now that I tried both, I have no doubt the extra expense was more than well worth it</review_text>
We like to incorporate back exercise in our workout routine, and after trying out a friend's inversion table, we decided to get one for our home gym. After considering various brands, we settled on the Teeter Hang Ups, convinced by their ad showing extensive stress and strength testing. If you are hanging by your ankles upside down, you want the best inversion table there is, no doubt about it.Why InvertThe reason to use an inversion table is to stretch your spine. Normally, you stand and your legs and pelvis and stomach support the spine. When you sit, you increase the pressure on the spine by resting on your coccyx (tailbone). So for people who sit all day, inversion can actually act like traction, using gravity to pull the vertebrae and decompress the spine.As you hang or lean at various angles from 20 degrees to 90 degrees -- totally upside down, your head gets more blood, your stomach muscles lengthen and stretch and your shoulders relax because you put your arms fully over your head.You can gradually build up your angle from 20 degrees, allowing you to adjust to the new feeling in your head and spine. You can use the table to do rocking (down to your set angle, back up to level or vertical) or you can do intermittent traction (1-2 minutes down, 1/2 minute up.) In the fully suspended 90 degree position, your body is literally hanging by your ankles and you can do twists, sit-ups, squats and back arches. This is not possible in the shallower angle positions as you are lying on the table in those positions as opposed to freely hanging with spine straight.You may not use any bands, weights or other equipment while on the table. You MUST wear tie shoes with flat, even soles (no thick soles, no high tops.) A standard pair of trainers (running or walking shoes) with ties works just fine.What you getThe table is a flat, nylon bed resting on a steel A-frame. The bed rotates like a teeter-totter. There is an ankle clamp on the bottom to hold your feet securely, and a pin lock height adjustment to set the table to the right height for you, which may be 1 or 2 inches above or below your actual height, depending on your center of gravity. There are handles (extended or normal) for the arms. There is an "anti-rattle" adjustment screw to prevent unwanted shimmy.The table is not powered; you operate it with your body weight, using your arms to add upper body weight to take you down to your desired position.The unit is based on an A-frame that collapses for folding and storage, the hinges lock (like on a folding table) and there are clips on the base to stabilize the base on the floor. The 5000 has optional "over-easy" extension arms, longer arm pieces that allow the user to move their hands and arms up and down to move to inverted more easily. Mine were included in a promo.A safety strap can be used to limit inversion to set degrees such as 20, 40 or 60 degrees. The table will automatically stop and the maximum degree you set and prevent you from inverting more than is comfortable for you.When starting out, have a friend to stay with you in case of dizziness or other discomfort.The Teeter Hang Ups comes with a 90 page book (Better Body) on inversion (ours turned up missing and we had to call customer service) and a 14 minute video on set up, safety and recommended use. This is a must-watch. If you do not have a way to play a DVD, you should find some way to do so as the information is vital to adjusting the table to your height and the safety information tells you how to secure your ankles against falls which, head-down, are very dangerous. Needless to say, children should be monitored closely while using the inversion table.The unit also comes with a laminated use guide that clips to the table with a chain. This is a nice touch, and important, as safe usage is paramount when inverting.The table weighs 62 pounds and measures 45 inches x 28 inches x 58 inches. The maximum height for any user is 6'6", the minimum is 4'8". Maximum weight: 300 pounds.There are accessories available such as gravity boots that allow full inversion to be more comfortable on the ankles. The standard ankle clamp is a soft rubber cup in back of the ankle, with a pin-lock rubber padded bar for the top of the instep. When locked into the clamp, your foot is secured above the ankle bone by firm pressure. It seems you have to add a t-bar to use the gravity boots. The boots also afford a gentler angle to the joints, so if you have joint problems and find the ankle clamp uncomfortable, you might want to spring for the extra $100 it costs to upgrade to the boots.Assembly was just a few pieces, it took longer, actually, to watch the DVD.We don't bother to fold it up, because it's in our basement gym, but it would fit in the corner of a master bedroom and if you lived in a small apartment, it can be folded for under-bed or against a wall.How does it feel?I am SO happy with my table. While I normally don't like to be upside down, I love the feeling of stretching my spine while I hang downwards. I have not achieved the 90 degree setting yet but I am confident I will do so. I use the table first thing in the morning to stretch after sleeping and it makes me stand up, after I get off, like I had a ballet workout; stomach relaxed, shoulders down, chest out and relaxed. Five minutes literally feels like I had an hour nap, so I do this when I come home or at lunchtime (BEFORE EATING) if I am working at home. I don't do it after I eat. I never do it with a full stomach, right after eating.I do the intermittent traction most of the time. When I get up to the full inversion at 90 degrees, I plan to try some of those crunches, which are said to be equivalent to 10 regular crunches.Warranty InformationTeeter Hang Ups home-use inversion products are backed with a full 5-year warranty. During the period starting with the day of retail purchase and continuing for 5 years, STL International, Inc. extends to the original consumer purchaser a warranty against defects in materials, workmanship, fabrics, and padding.Note that commercial use of home equipment voids all warranties. Teeter Hang Ups commercial line is backed with a full 2-year warranty</review_text>
By all indications this stuff is really easy to use and is best for our health.  I'm on my second shipment and highly recommend it to anyone who is interested in keeping their health while enjoying a sweet flavor.  Tastes just like sugar without any negative attributes</review_text>
I really like the product, my snowboard rack hooked up great to my car and I am happy.  There are a few things I didn't enjoy.  There is no key lock.  it has a mechanism to keep it locked, but it is annoying to get it unlocked.  Also, I couldn't find anywhere in the product description how many clamps were included, 4, and I ended buying two.  Needless to say I didn't have to and you don't either</review_text>
I have been completely satisfied with Jansport backpacks.  They are very well made and I love the guarantee.  The straps are more comfortable than other backpacks purchased.  My 14 year old son has had one for three years, and it is still in great condition.  Previous cheaper backpacks have lasted a year or two at the most.  This model has lots of zipper pockets in different sizes for storing just about anything you'd want to put in a backpack.  Great product</review_text>
I've had this backpack for about 5 months now, and I still have a great opinion of it. It holds many books and folders... It can also accomodate my Inspiron laptop with a 15.4'' screen. The backpack doesn't have an included laptop sleeve, so I found a solution by buying the Sumdex Padded Large Laptop sleeve, which isn't very expensive, but very protective and a perfect fit, and just putting the Laptop in the sleeve then putting the sleeve into my backpack. Even after doing so, I still had room for a couple of books. Keep in mind that this does make it a large backpack, slightly bulky, so if you aren't in need of something with such a high capacity, then this might not be the backpack for you.The backpack doesn't have a lot of organization as far as dedicated slots for pencils, pens, etc... It just has a few smaller zippered openings. If you have a lot of stuff in them, you will be having to fumble around your things. I didn't find this too troublesome overall, though.The backpack is comfortable, and seems to be holding up pretty well against all the weight of my nursing books, etc...I am happy with my purchase, as I always have been with Jansport purchases</review_text>
Hey,I decided to review some things I didn't buy off Amazon, but I have owned for sometime that are really great items: the kind I would buy again for sure if they were lost. I would say lost or broken, but Jansport has lifetime warranties! If anything happens to your backpack, all you have to do is mail it to Jansport with a note of the problem, they will fix it for FREE and send it back to you. They will even send you a card while they have it telling you it misses you and will be back soon. Overall, these are such great products, you just have to get a Jansport if you're thinking of a backpack.Also, I am in a review writing competition with a friend of mine and if this review is helpful, which I hope it really is, I would love to have your yes vote!With Care,Sa</review_text>
I bought this for my son, 2 1/2 yrs, who is very interested in golf.  I wasn't sure if it would fit him well, but the clubs were perfect for him.  The bag it came with was well made and the clubs were great for beginner clubs.  It also came with balls and tees - after looking at many stores, I found this to be a great deal</review_text>
good stuff. does what its supposed to. a lot of sweat produced when treadmilling with it.</review_text>
I had bought this item just for fun but it turns out that this really does work! I love this and don't bother buying the larger version of this, I am almost 100 percent sure that nobody who cares about their fitness and personal health wont fit into this size :]  It gives support to your back which is nice when working  out. I had went out to play some basketball with my friend today and after i removed the belt I had sweat so much in my abdominal area! This really does work :D! If you have back rpoblems/want to tone/lose weight then this is for you! I am turning 14 but please do not dismiss this review as if someone that lacks knowledge wrote it ^^ feel free to check my wishlist X</review_text>
It actually works quite well as long as you use it how it's suppposed to be used. You cant just strap in on and have rock hard abs. It's purpose is to sweat away the water fat your body has thus making it easier to lose weight and tone. I use it riding my bike and while I am working out and it does the job.</review_text>
This is the first racket that I have bought for serious tennis playIt's just awsomehas great grip, really comfortable, has a big sweet spotit is extremely light, and is nicely balanced.gives you great control over the ball with good powerI suggest it for anyone that is starting out to get this racket</review_text>
I purchased this knife 6-7 years ago for my husband and it is still in great shape. The swiss army quality is fantastic. I can't even tell you how many times this has gone through the washer.I was glad to see this knife on Amazon just in time for Christmas. I purchased 2 more. You do not have to worry about the shamrock coming off, because it is embedded in the plastic. It's a great little knife, especially for a Notre Dame fan</review_text>
I purchased a ripstik and let me tell you, THE BEST THING TO RIDE! Whenever I go down the street everyone stares and ask what is it. They all say they want one too. The best thing of all is riding hills! I can even go up them but when you go down its like snowboarding. I recommend this 100</review_text>
Owning 2 ripsticks for the kids in our household is not enough:  My husband and I are also hooked~~ Looks like we'll need 2 more.  Fun, fun, fun.  Best on a smooth surface- indoor tile or concrete, not black asphault.  Highly recommended for ages 10-100</review_text>
I bought this for myself to play with (I'm 35) and after all the presents were opened and toys, video games, and everything were forgotten (about 4 hours after Christmas), this was the ongoing favorite of the season.  Everybody, younger (down to 8) and older (to 45) had a blast with this thing after a couple minutes coaching. It's already on everybodys wish lists for upcoming birthdays and such.  This is a GREAT present for 11-18 boy. Fair warning though, there will be some good spills on the fairly short, steep learning curve - helmets, knee pads, blah, blah, are a must (and a video camera!</review_text>
I was extremely disappointed that there was no step counter, yet the booklet that comes with it talks about step counts.  I also found that for a certain amount of distance, it didn't register any more distance.  I took it off my belt at mid walk and clipped it on my pocket.  Now, looking at the review of "juicemonster" I realize now that the pressure of my sweater and jacket over the device had probably reset it.Spend a few more bucks and get the Omron HJ 112.  The reviews are excellent.If you already own it and don't want to buy a new one, either clip it on your pocket (your body goes up and down with each step unless you're an accordion), if you wear it on your belt, do not wear anything over it or it will get reset.</review_text>
I love my Adidas and needed a new pair for the upcoming semester. I looked around at the stores and on eastbay and stopped when I saw the Samba Classics. I like to wear shoes that are low cut and clean. There were some other Adidas shoes that I would have picked but Adidas decided to put some weird birds and chickens or some other big ugly logo on the shoe which completely threw off the price. These shoes are perfect in almost every way. Clean look. Classy. Agressive styling. Affordable.I had these shoes for about a week. These shoes run a bit thin so people with wide feet, I advise you to get something else. Other than that, these shoes were a great buy. They are really light weight and has that classic Adidas look that just sets it off from the competition.How does the shoes feel?-On the inside it is a cotton like feel. no leather on the heel or anything.-On the back of the shoe it is a white leather feeling material that has 3 etched lines.-On the front of the shoe it has a furry little leather feel. It's kind of furry too.-The entire shoe is completely durable plastic/leather feel. It doesn't feel like rubber or anything.-The bottom of the shoe feels like what you run on at the trackmeet.BUY THESE</review_text>
I bought these shoes about 2 months and a half ago and have been wearing them alot, they've gotten wore down inside (the insoles). These shoes are nice for wearing here and there, not for everyday use. They're comfortable, they run true to size but seem a bit too pointy</review_text>
After reading the poor review of this grill, I knew that it wasn't how they all were.  I bought this for camping this summer and it performed very well.  We cooked steak, hot dogs and hamburgers, and egg sandwiches and coffee in the morning.  The only complaint that I have is that, there really isn't a low setting on the stove.  There is either high or higher!  Overall though, great grill, would definately recommend it.</review_text>
Jack Leonard's story is mine too - I've carried this precise model knife since my parents brought me one from Europe in about 1964.  I am probably on my 9th or 10th one.  This knife is optimal - enough blades but not so many that you list as you walk.  (And, yes, one blade sharp and the other abused.)  I am re-ordering this model even though I'm carrying a backup model that is identical except for swapping out the corkscrew for a phillips screwdriver.  That's not good enough - you can improvise the phillips but not a corkscrew</review_text>
everything is fine since I purchased this knife from Amazon.com. it has most  functions I daily use and not too much complicated. by the way the price is good</review_text>
I received this knife as a gift from a Swiss business associate back in 1998, and have carried it nearly every day since.  I have to say that I am truly impressed with the amount of abuse this little tool can stand up to as it's been dropped countless times and overtorqued more often than I care to admit, but has never failed to spring back open ready for the next task.I can't tell you how many times a friend has brought a bottle of wine to a picnic or some remote location only to suddenly come to the panicked realization that he/she forgot the corkscrew.  You wouldn't believe the gratitude as they hear the cork being removed by the unassuming little corkscrew on this knife.One small tip: sharpen the blades from time to time.  A minute on a standard cutlery sharpening steel is all it takes to have these little blades ready for some serious work.</review_text>
I carry at least one Swiss Army Knife with me every where I go (except a plane, of course).  This 3 1/2 inch all-purpose tool is suitable for your pocket, glove compartment or tool box.  This knife has dozens of uses for a do-it-yourselfer, a gardener or a camper.This little wonder has a large and small knife, a corkscrew, a punch, a can opener with a flat blade screwdrive on the end, a bottle opener with a flat blade screwdriver on the end and what purports to be a wire stripper on the side (I have never used that), a key ring, tweezers and a toothpick.  This knife is water resistant and made of high quality components.I tend to use the knives on the pocket knife more than any other tools.  After that I find that the combination of one of the knives and the tweezers are useful for splinters and thorns, and thus the tweezers often become the third most useful tool. I must admit that occasionally I use the toothpick, particularly when real toothpicks are not available.The smaller screwdriver blade is small enough that it can also fit into a Phillips head screw. I have even been able to use the flat blade on some small internal hex head screws.  I have never used the corkscrew, and I have used the punch as an awl.  The can opener blade has yet to be used on this knife as well.The difficulty with carrying tools is that they can fill your pocket very quickly. This small Swiss Army knife is small enough to fit into a purse or a pocket and yet large enough to be useful. While the larger Swiss Army knives have even more and larger tools and blades, they are also harder to carry. Of course this particular knife will not replace a tool box, but I find it amazing how many tasks I can accomplish with the simple tools available in this gem.</review_text>
This is Therm-a-Rest's thickest sleeping pad.  It's soft, too.  I've used it many times during cold weather camping, and I've never felt the coldness of the ground.  It works very well in that regard, and it's comfortable.  It's a great mat if you are camping for the weekend with a car or don't have any weight restrictions, but if you are backpacking, this is probably going to be too bulky.  For casual camping, though, especially in cold weather, this is a wonderful sleeping pad</review_text>
I needed a small stool so I could reach the cabinets over my frig.  This stool is very sturdy and best of all it folds down so it takes very little storage space.   Poblem solved</review_text>
I was making plans to take my 86 year old mother to Las Vegas.  She has a difficult time getting onto shuttles and busses, so I thought this step stool would be just what we needed.  When folded, it is so small, I had no trouble carrying it with me everywhere we went up and down the Strip.  My Mom was able to go everywhere she wanted and do everything she wanted.  And when we got stranded in Detroit overnight on the way back, the stool was a lifesaver on the shuttle to the hotel.  The step was so high that everyone on the bus wanted to use the stool.  I would recommend it to anyone considering buying it</review_text>
I purchased this item for my son who is taking guitar lessons and he need a foot rest and this turned out to be perfect for him</review_text>
This device replicates, in a less stressful manner in my opinion, dumbbell wrist curls and wrist extensions. While it may not provide the pure strength gains dumbbells do, it is a good way to hit the same muscles in a less stressful manner. There have been occasions over the years, after hurting my elbow or wrist for whatever reason, that dumbbell wrist curls and extensions have caused pain trying to do. In fact I got this Valeo product for that very reason. I was immediately able to use it without pain. People with tendonitis know what I am talking about qhen I say it does not take much to aggravate it, and once it's back, it makes lfe miserable. With this Valeo device you can still work your forearms/grip strength, yet do so within your game and pain-free. I have been very, very happy with this product</review_text>
It is really good!  I wasn't attacked by mosquitoes or ticks for a long time at all</review_text>
I like how you can zip out the mesh.  Really great for dining or camping</review_text>
To my way of thinking, there are only TWO factors which keep the Vector from receiving a full 5-stars here.  #1 is the watch face.  It is not very durable.  It isn't even glass.  It's made out of VERY easily scratched plastic.  I own several watches, and even the plain glass face models scratch at the drop of a hat, but this one takes it to a whole new level.  I'd be worried to sneeze too close for fear it may implode.#2 is the fact that despite the promises of being water resistent to 100 Meters (ie 300 feet) this watch isn't...FAR from it.  You are in danger of ruining this watch if you even enter a bathroom while someone ELSE is taking a hot shower.  The humidity alone may cause problems.  Pretty sad when a watch advertised as at the very least capable in a pool cannot honestly pull off a basic shower in a bathtub.Now, with that said, if you take care to avoid moisture whenever you can, the Vector is a fine wrist computer that works quite well in a variety of areas.  It'll tell you the temperature (under the right circumstances, of course), help you predict the weather, give you a bearing on where you need to go and then (after proper adjusting) tell you your altitude.  I found the altimeter to actually be rather accurate -- oh, and those reviews I have read on-and-off by folks bragging about telling the altitude INSIDE of a pressurized passenger plane are BOGUS.Considering what this watch can do, and it's limitations, I believe that the price is a bit high (you can buy a Casio watch that'll do the same thing--and is solar-powered, AND is REALLY water-resistent, all for LESS) but the Vector has one thing that not all Suunto watches, or altimeter/barometer/compass watches come with: that little bubble on the face which allows a more accurate determination of specific readings.  If Casio add's one to their model, I'll probably become a full-time convert.  If you are looking for something similar, but smaller, try looking at the Suunto Observer.  It's a dang-good-looking watch, but the price is considerably more, so that may be a rather important factor for you (I know it is for me).All in all, Suunto makes great products, but water resistent models are unfortunately NOT one of them (unless you are going for one of their products that actually are designed for underwater use)</review_text>
this watch is one of the coolest watches i have ever seen. i have read reviews and technical data about similer products like the casio pathfinder. the pathfinder primaraly has the same fetures as the vector. the difference is that the pathfinders altimeter can be off by 1400' or more in stable weather! the vectors altimeter never really gets off more then 200 feet. if you want one of the best watches avalable get the suunto vecto</review_text>
This watch has everything needed to do anything. I, being a skier, bought this watch to find my way back to base camp after a long day of skiing. The watch a) new the altitude of the base camp b) the compass guided me on a specifc heading without flaw &lt;and&gt; c) it held up to the harshest conditions that France had to offer. Anyone who needs direction in the wilderness, MUST have this watch</review_text>
im a step novice, but i was able to follow after a few trys. i love this product. and heck, you can just buy new dvds if you dont like the one provided. i do, tho</review_text>
I wish I had purchased The Step before I wasted my money on a recumbent bike that didn't last six months!!  I love it because it is easy to use, takes up very little space, and appears to be virtually indestructable! I am also very fond of the included DVD featuring Cathe Friedrich</review_text>
This is the perfect step for at home.  It's slightly shorter than steps you'd typically find at gym clubs and the risers are rectangular instead of square and take up less space.  The risers also have cut outs on the bottom which are perfect for dyna bands  or other resistance bands.As for the video, Cathe Friedrich is one of the best step instructors out there.  I've been stepping for 14 years and found this routine, to give a great cardio work out.  It definitely is not for the beginner, however, with time and repetition a beginner could pick it up.Enjoy</review_text>
real nice scarf  super fast shipping. sounds like 5 starts to me ;</review_text>
Couldn't be more satisfied (unless it were autographed by Jeter). Perfect for early spring games and the playoffs!The best casual scarf ever</review_text>
Got great turnaround. Now if only my kid could figure them out</review_text>
This is among the best skate videos ever. I think most would agree. The level of skating as well as the quality of filming and music create a full package here. This would be worth it at twice the price. Buy now, be happy forever</review_text>
This is a great light, perfect for a "be seen" and backup light in addition to a stronger source.  The plastic handlebar mount failed on mine the first time out, apparently cracking from vibration fatigue.  The customer support from Princeton was terrific, though, and they sent a replacement mount (I contacted them on Friday and had the part Monday).  I may try to rig a velcro strap through the clip and attach that directly around the bar instead of using the supplied part</review_text>
I bought the Eos to replace a small Cateye light that I had used as a helmet light until it unexpectedly died on me.  I commute by bike and I got over 3,000 miles of solid-on or flashing light from the Cateye, but I expected more.  The Eos costs about the same as the Cateye unit and uses the same AAA batteries (I prefer AA for runtime, I'll put up with the weight - this is the only reason I didn't give the Eos 5 stars).  However, the Eos' light is *bright* - nearly as bright as my 10-watt halogen main light.  The runtime is quite good - I got over a week of commuting from the provided alkaline batteries before switching to rechargables.  The light doesn't seem dimmer on the rechargables, unlike some other LED lights.  The Cateye required some ingenuity to mount on my helment - the Eos comes with a proper helmet mount in addition to the handlebar mount.  It's clear that the light was originally designed to be mounted on a headband, which is fine for me.  The battery compartment is secured by a small screw with a knurled edge for grip, and seems reasonably waterproof.  I've used it light rain with no problems and I don't expect the eventual downpour will cause any trouble, either.Bottom line - I'd buy it again.  This one's a winner</review_text>
Cyclists recognize that headlights can be roughly placed into two categories: (1) "See" lights that provide sufficient illumination to actually see where you are going and avoid obstacles, and (2) "See me" lights that are really only about being seen from the front.I commute with an HID light that is much brighter than this one, but I like having a backup light, and also like having a flashing helmet mounted light that I can point in any direction to get the attention of motorists, particularly those approaching me from the side.The Princeton Tec light is one of the few LED lights I've enountered that truly qualifies (albiet, barely) as a "see" light.  On the highest setting, it produces a very well collimated beam that is just the right intensity and width to make it suitable for night riding at reasonable speeds.  The light is less suitable at the medium setting, and unsuitable for that purpose at the lowest setting.I have the same gripes as Kent about this light.  (1) It should have been designed to use AA batteries.  If it were made to use AA batteries instead of AAA batteries, the light would be only marginally larger and heavier, but the burn time would be greatly extended ... enough to make it suitable for ultra cycling events.    (2) The duty cycle of the "flash" mode is too low.  The light would be far more visible if the flash rate were increased by at least a factor of two or three.  Those complaints aren't a knock on the effectiveness of the light itself.  Just suggestions for improvments that could make a great light even better</review_text>
I like the ball.  Personally, my golf game isn't consistent enough to notice a difference if changing my balls actually help or not, so I can't actually tell you if it's truly a "good ball".  However, I do like the look of the ball, the price is nice, I trust Nike Golf to be good quality, and superstitiously I like feeling that bringing out my "MOJO" helps my game...even if it doesn't</review_text>
I use these for a Men's League. They are excellent and have a great tactile feel to them. Great product</review_text>
I am a elementary school teacher and I wanted something to project my voice on the playground. We have megaphones that the school provides by they are constantly out of order for one reason or another. I decided to purchase this to use at school and now all the other teachers want one to. They like  how such a small device can project my voice so far. Now I feel that I can cover more area on the playground by using the megaphone rather than a whistle and the most important of all my students are alot safer because of it. Thanks..</review_text>
Just what you need where background noise is a little more than what you want to yell over for extended periods of time.  In a noisy area, plan on being able to be heard well only within a couple hundred feet.  Well worth the $40 to be heard while saving your voice</review_text>
This is one of the best dip/chin bars out there.  Completely stable and solid.  Just look at the design compared to other models that rock and shake wobble as you do your dips.  Looks great too. Well worth the $60 more than the $100 versions and better than most of the higher priced ones I've seend. Needs some assembly, but don't they all?</review_text>
Can you belive that Nerf doesn't make foam balls anymore?  These are the best substitute that I have been able to find</review_text>
We bought the Hit-A-Way after using their Jr. version for several years. This is a fabulous concept for focused young ball player. An excellent way to get the feel of precision batting</review_text>
Read a previous buyers comments. However, I still purchased this for my 7 y/o. Because of said problems, I made sure to read the instructions prior to use. (Yes, I am a man so y'all know how hard that was.) Anyway, the most difficult part of the Hit-a- Way Pole was putting it away. After the 1-3 minute set up time, my 7 y/o needed about 5 swings to get the hang of this product. 30 minutes later he and my 16 y/o had figured out how they both could use it at the same time. (Helmets suggested) 2 hours later I had to literaly pull my boys away from it. Two points to address from a previous buyer: 1) If you  attach the ends of the cable to the pole correctly, the legs will not cause any interferance. 2) If you do not hit the ball correctly, it will not return, (unwind), properly. I would not call this a problem, but a training/use issue. My sons quickly learned that a bad hit/swing was very obvious, which lead them to practice and master the proper hitting technique. (In short, the ball failing to return was not caused by any part of the device, but by improper hitting technique by the batter.) It is a very well built product and it is easy to set up, take down and store. Because of its construction it is a heavy product, but the wheels aide in the ease of its placement and storage. I would recommend this product. Heck! so does Derek Jetter and Reggie Jackson before him. PS...I set it back up and took a few swings myself. Ok, a whole lotta swings, but don't tell the boys that their mom had to pull me inside to get me to stop. Remember how to be a kid again, have some patience, fun and play ball!</review_text>
I got these for my kids to take naps with at daycare.  They are warm and a good size: not too small like some toddler blankets.  There was no choice of color; they just sent me blue ones.They did have to be washed a couple of times at first to get rid of a strong inky kind of smell, but the smell has now vanished completely.For basic blankets to keep in the car or use for picnics or sports events or the like, these are a good deal</review_text>
This Yakima roof rack system works great and I highly recommend it. I bought one for my Mazda 3 and have used it, along with a Yakima roof rack for 2 cross country ski trips (I live a Florida, skiing is far away). The rack hasn't shifted an inch and was relatively easy to install. Yakima has a product guide on their site to make sure you order the right pieces for your model car</review_text>
If you're as much of a jerky lover as I am, you face the always challenging dilemma: How do I get that great jerky taste without the fat? I need a jerky that tastes great AND is less filling. Yes, I was looking for the Miller Lite of the jerky and beef by-product industries. I'm happy to report Ostrim's Ostrich Meat Snacks fits the bill.Plus, I despise Ostriches and derive great satisfaction that each bite is a victory over their ornithological empire. Cull their winged herd, I say. They are nasty, mean-spirited creatures whose sole purpose is to fill my belly in-between brunch and lunch.Ahem. Back on topic: Let's face facts. We can't eat bacon three times a day. Two is the maximum, so for a salty, meat-based replacement it isn't uncommon to reach for a bag of beef jerky. Ostrim's revolutionary product gives you 13g of muscle-building protein and only 1.5g of gross girl-deterring fat per serving. Yep. 13g protein, 1.5g fat, 80 calories.That well outperforms other bird-derived by-products. Consider this: "USDA guidelines for meats such as Ostrich when used for non-refrigerated meat sticks require the use of at least 3% traditional meats. OSTRIM satisfies this requirement and is approved as a dry-shelf meat stick bearing the USDA seal." (from Ostrim's own Web site).Well sir, if you can name me one other--just ONE--non-refrigerated meat stick that uses at least 3 percent traditional meats AND provides 13g of protein, then I sure would like to hear about it. Until then, my quasi-meat grocery money is going to Ostrim</review_text>
I was looking for a snack that contained high protein and something I could eat when I was in a hurry or to while I was at work. I was reccomended ostrim by a gym buddy of mine. What a great purchase, these things taste great and are very juicy. One downside, yet understandable. I get extremely bad gas from these, I didnt know I was capable of producing such pungent bombs until I ate a few of these. Watch out of that, so other than that side note, these treats are worthy of buying. Enjo</review_text>
I was always a huge fan of Slim Jims as a kid but quickly realized they were no good for me as I became an adult.  I recently discovered these at my local smoothie place and was pleasantly surprised at the taste and healthy nature. It's an added plus to offer this up as a snack to my daughter.  We are very strict about healthy food and I know she feels a little left out sometimes not being able to enjoy the typical American junk food.  I would stay away from the flavors other than natural but that is simply a matter of taste.  I just wish they were less expensive.  I encourage everyone to start eating these so we can start to see the prices drop</review_text>
These little sticks are a great source of protein for that afternoon snack or pick-me-up or as an adjuvant to a regular diet.  It is low in fat and there are practically no carbs to speak of...so it is ideal for those seeking a high protein diet for weight-loss or weight-training</review_text>
as we read in the other reviews, this track suit is cut very big.  took their advise and ordered smaller based on this.great athletic wear, great co. to order from</review_text>
If you want to keep track of times and do a couple different times at once this is the stopwatch for you.  This is so easy to use and keeps track so well.  I would buy it again!</review_text>
Somehow, you don't slip when using this on a yoga mat.  How, I have no idea, but it works.  I liked how it really absorbs all the sweat from my hands and feet</review_text>
People are apparently not following (or are misunderstanding) the basic instructions, leading them to believe the pump doesn't work. Here's what it says on the box that my similar Airstrike 950 came in:'With pump lever in UP position, tighten screw cap to ensure proper seal.'The screw cap is the knobby appendage surrounding the stem connector. The pump lever is on the opposite side, and UP position means to move it away from the pump body. You MUST first move the lever up and then tighten the screw cap in order for the pump to work. Be sure to tighten it all the way, until you encounter strong resistance. Tightening the cap applies pressure to the rubber sleeve inside, which causes it to bulge inward and form a good fit around the valve stem. If you make the rubber sleeve TOO tight and it won't fit over the valve stem, only then should you loosen the cap slightly until it will fit.'Lock lever in DOWN position.'Pushing the lever down applies the final bit of pressure to the rubber sleeve inside, creating an airtight fit around the valve stem. When you have the screw cap properly adjusted, the lever will offer some resistance as you push it down, and then it will lock in place against the body.That's it. Now you can use the pump. When you're done, flip the lever away from the body and remove the pump.Now that we're over that hurdle, the good news about the pump is that it's amazingly small and light, and it works great for inflating sports balls, which is the main thing I bought it for.The only issue I've found is that it's pretty hard to generate high pressure with the pump. I'm reasonably strong, but am unable to inflate bicycle racing tires to their proper level using this. In spite of that, I'm giving the pump five stars here to offset all of those ratings from the people who just didn't use it correctly</review_text>
This product simply doesn't work.  I don't mean that it works poorly.  I mean it doesn't work.  It doesn't pump air into tires.  How a company could put their name on a product like this and put it into the marketplace is beyond me.  I will never ever buy a product by Bell again.  Ever</review_text>
We use it indoors during winter months ... works great.  Must have a 10 foot ceiling if using this indoors.  Most likely I will set is up in the back yard when the weather gets warmer.  It will be very handy to get a few practice shots every day.CON;  This net requires two people to setup.</review_text>
This net is just what I was looking for. Easy to assemble and dissamble and has a huge hitting area. The net is tall enough that you can stand right in front of it to hit which makes it very unlikely that you will miss the net. Too tall to use indoors unless you have 10' ceilings. It seems to be constructed to last many years. Won't have to go to the range anymore to improve my swing. Get a good matt to go with it and you've got all you should need for years of practice swinging bliss</review_text>
This is a great little radio.  It gets good reception, is lightweight, can be secured for running, jogging or hiking. Nice companion to make my workouts go by faster</review_text>
This tiny FM radio is ideal for running, walking, or just using whenever you want to listen to news or music. It has great reception, and it's not at all clunky or obtrusive. It's a great little device that will come in very handy.</review_text>
I was     somewhat please, but numbers are a little dificult to see in daylight. And you need to go to school to understand all its fiturees. And it came without a case</review_text>
I bought this watch for the altimeter for climbing in Colorado - I recently went in January and it worked nearly perfect! Every location I could find an elevation marker, the watch was within 10 feet. The thermometer works well also, it just cannot be on your wrist to read the temp correctly.The watch looks great, I wear it to work nearly every day. I would highly recommend it</review_text>
I bought the X-Lander because I am a pilot and wanted a bit more information when I needed it. The watch is well designed and of good quality. A few things did disappoint me, but I think they are outweighed by the features, however.- It appears that it does not have a second time zone. Why they would not include this is beyond me. As a pilot I want local time in 12hour format and zulu time in 24hr format. A traveler would want time here and at home. It is not there, but is on other models they offer.- The dial is not the easiest to read and I had to use a magnifier to see the units information on setup such as feet vs. meters and celsius vs. farenheit. The display needs to be more vivid. The company does offer a white face with black numerals, which might be better.It is a nice watch, but not the greatest execution of the concept, especially for $300</review_text>
I recently ordered this watch from Amazon as a companion for a LTt Observer to wear in the field.  While the Observer is a more updated model they both share very similiar features and ease of operation.My first recommendation is that you do order this from amazon.com and be wary of the same item offered by "market place sellers".  At the time I initially placed the order amazon.com was out and the wait was estimated to be 3 to 5 weeks.  Since the item was also offered by another seller in amazon's referral system I placed an order and wound up with the wrong watch; turns out the market place seller didn't carry the black face model.  Fortunately amazon got a supply in and shipped my watch within 24 hours....good service.  The black face is a little hard to come by.Now then, to the watch itself.  First of all it IS big...but very light; almost as light as the titanium Observer I have.  The larger face makes it easier to read and Suunto has apparently gone back to the leather (waterproof) band, which I prefer.  Functionally, the watch is a full blown time keeper and (non GPS) navigation system including stop watch/chronometer functions, an accurate altimeter, a barometer and digital compass.  Both the compass and the altimeter are as accurate as I've found in analog portable units.  The alarms are sufficiently loud (unlike the only chink in the Observer) and my only criticism is that the back light is weak compared to the Observer, but that fault doesn't draw anything away from the 5 star rating.  Add the user replaceable battery (Suunto makes a kit that includes the battery, a water/dust seal and a new cap), the intuitive operating system and you have the ultimate back country time piece.Suunto was the first to offer this type of time piece and, in my opinion, still offers the best.  I've used their diving computers and field compasses for years and am a fan of the company's many products.  I don't think there's a clunker in the catalog</review_text>
This watch screams high-tech, and anyone venturing off to a comic book convention is bound to get a few nods from people dressed in Sith Lord garb and even a wicked witch or two.So it's big, real big, but cool.  If you want a little more discreet, go with the Observer.The new synthetic band that has replaced the leather is a real improvement.  After all, whoever heard of a sports watch with a leather band?  The idea is absolutely absurd.  HOWEVER, the back eyelit got chafed and worn away the first two weeks.  Of course, it doesn't show, but it's annoying, especially considering this isn't an el cheapo watch.If you're into mountain biking, running, swimming, hiking, or training of any sort, this is the watch for you.  It doesn't have super sports specific functionality, but in my experience I've never used stuff like that in any case, so this watch accomodates me perfectly.And women DROOL over it.  Well, sorta</review_text>
*****This is an upscale designer water bottle, top of the line, and so much fun. The designs Of Sigg's water bottles are gorgeous, from the plain, solid color bottles, to the ones with intricate designs. They are simply beautiful! I switched from regular plastic water bottles because of health concerns, thinking it would take more work to maintain. These do necessitate regular cleaning (I clean mine every day), but having something so beautiful to drink from makes the cleaning fun. Sort of like my rings, glasses, and watch, I now consider my Sigg personal water bottle a vital accessory, reminding me to drink more water, making a statement about my values, and expressing myself with a special design. Yes, all in a water bottle!Sigg of Switzerland water bottles are very high quality, made of light aluminum on the outside, slightly insulated, and covered with a special powder coat on the inside that prevents any leaching whatsoever, unlike plastic and polycarbonate water bottles. They are light, durable, and perfect for any activity. Well water tastes spectacular in these bottles, just like from the tap.Sigg bottles come with several different types of tops. I bought the screw top because I don't like sports tops, and I don't mind unscrewing the top when I want a drink. It is totally leakproof, which is important to me. The top is pretty and can be hooked onto a carabiner. I get comments on it all the time, "What's that? I love it!" The sports top version is ok; I just am not a fan, as I don't feel like I can get enough water from the little stream from the sports top. However, for convenience, you might prefer it. For children, there is a cap-type top. All are leak-proof. If you are ever unsatisfied with the top, you can buy a screw top separately to fit your Sigg bottle.Sigg makes their personal water bottle in .6L and 1L in this style. I have both. I use the .6L for sports activities because they are smaller. When I won't have to carry the container, I like the larger bottle. Sigg also makes a smaller .3L bottle for children that is a perfect size for young people. You can buy Siggs in alternative sizes too, such as .75L, .4L (for kids), .6L, .5L. You can occasionally find this bottle in the 1.5L size, also. Search Amazon for the perfect size.Pick a style and pattern you like, as this bottle is a personal accessory, and should reflect your style. The colors are vibrant and even prettier than they seem in the pictures on Amazon.They are expensive, but they are so durable that you can plan on them lasting many years. I consider them both an accessory and an investment in my health, so they are well worth it value-wise for me.Highly recommended.****</review_text>
I bought this for my 20 month old son for daycare because at his school the children take naps in sleeping bags...It was a little more money than your average small sleeping bag at Target, but it was well worth it!  It is so soft, well made, cute pattern, and thick...I highly recommend it!  Also, it says only to hand wash it and let it air dry...I hate mildewy smells so I just threw it in the washer and then in the dryer...it came out perfect...and dried completely...My son loves it too</review_text>
3 of my buddies with SG2's have upgraded to SG3 after seeing mine.  Screen uses larger (bold) numbers and is easier to read.  Grahics are excellent and very helpful versus SG1 or 2. Easy to learn and use.  I get 2 1/2 rounds before needing to replace the AA batteries.  Decided to buy rechargable AA batteries, to save the environment.  You may want to consider the SG4 with the built in rechargable battery</review_text>
These green fuzzy balls are good for practicing.  They are pretty good and lasts a while.  To be honest, I can't really tell the difference between these balls and all the other good tennis balls out there</review_text>
Small, light and easy to use once calabrated...a wealth of information...solidly built with sturdy belt clip...very satisfied...John H</review_text>
This is my second one of these, I lost the first one :(. I have had absolutely no problem. I think the trick to getting it to work is measuring your normal day to day stride so it will always record your steps no matter your speed.I gave it a 4 because yes the directions seem at first to be difficult but I figured out what they meant and found it easy to setup.</review_text>
This was the most reliable pedometer I have owned so far -- and I've had a few duds.  It worked great for 3 years until I dropped it on a hard tile floor and it broke.  I esp. like the button guard.  I have the fancy Omron pedometer, but it's too easy to accidentally push the wrong button...I am definitely getting another one of these pedometers</review_text>
Having used this pedometer for several weeks I have found that it does not always record your activity.  Like a previous reviewer, I have noticed from my first usage that it may not record your steps when you are not walking quickly.  But in the past few days I have also found that it does not always record vigorous walking either.  It simply stops recording entirely at times.  I have another pedometer, costing less than half of what this one cost, without all the bells and whistles, but it is accurate and dependable.  This product is not only not worth the price being charged for it, but given its inaccuracy, is not  worth any price</review_text>
The Kit is just what I needed to start my at home workout program. Can't say enough about the lay out of the workouts and the bands. I also recommend the Backsmart fitness Plan, I have been using both of these workouts and Green's other books and making great progress</review_text>
This ball would have been great had our cat not gotten to it.  If you have animals that like balls or small children who like to chew, get a ball that is coated or just a rubber ball.  My older daughter still plays with it though</review_text>
This is the best deal ever. They are amazing backupguns. They are easy to cock and shoot fast. They are accurate close but lose accurcy farther away. They are great backups and begginers guns it is a great deal for only $[...]</review_text>
Does this Gun Have The Orange Tip At All?....In The Pictures I Don't See An orange Tips, Which Will Lead To Jail, Because It Must Have an Orange Tip..</review_text>
this gun is the best gun i have ever shot. it is acuret to 50 feet. this gun is the best</review_text>
one word "great". don't listen to anyone. buy it and try it youself. then you will know if it is good or bad</review_text>
Its lite weight, comfortable & sturdy.Could have more uprite position. Can fix this by adjusting position of bracket to arm rest. (very easy fix).  GREAT PRICE</review_text>
Thank you for an excellent product. I think these glasses are not obtainable in Europe, except ordering via internet from the U.S. Only a few basketball coaches know about their existence. You should begin to deliver to Europe also. Now you deliver only in the U.S. I got my glasses with the help of an American friend</review_text>
These are extremely sturdy made from metal, no plastic at all.  Not plastic like the other ones in this price range.  Also can change height</review_text>
By studying reviews on Amazon and elsewhere, I narrowed my choice to this Stamina 15-4600a bike or the similarly priced Lifecycle.  I had a hard time choosing, could have gone either way.  I also considered recumbent bikes costing far more.I've seen some misleading or exaggerated reviews before, but guess what this bike really is that good!  You are probably considering paying hundreds more, because you are skeptical something this cheap could be very good.  I think for 90% of people this is definitely good enough!It's compact and low, which means we are comfortable putting it in our living room where a bigger bike would have been an eyesore in the way.  It's also comfortable (wide seat/good handle grip) and sturdy (doesn't wobble in use).  There is a low gap in the space between the seat and pedals, great for mobility impaired people so they don't have to high step to straddle it as they would most bikes.  However mobility impared people will have anything to pull themselves up with on this bike since everything is low.  There is nothing to obstruct your view, which makes this great to place in front of a tv.I think this is a fantastic buy, I encourage you to stop looking and just get this one.</review_text>
Needed a recumbent bike for physical therapy on knees.  It is comfortable,and easy to use as opposed to the upright bike.  Seat is cushioned and bars on sides are very convenient.  I need to go forward and backward, for different muscles, so it works just fine.  enjo</review_text>
It is  very quite, breaks down easily for quick storage and is rather small making it a perfect addition to my dorm room. Having put over 150 miles on it so far, I can honestly say I have no complaints</review_text>
Very good product for the money. Substantial weight so you do not feel like you are not stable and the electronics, while simple work fine for time tracking, etc. I highly recommend if you want an easy to assemble, comfortable recumbant bike that fits easily in limited space. Good product</review_text>
I purchased this as a Christmas present for myself and couldn't be happier.  Fits great in a small space and is extremely quiet.  : ) I had read other reviews about customers receiving this item damaged in shipping.  I did not have that problem and found the bike very simple to assemble.  Can't go wrong with this--especially for the price!</review_text>
My son will not play soccer without this headband. He loves it</review_text>
Quick shipping. Item was on backorder and they sent an upgrade. Great customer service</review_text>
I ordered it on Dec. 6 and already received it. Compared with the similar ones in local malls, the quality is high and price is low, even with the shipping cost.  I sure will buy stuff from the company again.</review_text>
I recently purchased - and returned - a Bowflex Ultimate 2 and I wanted to convey just how disappointed I was with the whole experience.My equipment arrived on January 10th.  As I opened the boxes, I realized that not only were there no assembly instructions, there weren't any user instructions on how to modify the machine to do the different exercises.  I contacted Bowflex immediately and was told that a mistake had been made, but that I could download the assembly instructions from the website.  I was also told that a user manual would be sent to me.One week later on January 17th, I contacted Bowflex because I had not yet received the user guide and because during the assembly of the Ultimate 2, I noticed that one of the plastic balls that prevents the cables from coming off the cables was broken.  The representative I spoke to again pledged to send me a user manual and a replacement ball so that I could use the machine.  I asked if they could be overnighted because the machine was unusable to me with the broken ball (which allowed the cable to pull through) and without a users guide.  The representative said she would expedite the order but that she could not overnight it.  She told me she  could not tell me for certain when it would arrive.By the end of day, Friday, January 19th, it was apparent to me that the items would not be arriving before the weekend and that it would be more than three weeks from the day I ordered the machine before I would be able to use it.  It was very frustrating to me that Bowflex would not overnight these items so I could fix and use the machine as soon as possible.  These items did not arrive until 7 days later, making it a full month from the date of my order before the equipment would have been functional.For these reasons, I elected to return the equipment to Bowflex.  I was expecting far better customer service for something that cost over $2,000.  Making matters far worse was the cost for me to return the items to Bowflex.  Using UPS as Bowflex recommended and knowing that the cost for Bowflex to ship the items to me was about $200, I expected it to cost about $200 to ship the items back to Washington.  However, because all returns must go to Virginia, the cost to ship the items via UPS Ground in the original boxes to Virginia was $489 - more than double the original amount.  I'm assuming that two reasons explain the cost difference 1) Bowflex must get some sort of discount from UPS for all of its shipping traffic 2) naturally, it is more expensive to ship from California to Virginia than it is to ship to Washington.  Regardless of the reason, my Bowflex ownership experience was only made worse by the fact that I had to spend 25% of the original purchase price to ship the item back.This whole experience has made it very difficult for me to ever have anything good to say to anyone about my experience owning Nautilus equipment.</review_text>
I've been carrying a Leatherman Squirt S4 for about 5 years.  During that time I've lost two of them.  When that sad day comes, I always  immediately replace it.Don't let the size fool you.  If you're looking for a really useful little tool that is also unobtrusive, you will not go wrong with the S4.  It is perfect for handling those daily little office and home chores.  90% of the time, I reach for the scissors.  They operate smoothly and cut well.  The actual knife blade is small, but works well enough considering the size and it ideal for cutting tape on a mail package.  The tweezers can be used to remove that occassional splinter.I did make the mistake of buying a Micra at one point.  The S4 is a much more refined and useful tool.  The S4 has nice smooth edges for comfortable carry and you can use the tools without opening the scissors.  In contrast, the Micra has rough edges and awkward functional design.[...</review_text>
This is my first Leatherman brand tool although I have owned other fold-out imitations. This thing works smoothly and is incredibly light. Very handy for the pocket or the keychain. This will be one tool that will be in my camping bag.</review_text>
It's a great product and I use it everyday.  It's easy to assemble and easy to mount.  I highly recommend it for anyone who wants to improve on their pull ups.   My pull ups have gone from 11 to 19 in a month</review_text>
I use this product with my P90X workout DVD's, and it is excellent.  gives you the workout you need to build your upper body muscle.</review_text>
Unmistakably easy to assemble.  "Installs" even quicker.  The only drawback would be the small divots left on the trim.  Otherwise, fantastic</review_text>
Received my Door Gym yesterday, had it put all together in about 5 minutes, and I was up and hanging. Also worked great for pushups.  With such poor directions, it took a couple of minutes to figure out what bolts should go where, but once I did, it was a cinch.For those that had problems with assembly, or are considering purchasing the Door Gym, here's the deal. The hex head bolts are installed vertically, where the 90 degree bend tubes connect to the horizontal bar. Use the silver washers with these. The rounded bolt heads are the ones used to attach the plastic bar to the two 90 degree bend tubes together at the back, and will be installed horizontally. Use the smaller black washers with these.  Looking underneath the rounded bolt head, you will see that it is four-sided for a short length, and not round.  Now, looking at the plastic bar with the pad, if you look in the holes where the bolts go, you will see that they have a square opening. The square part of the bolt HAS to be pushed into the square opening.  If it's not, you won't have the length necessary to securely screw on the cap nut.  This is why several people had issues with it.Great product, and would be even better if it had easily understood, and complete directions.</review_text>
I love my door gym.  Used it for over a year no issues.  Actually gave my first one to family becaused they loved it so much and had to get another.  Holds my weight well and works for both the pullup and ab workout.  Great product!!  100% satisfaction</review_text>
This is really a neat invention. I live in an apartment and didn't have any place to do pull-ups. Bought this item and problem solved! It's rock solid and very easy to install and uninstall. It does leave some minor marks on the frame, but no big deal</review_text>
After reading the reviews, I wondered if I'd be able to assemble this product.  It's hard to be certain when half the reviews say "completely worthless", and the other half say "awesome product."  After the speedy delivery by Karate Depot, I was satisfied.  It took less than 10 minutes to put together.  The screws, for some reason, are just barely long enough to fit.  There are only two pairs of screws, so if you try using the wrong pair in the wrong holes, you're not going to get anywhere; with the included washers, there is just barely enough room for the bolts.  This is not helped by the almost humorously poor instructions.  Perhaps these factors caused the other reviewers to be disappointed; or perhaps the screws were mispackaged in their boxes and were actually too short.  In my case, I've had the product for about two months, and have done around 75 pull-ups a week, and have had no problems whatsoever.Once put together, the product works great on doors that meet its specifications (you can see the specs online, so check before you buy!  Most standard doors will work).  I definitely recommend an old sock or other added cushioning; there is not damage to the wall above the door, but there are occasional black streaks.  These streaks can be removed easily with a cleaning product such as a magic eraser, so I'll accept them over other pull-up bars that require drilling into the door frame.I highly recommend this product.  Trust me, this thing can be put together and used without coming down on your head. I think pull-ups are a great exercise, and I know of no easier way to do them in the comfort of your home.</review_text>
This is a great teaching devise that is portable, and enables  good hand/eye coordination. It's great for getting your timing down. It is a little heavy for my 11 year old son, thank goodness for the wheels to help move it around. Very easy to set up.</review_text>
im new at airsoft so i can't really compare with any other guns, but i got mine the other day and it's awesome. really accurate, hop up helps alot, add ons that its comes with are great, shipping was really fast came earlier then they said it would, 8 day i think, low price, great for beginners</review_text>
I got this gun about a year ago after my friend got a really bad gun. It was better than his but not by much. The batteries are good value and have a good charge rate. The stock on my broke off but now it looks even cooler than with the stock on the gun. The sights were ok but not the best in the world. The barrels dont help much and just make the gun look cool but if you drop the gun on the barrel they will snap. Semi-auto was great for 1 shot fireing. Full auto was ok for auto. The magazines I got held 40 shots and ran out very quickly the only bad part about the magazines are that they break really easly. I hope this helped you in your airsoft gun buying</review_text>
this gun is the best gun I own it doesnt curve at all the scope isnt the best but the laser and origonal sight make up for it.  The clip runs out fast so you might want to get a extra mag or a back up gun.this gun is soooooooo cool you have to buy it.pros: 1 it is accurate2 it comes with a lot of accesories3 it is practically a give awaycons: 1 clip runs out fast2 scope isnt that good3 took 9 days to arrivethis hasnt jammed on me once</review_text>
This gun luckly has a button not a peice of plastic sticking out in which you pull to get the clip out. The reason i say this is that my freinds gun cant remove the clip becuse this peice broke so thaTS A GOOD THING ON THIS GUN. IT LOOKS DURABLE AND THERES NOT THAT MAN7Y PEICES THAT LOOK LIKE THEY WILL FALL OFF. iam still waiting for it to get shipped it said it will take 3 to 9 days even know i paid $18.00 for shipping dont you think that sucks. i take one star off for the shipping price</review_text>
Hi this looks like a sweet deal i was wondering wat type of m16 magazine will work with this airsoft gun thx to the person who answers</review_text>
The item I ordered came exactly as described, quick delivery, very pleased. Would buy again from this person</review_text>
It was a gift for my husband . I think he likes it he said no negative feedback</review_text>
This is an inexpensive machine and when you get it you can see why.Still probably worth the money if you actually use it while watching tv.For people who essentially want the machine to show up and the weight to come off might hate it as might those who think feeling the burn is the only way to go but I think its the best way to burn about 400 calories while watching a single tv show without killing your back.You can sustain the zero resistance level twist for an hour straight and break a light sweat, lo level cardio. At that rate (as a tummy toning cardio machine - for which it is excellent!!!) you can burn between 7 and 9 calories per minute. I know this because I also own the body bugg calorie management armband and measured calories burned for a one hour work out.  I loved it because Its a great way to avoid just sitting there when you want to watch tv. I've killed myself with brutal kick boxing workout for the same calorie burn in shorter time - this is less stress on the back. I thought the video was a demonstration and I recommend only using it once to see the different exercises. As a workout video I give it a negative 3 out of 10.The absolutely best thing is that this isn't a HARD workout but it does burn the long term (45 minute to an hour) calories. Because of that I think its sustainable motivation- people who hate their workout machine will not use them and they end up in the garage.This is my new tv chair</review_text>
Used this Digital Compass for about 20 days and am returning it. It  does not seem to be capable of giving reliable directions. The same position - try the reading twice and the directions are off wildly. Tried in open fields, inside my home and the same. Tried calibrating a dozen times and setting the Declination correctly, but no change</review_text>
Really well made and solid feeling.  Easy to use (has good instructions too).  Small enough to clip onto the fanny pack or backpack.  Numbers are big enough to easily read.  Looks cool too :</review_text>
I needed this product for better stretching and light exercise.  It arrived in great shape and in record time</review_text>
I wanted to purchase another Ab Slider because my original one finally gave out after years of great service. The slider is a great adjunct to ab training.  The 4 star rating is based on the shipping ripoff of $16.95 for a product that sells for $22.00,  not the quality or usefulness of the product</review_text>
this gun is very good. its amazingly good for the about $20 itl b with shipping. this gun shoots about 80 feet acurately. it is very good but runs out of ammo faster than you'd think so get and extra high cap mag with the order</review_text>
every thing on this gun works it it the best buy eve</review_text>
I bought this gun for my little cousin and I expected this gun to fall apart but to my amazement It didn did last to the rocks we droped it in. well for the add-ons the magazine Is all right it holds around 30. most ever thing that comes with It Is cheap nothing like the flash light and that laser (I didn't even get that aiming thing) worked for me at least but I was to lazy to call for it.well to the gun Its self very good just I think It was made for close combat(ya its a shotgun) good for backyard wars</review_text>
first of all im not a kid but this gun is friggin awesome!!!!!!! it was alot of shipping but 100% worth it shiped in 2 days and everything works great no need for scope when you have the laser but who cares! excellent buy!!</review_text>
first of all, i am not a kid, just too lazy to get an account.this is a really good gun, i bought this gun because it was my only choice at the time, but i reccomend it.  it says 100 round max capacity, thats not true, it only holds 50, but 50 got me through a round.  after a while i broke mine BUT it was my fault, not the guns.  just do not take it apart, i got curious and did it anyway though.  it has a pretty bright light and a good laser.  the little box scope does nothing, but it is accurate enough to hit the laser or only be a little bit off.  my only regret was the price on shipping from this company.  but i would buy this gun again when i pull the money back in.BUY IT, IT'S WORTH IT</review_text>
The shipping was quick and the product was exactly as shown.  Hard to beat the basics.  I hope these last as long as my first pair (10 years of a lot of use)</review_text>
I wasn't expecting it to arrive for at least another 5 days, and was very pleasantly surprised to have it be shipped so quickly.</review_text>
I once had a pair of generic Teva lookalikes.  I loved those shoes and wore them until the back straps fell off after a year, and still wear them around the house and yard although the front straps are hanging by a thread.  So this year, when I needed shoes to walk to school and work that would be compact enough to slip into my pocketbook when I got there and put on my heels, Tevas were the only shoe I considered.  Most of the Tevas and similar shoes these days have been reinforces with bulkier straps and soles for hard-core outdoors activities, but this pair was perfect: basic, cute, and packable.  Upon arrival, I slipped them on, and the straps adjusted perfectly to my larger in the toe than in the heel feet.  The soles immediately began their work of molding to the curves of my arches. I was also tickled to find that they had an antibacterial coating to prevent any odors or bacteria while packed away in my pocketbook. I walked in them that day and every day that I have had to walk since.  They feel sturdy and reliable, and I have no doubt that they will last significantly longer than the generic ones that I once loved. Simply put, I love these shoes and recommend them to anyone with similar footwear needs</review_text>
comfortable, straps fit without irritation, no real "breaking in" required, although I would prefer a sandal with a higher arch.</review_text>
i love the comfort of this shoe. it's on a par with my birkenstocks. Service was fast and very efficient. Will probably order more in the future</review_text>
Excellent product and reasonable price.  Very comfortable.  Last pair of these I had lasted for many years.</review_text>
Great for beach, flea markets, biking, hiking, you name it!  Comfortable, good traction, and washable.  What's not to like</review_text>
Great bike for the price - it looks great and a great buy for a basic beach cruiser.  I purchased this bike for my husband and ordered it two weeks before Christmas - I was very impressed as to how quickly the bike arrived - it was on my doorstep within 4 days after I hit the online send button!!!!  My husband (not a serious biker - just likes to cruise the neighborhood) loves the bike.  We have since equipped it with a lite and horn for a real vintage flair.  Great deal - and thank you, Amazon</review_text>
This is a great bicycle for those who like a classic bike with a coaster brake. I am an older adult and I wanted a smaller bike for easier handling. The bike took some assembling, but I enjoyed it. The instructions were good. This is a strong, sturdy bike and I love it. It has the classic wide tires that make it easier to ride on grassy areas. The seat and handlebars have convenient adjustments. I like the black and chrome appearance</review_text>
Where would Roy Rogers have been without Trigger?  Where would The Lone Ranger have been without Silver?  And Pecos Bill without Widowmaker, or Doc Holliday without Big Nose Kate?  The indisputable fact is that every cowboy needs a horse to ride.  And what with the price of gasoline and oats these days, is it any surprise that many of us urban cowboys have shifted to the two-wheeled variety of equine transportation?The other day -- just on a whim -- I did an Amazon search to see if anything would come up when I entered in the name and style of my deeply beloved bicycle, THE HUFFY "GOOD VIBRATIONS" model cruiser.  How exuberantly surprised I was to find myself staring at a photograph of my lovely, faithful "steed."  It's still being made.  Hooray!  "Classic" cruisers are still in and I'm still astride mine (even if the "fenders" are long gone.)Let me tell you about my bike:  I bought my Huffy "GOOD VIBRATIONS" cruiser at Pep Boys in downtown Santa Monica, California circa 1980.  (It looks identical to the one pictured here.)  I've probably logged over 144,000 miles on mine.  I used to pedal it every day before work on the beach bike path for exercise and for just the pure joy of it.  My favorite ride took me from underneath the Santa Monica pier, through the human carnival of Venice Beach, around the boat slips of Marina Del Rey, and along the sand through El Segundo, Manhattan Beach, Hermosa Beach, Redondo Beach, to the outskirts of Torrance, and then back again.  Or to put it more succinctly: My favorite ride was Heaven on Earth!And note: With the barest minimum of maintenance, I'm still riding on "GOOD VIBRATIONS."  Yeah, uh-huh, that's right.  About 26 years after buying my bike (for approx. the same price it's being offered for here)  it and I are still the best of friends; I'm still planting my "cushions" on its seat and still pedaling along the canals, to the horse track, or to the grocery store, or to work.  Now, how many years have you been driving your car?  Think you'll get 26 years out of it?  Will you get 26 years out of your job?  How `bout your marriage?  Yeah, what I'm saying is that "GOOD VIBRATIONS" last and last...But I had a real scare recently:  The bearings in the doohickey that connects to the thingamajig had gotten wrecked and the handlebars were loose in the whatchamacallit.  (Rode it that way for over a year anyway.)  Finally took it in to a bike shop and "Homeboy" tells me to throw my best friend into a dumpster.  "Homeboy" says it can't be repaired.  According to "Homeboy" the bike was basically junk when brand new; and that the fork could break on me at any moment and put me in the hospital.  Well, certain that "GOOD VIBRATIONS" could never hurt me, I put my buddy in the bed of my truck and drove it from Phoenix, Airheadzona to Santa Monica, California for one last beach bike path ride.  I figured that if it broke on me along the way, I'd just leave it on the beach to R.I.P. (Rust In Pieces).Well, we made it from the Santa Monica pier to Torrance and back, just like the good ol' days!  The other riders could hear us comin' up on `em because "GOOD VIBRATIONS" was loudly going "SQUEEEK - KREEEK - RATTLE - GROAN!  SQUEEEK - KREEEK - RATTLE - GROAN!"  Other bikers probably thought he was crying in pain, but I recognized those sounds for what they really were: SINGING!  JOYFUL SINGING!Back home, Good Friend Melanie suggested that I take "GOOD VIBRATIONS" to see the nice, old gentleman who owns ROADRUNNER BIKE CENTER in Glendale, AZ.  Two weeks later and only $34.59 lighter, "GOOD VIBRATIONS" is as good as new and ready to hit the canals again as soon as the weather cools down!  (Why that dirty dog at the first bike shop!  I think "Homeboy" just wanted to sell me some newfangled, multi-geared "horse.")Only one thing concerns me:  My bike is clearly labeled "HUFFY - MADE IN U.S.A."  But nowhere on this Product Page do I see the country of origin mentioned.  Are "GOOD VIBRATIONS" still made here, or are they now produced in China?  I urge you to investigate before buying because "GOOD AMERICANS" don't financially support Coummunist countries that utilize slave labor, threaten their neighbors, imprison the religious, and force abortions on their women.  Right?Sometimes only poetry can express a cowboy's love for his "horse."O my Bike, O my HorseWe've ridden twenty-six yearsYou have carried me throughTimes of joy and times of tearsWe've traveled city streetsAnd journeyed along the strandI rarely gave you oilYou never b!tched `bout the sandLeaving CaliforniaYou never said, "This is bad!"You never once complained(Though I kinda wish you had)You never bucked me offNever trampled on my hideNever had a headacheWhen I said I'd like to rideYou are my "Black Beauty"You are truly my best friendI'll shout it from rooftopsThough others I might offendBecause of you aloneI have known excitationsAnd more than The Beach BoysYou give me Good VibrationsI feel so close to youYou are almost like my kinThrow you in a dumpster?No, I'll throw that "Homeboy" in!</review_text>
The IZZO Golf Swing and Grip Trainer is a great little tool for practicing your swing.  It has the proper golf grip molded into the handle and removable weights to adjust the heaviness.  It's also short enough so you can swing it indoors without worrying about breaking the TV or lights.I have used the trainer every night for 5 - 10 minutes over the past few weeks.  I have seen a noticeable difference in the quality and distance of my shots.  I am hitting straighter and longer shots than before.  Recently, I was hitting over 150 yards with my 7-iron, which is a milestone for me.If you love golf and want to improve your swing, get this tool.  It's well worth the money and the satisfaction from seeing yourself improve</review_text>
Sometimes the simplest thing can be the best thing in the world. Gee, I wish I came up with this gadget, I would be a millionaire by now. If you want to work your arms, abs, back, just use this EVIL WHEEL everyday. Forget about Sit Ups, and wasting money on BIG HEAVY machine. This Wheel can be used for ANYONE ANY age, ANY sex, and of course at ANY place~! Do not worry, I will come up with some gadget next time and be a millionaire! We all be glad I did it~!</review_text>
I purchased a Wenger Rhine Queen 20-30-40 degree sleeping bag which has a detachable hood and liner. Rolled, it was very bulky. The product description said the bag came with its own stuff sack, but it didn't. The Granite Gear 3XL (12x25") sack fits the sleeping bag with the detached hood folded and laid inside on top of the sleeping bag. I was so satisfied that I also purchased the 2XL (11x23") sack for a standard rectangular Eddie Bauer 40-60 degree bag and it fit perfectly (and was a few bucks cheaper). The construction of these compression sacks are very rugged. The material seams hold solidly against the pressure of 'stuffing'. It is great for sleeping bag transport and storage; keeping dust, etc out of the bag over the winter. This a great stuff sack</review_text>
I needed a compression sack for my sleeping bag and decided to check out granite gear as I had heard good things and my granite gear backpack is great.  I would compare it to Nalgene water bottles.  Sure, you can break them but you have to be trying awfully hard.  When I really need the space I sit on it and pull the straps as hard as I can.  This could possibly be considered abuse but it has held up for years like that and is showing no sings of quiting.  Great product and a great company.</review_text>
This is great for kids in the tub - keeps the shampoo out of their eyes. BIG A+</review_text>
At 20 ft. this gun will hold about 1" groups and shoots very hard. Great fun for plinking</review_text>
basketball hoop rules! i play everyday and this is one of the best.                                                                                                                                                                         BUY IT</review_text>
We have loved  this basketball goal. It is very well made and the height adjuster is easy enough for a 9 year old. The frame is very sturdy and strong. We have spent hours as a family playing basketball.The only draw back is, it took two grown men (that are very mechanical) 3 hours to put together. Let just say my husband was not very happy about that!:)But all together, I love it!</review_text>
Overall, I am happy with this product. The instructions were less than ideal,  but all in all the product went together well. The backboard is very sturdy as is the entire frame</review_text>
I was extremely pleased.  The packaged arrived promptly, even during the xmas rush.  The hoop itself is quality throughout, the lift system has to be the best around.  The price was the best I could find. Putting together was definitely time consuming, figure 4 to 5 hours, but it went smoothly.  Good luck</review_text>
Purchased as a christmas present for 12 y.o. daughter. Two positive things first of all: we were a little late in ordering, so was scheduled to ship after xmas, but actually arrived 5 days before; also the price was excellent from Amazon--local stores were selling exact same product for twice the price--free shipping.About the assembly: I had read other reviews and was a little apprehensive, but I also checked the owners manual online (always a good idea) to check out the step-by-step before I purchased, and it seemed doable.It was definitely a challenge and an effort, but not horrible. Instructions say you need 2 people, but it definitely helps to have more--often one person is needed just to sort through the parts while the other two hold the assembly. We had 3 adults and the 12 year old and everyone kept busy.The biggest problem is that there are a lot of steps, but you can't intuitively figure out where the directions are leading you until you get to the end--it's a lot like doing your taxes. One very important recommendation: the parts come in numbered bags--the numbers correspond to steps in the assembly--DON'T TAKE THE PIECES OUT OF THE BAG UNTIL YOU NEED THEM. Another confusing aspect: one bag of parts might be used in 3 or 4 different steps and some of the bolts and nuts look very similar so you have to check, double check, and triple check before using them. In one step, the size of the bolt that is needed does NOT match the size-matching template printed in the instructions.It took us 4 hours to put it together--this is definitely a process you do NOT want to rush through.Once put together, it is a nice product. For those looking to purchase something like this, I would definitely not get anything smaller that the 50-inch backboard--it is not that big. It is sturdy for a portable, and the height adjustment works fine. We filled it with sand, which performs better, but which we will probably regret when the day comes to take it apart and we have to figure out what to do with 350 lbs of sand. However, this will be out in cold weather so water was out of the question.I ultimately purchased this model because it seemed like the value and performance made it worth the rigors of the installation. I knew what we were getting into when we ordered it, and it worked out exactly as I anticipated. So, get some friends, be patient, measure-twice/bolt once, make sure you have someone with an analytical mind managing the parts, and in a few hours, you have a nice hoop.</review_text>
We've been using this hoop for over a month and it is wonderful. With children of different sizes, the height adjustment is fun and easy. The overall quality of the system is excellent.It came with all the parts. I read a lot of bad reviews about the instruction manual, but all positive comments about the completed net. When assembling be organized and have all tools layed out.Be methodical and really study the parts before assembling(both via the listed descriptions and the diagrams)It took 3.5 hours to put it together and I do a lot of construction work. We live in a cold winter climate so we put sand in the base. It helped to level the ground where the net would rest beforehand. Overall,the hoop was well worth the price. Thanks to Lifetime and Amazo</review_text>
I'm very satisfied with this Lifetime basketball system. Amazon's free shipping was great, but somewhat slow. I assembled and setup the unit by myself, but at times two people would have been convenient. If assembling by yourself, just be sure you have a few things like garbage cans or boxes to support it when needed. I even raised the hoop myself, which was pretty easy.I found the instructions sufficient, not terrible, but not great either. The first thing I did was inventory the parts and nothing was missing. There were no extra parts either. I recommend you inventory the parts if no other reason than to become familiar with the many parts.Some readers felt that an optional drill bit was needed. This isn't the case because all of the screws that self tap are also self drilling. I never used a drill bit. But be sure you have a good power drill to drill and drive the screws where needed.I was careful and took my time to assemble the unit. I guess that my assembly time was about 6-1/2 hours, and I assembled it at multiple times. There was a few confusing steps but with a little thought it can be fiqured out from the drawings. The instructions are mostly assembly drawings rather than step by step detailed explanations of what to do.The hoop mechanism raises and lowers with ease. I filled the base with water and the system seems sufficiently stable. I spoke with Lifetime and they recommend not using antifreeze. They said the base is designed to withstand freezing water expansion and contraction. I didn't use sand because the fill opening is so small that I imagine it would be quite a problem emptying the base's sand if I had to move the unit someday.I think this system was an excellent value, but I noticed Amazon significantly raised the price since I purchase mine about 1 month ago</review_text>
I purchased this for my sons at Christmas time.  The newest version is 52" and is product #71284 - I paid $[...] on sale at Dick's.  The boys were excited and were on me to get it assembled quickly.  I worked on it during three sessions of about 90 min each.  At first glance the directions were great.  Upon assembling, however, the directions leave a little to be desired.  Some details were oddly left out.  Still, with a little head scratching (and reassembling) I was able to put it together with little trouble.  When I did have a question I called the Lifetime customer service number and found their employee to be helpful and efficient.They recommended filling the base with water and a little chlorine (to kill algae) but did mention cold weather considerations.  I remembered adding antifreeze to an earlier system I built so decided to go with that (2 gallons).The product seems excellent - I look forward to rocking the rim with my boys during a little 2 on</review_text>
This is an excellent seller. I ordered one day and I think it was the next I got a notice that my item was shipped.  They came in great shape as well. Thanks for such good service and merchandise</review_text>
This is fabulous! I got this within 3 days of my order! its awsome! its comes with a black plaque-(bonus), the picture is misleading, it doesn't come with that strap thingy, but the plaque is nice. It really good for the price, recomended to buy if you collect this stuff, I DO!!! really good product, very detailed. i am happy :</review_text>
Great item for the price.  It comes with the display plaque which is a bonus.  Item arrived within a week.  The box the actual item comes in was slightly crushed by shipping but the product inside was undamaged</review_text>
Cytomax really helps cut the burn and gives you more energy during work outs, and helps with recovery afterwards. Great for those returning to a regular workout routine after a layoff. Tangy Orange is low-cal and tastes great</review_text>
I have been using Cytomax regularly for about six years now.  I cannot preach the benefits of this product enough.  It really does beat the burn.  The percieved exertion levels, the lowering of lactic acid levels in muscle and the subsequent enhanced recovery are all truly part of the package.  I frequently use it before bed when I know I will only have a limited time to sleep (i.e. 3-5 hrs) and have found that I will have deep restful sleep and awake feeling invigorated.  It is also a handy hangover drink according to some of my past roomates.  I have been encouraging other fellow runners, triathletes, cyclist, backpackers, mountaineers, etc to try the product and have recieved similiar feedback.  Many nice climbing/outdoor gear shops have the individual packets available if you wanted to demo the product.</review_text>
*****This is an upscale designer water bottle, top of the line, and so much fun. The designs Of Sigg's water bottles are gorgeous, from the plain, solid color bottles, to the ones with intricate designs. They are simply beautiful! I switched from regular plastic water bottles because of health concerns, thinking it take more work to maintain. These do necessitate regular cleaning (I clean mine every day), but having something so beautiful to drink from makes the cleaning fun. Sort of like my rings, glasses, and watch, I now consider my Sigg personal water bottle a vital accessory, reminding me to drink more water, making a statement about my values, and expressing myself with a special design. Yes, all in a water bottle!Sigg of Switzerland water bottles are very high quality, made of light aluminum on the outside, slightly insulated, and covered with a special powder coat on the inside that prevents any leaching whatsoever, unlike plastic and polycarbonate water bottles. They are light, durable, and perfect for any activity. Well water tastes spectacular in these bottles, just like from the tap.I bought this particular top because I don't like sports tops, and I don't mind unscrewing the top when I want a drink. It is totally leakproof, which is important to me. The top is pretty and can be hooked onto a carabiner. I like carrying mine, though. I get comments on it all the time, "What's that? I love it!"Sigg makes their personal water bottle in .6L and 1L in this style. I have both. I use the .6L for sports activities because they are smaller. When I won't have to carry the container, I like the larger bottle.They are expensive, but they are so durable that you can plan on them lasting many years. I consider them both an accessory and an investment in my health, so they are well worth it value-wise for me.Highly recommended.****</review_text>
My beautiful SIGG Mahardsha Traveller encourages me to drink my water!  It is an attention getter, too.  Everyone comments on how unique it is.  By using it and filtered tap water, I'm saving a bundle by not buying bottled water.  This also reduces the number of plastic water bottles that end up in the trash, too!  Besides, the water tastes so much colder in the chilled aluminum than from plastic</review_text>
I've been lusting after an aluminum water bottle for quite some time, and finally got this SIGG.  I am very pleased, so far.  It comes to work with me every day.  True to the descriptions, your water will taste neutral after being in this bottle.  I have not tried storing any other liquid in it, however, and so cannot testify to its taste properties with juice or anything other than good old dihydrogen monoxide.  I would recommend this bottle to anybody, however don't go bashing it around like you can with a Lexan bottle.  Aluminum can dent fairly easily, but that's the price you pay for lightweight.  SIGG Switzerland rocks</review_text>
I just started doing yoga again and was using another mat that made my feet slip all over the place if I perspired at all. It was a bummer because I couldn't keep my focus during class because I was constantly adjusting my stance. This mat is fantastic because not only is it non-slip, but it is very well cushioned for comfort and durability.</review_text>
Yoga mats come in three basic thicknesses with a newer fourth thickness becoming increasingly available. At 1/4 inch, this mat is one of the latter kind that tops even the "thick" mats (3/16" thick) designed for those who need or want extra cushion. It is exactly two times thicker than the average mat. At 24" x 68" it is also the standard width and length. Mats that are about one fourth as thick as this one (1/16") are good for travel or placing under a thicker mat to provide more traction. The average mats are about 1/8."There are two sides to this and nearly all yoga mats. Look carefully at the 'bumps' on each side of the mat. The larger bumps are designed to face upwards to cushion your hands, feet, and knees during poses while keeping your body from dangerously slipping out of alignment. The smaller bumps are designed to face downwards to grip the floor and keep the yoga mat from sliding. Many mats have a label on one end with the name of the brand. This is typically, but not always, located on the 'up' side. The bumps will tell you for sure.This yoga mat will increase in softness and stickiness with use. (So do most mats.) They start out mildly sticky and increase in stickiness the more they are used. You will want to wash your mat when it first arrives so as to remove the thin film they get on their surface during the manufacturing process. Instructions for washing the mat are included. Once you've washed and dried your mat you're ready to begin! After using it for a while, if you find the mat decreasing in stickiness each time you pull it out, this is the typical sign that a light coating of dust or too much body sweat has accumulated on your mat and it needs a light hand washing with very diluted soap and water. After washing, roll your mat in a thick towel to squeeze out the excess water, otherwise it will take forever to dry in the air. Then, air dry your mat unrolled, inside, and away from sunlight. (Hanging over the shower bar works nicely.)When you first unroll your mat you will find one end to be a bit curled. Simply alternate the direction you roll your mat (top outside once, then bottom outside next) or the end you start from (curled end once, flat end next time) and you'll find it straightening out more or less over time.I recommend buying your own yoga mat even if your yoga studio or gym provides them for you. I've worked in many studios and gyms over the years. Sometimes management has mats cleaned often, sometimes not. If you bring your own mat you always know where it's been. :o) Plus, owning your own mat may encourage you to begin valuable practice at home.For my students who have trouble with their knees in some of the poses requiring the body weight to rest on a knee, I recommend temporarily folding over one end of the mat to get double cushion under the knee while still leaving one layer under the rest of the body. This saves you having to haul more than one mat out each time you practice which can be discouraging especially to the beginner.</review_text>
threw it out and decided to get a floor pump.  Never could get it to impart air to my schrader type valve.  The bracket can only be connected to the frame if the frame is pre-drilled and -tapped, and the pump is kept in the bracket by a rubber band that would have broke in a month.This was the first frame pump I'd bought so I can't compare, but it certainly wasn't what I expected.I give it two stars instead of one, figuring maybe I wasn't doing something right, but if so then I'd have to say operation was definitely *non-intuitive</review_text>
Pros: High Pressure, Very Small, Light Weight, High QualityCons: Heating, Flimsy rubber holder on the frame connectorThis is an amazing pump, very small and works really good. I had other pumps before, but for my racing bike I need to put over 100PSI air. No mini pump could go near 80PSI. This one goes as much as 160PSI according to the specs. When I tried it on my bike, I could go over 100 easily. My tires can take a maximum of 120PSI, so I didn't try further. It is neatly built, with high quality material. The barrel is brushed aluminum, and very narrow in diameter. Towards the end of pumping it gets warm, but it works like a charm. Thanks Topeak! If I lose I'd definitely buy again</review_text>
It was a gift for my boyfriend and he loves it a lot. We can't share the backpack, I think it's very useful with all of the pockets. And I took it by super saver shipping. That's the best shopping feature for me :</review_text>
I bought this when these bags were on sale. A good spacious bag to carry your stuff for a weekend away as a carry-on in flights without having to deal with checkin hassles. It is spacious and comfortable. I wish the material was a bit more sturdy but it is a good value for the price</review_text>
I've had one of these about a year, and they don't get as dirty as others I've tried.  I like the extra length, I'm 6'-3" tall.  The thickness is nice if you do any poses on your back.Recommended.</review_text>
You can't go wrong with this product for 50 bucks and free shipping.  Our son did find it to be a little wobbly, but no show stopper.  If you are looking for a good deal on a decent bike trailer, this is it.  If you want top of the line, keep looking</review_text>
We love this product.My daughter is almost 4 & she asks to bike ride all the time now.  She loves it & so do we.The first time we installed this on my bike we did notice the bike trailer feeling a bit wobbly but my husband readjusted the clamp on the adult bike & it eliminated the problem.  while riding you might notice the bike leaning slightly, my experience is it's because my daughter is looking backwards, not because of a malfunction.  If you can teach your child to not turn to the back & make sure the clamp is perfectly straight on your seat post, you shouldn't have problems with it being wobbly</review_text>
We purchased this for our 4 1/2 yerar old.He loves it.We love it.Easy assembly.  Easy hook up to Bike.Not to heavy for my wife to use on bike rides.  Stabiity is not an issue and it is getting our son used to riding on two wheels</review_text>
I was a little skeptical about buying this based on some of the other reviews that mentioned instability, loose connections, etc. But I bought one of these from a local store today (because it was the only one they had and I needed it today) and I am very happy with it.It was very easy to put together, the connections are tight, and my six-year old boy is very stable on the back. He absolutely loves it and I have no complaints.It's also surprisingly easy to pull a large child. We have a "bike seat" taht we still use with out 3 year old, and I think it's actually easier to pull my 6 year old than to ride with my 3 year old in the seat, probably due to the center of gravity.One last thing - I paid $99 + tax for this in the store. Amazon is offering a very good deal.Happy Cycling</review_text>
My daughter loves the ride and i like knowing she is right behind me. This trailer is easy to use and comfortable for her,the only thing it could use is springs or shocks under her seat. This does take a little getting use to as it does slightly swayto the side a little.You also have to be sure that you have leg length as your seat needs to be up a little higher than your normal setting. We enjoy our bike rides even more now that we can travel longer distances (nice that your child helps on those inclines).I recommend this product to parents who enjoy biking and wish they could take there little ones on those longer bike rides</review_text>
If this had been invented before the skateboard, the skateboard would never have been invented</review_text>
This board is so much better than a skateboard.  I got one for christmas and haven't really put it down.  Definately worth your money.</review_text>
So it was the summer of 2006 I was walking in with my girlfriend in the park and saw this kid riding a two-wheeled skateboard.  I went over to him pushed him off of it and took it.  Well, not really.  I actually went home and looked it up online. Found it for 129 on the home website then found it at sports authority for 99 with and had a coupon for an additional 40 percent off!!  We purchased 1 then went back the same day and bought number 2.We started off riding it on a shallow hill, and then started riding it on some steeper ground.  I couldn't believe how much it reminded me of riding my snowboard.  Yea its a little nerve racking at first but definiteley worth the 99.  I now live by the beach in the south and can hardly ever snowboard "the wave" is my new fix</review_text>
I never knew this skateboard existed until one day in P.E. when we got to try them out the whole period! This guy came to our school with about 30 waveboards and helmets, plus 7 boards he was giving away for free! So we got in pairs of two, and we tried out the boards. They are a little hard to get, but soo fun! Even trying to get it is fun, and it is a little helpful to have someone to hold onto in the beginning. I couldn't ride the board on my own in about 15 mintues of trying it, but I was getting close! I will be getting this board as soon as I can! It is sooo fun! =</review_text>
I bought this Skateboard for my son and it is not easy for beginners but when you get used to it is amazing. Kids can do things never thought for a traditional skateboard, as a recommendation try to buy a spare of wheels.</review_text>
All three of my kids:  9, 11, and 13 are using it --even the girls.  Seems great for coordination and balance and probably less dangerous than a skateboard/scooter.  It is popular enough that they want another.......</review_text>
I purchased this to help lower my back pain from lugging a laptop in a normal brief type case.It has far exceeded my expectations, I do wish that there was something just a bit bigger.  This bag is 3500 cubic inches, and really if you have tools, gear, books and a laptop to carry around, this bag just barely cuts the mustard, but it is the largest laptop protected case that I have found.The specialized pockets are great, even if you are unable to utilize them by designation.I found there not to be enough pen pockets, but I stored them other places as well.The book/file area could be larger, and when fully stuffed with support equipment for the laptop this space is full.I had hopped that I could find a case with support much like a overnight backpack, but this was as close as I could find.I have had this almost a year at this point (most cases only survive for about 4 months for me) and it is still holding strong.  Strong enough that 2 other guys I work with have purchased the same model.</review_text>
This is the ultimate geek backpack.  It was designed by a geek for a geek.  If you're a student and constantly carry around 10lbs of keys and gadgets in your pockets, this is the backpack for you.The laptop pouch is also sufficiently padded.  I happily carry my Thinkpad and a number of books and a binder and don't feel like I have to nurse the bag at all.  It feels very sturdy.The construction is good.  The zippers work well.  The inside is deceptively spacious.For those of you not sold by the millions of comparments for all the geek toys, or with any other "gadget" that this backpack might have, let me leave you with a final criteria I used when selecting this backpack: it looks good.  I can walk around with this and no one would know that it's a laptop backpack - it's not square, it doesn't have 15 million straps, it doesn't ahve 40 pockets on the outside.  In summary, it doesn't look like "Terminator" backpacks that I see people wearing.  And, frankly, for the price, you can't beat it</review_text>
My thoughts on this bag have been pretty well covered by other reviewers.  This is a great backpack with LOTS of storage space and the shoulder straps are much more comfortable than my L.L. Bean.  I recommend this bag</review_text>
I bought this backpack from Amazon last week and I can say it is the best one available, even much better than most of other top brands like targus, Samsonite or Kensington. Earlier I wasn't sure about the reviews about this product I saw on Amazon but still ordered it after reading and looking at its pics. I am 100% satisfied with the product and whatever they say in the product description, its all true.Its strong with many different compartments suitable for your school or business. I have HPDV4000 with 15.4 inch screen and it fits well. The mesh on sides can hold even big bottles, nice feature. I have bought it for school but it has enough room to accomodate ur shoes and some clothes also (along with books). I enjoy using this wonderful backpack. I would highly recommend it. So, go ahead friends</review_text>
I've bought three of these laptop backpacks and this is the best. Well-made, well organized, and lots of space. Seems durable, but haven't used it enough to vouch for it. Will protect my laptop physically with its padded pouch, but also from theft. How? The backpack doesn't yell out "I contain an expensive laptop" - it looks like a cheapo student bookbag. And you can't beat the price. Highly recommended</review_text>
This is an excellent laptop backpack.  It has plenty of pockets for all your electronic gear and cords.  There is also an abundance of room for files and other business items.  The section for your laptop is padded and convenient for easy access</review_text>
This is a great bag.  Very comfortable even with all the stuff I end up carrying around.  There is a pocket for just about anything you can thing of so it is easy to stay organized.  I love that it doesn't look like an expensive laptop bag, which i suppose makes theft a little less likely</review_text>
My son got this bike from Santa and he loves it.  The colors are great, the training wheels are sturdy and it's just the perfect size for my 4 year old</review_text>
I wasn't sure if it was called a waist reducer because when you put it on it makes you waist a few inches smaller or it actually helps take inches off your waist. I was a little skeptical because I have read no reviews on this item. The first day I used it, I seen very little difference. The second day I used it I lost an inch and also on the third day. I only had it for a week and lost a little more than 2 inches without exercising.</review_text>
Installation could be better described.   Wish I had this cartop carrier long ago.  Much better than straping skis/boards to the top or putting them inside</review_text>
I needed storage in my Geo Tracker because my Lab takes up the whole back end. This did the trick. I received my cargo box in good condition.  The only thing I needed to do was to install the clamps to connect it to my roof rack.  The clamps are adjustable front to rear so installation was easy.  Removal was just as easy, so I could run thru the car wash.  I liked the dual side opening, it allows access from either side.  It just clears my 7 foot garage door by 2 inches, so I have to be aware of places that I go for clearance. The smooth finish is easy to clean and looks good. The free shipping also made the price competative with buying local.  My Lab is now able to ride in my Tracker all the time and she's a happy camper.</review_text>
i just ordered it i am excited yay i can't wait to get it it looks awesome i like having something to look forward to too bad on columbus day the mail isn't delivered</review_text>
I have over 7,000 hours of experience teaching on studio quality, spring-loaded Pilates equipment.  In the last years that I taught professionally, I cut down my insane teaching schedule by teaching group classes on these machines.They are safer than spring-loaded reformers because of the bungee cords--springs snap back.  Bungee cords will move, but not with the kind of propulsive, really dramatic force you see in springs.  Over and over again, I watched students do things on these reformers that would have injured them on spring-loaded equipment.In my own practice, lack of attention has caused a moment or two of real danger;  the worst thing that happened was a flying bungee cord cutting the upholstery.Safety aside, these provide enough resistance for a really good workout.  They are big enough that anyone under 6'2" can do all of the exercises, with the exception of the Semi-Circle, which is a more intermediate exercise anyway.  Students with knee and hip injuries reported that they were more comfortable on these machines, possibly because the bungee cords provide less resistance.Also, these reformers do what reformers were designed to do:  in two hour-long workouts a week, these machines increased flexibility, improved back pain and dramatically changed the shape of bodies, just like studio quality equipment would.  (Yes, Virginia, there is a way to get rid of saddlebags without lipo.)Finally, unlike some other pieces of non-studio quality equipment, I can unequivocally recommend these for even very fit men.  The runners, bikers and hunters in my classes really found the machine workouts challenging.Cons:  I have never been able to get replacement parts. You will need two people or one man over six feet to move each machine.  Attempt to fold them up again at your own peril.  Lock them away from children, or vice versa--even bungee cords can cut</review_text>
A little larger and heavier than I expected, but a solid home Pilates reformer. As someone who has been taking classes in a Pilates studio with professional-grade reformers, this comes as close as possible -- and for about 10% of the price of a studio-quality reformer.It's versatile, easy to use (once you figure out the sparse instructions on how to set it up) and the cords provide some serious resistance and a good, thorough workout.The one complaint I have is that the wheels don't seem to be in the proper position to actually function. Then again, if the manual weren't so minimalist, I might have been able to figure out what, if anything, I'm doing wrong</review_text>
The product has been very helpful to m wife and myselff. We use for 10 min each every other day and the results have been great. I highly recommend it</review_text>
I like this machine. If you do spend your 3 quality minutes with it properly, you should feel those abs burning. I usually like to do 3 minutes to the front and then 3 minutes to each side to attck my "love handles." (I just a little overweight, so it good for burning calories and toning too). Good product, try it out..</review_text>
Excellent Ab workout.  I did ten minutes the first time I used it and I was so sore that it hurt to laugh.  Definitely works.</review_text>
This product really does work WHEN you work with it. I feel that there are a lot of people who really want to start exercising, who want to start improving their bodies, who want to look good and so they start out all gung-ho with the exercise and the diet, but pretty soon, the enthusiasm fizzles and they are right back where they started.Before you begin any exercise routine, sit down and write out what you want to get from exercise. In other words, what do you expect? Do you want to be able to see your abs? Do you want your energy levels to improve? Do you want to look great for your 20nth reunion? Whatever your goals and dreams are, write them down and every day before you start your exercise routine, look at your goals for a few minutes and then visualize how you will look after reaching those goals. If you are 225, start seeing yourself looking down at the scale and seeing it say 175 or however much it is that you want to get down to. Imagine your family and friends congratulating you on your efforts. See yourself getting out of the shower and looking in the mirror loving and appreciating this wonderful "vehicle" of the soul. Writing down your goals and visualizing the end results will not only get you in shape faster it will also inspire you to keep on going with your routine.With all that said, this is a great piece of equipment and something I keep by my bed. I use this every other day for about five minutes. It not only works your abdominals, it stretches out your entire upper body. I had back surgery not too long ago and so traditional ab exercises really bothered me, not so with this. If you don't push too far outward, you get a nice, deep stretch. Almost like how a cat stretches when it wakes up after a nap.I think this product is worth trying, but please, write down your goals, envision them happening, realize that you aren't just a body, you have a spirit and a mind, as well. Keep yourself focused, inspired, and enthused and you will reach your goals.Here is wishing you a Healthy, Wealthy, and Fulfilling 2007!Peace and Blessings...john 'the light coach</review_text>
I'm pretty good about exercise and the muscle I absolutely hate working out is my stomach.  I hate situps, crunches, and I'm not big on pilates.  I used to have the original ab slide but lost it.  It definitely works out your abs and I love the counter on this particular machine.  It's hard to keep track of time when you are focused on your exercise.  When I see 3 minutes I know I'm done.  The only reason I didn't give it 5 stars is because I still hate working out my abs :</review_text>
This thing works.  I won't make a lot of crazy claims, but I will say that this is a great starter device to get your abdominal muscles working properly.  My wife bought it and I was afraid it was going to be a typical TV gimmick.  Now I use it more than she does.It seems to tighten up and strengthen the whole range of abdominals (and some parts of the back and shoulders), making you more slender across the midsection and giving you the strength to do gut-busting exercises if you want to do those crunches you feel you cannot do right now.As someone else pointed out, this is really a benefit if you already do cardiovascular or fat-burning exercises but need to trim in concentrated areas.  Exercises like this don't remove fat (cardio, etc., does that--consider doing them with a heart monitor to guarantee a consistent effort.)  They firm up the muscles in those areas instead of hanging loosely and looking flabby.What NOT to do?  (I know this from experience)  Don't do crunches with weight.  I built a nice strong round belly that way once (thanks for the wrong advice, Bally's!)  If you made that mistake, I hate to say it, but you'll probably have to LAY OFF the abdominal exercises for a long time, then use this, add torso twisters (with very low weight) and lower back extensions, crunches (without weight) and knee raises.  You will find that the AB Slide and torso twisters build your strength so you can do the other exercises--a total of maybe 10-15 minutes a day.As with any exercise, TAKE IT EASY at first.  Don't extend all the way until you've been using it for a while.  Once you've been using it a week or so, you'll get a feel for how far you can extend</review_text>
With the Ab Slider you will no longer need to do the crunches.  It workes out your back, ab's, butt, and arms.  The most important part is that you feel it the next day and know that it is working.  While when you are doing the excercise you don't really feel it if you don't extent yourself to far.  I love it and I've lost 2 pant sizes using it.  Good luck with your own.</review_text>
This device is awesome, the first time i used it, my upper body was burning for days especially my abs, all you have to do is 5 to 10 a day to make a difference, they will be tighter in no time, i recommend this to anyone who is doing a lot of cardio already, this helps you not get flubby on the tummy :</review_text>
This is anamazing bright white LED light.  Can be a focused spotlight or a wide beam.You will be seen by cars at night AND you will be able to see the path ahead of you.Because of its short run times,  I would recommend this only to those who do alot of night riding in near pitch-black conditions</review_text>
Although these blocks are made of foam, they are very sturdy.  My daughter (15 months), has chewed on them, stepped on them, thrown them, and generally mistreated them, but there isn't a mark on them.  They are a great toy for toddlers. Her 3- and 6-year-old cousins enjoy them, too.The colors and textures are a fun touch, and because the blocks are so lightweight, nobody gets hurt when they are thrown</review_text>
There are a lot of similar floor mats for sale on amazon, but these are the cheapest decent ones here.  The thickness of this flooring is just enough to mitigate the hardness of a bare cement floor, but aren't so "squishy" that you can't put a chair with rollers on it.The tiles go together much more easly than I expected.  There's enough give in the jigsaw edges that you don't have to fight to get these lined up.  On the other hand, the edges are rigid enough that they hold together tightly.The only potential negative to this set is that there are jigsaw edges all around, and I don't think there are plain-edge pieces available to finish them off.  I don't really care about this, as I don't mind the look, and I don't need wall-to-wall coverage.Oh, one last thing.  Note the contradictory information in product features/description regarding how much you're getting.  It's 8, 2'x2' squares, for a total of 32 square feet.  You can make an 8'x4' square.  If you want 8'x8', order two sets</review_text>
This unit has many features to give you more information than you probably need.  One feature I found to be interesting is the accumulation of the time you spend riding.  You get the trip time plus the total time you have spent riding the bike on all trips while using this computer.  Similar to the trip mileage and ODO mileage.  Only complaint is about the mounting of the transmitter.  Topeak gives you a single band strap which snapped when I tried to tighten it.  I think it would be better to have a mounting bracket that would use 2 plastic wire ties.  Had this broken at a point where there was not enough left to wrap the fork I would have had to find a whole new bracket.It's a good computer at a reasonable price</review_text>
This was given as a gift to my father for Christmas- he loved it! It's great and cranks out some heat~ the only downer is that it's really low to the ground. I should have looked at the dimensions. Other than that, Fabulous</review_text>
This product is great. Very nice construction, easy assembly and fun to use. We have used it quite a bit this summer to sit around at night. The kids love cooking marshmallows and Smores</review_text>
Overall, this is a very nice bike for the price. Before I got this bike I had a 21 speed and was skeptical about switching to an 18 speed, but the difference was not that noticeable to me. I pull my kids in a bike trailer too, and the bike works just fine. The only conn is that the seat is a little ridged but you can get a more comfortable one, I just haven't yet.</review_text>
I love my Broncos bagIt is very comfortable to wear and has lots of roo</review_text>
i have a 02 diamondback viperX its awesome this kickstand fits the quality and style of a diamondback it awesome its easy too flip up and down even with bare feet VERY strong too when your jumping it stays up too dont fall down like most of them gloss back realy looks good durable finish too im satisfie</review_text>
It is cute easy to put on the bike and a good noise level to alert others.</review_text>
My little soccer star feels like a pro.  I only wish these came as a PAIR instead of a single.  It does fit nicely around his little wrist.</review_text>
I am placing my second order with this company for additional sweatbands.  The quality of the sweatbands is very good and they are thick and absorbant and comfortable to wear.  Like the first reviewer, I was expecting to receive 2 wrist bands per pack instead of having to purchase each individually (luckily I had purchase 4 initially and had two pairs.)  Overall I am very happy since they are cheaper than most places and shipping was fast.</review_text>
I think these wrist bands from ATAFA are very nice and cheap. I bought several wrist bands a few days ago and they were received on time. More important, these bands have very good quality. Overall, I would like to rate them "5 stars".</review_text>
The is a very durable and spacious pack. Sits very nicely on the shoulders and back with lots of handy loops for everything you can imagine! One thing that annoyed me was that Amazon AND the Wenger Co. labeled this pack as a 3-Liter hydration pack, but it is in fact a 2-Liter. This may make a difference to a calculated hike, so keep this in mind. But a GREAT buy for the money</review_text>
i really didn't expect much from this product. In fact, i left it in the box in my yard all winter. The weather here finally improved, so I decided to break it out and see if it would really work. to my surprise, i found myself spending an hour hitting forehand after forehand. it really works and helps improve consistancy of strokes and allows you to really hit out on your shots. a great investment for those who like to swing a racket and smash a tennis ball</review_text>
Fairly good pratice equipment for tennis or baseball. If you want to challenge yourself it's better on the tennis court. For pratice during the off season or when it's snowing, this is a good alternative. I recommend this product (if you have the space)</review_text>
My husband and I are both long distance runners and are in our 50s.  We use Biofreeze with Ilex for mild and more serious pains and strains.  I also use the roll-on version on the back of my neck and temple when I get migraines; the cooling helps tremendously.  My mother uses it for severe arthritis in her hands, and my father uses it for back pain.  I recently ordered some for my mother-in-law for hip pain.  She called raving about how much it helped her and my father-in-law.  Its a fabulous product that I recommend for many purposes.</review_text>
Excellent product... relieves pain of sore joints and muscles. I use it regularly on ankles and knee joints. The pain reduction & generated warmth allows free movement of joints</review_text>
Pleased with product; takes longer to acheive desired results than gel but cleaner to apply</review_text>
I've been using ths for about a year now and I haven't found anything better for aching muscles or lower back pain. The smell is not as strong as some other pain relieving ointments and it starts to work almost immediately. Also it does not burn the hide off you like that OTHER stuff in the red tube does. This is safe for sensitive skin and inexpensive to use and lasts a very long time. The spray and roll-on are my favorites because you don't need to use your fingers to rub it in - less messy for sure</review_text>
The product is great. I highly recommend it to people who have muscle pain. I use it daily for back and leg pain</review_text>
I love this Product ! I have burcitis in my shoulder and the Biofreezereally releaves the pain. I love the roll on it makes it so much easierto apply</review_text>
BIOFREEZE is the very best Muscle pain reliever I have found.  I have looked for years and there are many good products out there, but this is clearly the best.  Nearly all Chiropractor Offices I have visited in the last couple of years, use and sell this product.</review_text>
I've been using BioFreeze for 4 years.  While working in the hospital a co-worker gave it to me for pain in my wrists since I do a lot of typing.  It worked immediately.  Whenever I feel the pain arise periodically, I apply Biofreeze.  I haven't used anything else since.  I highly recommend this product.  I've only used the roll-on and all I can say is FANTASTIC</review_text>
I first saw this product at the Chiropractors, and have been trying to find something to give my husband some relief from pain in his neck. This product is wonderful, it has helped him with his pain, and allowed him to get some sleep at night. The roll-on is a great idea, no messy hands, and he can even put it on himself</review_text>
This product works better then any other's I've tried with very litte odor that goes away quickly.</review_text>
Price was great, product is excellent.  Just wished it could have shipped sooner</review_text>
The price is great for this foam roller with removable cover.  The fabric that the cover is made from is a tad slippery, but otherwise it's a great product.  I plan on buying more at this great price for friends and family</review_text>
The Stretch-Out Strap was recommended to my teen-age son by a professional speed and agility coach.  I tried it and found it allowed me to stretch as well as if I had a partner helping.  Recommended for anyone who works out solo at home, or work out at a gym but don't want to ask a stranger to grab your leg!</review_text>
I have been in therapy for about three months, due to a back injury and the use of the Stretch Out Strap was part of my treatment.  It is excellent and I feel should be used before starting any excercise routine. I recommend it</review_text>
I first used this strap in physical therapy, for lower back problems.  For those who are supposed to stretch their hamstrings daily, this strap is very handy.  (Really you could do just about the same thing with a towel, but this just makes it much easier, and provides much better control.)  I literally use this product every day</review_text>
I recieved this product quickly and in the exact condition that was explained and the product itself is exactly what I was expecting as well.  I give five stars for a perfect service and a perfect product</review_text>
I use this strap in my Power Stretch class, and this is really helpful to maximize your normal stretching ability of your body.  It appears simple but extremely useful in the stretching exercise.A small booklet explaining how to use the strap comes with it.I recommend this to everyone who doesn't like heavy exercises.</review_text>
I originally bought a kit elsewhere with handles, 3 assorted tubes with clips, and a couple of accessories.  I love the idea, and have found a lot of easy ways to exercise at home.  My back deck has a wood arbor above it, and I can put these around a horizontal wood piece, and do a lot of exercises involving pulling down (like pullups, etc), or I can loop it around a vertical post and do other exercises, including leg exercises.But the ones I bought keep breaking, so I bought the bulk cable, which is much cheaper than the kit.  It's also got much heavier duty tubes, so I don't need to use so many at one time.  Also, I have the ability to make different sizes to expand the types of exercises I do.One thing to be aware of is that sometimes (at least with the 25 foot lengths), it may not be a continuous length.  In my case, there were two pieces in some, but the total length was more than 25 feet; since I intended to cut it into pieces anyway, it was OK.  I mentioned that it wasn't one piece, and they offered to swap it for me, and seemed very motivated to make sure I was happy with the product.  If the length is important to you, you might want to contact them first and let them know via their toll-free number listed with the product (866-263-0674).I was disappointed with the customer service rep, who made promises to send email with a special offer for a future purchase for my trouble, but failed to follow up - I never got anything</review_text>
This stove is worth every penny.  It has a lot of burning power and is relatively efficient with the gas.  It cleans easily and packs away nicely.  My only complaint is that the burner guards could be better secured.</review_text>
Have used this stove several times and am in love with it!  Love the way that you can fold it up when it is not in use.  Lots of firepower, too.  I would reccomend this stove to anyone.</review_text>
Excellent Pedometer. Tested first by walking 20 steps and it registered 20. Stride is preset so it does estimated distance, but there is no set up, so it is really easy to use.</review_text>
I am very pleased with this item.  The shipping was fast.  The item is very sturdy and can be stored under a bed.  And most of all the price is very reasonable.  Nowhere out there can you beat the price and I researched</review_text>
I've really enjoyed this product and you really can't beat the price!!!  It's fun and easy.  I just wished it came with a video</review_text>
I also own the "Pilates Reformer," I found this easier, more affective, and it seems to beable to do more things my than what my reformer could do.  I have more room to either leave it done or store it away...ILOVE WORKING OUT ON IT....Carol M.......</review_text>
Unfortunately, due to the holidays, I haven't tried to use it regularly but will be able to soon (also other things going on - possibly will be getting a new home soon, currently looking).  But as far as I can tell, I will enjoy it a lot and hopefully get good results from it</review_text>
You can do so much on this, and it really works you out.But it could of came with more clips so you dont have to keep switching things around as much.Going to the hardware store to pick more up.Also the machine came with no manule,instructions, or example's of moves to do on it.I have mat pilates tape and just ajusted the to the machine work out and got ideas form the "Surpreme Pilates Informershal".This is for some one who knows previous pilates moves</review_text>
Bought the pack for a 23 day trip to Africa. I would highly recomend this pack to anyone. Carried on the plane easily stored. Holds any thing you can think to pack with very little stress on your back</review_text>
Highly recommended!!!! My wife uses this pack for nursing school.  As you can imagine she carries A LOT OF "STUFF".  This pack makes it a lot lighter on the shoulders than a normal pack would because of the padding in the straps.  I would recommend this to anyone who is a student and is looking for a durable pack for school</review_text>
I bought this for my daughter to use for college based on previous reviews praising roominess and good support.  The backpack is great with lots of different compartments and shoulder and waist straps that really help balance the weight.  My daughter is able to carry her laptop, numerous books, gym clothes, and a huge waterbottle to get her through the day.</review_text>
I've been a JanSport fan for over 20 years and have owned various backpacks and packs, and I always come back to JanSport.  You just can't beat the quality and durability of a JanSport.  I have to say without a doubt the Odyssey is an outstanding pack for what it is designed for.  It has tons of room, is well thought out, loaded with features, and most importantly, comfortable to wear even fully loaded.  I use if for commuting every day and frequent travel for work.  I can load it up with my laptop, an extra sweater or light jacket, my portfolio and still have plenty of room for all of those extra things you need when traveling.  If you're looking for a high quality pack that's versatile, loaded with features and comfortable, look no further.</review_text>
Pros:1.great compartmentalization everything is easy to obtain (if you know where to put it).2.Lots of room able to put just about everything in it. gym clothes, several text books, laptop, camping gear, etc.Cons:1.its bulky, even when nothing is in it, its bulky. if your one who likes to show off your back or want a sense of style this is not the product for you. Tip: to make less bulky, put more stuff in bigger compartments relative to smaller compartment.2. THe shoulder strap strain resistant doesn't quite work...i'm consider myself an average male, strain works in about 25lbs. if you want less strain i'd go for the Targus or Wenger brands.Conclusion: if all you want is lots of space to put ur stuff w/o the style involved this product is for you</review_text>
I bought this pack as a substitute for bulky roller bags. It works great but if you stuff it to the maximum you may have to compress it down a bit for some overhead racks. The separate compartments give you plenty of flexibility and it will accomodate a shirt folded as received from most laundries. The padding is excellent and the weight distribution makes it very easy to carry.I will also use this as a day pack for hiking although it has more space than generally needed for this. The organizer section works well to carry cell phone, PDA or any other miscellaneous items.Construction is excellent and it is versatile enough to accomodate a wide range of uses.Great value at the price charged</review_text>
I needed a replacement for my Targus backpack that I used to haul my 17" powerbook.  This pack is lighter, smaller (which is a good thing; the Targus was huge!), yet has as much useful pack space as the Targus.  I vastly prefer it; the only question is that of durability, but as my last Jansport pack lasted 5 years and my Targus only lasted 1.5 before blowing a zipper, I'll give Jansport the benefit of the doubt.Supremely comfortable, two water bottleholders, a bladder slot, and plenty of pockets.  Top notch</review_text>
this gun is sweeeeet!!!! ive had it for 7 months and have had no problems at all. it shoots 300 fps with .12g bbs and a very strong 260 fps with .2g bbs and that is a deal for 80 bucks. the small mag that comes with it holds a lot and you can order bigger ones. the sight works good and it is 800 rpm. the only thing is the selector switch gets confused between semi and full auto. all you have to do is move it in the direction of the mode you want and its fixed</review_text>
This gun is fantastic. My friend has it, and i have used it. He, however, bought it for a considerably cheaper price. $65 at Big 5. The gun does go 330 fps though and is really accurate and teh 110 round clip is a big plus. It is more powerful than my utg 870 shotgun and almost more accurate, I am not kidding about this. This gun also has adjustable hop up. Great gun but overpriced on this site</review_text>
i gotta give this gun 5 stars because for 100$ its a remarkable gun. It definitely doesn't shoot 330 fps, more like 270-280 which is pretty impressive for the price. if you do buy the gun i would reccomend getting a classic army clip because the one it comes with is cheap and made out of plastic. Its got a nice rate of fire and great accuracy, just don't try to snipe anybody out. I don't think it can be compared to classic Army, but definitely as good as tokyo marui (better than utg).</review_text>
This light has been so great!  I suffer from severe migraines and some of the time I cannot stand to have the main light on in my room.  This light has helped me continue reading with no trouble.  I have also used it to look around unfamiliar rooms (hotels, relative's home) when I forgot to bring a flashlight.I am planning a trip in May and on my list of things to take with me will be both my light and also extra batteries for it.  The batteries are easy to find in most drug stores.And having it in my favorite color is an added bonus!I am so glad I bought this</review_text>
First, in the interest of full disclosure, I am writing this review under my husband's "real name" because it's his account.My husband and I are avid readers and we often read in bed before falling asleep.  As such, we've looked at and tried just about every book light on the market.We initially found these lights by chance at a Costco, sitting by themselves (the only package available) on top of a stack of books.  We tried them out and they were fantastic.  Most book lights had one of two features we liked, and a lot more that we didn't.  These were just what we wanted.They are lightweight.They are very, very bright.The battery is easy to change.The light bulbs have never needed to be replaced.They are compact and don't weigh down a paperback.The clip is strong and stays in place.Best of all is the swivel.  You can direct these lights anywhere you need them, left/right, up/down, all around.  Plus you can direct the arm that holds the lights to various angles.  It's perfect for night-time or car/air travel reading.Someone said it's hard to find batteries for the lights.  We've never had that problem.  Target and WalMart carry an extensive supply (I think they are 2032, we get Duracell and Energizer brands and they last a long time).  Very easy to replace, just unscrew the back of the light and pop them in.I will say the first lights we got in that original two-pack from Costco (we have never seen them at the store again, it was such a fluke) did have a problem with one of the two lights.  One of the batteries always gets stuck and is next to impossible to remove.  We end up unscrewing the other half of the light where the bulbs are and pushing the battery out the other side.  This is obviously not intended to be the way to change the battery.  HOWEVER this has NEVER happened with the lights we've bought from this company through Amazon - only one one of the first two we got at Costco, and I'm not even sure they were made by the same people, although they look identical.Since buying that first two-pack, we've bought four more lights from this company at Amazon.  My husband and I keep them in various locations of the house, in our travel bags, in the car, etc., and get constant use out of them.  They are durable, and long lasting.Only one thing I have a complaint about: the claw-clip is supposed to open using a thumb-press movement, but I find it difficult to use.  It's easily worked around just by opening it with my fingers and attaching it to the book.  Maybe I have small hands, my husband doesn't have this problem.  It's a minor issue, though.Finally, I love the colors.  Pink, blue, and purple especially.  They just make you happy to look at, but maybe that's just me.  :</review_text>
Boy, do some reviewers have an axe to grind or what?!  You'd think they were reviewing a $100 light or something.  I like these lights.  I have had several for the last few years and they have held up great and been very useful.  I use mine as book lights, fix-it lights and I keep one in my car.  I have even given some as gifts - to the recipient's delight!  I might agree that there may be better pure "book lights" on the market - but there are not better book lights that are ALSO all around good task lights / flashlights.  This one is the best!  I guess as far as booklights go, it just depends on what your expectations are and how you use it - and how big the pages of the book are that you're trying to light up!   At least with this light it's way easy to roll the ball around and point the light where you want it.  Contrary to some weird reviews, the batteries have all lasted a long time, were very easy to change (just unscrew the back of the ball - drop in the batteries and screw it back together - that's it!) and were not hard to find in stores.  I have purchased several sets of batteries at both WalMart and Radio Shack.  If you get this fun light and you don't like it, then you are probably the kind of sour person who's just never happy about anything</review_text>
PLEASE PLEASE PLEASE STEER CLEAR OF THIS ITEM!!!! The listing advertises two 10 lbs weights, however you'll ACTUALLY receive two 5 lbs. weight sets. These weights are actually sand, rather than the iron tubes you get in most other sets. I received a set that was ruptured and leaking sand so I had to return them. But it was for the best because the advertising on these are misleading anyway.The set is bulky and not particularly comfortable. Furthermore, these can't be all that durable either. Finally, these are the most expensive 10 lbs ankle weights that I've seen thus far. You'd be better off with anything other than these</review_text>
A simple concept:  A hinged 5 iron club that bends with errors in your swing.  It does require that a person is comfortable enough to actually hit a 5 iron - which many high handicap golfers struggle to hit well.  For those people who use Hybrid 5 irons or greater, or defer to the 7 and 9 Woods, this aid is NOT for you. If you have developed your fundamentals and have "Grooved your swing" through thousands of balls and numerous lessons, you will not benefit.The value of the club is that it can be used to hit a ball - note that the Momentus cannot be used to hit a ball.  Key difference here that gives this training aid greater versatility.From the original takeaway, if you're not in the correct position, the club with break.  In every aspect of your swing, if there is a flaw it will be found.For the most part, I have found my faults to be at the initial takeaway when trying to rush the shot.  I need it to remind me to get me back on tempo when on the range.  It is an excellent tool for someone with a conventional golf swing with either the 'One plane' or 'Two plane' method (as outlined by Jim Hardy).Regarding the Natural Golf method, I cannot verify its benefit.This club will reveal your faults immediately.  I wouldn't recommend it for a novice without any experience or formal instruction or even a beginner who hasn't the consistency to groove a swing.  It is for a person who has more consistent swing - one who isn't struggling to get the ball in the air or getting 'wormburners'.With just one week of working with this club, I have found some fundamental faults that have plagued me.  After a few weeks, I have developed confidence with irons.Obviously a golfer's swing is a composite of various facets of grip, alignment, stance, tempo, takeaway, backswing, transition, downswing, contact and follow-through.  If you find one aspect of your swing at fault, there is likely a domino effect that will require some other changes in your technique.This tool will not in any way obviate solid practice or a lesson from a golf professional - it will complement it depending upon your style.The club head is small compared to oversized game improvement clubs with a thin topline and it is in the profile of a muscleback more than a cavity back iron.  Thus its sweetspot is smaller than the modern iron for the 'Duffer' like me (I use the Ben Hogan Apex Edge irons with a wider sole and thicker topline).  If you do hit it correctly, it will sail to its intended target.  I don't typically hit a 5 iron very far but it goes about 150-160 yards for me.I highly recommend this club.  It is worthy of consideration and it's an excellent tool to maintain a proper swing plane and tempo.  No other device can help tell you the multitude of flaws that your swing may possess.  It's no wonder that training aids have come and gone but this one has still met the test of time.-I have also reviewed the Medicus Driver</review_text>
I am a beginning golfer, and I love this club.  It has helped me to develop and maintain a solid, consistent swing with my irons.  I now keep the Medicus in my bag to take practice swings with during rounds.  It is great for keeping the right swing motion grooved into my body and mind.  I am looking foward to trying the Medicus driver</review_text>
This machine gives you a really nice workout, and I like it a lot. The instructions are a little lacking and don't be fooled, there is a lot of assembly involved (takes about 1.5 hrs total to unbox and assemble) but the tools are all included which is terrific and the packaging is very thoughtful and well done. I like everything about the unit except some of the connection points where the arms attach to the pedal can get clicky and loud at times (there are no bearings at all to connect this portion, just metal on metal washers which in my opinion makes for a 2nd rate connector type) The heart rate strap works poorly until you work up a sweat but after that it does a great job (i try to moisten it first but sweat seems to work best) and the computer does a great job tracking results too. For $1000 it's a really nice piece of equipment but definitely not health club quality, it's for home use only</review_text>
I've read several reveiews that mentioned the LCD was faulty.  When I assembled mine and tightened the mounting screws that hold the LCD in place, the unit simply beeped and would not enter data or respond at all when various buttons were pushed.   I realized it is a solid state, with touch sensitive plate underlying the LCD and loosened the mounting screws from the back of the LCD just a hair.  This seemed to relieve a bit of pressure that the unit was under and it responded immediately.  It now works fine and I have had no further problems.  The instructions for the unit are pretty well written although they do not tell you that two cylinder bushings go into the crank units on the front.   Other than that, everything is well explained and bolts together quite well.  The unit is sold, sturdy and on par with units I've used at exercise studios.   It operates smoothly and while a little pricey, I feel that you really can't expect to get a unit that is not flimsy if you don't pay a little more.  On the whole, I think the unit is a good buy and a well made product.  Just be careful about how tightly you screw in the LCD unit.  If you tighten it aggressively, it seems to short out or cause an electrical problem of some sort.  Back off just a hair on the tension on the mounting screws and it seems to make the unit work fine.LIN</review_text>
I received this item on time but when I looked at the box I discovered that I'd been mistakenly sent the lesser 418.  A few clicks put it right and the correct 438 model was shipped.  The incorrectly delivered item was scheduled to be picked up during the 438 delivery.Assembly was not too difficult if the directions are read and followed.  I noticed a bit of noise from the start but cured it, I thought, with a few sprays of WD-40.  That lasted only a short time.  The slight noise developed into a loud creaking sound over the the course of 2 months.  After disassembling the arms and linkages I realized that the bushings and moving parts had only the thin spray of WD-40 that I had delivered.  I greased every one with a thick, water-proof grease, re-assembled and now it is as quiet as it was advertised to be</review_text>
Of all the home-based elliptical trainers, this is the smoothest 'ride'.  It's one of the priciest in-home ellipticals, but definitely worth it.  We ordered on-line through Amazon--free shipping and no tax.  Came promptly to our door and we assembled it fairly easily</review_text>
The first thing I always do is take an inventory of all the parts.   I labeled small zip lock bags per the steps and inserted the required hardware for each step. Good thing, after assembling step 6, I found I forgot to install two flat washers.  It was very easy to find out what step I didn't assemble correctly when I discover two left over washers on the table.I was disappointed when I audited my parts and saw that two of the wave washers were missing.  I received the machine on Friday, which meant I would have to wait until Monday to contact Customer Services.  So I started assembling the elliptical.  Much to my surprise I found that two of the wave washers were already installed (step 7).  I was very pleased to be able to assemble and start using the elliptical.The computer did not work at first.  Thanks to a few of the reviews, I tried loosing the console screws and the computer started working.I love how the machine is easy to use and very quiet</review_text>
Wonderful Gadget. The cover helps prevent reset. Accuracy rating was right on at 98-99%.  A little tough to open at first but does get easier with use. Highly recommend this mode</review_text>
Received the order of Multifunction pedometers to replace the single-function pedometers that were mistakenly sent. They seem just right.Many thanks,Carol ConnollyParish Nurs</review_text>
These pedometers are great because you can track distance, calories, and steps but it is inaccurate uses a standard rocking mechanism to count. I ended up giving them to my kids and they think they are great</review_text>
I was concerned after reading the posted review before mine.  I had ordered a Hummer Shake Flashlight and received it today(Dec. 28th)as a Christmas gift for my husband.I noticed the on/off black switch is on, as when I horizonally shook the light the bulb light appeared.  So I click the black switch again and no light appeared as I shook the flashlight, therefore, assuming it was off.  The light lasted 5 minutes, but did become dimmer after 1 minute.  I live in a rural area and it is enough light to walk in the pitch dark of the night.I notice that the warranty is for One Year.We are pleased with this product as our Eternal Light.</review_text>
This dartboard has been an attractive and fun addition to the game room. The wooden cabinet is very handsome - it has a nice finish and is well-constructed - and the actual dartboard itself seems to be of top quality. My one complaint is that the darts that come with the set, while highly servicable, are somwhat clunky and the flights frequently fall out . However, you could remedy this by buying a slightly better dart set - the old darts can be used for kids or for parties. Overall, this would serve a player with medium experience quite well.</review_text>
A great sideline to a pool party - placing it on the patio lures the more active crowd around and gives the party some substance and competition, not to mention good laughs. Even gives all ages of family members something fun and easy to do together whether it is in the heat of the day or the cool of night.  Nice easy scoring included and case gives some protection to outer wall area.</review_text>
Best work out gloves i've had. sure beats the mesh gloves, and the grip is outstanding</review_text>
This is still the best weight lifting glove out there....comfortable, extended finger grips, attractive, & NO ANNOYING WRIST WRAPS! My only complaint is that there could be maybe a little more padding, but other than that it's an EXCELLENT glove. One other thing...I don't understand why it cost about 10 dollars more than the regular Harbinger glove...basically you pay 10 bucks more for some extended grips which there really isn't that much more of</review_text>
These gloves are comfortable and help grip the weights that are handling.  I like them a lot</review_text>
I've been using my Harbinger 1260s for approximately three weeks. The padding on the 1260s took a little getting used to. The majority of my weight training is on machines that have rubber padding on the grips. This makes gripping with the Harbingers a little awkward at first, but I got used to it after a couple of workouts. Only time will tell whether these gloves hold up as well as my old Nikes. I used those for over three years (they were lost) lifting weights 3 times a week</review_text>
My last pair of leather and mesh training gloves where trashed, so I shopped around and decided to replace them with these gloves.  The Harbinger 1260 gloves provide ample padding for protection and comfort while providing a solid grip.  The nosweat (tm) lining wicks moisture away from the skin while the curved three quarter finger design fits more naturally, improving dexterity.  The gloves are fastened in place with an adjustable wrist strap.  Even though the gloves are partially constructed of leather, they can be hand washed to remove salt and oils.  Washing with a mild soap and air drying will help the gloves to maintain their comfort, fit and will last longer.My workout partner uses the Harbinger 143 gloves.  Compared to the 1260, the 143 are simpler gloves with less material and padding.  Since they sell for about the same price, the 1260 gloves are a much better value.PROS:WashableComfortableDurable enough for rigorous strength trainingCONS:Sizing seems slightly small in comparison to other gloves.  I can get my gloves on easy and they are comfortable.  They are a bit of a challenge to remove though.  The next size up is too big on me</review_text>
el material es bastante fuerte y duradero, por el precio son excelentes para los practicantes de cualquier intensidad.  el agarre es perfecto.  no deja lugar a las magulladuras en las palmas de las manos ni en las articulaciones. limita un poco el radio de accion de la palma e la mano, pero eso no lo hace malo.  muy buena adquisicio</review_text>
If you are into weight training, these are great gloves.Well padded, washable, flexible, and great value for the price. The 3 quarter length fingers provide extra protection while maintaining freedom of your fingers</review_text>
Will it work for a m4a1 and hk g3 sg1</review_text>
I am a 14 year old boy ordering off his mothers account. i just got this scope yesterday and it works terrific with my super 9 airsoft gun. if you have read my review on the super 9 from airsplat, this is the 4x32 scope i was talking about. It is a great buy for only $20.00. and if you attach it to your super 9 it is very easy and makes your super 9 very accurate. I hope this was helpfull to you</review_text>
If you have a gun like an airsoft gun or airgun or .22, this is a good scope for you. It's decent quality and adjusts well, and unless you are doing some serious shooting or shoot at longer ranges, this scope will work just fine for you. Take care, and good luck.-Sa</review_text>
I purchased this for my son, who plays alot of Airsoft.  If you are into Airsoft, you know that Green Gas is expensive.  This little adapter makes it possible to use propane to power your gun.  The piece is expensive for what it is, but it works.  (Which is the only reason I gave it 4 stars instead of five.)   In the long run you will save money.  Just make sure to use silicone oil on your gun every eight mag fills.</review_text>
The Airsoft Innovations propane adapter is an absolute must for airsofters with gas guns.  Sure it's a bit of money up front but it's well worth it since a bottle of propane from a local store such as Wal-Mart is a whopping $2.42.  I've been playing 3 months with a gas pistol as my sidearm and I haven't yet gone through my first bottle of propane.  It's not that I don't use my gas pistol because I do on each and every outing which is almost weekly.  A bottle of propane simply provides a lot of shots.  This is where the value of AI's propane adapter really shows.</review_text>
I've owned this product for four months.  I use it for my indoor workouts when weather or time don't permit my outdoor walks, about 2-3 times per week.  I ride for 45-50 minutes and feel that I'm getting a good workout.  I'm sure it's fine for exclusive use but as with all exercise, you'll hit more muscle groups if you mix it with a walk or jog and thus lose body fat more effectively and quickly.  I also do some light muscle toning with resistance cords.  I prefer recumbent bikes over uprights because they're more comfortable and don't cause the back strain.  Also, I haven't had knee pain using this bike unlike when I do high impact stuff like jogging.  It only took me and my son an hour to put it together.  The instructions and drawings could have been slightly better but we got through them.  One tip, make sure the tension line is loosened (= lengthened) before you attempt to attach it to the adjusting wheel).  I've exercised regularly for the last three years and find the resistance settings adequate.  Settings 1-6 are nearly useless because they're so light but may be good for some who are not yet fit.  I do a warmup for five minutes on level 6 and the majority of my ride on level 7 for a moderately tiring workout.  Once in a while, when I'm feeling strong, I'll crank it to level 8 for 5-10 minutes.  I don't think I'll outgrow level 7 and 8.  The bike rides quite quietly and comfortably.  I like how I get a little give from the seat support pole.  It's strong but bounces just slightly depending on how hard you're pedaling.  I'm of average height and build for a man and weigh approximately 165 lbs.  I'm over 40 and no longer do high impact or agressive workouts.  My goal is moderate fitness and low body fat maintenance without workout strains or other injuries.  I feel the bike is sturdy enough for me.  It's very easy to adjust the seat distance from the pedals.  The pulse monitor seems to be relatively accurate.  It's easy to change the monochromatic monitor screen settings with the large button and I'm very happy with the large display as I'm somewhat farsighted.  I have not yet had to replace the monitor 9-v battery even though the diplay has no manual off setting, it turns off automatically if the pedals aren't being used after something like 5 minutes.  I like the fact that the monitor can scroll through the various workout data or I can select them manually.  I usually just set it to the timer.  I've had no problems with anything breaking.  At this price, this is a very good value and I recommend the product</review_text>
I ordered this bike on Monday, and received Thursday even though I did the free shipping!!! Today is Friday, and after riding the bike, I am very impressed.  My boyfriend and I put it together last night and it took about 1 1/2 hours.  I bought this bike after reading the reviews, and yes the instructions sucked but we knew that going in.  We did have to use a few of our own tools to make sure we really tightened the bolts.  Like a previous reviewer, we were also confused at first about the rear and front stabilizing bar, the parts really should be numbered for this purpose, the illustrations do not help much.  But once we got past that, it was pretty much a breeze to put together.I've ridden it today and am VERY impressed!!! The bike is so quiet you almost can't hear it, I really can't stress enough how quiet it is, someone could sleep 15 feet away from you and not hear it!  I am 5'6, and lengthening the bike out is very comfortable for me.  I love everything about this bike, although I do agree the seat could be a little more cushioned, but that's okay.For the price of the bike, I would DEFINITELY recommend it!!  I doubt you would find a better bike for under $200.  Great quality, and it provides a good workout</review_text>
I have owned this bike for a year now, having purchased it from Amazon.  The bike is comfortable (I am 6" 0" tall).  It is easy enough to push into position for a morning ride while watching the news then push back out of the way.  Occasionally the digital display freezes and I have to take the batteries out and  reinsert them:  Maybe once out of every 30 uses.  The display cycles through the usual readouts except heart rate, which is a stand alone reading.  I bike for 20 to 50 minutes in the morning.  It is not an expensive piece of heavy equipment that people buy and get tired of using.  I use it 5 times a week, and after a year I have to say "5 stars' considering the price.</review_text>
-great for the price-arrived faster than expected-the instruction is small. should have bigger font siz</review_text>
I bought this recumbent bike just three days ago and it is already at my house and set up!  It took my husband about 1 1/2 hours to put it together (if we were younger it probably would have gone faster). The bike is GREAT!!  I can't say enough good about it.  I don't know how it will hold up, but it seems to be sturdy and so worth the price. As I said, I am no longer so young, but I was able to get on the bike and ride it comfortably on a low setting for more than a mile. The bike kept track of my distance,speed,calories burned, etc. I know that this is an exercise that I can keep up with.  I am so happy</review_text>
...fairly easy to assemble and great workout for a stroke recovery patient.  Bought this bike for my husband to get some extra rehabilitative exercise but found myself and my daughter-in-law both using it as well.</review_text>
The bike itself runs very well and is very solid.However, the wiring for all of the body monitoring and computer input is wrong, with two "male" connectors under the seat that don't lock in with two male connectors under the arm bars, and three "female" connectors coming out of the front upright tube, which don't lock in with the two female connectors from the computer. Does anyone have an idea on how to fix this</review_text>
I love this bike so far. It arrived only 4 days after I ordered it!It took a while to put together, but nothing troublesome. I'm out of shape so the tension is good enough for me. It is sturdy,comfortableand I don't dread getting on it. It's small enough to have in our family room so I can watch tv, read or listen to music while riding. It's easy to move to get it out of the way</review_text>
I finaly got this knife so I could figure out how they open :D. The knife is pretty good, especially for the price. It is a little hard to open, though that might be the same with any paratrooper dagger</review_text>
This is the best front fender I have found.  It is so well made, locks good and tight in your fork tube and deflects water and mud very well.  Also it looks very cool and solid and I think the price is very fair considering how well made this fender is.  Shipping from Amazon was fast as always</review_text>
This is a class I jacket, class I is the best you can get.  Made for offshore but can be used inshore as well. A little overkill can't hurt, right! The jacket fits good.  I feel like a marsh mellow in it but I didn't by this jacket for style!The photo shown is last years model.  This years model has a total of 4 reflective patches on it instead of just 2. It also has a little loop to string a whistle or strobe device around for a little extra safety.I highly recommend this jacket in all conditions.  Sometimes it's flat when you go out in the morning and rough 6 hours later.  This jacket covers all the "just incase" scenarios.  This is by far the lowest priced Class I jacket.  Heck, it's even cheaper than most dinky class III jackets! Other Class I jackets go for 2-3x's the price of this one.Keep yourself and loved ones safe with a class I jacket</review_text>
Bought this for my son as a gift and liked it so much that I now have to order one for myself.  Great authentic design</review_text>
I carried this bag on my last plane trip and it was awesome! It was easy to carry and easy to access. It has several convenient pockets inside and out. There was a nice little pocket on an inside flap where I kept my ID and plane tickets. Sure made it easy going from plane to plane. It also took the place of a purse, overnite bag and a carry bag! Very roomy and you have both hands free! Would not travel without it</review_text>
It's a comfortable sling when filled.  The "ipod" pocket is handy.  The outer flap is secured by magnets.  It needs at least 2 inner pockets in the main compartment, otherwise things get lost into the void.  Great travel bag</review_text>
I had a Head TI S6 racquet and it wasn't enough for me( not enough control with it). I did a loner from my local sporting goods store an loved this racquet.  I'm a 3.0-3.5 player, the feel and the control of this racquet is ten times better than my other racquet. Great racquet!</review_text>
This latest version of Freeze-Framer is an excellent tool for the home user to practice relaxation and learn to synchronize the two branches of the autonomic nervous system.  In HearthMath terms this state is called high coherence and represents a heart rate variability pattern where the sympathetic (excitatory) and parasympathetic (calming) parts of the autonomic nervous system are in balance. In more simple terms, it represents a state of less chaos in the nervous system which simply means we are in an optimum state that favors good health.With respect to the software itself, it has a nice user interface, is easy to use and you don't have to have a technical or medical background to get the full benefit from it. In fact, you don't have to understand the technology at enjoy the benefits!  That's one of the things I most like.This software is particularly good for people who are working with stress management, pranayama, meditation or other relaxation techniques and want to see the affects on their nervous system and heart.  How it does this is by exploiting monitoring heart rate variability from moment-to-moment.  By practicing meditation, various breathing techniques or relaxation exercises one can see the affects on the nervous system as manifested in changes in heart rate variability (HRV). This data is shown graphically along with other useful information such as the percentage of time spent in the session in high, medium and low coherence. There is also graphical and audio feedback to let you know whether you are in high, medium or low coherence in a given moment.  You can also measure pulse waves and see your pulse rate at any given time.This software also allows you to save past sessions, change many options and increase the thresholds for the various states of coherence. This allows you to keep things challenging as you get better at achieving a state of balance. There are also a variety of games available for you to practice your skills outside of the main program.This package also comes with some useful tutorials and good online help. It is very simple to use and doesn't have a busy or complicated user interface or instructions.  I do a fair amount of biofeedback work on some very expensive equipment and I find that this program has most of the things I need for heart rate variability measurements at a low price.  This makes it ideal for home users or people contemplating more in-depth biofeedback work.If you want to no more about the theory behind this product and how it could help you, you can look at HeartMath's website or do a search on the book "THE HEARTMATH SOLUTION" by Doc Childre and Howard Martin. You can also search on biofeedback, heart rate variability and respiratory sinus arrhythmia on the web.  While I don't necessary agree with everything the HEARTHMATH SOLUTION says, I think it makes some excellent points that have been validated scientifically and that I've found to be true in my own experience and the experience of my clients.I think one of the most powerful uses of this software is to see how different emotional states affect coherence such as anger, compassion, love, anxiety, etc. For most people, it's a very visceral experience to see how states of love and compassion correlate to maximum coherence. It is also an eye opener to see how anger and other negative emotions cause these physiological states to deteriorate.I also teach various types of meditation including loving-kindness and forgiveness meditation. This software is an excellent accompaniment to this type of practice or pranayama work in yoga.In summary, I think this is a great investment for busy people trying to find a simple stress management practice, yoga practioners and meditators. It will help you to develop higher awareness of your anxiety levels and other emotional states. It could also be used in combination with therapy for anger management and other issues in a very effective manner.  The tutorial also gives you beginning instruction on how to increase your coherence on your own and points you to other more in-depth resources.If you have depression or other serious difficulties in your life then I recommend checking in with a professional as to the suitability of this product.  Some things just can't be treated on your solely on your own and I have found that deep relaxation practices without guidance when there are serious issues going on can evoke anxiety or strong emotions.  For the average person, however, this shouldn't be an issue.</review_text>
THIS IN YOUR FACE PRODUCT LETS YOU SEE INSIDE YOURSELF, RIGHT NOW,  SEE WHAT YOUR MIND AND BODY IS DOING, LETTING YOU GO FROM CHAOS TO COHERENCE IN SECONDS.  I HAVE BEEN USING THIS FOR ABOUT A YEAR NOW...........PEOPLE HAVE SAID , WHAT ARE YOU DOING YOUR DIFFERENT.  BY IT GET I GO FOR I</review_text>
This little wonder does exactly what it's supposed to do. It tells you in what direction you're driving. That's what it does well. What it doesn't do as well is stick to your windshield. Even though it has three suction cups, it still has trouble staying where you put it.But, aside from that issue, it works as advertised</review_text>
Easy to install and setup.  Good solid bracket.  Works great.   The only negative is it doesn't light up so its hard to see at night</review_text>
I bought this on sale for around $10, if memory serves.  Works as expected.  A backlight is sometimes wished for, but I find that the car's dome light makes the reading ascertainable.  If you do a lot of night driving, you should consider a different compass -- one with a backlight</review_text>
Works very well - - easy to setup -- Price was right</review_text>
Works great...I have it attached to my motorcycle and love it.  Very simple to set up and start using, acurate and with the auto shut off, very practical.</review_text>
It takes a special soccer ball to be used in the World Cup Finals, and this ball is worth it.  I've played semi-pro and pro soccer in the US for years, and this ball is great.  EXCEPT, as a goalie (that I play at times other than halfback), it's darn hard to stop!  It "wobbles" a bit, making it hard to defend.  But, as an offensive player, it flies true.  Not cheap, but if you want the best, this is it</review_text>
We gave this soccer ball as a gift to our 11-year-old daughter for Christmas.  She absolutely loves it!  She brought it to her soccer practice and all the kids were checking it out.  My daughter says it 'plays' really well, has a good feel and bounce to it.  This ball was well worth the splurge!!!1</review_text>
IT IS THE COOLEST SKATE ON EARTH.THE FIRST DAY I WAS DOING 360 SOUL GRINDS AND 1080S.DEFINITLY BUY THIS SKATE.ps-AUSEOME!!!!!!</review_text>
We needed these helmets for my students to participate in our State Special Olympics Rollerskating event.  We ordered them on Tuesday and they arrived by the time we left on Friday. Great prices and ON TIME</review_text>
Great for an upperbody workout when space is minimal. i love it</review_text>
I got what I wanted - a yoga mat easy to fold and easy to transport in its own shoulder bag</review_text>
I have 6 mats now, of differing types, including this Savasa, and I really enjoy bringing this mat to class as well as use at home.I participate in heated vinyasa yoga so this makes a great non-skid layer underneath the woven mat or towel.  Because it packs up smaller than the mats I have to roll up, it's definitely convenient for travel. The little bag that comes with it can carry some essentials, like an extra change of yoga clothes, deodorant, pack towel, etc.When I use it at home, I find that the fold lines are great for alignment checks, and I don't have the same slippage issues that I have with other mats.  I really appreciate the product</review_text>
Elliptical arrived by truck and fully assembled.  I have used this for one month and had no problems.  I am very happy with the purchase</review_text>
Although it is not commerdial grade it is still a good elliptical for the money. I expected it to be more robust but at a thousand dollars I did not find anything better</review_text>
Shell-based blood clotter works without heatBy Kelly Kennedy - Staff writerPosted : Saturday Feb 10, 2007 13:21:15 ESTA scientist walking down a beach in Washington state noticed lots of crabs with no legs -- but none of them showed any signs of bleeding.Most animals that lose a limb tend to bleed again after the initial injury, so the scientist wondered why the crabs had such clean wounds.The answer: Most animals don't have shells."It was the chitosan in the shells," explained Limor Shemer, spokesperson for Celox. "It stopped the bleeding."The crustaceans' natural body armor now serves a similar purpose for soldiers and Marines in Iraq and Afghanistan through a new quick-clot agent, Shemer said."The feedback's been very positive," she said. "It doesn't heat up."Unlike other quick-clot products troops have been using in the battle zone, the seashell product -- called Celox -- doesn't depend on the blood's natural clotting agent to work. Instead, the seashells bind with the person's blood to create a clot.That's important, because other blood-clotting agents, such as QuikClot, can heat up to temperatures of 230 degrees Fahrenheit -- enough to cause a second-degree burn. However, Z-Medica, the manufacturer of QuickClot, released a new product in September, QuikClot ACS+ -- a clotting sponge that does not heat up enough to burn the injured person.Celox also can be used on heparinized blood, or blood that has been treated so that it won't clot on its own.While HemCon -- which is standard issue for troops in combat zones -- also uses chitosan, studies have shown it doesn't work as well to prevent bleeding because it is a dressing. Celox, which comes in granules, is poured directly onto a wound, and therefore works well on deep or arterial wounds, Shemer said.Scientists at the Portsmouth Naval Center, N.H., applied Celox granules, HemCon bandages or QuikClot granules to pigs with severed blood vessels in their thighs after letting the animals bleed for three minutes. The study found that Celox reduced bleeding to nothing, HemCon to 33 percent and QuikClot to 8 percent, as opposed to a standard dressing, which brought bleeding down by 50 percent."Although all three agents were superior to standard dressing with regard to re-bleed, only Celox improved survival in a lethal hemorrhagic groin injury compared to standard dressing," wrote Lt. Cmdr. Buddy Kozen in a letter about the study.Celox was approved by the FDA in June, and has been used in the war zones by Special Forces medics since September, Shemer said.Studies also found that even if Celox gets wet or is kept in humid conditions, it may get clumpy, but it still works. It can also be easily rinsed from the wound, Shemer said</review_text>
They work great. Excellent grip, only thing might be the fingers curl up, but this is only a minor annoyance.</review_text>
This Indian Rosewood Block is excellent.  Its grainy wood texture is beautiful, and looks great in my home yoga studio.  I ordered 2 of them so I could have a pair.  These blocks are the perfect size, and are also a nice weight.  Whenever my friends come over to practice at my studio, they always complement these blocks and I refer them to order them online for themselves</review_text>
alright since it seems that someof you have no idea what airsoft is i will help you.    hop up is a must for electric guns it makes it fly farther and shoot harder it goes on and if with a buttin it is really easy to use.  second those rail things are important for up grades and things like that is is how things attach.  and the battery in most guns goes in the barrl hand grip area.  most of the time u want a gun that hits harder if ur on a team like over 400 fps and things that are gas powered.  this thing seems that it will brake easy too</review_text>
o.k., first of all i can't wait until i get this gun! But i need some help. I think i will take of the shot gun part but where can the battery go? second,what is a 3 point sling? Third what are those hand guard things. Fourth what is the heat shield thing. And lastly how does the hop up thing work? thank you to any one who can help answer some or all of these questions. and yes i am new to airsoft</review_text>
If you're getting started in airsoft and you need an AEG to make yourself a deadly force on the field.... I recomend this gun.  I bought it last summer and I loved it.  The rocket launcher is kind of worthless.  It works like a shot gun.  Just pump and shoot a bb.  I think I used it once, then it had to go.  It was too bulky and I didnt use it.  I also don't recommend dropping it too hard. The plastic is kind of weak.  If you take care of it, it will last you a good while.  I've never had any problems with it jaming. It shoots great.  The high capacity clip is a crap.  You have to crank it to load the bbs. Unfoutunatly, it's hard to find extra magazins for it.  You have to really look for what magizine it is compatable with.  All in all, this is a great weapon to get started with,  it can compeat with many tokio marri guns... (obviously, a tokyo mari will last longer because it has metal parts) but you can still kick but with this</review_text>
I am looking at buying this gun but i have a question..... Is it a Full Size 1:1 or is it not full?Also is the sling a 3 point one or</review_text>
I got this gun for christmas. I was really happy i got a clip a few clips with it but some did not fit the hole was in the back and it was suppose to be in the front. I have 2 problems with it one it was hard to put to gather. took about 3 hours. Second the shotgun stinks it goes about 8 feet other then that its Great.</review_text>
cna u put a real shell in the 203 launcher part and what parts are mad of m,etal and about how amny peices does the gun com in? answert as quick as possibl</review_text>
I received the product in the expected delivery time and it works great with my XP operating system that is running on my Apple computer via the Parallels software.  I downloaded the software to run the Interface from the Polar site.  Did not need the small CD that ships with the product  (which was too small for my CD drive)</review_text>
I purchased this IRD from Polar because I don't want to face any problem during the interface between the watch and my laptop. I had no problem with this device but I had a problem with the watch. I returned the watch and kept this as IRD for my laptop.Some people are saying that you can get any IRD from the internet for $5 to $15, but I prefer to go for Polar</review_text>
I picked this up looking for a non-serial or bulky IR device for my desktop PC but was VERY happy to find that it came with "SigmaTel IR-721 USB IrDA Bridge Driver" drivers for both Linux and the Mac on the CD; in addition of course to the standard Windows drivers.The only drawback with the Mac Drivers is that it is a Mini-CD which is not-compatible with the insert drives on Mac, but I was able to get it installed successfully without issue on my MacBook Pro (Intel Based) and on my Windows PC.Now if Polar could start releasing a Mac Version of their Polar Precision software and the other third-party vendors of HRM Software (like iSmarttrain) can get the update out for this new hardware it will make many Mac owners happy.Polar Precision 4.03.43 (Mar 06) has worked with this device on my Windows XP SP2 on a Native Intel/AMD Windows PC.It also works fine on my Mac Book Pro under Nova Development's Parralels Desktop (still windows but on a Mac) running Polar Precision 4.03.43. I have not gotten Polar Precision to run under Dreamweaver's Crossover yet though; but hopefully that is only a matter of time.As an added bonus, being this device includes Macintosh Drivers it could be used in theory to support other IR applications that have been limited by the lack of two-way IR support on Macs, as of OSX Tiger (10.4.x) on the MacBook Pro the built in IR support is only receive mode.</review_text>
If your soccer club takes down their goals & nets at the end of each season (spring & fall) and you still want to take advantage of day with good weather, these goals are the way to go.  They fit in a van/truck/car with decent trunk space perfectly and they're easy to set up and take down.  In many practice sessions you'll realize that they're a huge step up from using cones or flags as a goal and your team will appreciate the target they offer.  The quality of workmanship is excellent, the netting holds up to powerful strikes and they bounce back well if accidently fallen over by a player (with little injury to the player likely to occur).  These training goals are also perfect for the backyard player or travel player looking to improve his/her accuracy.  Amazon offered the best price on the pair and I recommend them.</review_text>
These are probably the best gloves I have ever had. The foam padding in seriously amazing, plus they are very comfortable and seem to be pretty durable so far. I would definately recommend these gloves to anyone who is serious about working out</review_text>
These are by far the best gloves I've used even better than the harbinger gloves I reviewed. These gloves are very Thick on the palm, thicker than any gloves I've used providing real good protection from blisters and sores. I have not gotten one blister or sore since using these and the wrist wrap is the best on these gloves</review_text>
I have used these gloves for over a year.  Still, just like new</review_text>
My boyfriend was very thrilled with the gloves. I was very pleased with the outcome.I will definately continue shopping with amazon.Thanks guys</review_text>
I'd have to disagree with the other reviewer. I've been a tennis teaching pro for seven years now, and these balls have put up with tons of hitting, and have great shelf life. I've used them in much less than desirable conditions and only have to replace them once a summer, and I coach 5 or 6 times a week. They bounce true and although they aren't the exact weight of a normal ball, the average player would never notice</review_text>
I planned on using this scope for target shooting at 100 yards. Unfortunately the product description at the amazon site was not all that detailed but I took a chance given the great review and the price. It turned out having the parallax setting I was hoping for. In other words you can focus the scope to any distance between 10 yards and infinite so you can get your target clear and parallax free at any range. The clarity of the picture at 100 yards with 24x magnification is amazing. It started raining while I was shooting and I was still able to use the scope effectively and the target remained bright and clear.The reason why I am giving it 4 stars is that the scope I received is obviously one that was produced before Tasco changed ownership and as I understand it there is no support for this item.</review_text>
Worked out very well on my Savage .17 varmint rifle. Clarity and function of this scope is great considering the low cost of this instrument.  Very satisified with this product</review_text>
This book is a great introduction to the art of knife throwing and I found it useful as a guide and as a teaching tool</review_text>
I did not order or receive this.  Please let me know how I can investigate this.Cindy Peterson-Dana #845-709-720</review_text>
I ordered these bearings to use on my rollerskates, and chose this site to order them from because the price was the lowest I could find from a reputable website.  The product image is slightly different from the actual product, and the description isn't very...well...descriptive, but I received exactly what I wanted.  These are Bones Ceramic Labyrinth bearings, eight in a pack.  I've used Bones bearings for a while, and I have always been impressed with them.  They hold up to abuse much better than other bearings I've used.  I would highly recommend a set of these bearings to anyone looking for excellent high quality skate bearings.*It is also important to note that these bearings are designed for 608 axles (8mm) and not for 627 axles (7mm).  They can be used on 7mm axles with the proper axle upsizing shims, but without the shims, they will not fit a 7mm axle</review_text>
In 2004 during my hike of the Appalachian Trail, my water filter was nothing but headaches, clogging and maintence. I replaced the filter 2 weeks into my hike with Aqua Mira and used it extensively for the rest of the trip. I found only a slight chlorine taste, no worse than some city water I've had. The only issue was I couldn't drink my newly gathered water immediately, as one could with a filter. Water management had to be planned. I would take my breaks at or near a water source so I had the aloted time for parts A & B to mix properly. Then once at camp, first thing I would do is get and prepare my water, then move onto setting up camp. By the time I was done, I had water.During my hike (and afterward) I used it without any problems and without contracting any sicknesses.I liked the product so much, I'm back to purchase some more for an up coming hike I'm planning on the Ouachita Trail, in AR and OK</review_text>
I've used Aqua Mira on 2 backpacking trips thus far and it has been better than iodine. The only problem is spilling it when you mix both parts together and also keeping track of the time. Eventually, if you use this for over 2 weeks, you'll begin to taste it because it will build up in your bottle, however if you rinse your bottle out well, your water will barely have any Aqua Mira taste, if any</review_text>
We bought this soccer net for our 3 year old who loves to kick the ball around.  With a quick two handed motion, the net collapses to a convenient carrying size perfect to take to the park.  Excellent quality, size, and ease of use</review_text>
Am using the light for early morning and late evening trash hauling.  Heavy duty work.  Have tried several cap lights and this one works out the best so far.  The lights that fit on top of the cap do not shine where you are trying to look, and we have not found any other cap lights that are as bright as this one</review_text>
Good guality tank at a great price. I think that two smaller tanks would have been better for me though</review_text>
I got these for my son for Christmas and he says they are great.  I am so glad I bought them through Amazon, I saved a bunch of money and got high quality tanks.</review_text>
co2 is the best in hot weather but if u dont have an expansion chamber dont use during cold weather... but other wise this is a good size tank that will fufill all ur paintball need</review_text>
This is probably the best deal you can get on any CO2 tank considering they are brand new PURE ENERGY TANKS!!!!</review_text>
DUDE THIS TANK ROCKS....I THOUGHT IT WOULD BE SOME CRAPPY OFF BRAND BUT IT WAS ACTUALLY A PURE ENERGY!!!BEST DEAL I HAVE EVER SEEN...THESE ARE 30-40 BUCKS AT A STORE!!</review_text>
this tank looks like a PMI tank or pure energy idk cause i use air but i have a  12 oz that looks like it so i would buy it actulay i might buy it right now so if any one gets there comment back and tell me if its a pmi pure energy thing   ok thank</review_text>
this is a good co tank, easy to fill and use</review_text>
They were delivered on time.  I needed them for a game for my daughter's birthday party.  Got them on time and very reasonably priced!  Thanks</review_text>
How can 144 ping pong balls be anything but overwhelmingly positive? Sure, a few came out of the box cracked, but great bang for the buck here. Lots of pong gets played in the office (sadly, more "ping" than "beer") and we have some really good players, but there have been no complaints about the balls</review_text>
Great unit!  It's really sturdy enough to support my 200+ lbs for push ups and gives me an awesome ab workout.  Better quality than I expected</review_text>
The thing that I like most about the Keys Pro-Trainer is that I could do many different exercises with it.  The ab crunches are great, but on top of that I could do push ups and dips with it too.  So overall...I think the Pro-Trainer gave me a pretty good bang for the buck.</review_text>
This product is no joke.  I can do various exercises with it, including dips, ab crunches, sit-ups, and push-ups as well as stretching.Work out regularly with the protrainer and you'll see results after a while in your targeted area.  Make sure you stretch before exercising</review_text>
I've been using the original(purple) AB Roller Plus for several years with good results and decided to try the Keys Pro-Trainer Ab-Roller because I was looking for more of a gym quality machine. After using this product for a few days I must say it has exceeded all expectations. It is similar in quality to the Pro Trainer Culb model made by the AB Roller people, but at a third of the price. It is comfortable to use andprovides more workout options. Most importantly, it targets the abs much better than the AB Roller Plus. Unfortunately it doesn't come with a workout video, but using the AB Roller Plus workout video I find that I get a much better burn in my abs with the keys model</review_text>
Item works reasonably well. Sometimes the cards get jammed and flip over while being shuffled</review_text>
My hubby bought it for me for my birthday and I love it! He also uses it, just as often as I do. A great work out out for a small price</review_text>
A compact, easy to use recumbent bike. Easy to assemble as well.My only complaint is it could have used more holes to open wider for long legged riders</review_text>
This is a great item for those kids who only like to stay inside and play video games. When i gave it to my kids they looked at me funny at first until they started to play with it. Now they go outside and play with their friends. I'm very thankful for this item. Its easy to put together and provides some good fun</review_text>
They are of good, solid material and the case is sleek and cool.  We've been using them a lot</review_text>
I purchased 2 pairs of goggles for my 10 and 12 year old children.  They used them for a week on vacation in Mexico swimming in the pool and ocean.   Both of my children said they were the best goggle's they have had and were able to play in the water for hours at a time without having any eye irritation.  Both my children have light blue eyes which are very sensative to chlorine and sea salt.   I highly recommend them</review_text>
My daughter swims summer swim team for 8 weeks at a time, and she has had the same pair of Jr. Hydrospex for 5 years. Yes, years. I don't know how they have lasted that long, because we also swim at an indoor pool about 20 times the rest of the year. Only now, as a teenager, does she need the adult size Hydrospex.That's a pretty good recommendation</review_text>
I bought these for my daughter when she was a toddler.  She is now 4.5 and still uses them!  They are sturdy and safe.  We love to march around the house to music!</review_text>
My daughter, a competitive swimmer for 5 years, will only use these goggles.  She loves the "suction cup" gaskets that let no water in, and the one piece design.  She feels confident that they won't slip out of place during a start.  She now has her younger sister insisting on these too</review_text>
Got it, love it, loved the price.  CD Best Buy, and they were right.  If you don't want to drop 2-3 grand for the top of the line, drop 800 bucks for this and enjoy.I've used it for nearly a year.  I've lost 45 pounds, combined with a sensible diet.  I put it by the TV; it's quiet, and the functions are great.Pros:  Price, features, lightweight, programsCons:  LED lighting, not as stable as higher priced items (probably not a big deal unless you weigh over 300 pounds), heart rate monitor is definitely off (I'd say it's about 10-20% too low)In my years of internet shopping, I rank this buy in my top 3.  Enjoy</review_text>
I am very happy with my purchase. This elliptical is big and heavy, but I managed to bring it in piece by piece from my garage to my family room.  It took me about 3 hours to put together, not too bad but you need to make sure you have everything you need and follow the directions as best you can.  After I put it together, it had an awful rattling noise that I couldn't figure out.  When my husband got home, he suggested it might be a plastic cover where the arm handle joins the foot pedals. I put tape around it and resolved the problem. It's not completely stable but pretty good for a home elliptical. I'm happy overall with my purchase and would highly recommend it.  The machine is rather long so you'll need some space for it.  I've lost quite a few inches and I'm not even dieting</review_text>
The Schwinn 212 is an excellent bike, very sturdy and quiet. I love all the different programs and it is easy to program. My husband said this is the easiest assembly he has ever done. The hardware was packaged showing what pieces go with each assembly step, what genius. Thanks Schwinn.</review_text>
Very solid construction, feels like something you would find in a top gym. Great variation in resistances, I have yet to manage anything more than half way up the scale. Built in heart rate monitor works great and a fairly good variety of preset programs to chose from.If you are looking for a robust system you should definitely consider this bike.It is pretty heavy so moving it around especially on carpet is not that easy even though there are wheels built into one end.</review_text>
I bought this bike 2 months ago and I've been using it 6 days a week!Pros: Easy to assemble, Reasonable Price, severall exercise optionsCons: It is uncomfortable after a long exercise (+60 min).I don't like going to the gym, so this bike is the perfect solution for a guy who works 9-10 hours in front of a computer</review_text>
I read the reviews of this product before purchasing - promises of fast delivery, easy assembly, etc. - with a grain of salt. I live in a very rural area where nothing ever gets delivered in two days. But the bike sounded so perfect for our needs, I ordered it anyway.I was amazed when, two days later, the bike showed up on my doorstep.  Assembly was incredibly easy with all the tools and hardware bubble wrapped and labeled by assembly step.  It could not have been simpler.The bike itself is a wonderful exercise tool.  It is quieter than I even imagined, and the ease of operation is unsurpassed.  I mix up my morning routine with a different pre-programmed ride, and I really get my money's worth.In short, this bike is everything that is promised, and more</review_text>
I agree with most of the reviews.  Some stated their box upon delivery was in bad shape.  They must have corrected that deficiency, mine came in pretty good shape.  One gentleman indicated hearing a loud clacking sound when peddling that eventually went away.  I too have noticed the loud clacking sound and is still awaiting the day it goes away.  Someone stated the bike isn't geared for people under 5'4".  I agree shorter people are going to need some propping.  Bike is sturdy.  Instructions are clear.  Overall a pretty good bike.  Seat is semi-comfortable.  I really like the computer monitor.  It monitors distance, heart rate and even have programs.  I took a star off due to loud clacking sound that I'm HOPING eventually will go away</review_text>
I want to say first of all, I love this bike. It rides smooth, is comfortable, and adjusts to fit my long legs so that I can get a full extension. It is much bigger than I expected, so I had to move around some furniture, but it gives a great workout with a lot of choices. It also has to be plugged in, so make sure you have a place with a plug where you are going to put it.That being said, the rear stablizer (bike works without it)was broken when I recieved the crashed up box from ups.  I called and they overnighted a second one, but UPS also broke the second one (plastic part on outside). So I emailed and they sent a rear stablizer out wrapped in many layers of bubble wrap.It was easy to put together, it took me less than an hour even with a two year old "helping" me.  It rides quite, and other than the occasional beep from the computer it is silent.I would give it 5 stars, but I am taking away one for the trouble of having to contact them twice in order to get a part replaced twice</review_text>
The Schwinn Airdyne is everything I expected it to be and a little more.  It is extremely well built and was easy to assemble.  I was hesitant to assemble it myself and the assembly instructions are minimal, but clear and easy to follow.  The parts fits together beautifully and assembly went without a hitch.  Assembly took about 1 1/2 hours.  This bike is really awesome!!! I thought free shipping and no sales tax was sweet...the bike arrived in seven days from the date it was ordered from Amazon and I literally live in the middle of nowhere.  I was very impressed with the whole process, especially with my wonderful new bike. The fact that is good looking is just a bonus.</review_text>
Most workout equipment either doesn't give a total body workout, or they cause me to have joint pain (espcially treadmills).The Airdyne works both arms and legs and it easily will get my heart rate to wherever I want it. The best part is that at the end of the workout my joints do not hurt.I love my airdyne.</review_text>
I bought this for my wife who has been going to an exercise class for 4 years.  She rode an older model of this bike there and really wanted one.  It just fits in our bedroom at the end of the bed and we can run in and ride it for a bit any time of day.  She rides it for a half hour every day and I ride it for about 12 minutes.  I get in about 3.5 +/- in that amount of time and hit 18 mph for about 2 1/2 minutes so far.  It seems to be a good purchase and Donna thinks it may be one of our best investms thus far.  It seems to be well made and my only questinon is --- does it need greasing in any of the areas ever, or at cetain times</review_text>
This is a pretty solid machine, I have used them before in a local health club. I think it is worth the money, I like the new color vs white and it is super easy to assemble. Issues: it came in a box that needed to be sturdier, mashed up, but not damaged.  It has a little click during operation, that seems to come and go and the rubber skuff pad adhesive is not satisfactory, but also, not necessary and I wouldn't bother with them. It is a good work out for me becatuse I am missing one leg. It is probably the best one out there if you want to get your arms into the action. CWB -</review_text>
Schwinn's assembly instructions leave much to be desired. Poor, poor graphics and the words didn't help much. Additionally, some of the nuts and bolts are of obvious poor quality. However, once assembled, it provides a good workout.Buying from Amazon was, as always, a great idea. Free shipping and no tax saved my a bundle. Amazon is now my favorite store, internet or otherwise</review_text>
I like the bike a lot, but I find it extremely loud and not very smooth.  The best part is the resistance.  I find the resistance to be much more realistic than magnetic or other kinetic resistance methods.  You work as hard as you pedal, just like a real bike.The only problem I have is I don't use it enough.  The seat isn't very comfortable, it's not horrible, but it's not comfy.  The noise is another detractor.  My bike seems to have a lot of squeeks and creaks, but they're generally drowned out by the noise of the fan.  I probably should have checked out the one with the smaller fan, but I researched all of this online.I'm 250lbs so I hope it holds together.  So far so good, but time will tell.It's an old school workout machine.  If you're looking for something effective, but not refined, this is it</review_text>
Seems to be a very good exercise product. But the product description should mention that assembly takes about 2 hours. Stabilizers, arms, computer, pedals, and seat need to be attached to the frame. This should be easy but the assembly instructions are minimalistic at best. The method for attaching the arms to the frame requires quite a bit of strength.</review_text>
This is certainly not the least expensive piece of equipment I could have bought but I am glad I made the decision I did.  I am almost 300 lbs and this bike is plenty sturdy for me and I am sure it will still be working just fine long after I am dead.  It is quite comfortable and the seat adjusts easily up and down.  The air blowing on you from the front wheel is a nice feature too.I like the little computer, it gives a nice variety of measurments depending on what you want to use as a benchmark, mph, miles traveled, time, calories burned, heart rate, etc. and you can monitor 3 at a time.Overall a good purchase</review_text>
Although this stuff is inferior to Curb Candy, it still makes grinds nice, even on extremely rough surfaces. It does last a real long time</review_text>
Excellent tools for your tackle box,excellent use of material,anti-rust,easy carry...All in one complete package..</review_text>
LOVE this knife.  Looks great, sharp as can be out of the box.  Thin enough for the pocket of my khakis.  One disclaimer, use the safety.  It opened up in my pocket once (no clue how) and could have been dangerous</review_text>
bought this knife for a friend. it is small and sharp. but mainly bought it for the looks, very bright and colorful. though i think this would ware away pretty fast if was put to much use.</review_text>
Great little knife.  I've taken to carrying it with me on every occasion my Native is too big.  Super sharp and keeps its edge even after some pretty heavy use.  Only beef is that it's a little hard to open and close with one hand because of its size.  I'm going to have to get the leek</review_text>
I'm mostly a kitchen knife collector but was so impressed by Kershaw/Shun Ken Onion that I decided to try a style of knife (sport) that is his usual forte. I'm just as impressed with the design of this knife as I was with the Shun/Onion knife. It's compact, it's attractive, and sharp enough to shave an arm with. I have the rainbow chive and I am still amazed that as much as I've used it,  the surface and coloring is still intact and gorgeous. I'm now a believer in Speed Safe, and have my second Ken Onion (leek) on order. 50 dollars for a small pocket knife? (I hear people complaining)  Absolutely, it's well worth the price, but anybody who knows knives knows that the truly good ones are never inexpensive and last a lifetime. You get what you pay for, and this one is well worth it</review_text>
My first Kershaw knife.  But not my last.  In fact, my second Kershaw has already been ordered. Blown away by the quality of this product.  Extremely smooth operation.  Outstanding fit and finish.  Sharpest knife, right out of the box, I have ever purchased.  SWEET</review_text>
Perhaps the best and most useful pocket knife you can have</review_text>
It took me a long time to accept the notion of paying more than 10 bucks for a knife.  This is a great deal, though.  Very, very smooth opening and closing action, keeps an edge very well, and is shipped to you super sharp already.  What I really like is the ability to keep it on you almost all the time since it is very small and light.  You have to be careful opening and closing it the first few times though (read: don't buy this for your Cub Scout).  Overall, definitely the best deal I've seen in this price range</review_text>
I purchased this knife for about $4 cheaper than its usual Amazon listing price at Amazon's Friday Sale.  I had been looking at the Kershaw knives for awhile, and following an incident in my building's parking garage (woman accosted, pocketbook stolen), it seemed like the perfect time to buy.  The "rainbow" titanium-coating color might bother some men, but I'm a woman, so I don't mind the color of the knife. I would have preferred the black-on-black, but this was too good a deal to pass up.The safety lock looks like it might slip out of safety easily, but in two weeks time of regular wear/use, I haven't had a problem. I flip the knife open often (heck, it's fun), and I wear it regularly (what's the point of having it, if you're not prepared to use it?).  The thin attached metal "belt clip" is very sturdy and multipurpose (it looks similar to the metal clip on a writing pen). Not only can I clip the kninfe just inside my slacks waistband, but it clips easily to the inside leather pocket of my purse.  The single finger flip-open mechanism is beyond belief - very easy to use, exceptionally fast and accurate.  The locking mechanism (keeps the blade in place) is extremely solid, and has worked without flaw.  When I'm walking anyplace suspicious by myself, I hold the knife in the "ready to flip open" position in my hand, held down at my side.  The knife is nearly invisible in that position, so I don't stand out as "oh my God, she's carrying a knife!" However, someone intent on a criminal act just might notice, and avoid me altogether.  Great knife for personal safety.  Lastly, like the other reviews point out, these knives are SHARP. I don't use mine to open letters, boxes and typical pocket knife activities (I believe that would gum it up, and slow the opening speed of the knife), so I anticipate the blade should have a good, long life in my care.</review_text>
This knife is wonderful! I'm one of the last people to get something that looks this "girly," but there was something about it that appealed to me. It looks cute and innocent, with the pinkish rainbow sheen (mine has a lot more green and blue than the picture), but it's wicked sharp. Since it is spring-assist, it opens lightning quick and can be deployed instantly for opening boxes or what-have-you. I like carrying mine with the pocket clip, but it comes with a safety lock so you can carry it in your pocket without fear of having it accidentally open. Very essential for the times when I'm wearing dress pants and can't have a knife showing.It is very small though. It is perfect for kids or someone like me who has very small hands. Though I do have problems opening the knife with the thumb stud. It's just small enough that my thumb will slide to intercept the edge of the blade. Fortunately, it has index-opening and with one flick of my index finger, I can open it.I carry larger knives in my jeans pockets on a daily basis, but if you need something discreet and stylish, you can't go wrong with the Ken Onion Rainbow Chive. It certainly looks inconspicuous, but it's incredibly useful for many applications</review_text>
This is more of a timer than a stopwatch. If you need to time standard intervals, like a spin coach, aerobics instructor, or darkroom photographer; then the dial can set any time to one hour quickly, and time it once or over and over. You can set in a longer interval that stays in the watch; up to five of them. Even the pace function is useful to set a run or cycling cadence. So far mine works great, and the button pushes have a very positive click- which I like</review_text>
The chain is very reliable and holds my 100lb Heavybag with no problem</review_text>
I ordered the fuzzy navel flavor and it is delicious!  It tastes like I'm drinking orange/peach juice.  The texture is pleasing and there's no after-taste.  I actually crave this stuff and it's sugar and fat-free.  The sweetner in it is sucralose (Splenda).  I can't wait to try other flavors.  Next I'm getting Caribbean Cooler</review_text>
All things was perfect, except the US post. Because some stupid monkey send the parcel to Australia. I did not know why, because the adress sticker was correct. But the Australian post was so clever to send the parcel to me</review_text>
This is our handy tool to avoid our kids bouncing off the walls, instead they bounce & count.  Its sturdy but portable enough to move easily around the house</review_text>
If my wife can use it it's easy!  i bought 'em for a motorcycle trip.  They are perfect for use with the guy that have communication systems.  I didn't have a system I just wanted to be able to listen.  With a good headset I'm clear and I hear my buddies clear.  5 stars</review_text>
+ compact and lightweight- no vibra- no low power transmition (at 0.5W</review_text>
I personally like these radios because they give good range than other brand like cobra. The battery last full charge and it never brakes like cobra. I recemend buying them if you need radios</review_text>
As a former 2/75th Ranger, I found these radios to be satisfactory for what they are. I only use it when I need to be able to speak to the wife while we're working on projects (no, I don't make her transmit properly over the net, but I do tie it off to her body ...lol), but these SX800R radios allow me to talk to her across a city block (approx 200-300m) in downtown Las Vegas. That means trees, homes, apartments, townhouses and a shopping center in between us... just not as loud and with static/white/pink noise. That's downright impressive for a walkie-talkie "toy" radio. There were no battery failures/issues. Follow the directions and DON'T turn them on for the first 16 hours of charging... a problem for most, I'd bet. The belt clips are fine, no breakages there either. There is a lanyard hole for you to tie them off, so that's a non-issue as well. If I have a gripe, it's not to do with the radio, but the need for an accessory mic and earpiece, as it's a PITA having to hold the radio up like a walkie talkie to receive and transmit because my hands are usually full. Personally, I'll fix that issue with a QUALITY throat-mic (whisper mic for the hooahs) and acoustic ear tube setup... or maybe the secret service hand-mic setup. I digress, but overall, after reading all the reviews of the prior Motorola FRS/GMRS online, I'm satisfied with the SX800R, especially the price... almost free, considering my other options. -RLT</review_text>
I needed more coverage than the typical FRS radios provide.  I work with people outdoors in hilly terain, reliable communications is vital, so I tried 4 of these SX800R radios from Mot.  They where easy to set up and use.  The crew trained up in less that 5 minutes. They provided the extended coverage needed and worked reliably.  Fast recharge and day long battery life was just what we needed.The FCC has a quick and pain free way to get the license to operate at the higher power levels of GMRS. Still in use today and very handy.</review_text>
Table came exactly as shown in the photo.  Works great for a small-medium sized home poker game, and quality is great for the price paid</review_text>
Tempting to the bigger children, this trike is fun for all ages.  The front fork does not take the pressure an older child creates while riding aggressively and the result is the front tire axle can be forced out of position.  If not treated roughly, this trike seems tough enough to handle even my (100lbs.)11 year old</review_text>
My [former] friend HAD one in blue..We spent long summer days playing on this toy!! And it was so much fun! But eventually it wore out and now theres a big hole in it. I think it has cause a whole bunch of people jumped on it at once (remember, 2 at a time!!) so much fun, but doesn't last long</review_text>
this toy is one of the best my mom have ever bought me thanks</review_text>
This trampoline is the best ever, never before have I seen a trampoline only 8' all the others are 14', 13'... so one but only eight feet. Great for chrilden for all ages. I highly recomend this item. I gave this item five stars for Educational value because if you use trampolines they increse young child's motorskills and for the fun and durablility i also gave five stars. This tarmpoline RULE</review_text>
This is a great toy for a small child.  I just got it for my highly energetic daughter's 3rd birthday, and she loves it.  It's great bonding playtime, too.  She always wants me to jump with her.  Best of all, I'm burning calories while we have a blast!!  I gave it 3 stars for educational because it's obviously not teaching the alphabet or anything, but it's teaching balance and coordination and spatial reasoning.  Since it's less than 2 ft tall, she doesn't get hurt when she falls off of it (and she has...several times).  She just giggles and climbs back on.  I would highly suggest the enclosure for a child who was big enough to REALLY bounce, but for a small child, I don't think it's a requirement.  It's no more dangerous than falling off a couch or something.  All in all, WELL worth the money!</review_text>
This is a great carrier. We are a family of skiers. This carrier was easy to install and I have put in it two snow boards, two long sets of adult skis, two pairs of kids skis, and poles for the whole family. This allows us to take a better gas mileage vehicle skiing and still fit all of the gear, or to have room for groceries in the van when we come back down off the ski hill.</review_text>
I ordered a blanket in the beginning of December (as a gift). True, it was not recieved later than it stated, but it took just a week to schedule a time to be home to sign for it.  It was incredibly aggravating, but the product is good and I intend on giving it to the same person for their birthday in Feb :</review_text>
This overgrip is a favourite as well as the blue VS overgrip from Babolat. They simply have great feel, this one being the softer one</review_text>
Great Watch, this is my fourth, I have bought other models for different purposes and they are accurate and deliver all the performance I have required of them</review_text>
an excellent watch that could use some downsizing, but its size gives the advantage of an easily readible face. could use a mineral crystal lens...even though plastic and inset, ...but the best feature is the fact that the easily obtainable battery is so easy to replace that the wearer is not discouraged from using the features as often as necessary. Unlike many other digital watches, the band still fits my 6 inch wrist with holes to spare. Although the operational functions are laid out well, I was lost in trying to remember how to operate the watch after storing it away for several months...after all, to download the manual is 50 odd pages. Still I think this is an excellent product that could be made better with the additions I mentioned</review_text>
Honestly the best duty belt I have ever used. I am a Federal Security Enforcement officer and this duty belt goes leaps and bounds above my Government issue gear. I am planning on starting up my own security company and I can say Ill be ordering these in bulk for all of my officers. Thanks so much pyramid air!Officer Steve Doh</review_text>
as w/the 1st opinion this belt in value/quality beyond the price...... i'm a 40 waist & there is plenty of room maybe to 50" for using over outter wear(altho i haven't taped)...... as for smaller, closure is velcro & i doubt u could slim to less then 24" (here again that's an eyeball)...... i use side arm w/a shoulder & it is great..... have the nightstalker rifle & 1008 hand pistol...... stuff i need for both carries well in the belt & shoulder harness...... hope this helps...... joh</review_text>
I have a size 38 waist and this belt fit me fine out of the package.  If you're smaller than 36 or larger than 40" it might not be for you.  The quality is good for the price.  I was a police officer way back when leather was everything, but this belt is just as good.  The "keeper(s)" shown are fake, they don't unsnap to attach to your pants belt.  I'm an airgunner, not "soft air", so I can't vouch for magazine clips fitting in the horizontal magazine pouch.  I put a spare CO2 in one and my 4" folding knife in the other.  Leapers is velcro heaven.  I have 2 Leapers waist holster, and they fit real well.   mgs</review_text>
This chin-up bar works great. It only took a few minutes to install and it looks good. I weigh about 230 and it supports my weight without any problems. Great  product for a great price</review_text>
This bar is great for my 12 year old son.  He uses it every day and his strength has increased.  The padding makes it more comfortable and thus he uses it more often.  Just don't forget if you put it in a door way that you use (bathroom door) that it is there...it is self critiquing</review_text>
The braces attach permanently to your door frame, but the bar can easily be removed when not in use.  (My 7-year-old can take it down).  My teenager uses it for chin ups and my 7 year old uses it to do pull-overs to practice for gymnastics</review_text>
Even though these are made of plastic they are very durable and can support my 150lbs with no bending. They can be easily disassembled for travel/storage by pulling off the two legs from the handle - no tools needed. The best feature is probably the angled handle bars which reduces stress on my wrists</review_text>
Dont buy this product. I have the other mountain bike pump which is same junk just smaller. Its 90% plastic which doesnt hold up even with very occasional use. Save your money, get something else</review_text>
It's simple really.  The stuff goes on wet and needs a little time to dry, then your chain is lubed via a light wax covering which does not cause any GUNK build-up.  The wax falls away while riding as your chain stays lubricated.You gotta use it more than the others,  but so what?  No more grease on the pants</review_text>
Several times I have looked at White Lightning in stores and never felt like going through the hassle of buying it and prepping my bike.  I recently had a change of heart and picked up a bottle.  After a thorough degreasing, I applied several coats of White Lightning and let it dry overnight.  The next day the results were amazing.  My bike was much quieter and shifting was much better.  Ever since I've been using White Lightning as my primary chain lubricant</review_text>
An excellent product designed to be a firm fit, along the lines of compression garments. At first you feel very 'snug' as the fit is tight, but as you ride there is no resistance and it's great not to get snagged by the saddle on mountain biking technical sections! I live in a very hot and humid country, and find the fabric is cooler than any other I have used and dissapates the sweat very well. The little pocket is great for used gel sachets. It is quite a short leg length, not for the very self-conscious - An excellent product, will buy another pair</review_text>
I was so suprised how fast I received the Dome Tent. I have not had a chance to hook it up to my car yet because it has been snowing here, but I am really excited to use it this summer.Thank you!!! :-</review_text>
It was exactly what I expected. I used it right out of the box. It really is 1/4 in. thick</review_text>
I like the skates. They are worth the money... They run a little small though. I wear 8 1/2. I bought a 9 they have very little room in them. Other than that they are comfortable.</review_text>
Ok, I don't know what that last guy's problem was.  I ordered two of these on the advice of people that I assumed knew what they were talking about (it seems they did).  Now, they are damned impossible to load without the speedloader, and they can be a bit of a pain putting the last 20 or so BBs in (even with the speedloader), but they work great.  To settle the argument about capacity, I filled one up as far as I could, and then I emptied it and counted 70 BBs.</review_text>
Dont listen to the last review.  He is wrong, on the outside of the magazine there are marks that only go to thirty but i counted and it does hold 70 or mabey more.  I bought one with my high power AUG that i ordered and it turned out to be the same one it comes with.  It is a pain to load without a speed loader but dont worry beacuse the High Power AUG comes with one.  It is made of high quality plastic, and fits nicely into the gun.  I would recomend buying 2 extra beacuse the High Power AUG goes through bbs quickly.  The picture is also wrong so i will post a picture of the actual thing.  Manufactured by BOTH ELEPHANT, the same people that make the High Power AUG</review_text>
These gloves are by far the best glovesI've used very comfortable and protective fortough workouts. And as an advanced lifter lifting weightsthree times a week these gloves have been very good.Best part of these goves is the wrist wrap feature whichprotect the wrist during heavy lifts and it really protected my wrist.Update for these gloves is I would have to rate it a four because they will tear in about 5 months and start to lose there protection for yourhands.</review_text>
Really prevents tender hands from being torn up. Really protectst the wrist too.</review_text>
This cot has saved me many a time when bed space was limited, because of it's small carry size.  It is not the easiest to assmeble, or the quickest, but it is there when I need it.  It is lighter and a smaller package than any aluminum cot I have found, inspite of using a steel frame. The one recomendation I would make is get one with the nylon mat. I have one in nylon and one with cotton. Carrying them all the time in the car, the cotton takes more care to keep it mildew free.  In summer I understand cotton is cooler, and gives more, but I can not tell the difference.  One more consideration; this may not be the cot for heavy person. It works great at 200 pounds</review_text>
The product is good.  The only thing that I did not like is the mat was a little thin.  Other than that it is a good product</review_text>
The first one we got was defective.  Amazon promptly sent out another one and picked up the defective one.  Communication was excellent and the new ATV works very well.  I love that we can control the speed with 2 speed settings.  I will defnitely keep Amazon in mind for future purchaces whether large or small.</review_text>
The Mongoose Dirt Grinder is so far ahead of "Power Wheels" or any other piece of junk plastic riding vehical that I do not know where to start.  My kids woke up on Christmas to find a "Power Wheels" Hummer that they were thrilled about.  They jumped in...proceeded out of the garage and into the yard.  That's about it.  My 5 and 3 year old boys couldn't turn the wheel, and if they could the plastic wheels had no traction to get up the mild grass slope or the slightly sloped driveway.The dirt grider has a very strong tube frame, suspension, steel drive chains, and steel wheels with rubber tires.  The capability to cut the speed in half using a separate key is great, and I belive my boys will be enjoying this toy for a long time.  This thing can even haul me around at 6'4" and 190lbs (though not rated for it).  It went through the snow fair enough last weekend and the kids are getting a lot out of it.My bottom line point is that if you are going to invest in something like this that will consume garage space then it better well work and give the kids hours and years of fun</review_text>
This is a real ATV with an electric motor.  It blows away those plastic ones you see in toy stores.  This ATV has a metal frame, suspension front and back, pnumatic tires, lights, keyed ignition, etc.  My kids love it.  Plus it has a seperate parent control key to set the max speed at 4 or 8 mph, which is great for the younger kids.  It seems to go pretty long on a charge, and can go over about anything.  My kids are the envy of the neighborhood with this.  Plus the neighbors don't mind it because with the electric motor it is very quiet.</review_text>
I was amazed at the quality of engineering and materials used in this machine.Most electric ride-on toys have tiny batteries, weak motors (which last minutes) and plastic tires which need an absolutely flat surface. Not so this unit. This is truly an ATV, with it's hour and a half cycle time and pneumatic tires.The kids absolutely love it (ages 3 & 5).This is a toy that will last for a generation</review_text>
this in my opinion is the best compaired to the red one at walmart made by a different company , twistgrip throttle,full suspension,lights,keys for ignition and speed control,loud horn,2 speeds forward 2 speeds reverse,2-12volt batteries, over2 hours run time,154 pound max load, big 300 watt motor will cary my son and i no problem ,not recomended im 140 son is 40pnds and 4 years old and has no problems riding it on slow 4.5 mph, on fast 7.5mph which is faster than i can run to keep up.he has crashed into everything possable but no damage to the mongoose at all.  the picture does not do it justice it looks better in person much better than                'razor dirt quad'w/its 40 min runtime 6volt batt. no lights or speed control and front shocks.no rear shocks, 20 inches longer.  I hope this helped your desision on making a purchase I am very pleased with my purchase from amazo</review_text>
We just purchased this for our 6 year old for Christmas. He has been begging for a 4 wheeler and we're not ready to go gas powered. This one is a little small for the age age, my almost 3 year old looks like it was made for his size, but it is too fast for little ones. My 6 year old likes the speed and isn't bothered that it is on the small side. He could have handled it last year though. The battery life seems good. It is not recommended to get it wet which may be a concern as our son loves riding through puddles</review_text>
I had my knife for 10 years, and would still have it, if not for the 2nd instinct of putting it in my back pocket whenever I leave the house. One night I was heading for a flight, at the airport, going thru security; when I realized I had it on me, I had no choice but to throw it out. So had to get another one</review_text>
It is the same step we use at the club!  Shipping was SUPER fast too</review_text>
Just as advertised.  Only problem was that the DVD in one of the boxes was damaged during shipment.  The other step's DVD was in great shape</review_text>
OK, so it's a trip down memory lane to begin with... this is the step that we first saw in use starting in the late '80s at the health and sports club that we taught aerobics at all over Southern California.  Same step, same high quality.  You can find a little cheaper step around, but this is the one that we all knew back when.  This is the step that took all the abuse professional classes at high-end clubs could dish out and still look like new.  Highly recommended, we love having this step:  right height,  right size, adjustable, strong as an ox and looks good too.  The memory thing, that's just a bonus for us aerobic instructors out there</review_text>
I purchased this over a month ago and have rode it on average 5 - 7 times per week. It was easy to assemble although I did get some help from my 4 year old son!The heart rate monitor was a little flaky at first and would reset to zero when I was in the middle of a program but I later found that one of the plugs was not in all the way.I usually use it in the early morning when everyone else is asleep and with it being so quite I dont have to worry about waking anyone. I'm 6 foot and find that the adjustments still have plenty of room both shorter and longer.I'm 41 and had been doing light weight training for about a year but hadnt done any aerobic exercise for a long time. I started using it with the 20 minute programs at a resistance of 5 using the first program (1=Fat Burn, 2=Max Fat burn, 3= Aerobic) working my way up to the third program. The digital display shows you whether your speed matches the program with an easy to see light. I am now on resistance 6, second program after four weeks with two more resistance levels to go. During some evenings I just ride it for an hour at a steady 10 mph watching tv.I would recommend this to anyone wanting an inexpensive, comfortable exercise bike to get back in shape on</review_text>
My husband bought me this bike for my birthday. We really searched for the best bike, and thanks to other reviews we bought this bike. This bike accomodates me at 5'9", and my husband at 6'3" with no problem. It is very quiet. Although mine has developed a small squeal, it is still not even loud enough for me to really care about or call in for advice.I gave this bike 4 stars because the computer comes off a little too easily. I have many small children and they take it apart a lot. Nothing a little sticky tape cant fix.My mother in law bought a bike for two thousand dollars and ours are almost identical ( hers did not develop a small squeal obviously). Even the programming choices are the same. Mine is a little lower to the floor also (those of you with kids in the house will appreciate the lower profile-your kids will have a shorter distance to fall off when they are climbing on it). A good deal for the money- feels solid and well built, yet I can move it from one room to another easily(when so inclined) thanks to the "rolling endcaps" on the frame. Aslo easy to move for vacuuming</review_text>
If you want to exercise any time of the day without disturbing either the neighbors or your family in the next room, then the Stamina Silent Magnetic Resistance Bike is the perfect solution.Not only is the quiet, it is comfortable and easy to assemble. While riding the bike, you can also see the TV since there is nothing in front of your face to look around. The main display panel is low enough and the seat is high enough to accommodate TV viewing. Most of the bike has been pre-assembled so it only takes a short time to finish the assembly.The LCD Display area shows Time, Speed, Distance, Calories, Program and Pulse. A little bike runs around the edge of the screen. Programs to choose from:Fat BurnMax Fat BurnAerobicHillIntervalMountainThe pedals are comfortable to push and the position you are sitting in seems ideal if you are worried about your knees being uncomfortable. Some bikes I've tried are too uncomfortable to use, so this one was a nice surprise.The way this bike is made makes it easy to move. There are "wheels" or at least leveling caps that make the bike easier to move if you have to slide this back and forth on the carpet. Everything is included for assembly and once you get this bike all put together, it is very easy to use and quite convenient. Since it is so quiet, you can even use this bike in the middle of the night or while other people are sleeping.In 32 minutes it seems possible to burn 250 calories, ride 4.6 miles and maintain a speed at about 8.2 or higher on level 2. There are many levels, you can work your way up to various levels or change the levels manually for cooldown.One day I rode for 8 miles in an hour! The next time it was easierand as you increase in strength you can increase the resistance toburn even more calories.~The Rebecca Revie</review_text>
If you want to exercise any time of the day without disturbing either the neighbors or your family in the next room, then the Stamina Silent Magnetic Resistance Bike is the perfect solution.Not only is the quiet, it is comfortable and easy to assemble. While riding the bike, you can also see the TV since there is nothing in front of your face to look around. The main display panel is low enough and the seat is high enough to accommodate TV viewing. Most of the bike has been pre-assembled so it only takes a short time to finish the assembly.The LCD Display area shows Time, Speed, Distance, Calories, Program and Pulse. A little bike runs around the edge of the screen. Programs to choose from:Fat BurnMax Fat BurnAerobicHillIntervalMountainThe pedals are comfortable to push and the position you are sitting in seems ideal if you are worried about your knees being uncomfortable. Some bikes I've tried are too uncomfortable to use, so this one was a nice surprise.The way this bike is made makes it easy to move. There are "wheels" or at least leveling caps that make the bike easier to move if you have to slide this back and forth on the carpet. Everything is included for assembly and once you get this bike all put together, it is very easy to use and quite convenient. Since it is so quiet, you can even use this bike in the middle of the night or while other people are sleeping.In 32 minutes it seems possible to burn 250 calories, ride4.6 miles and maintain a speed at about 8.2 or higher on level 2. There are many levels, you can work your way up to various levels or change the levels manually for cooldown.~The Rebecca Revie</review_text>
I am very pleased with this rower after 4 weeks of use. It is very solidly built and the action is extremely smooth. Assembly was straightforward with no missing parts. As others have noted, the manual could have used a bit of editing, and some features, like the "pulse recovery mode" are very poorly explained, but you eventually figure it out. I really like the "constant heart rate" mode which interacts with a Polar chest strap (they actually provide a chest strap with the unit) and adjusts the resistance to keep your heart rate in a defined range. This is a good choice</review_text>
I've been using the Lifecore R900 Rowing Machine for a week since purchasing. I used to row in an eight.  This machine is sturdy, well engineered, quiet and smooth.  It's the closest thing to "oars in the water" I've experienced on any rowing machine (but without the choppiness of waves and having to "set-up" the boat."  It provides a true rowing experience and a great work-out.  I had some questions initially about the feedback graphics, which I emailed to the company, and the *president* responded the same evening (pretty impressive customer service).  He had one of his employees recontact me by  email to make certain I'd had my questions answered adequately.  There are so many similar products out there that I haven't tried, and cannot make an honest comparison among them all.  I'm just very lucky I chose this one because of its excellent engineering and simulation of actual rowing.  Even more important than the excellent quality of the machine is the obvious nature of the company that built it - they'll stand behind it and be very helpful with any problems (it certainly appears so from my experience with them).P.D.M., Woodstock, GA</review_text>
Faithful readers may have read the review of my previous dealings with a rower from Brand X.  I have been using this rower for a few weeks now and I am very pleased.  As other reviewers have noticed, the magnetic resistance is very quiet.  I sometimes get rattling from the seat, but not much. Okay, unlike other machines, the max weight limit on this machine is 350 pounds (not 250).  The LCD display is great in my dim basement, the heart rate feature is the HEAT! I waited to try that feature before I wrote this review.  It's compatible with my Polar Heart Rate Monitor's existing chest strap(one is supplied anyway).  The pulse program is useful as it raises resistance to raise your heart beat to a preset target and also reduces resistance to lower your heart rate to the target rate.  There is even a pulse recovery feature for when you stop rowing.  It monitors how quickly your heart rate recovers in a minute and displays your score from 1-6 to the nearest tenth.  The preset programs and options are varied enough to prevent boredom.  If there is any drawback, it's the way that the operator's manual needs a couple of readings to get the meaning across. In fact, I basically tell you more about the Pulse Recovery feature than they do in the manual.  Barring that, I was able to assemble the rower by myself in one session using the tools that came with it.  Overall, a very satisfactory balance between price and features.**UPDATE** 16 March 2007: I had a part break in the seat.  I called Customer Service and not only spoke to a human being, but a human being in the States!  The part was on it's way THAT DAY. Now THAT is what I call a positive experience</review_text>
This is an incredible machine, you can essentially do anything on the Ultimate that you do in a gym.  The first time I used it I was as sore the next day as I have ever been from free weights.  And for people who workout, you know that being sore can be a good thing (shows you actually did something).  Any exercise you can think of you can do on this machine, and they all provide great resistance.  It is beautiful to be able to push yourself without worrying about needing a spotter.  Overall this is a super home gym, even the delivery was fast and simple.  Putting it together takes a little work, but once you're finished it is a solid well-built device and the instruction manual is very clear.  Highly recommended if you're fed up with trecking to the gym 5 days a week</review_text>
I have been using a Bowflex for years.  I am a huge fan.  Although I rip the Xtreme2 in my review of it, I love the Ultimate.  The workout is as good and maybe even better than the gym.I'm a big guy and fairly strong. The Bowflex gives me a great workout and even challenges me.  I honestly think its a better workout than the gym because with this, I can go very heavy and not worry about having a spotter or dropping the weight on me. You can apply all bodybuilding techniques, including pyramiding, drop sets, rest pause sets, low reps, high reps, heavy duty, etc. Additionally, changing the weight and cables is quick and easy, making the transition from one exercise to another quick, so you can keep your heart rate elevated.I have put on alot of mass since getting my new Ultimate not too long ago. Those who say you can't go heavy or can't get a gym-type of workout must not be doing it right.This equipment can and, if properly applied,will give you a kick a_ _ workout</review_text>
OK, I'm not THAT old (51) but I was starting to feel that way. One day I woke up and realized I was 25 pounds overweight. Add to that my rising blood pressure and poor lung capacity and you get the average guy in his 50's. As I wathched the Bowflex infomercial I just said to my wife "I've had it!" I went out and got one that weekend.Well, with the help of Bowflex and the accompanying diet info I lost the 25 pounds and have kept it off for almost 2 years now. In addition, I got into good enough shape that last year my wife and I bought bicycles for Christmas and have had a great time riding on weekends.My blood pressure dropped and I can easily wear 34 waist pants again! I have had to buy new clothes but it's $ well spent.Take my word for it, dieting alone will not do it. Get a Bowflex, follow the diet plan, and use the machine... You WILL succeed!Oh, one more thing. Be warned. As the pounds drop off, be prepared for lots of comments. Some folks will be complimentary but other nay-sayers will try to drag you down by saying things like you're losing too much weight. It sure is nice to be complimented at my age.Good luck!!</review_text>
Though once this piece of excercise equipment is built, it's everything the advertisements, from print to infomercial, declare. However, somewhere, I swear, I read it takes only 45 minutes to put together and just taking the parts from the 5 large boxes took well over an hour. Further, the actual installation took over two days; and I'd like to think my buddy and myself are pretty good at these things. However, as I said, once put together, this is one solid, helpful piece of excercise equipment. One more thing, be sure you have the space for it once assembled. It really is a large piece of equipment, both vertically and horizontally. Good Luck</review_text>
We looked all over the internet for a Bengals backpack for my 9 year old son.   He is a huge Bengals fan and all we can find in our area is Detroit Lions.   This is has many great pockets, comfortable to carry and seems to be made well.   Would recommend</review_text>
My son loves this backpack.  It has tons of room and fits all his school books, gym clothes, etc.  I would definitely recommend it.</review_text>
this item has a very high price.if it could be lowered at USD 110.00,ill buy 2 pc</review_text>
We bought the Disney Minnie Mouse Trike for our daughters 2nd birthday and her eyes just lit up when she saw it.  Eventhough she can't quite pedal the bike on her own just yet she loves to ride on it with us pushing her.  We are going to get the pedal blocks to make it easier for her to learn to pedal.  I would highly recommend this trike for any little girl</review_text>
I just love this trike. The picture on-line does no justice for this product. If you want to buy something very unique for your little princess this is the perfect trike. My daughter just loves it as much as anyone that sees her ride it</review_text>
I love this trike, the quality is great. The price was very good. You don't see these at stores. Very nice, my daughter loves it. Get lots of compliments</review_text>
easy to assemble and very cute for little girls, our daughter fell in love with from the moment she saw it and it is very easy to ride and the sit has to settings to fit your child just right</review_text>
The InTone Jogger was exactly what I was looking for, and hopefully will help get my ankles in shape, along with the rest of me. I read other reviews, and really expected to have a difficult time getting it put together. My husband and I got it all done in less than 15 minutes. It's great!  I've looked in local stores, and can't find joggers like this. When I did find this, and at the shipping was free, it was a much better deal than I could find anywhere else</review_text>
I love this rebounder.  It was a bit difficult to assemble but the instructions did say it needed two people to assemble it.  I have had no trouble with it, the handle is sturdy and the cover stays in place.  It came with a DVD instead of VHS which was listed, but I still have not watched it.  Good workout with less impact</review_text>
I was suprised at how sturdy it is.  The metal tubing is thicker than I was expecting.  It wasnt too difficult to put together, but it took two people.</review_text>
It required a strong man to assemble it.Stability bar is great! Video is a much needed addition because it's hard to find something to do on the trampoline. It really supports the suggested weight. I think the price was a little high considering it doesnt fold</review_text>
This product is better than expected.Well constructed, and it works very well</review_text>
I would rate this with 5 stars, except that it is hard to put together - especially getting the cover on the springs.  It took two of us to get it on and we will not be taking it apart for daily storage.  Once on, the cover has remained in place.  The feet screw on and are secure.  The handle wiggles a little, but is plenty sturdy.  I recently had knee surgery, and the handle plenty sturdy enough for me to feel comfortable using it.  Once together, this trampoline works very well.  The kids jump on it ALL the time.  The handle keeps them from getting out of control.  I have not had to tell my kids to stop jumping on the couch or beds since getting the trampoline.  They just needed a good place to expend their energy in the winter.  The springs give it a good bounce too.  I have not tried the video, yet but the trampoline has been good for adults too</review_text>
Exactly what I wanted and as described.It was a bit harder to put together thanI would have liked, but once done, it worksfine</review_text>
I don't know what the other reviewer was talking about.  This product as pictured is exactly what you get with the VHS tape and all.  It has springs and not straps.  The only drawback of this item is the cover that covers the springs literally takes 2-3 people to put on and comes off quite easily.  The trampoline is very sturdy as we have had ours now for more than 2 years and my husband and I have used it as well as our three kids.</review_text>
i have to say that i LOVE this mat. the combo jute and rubber make it nearly impossible to slip. only thing is... the jute and rubber are rubbing up against one another and kind of crumbling and flaking off where i often place my feet causing bald spots on my mat. haha. weird, huh? so now you know. other than that the mat is visually very pleasing</review_text>
Great quality and a hit with my son-in-law an avid fisherman.  They run a bit large</review_text>
The product will keep items hot or cold for up to 4 hours.  Since it is solid with no glass interior it is virtually indestructible.  It is dishwasher safe</review_text>
I'm 33, but a kid at heart. This was a great purchase. Easy to learn and lots of fun. I ordered a size bigger than my regular shoe size and it fits perfectly</review_text>
I bought the nose clip because face masks always seem to leak for me. With the use of the clip to keep water out of my nose, I can use a snorkel rubberbanded to the head strap of my very comfortable swimming goggles and not have to worry about leaks. Of course I don't know yet how long the clip will last, but Speedo is a good brand, the clip is comfortable, and I've already gotten a lot of use out of it.  Joan Frost</review_text>
thule 871 is a great fit for the 07 toyota FJ. fits great between OEM roof roack and reduces wind noise while underway greatly. solid product. i always use thule.</review_text>
We gave this trike to our son for his third birthday.  He's pretty tall, but he had no problems reaching the pedals.  Took a bit to put it together, but that's the case with any new trike/bike product and the seat kept wanting to slide down, even after tightening.  Eventually, my husband got the seat to stay.  If your child is over 3 feet tall, you should be able to adjust the seat enough to get his/her legs to the pedals.</review_text>
I'm glad that the first reviewer mentioned that the trike was too big.  My 7 yr old suffered a stroke last year, and I needed a large trike for some therapy.  This trike works very well for the purpose</review_text>
I have an almost 3-year old grandson who is totally into construction toys and the sandbox. He loves this digger and so does grandpa. I found a cheaper digger when searching online, but while the reviews said the child loved it, there were also comments about it being less than sturdy.Assembly is from drawings only (little or no written instructions) so you should have someone somewhat mechanically handy to put it together. There are a number of plastic discs and rings that are important to not forget as they provide protection at various potential pinch points. I had to re-do some of these parts because in my hurry to put it together, I failed to notice all these parts in the drawing.Being winter now, we are using it mostly indoors with blocks and beans and under a covered patio in a sand box, but will move it into the garden area as the weather improves. I bought this model because of Kettler's reputation for sturdy toys and I have not been disappointed. This one will last for years</review_text>
I have a 2 and 3.5 year old and they both love this toy- I'm ordering another one because they fight over it.  We put it in the sandbox and it's easy for them to control and they have literally spent hours playing with it</review_text>
The product is simple to put together, seems to be functioning well and a good value for the money.  We actually ended up with the next level up due to a supplier issue</review_text>
We received prompt delivery and the detector was well packaged.  It was a Christmas present for our grandson so there was some delay between our receiving the detector and giving it to him.  The detector worked fine out of the box and all are happy.</review_text>
I have had this watch for 6 months now and during the height of the climbing season I can say I love it. It does everything it it claims plus looks great. I had a Avocet wrist altimeter for 10 years before this and the Suunto is much better and more accurate. Yes it does take some study and getting used to but if you make the effort it will reward you. So why do I like it?1) It looks great, small enough to not grab attention (like the funny looking bigger watches) but classy. Have not found scratching to be a problem even with rock climbing if you are careful. 2) The controls make sense. After having the Avocet this has multiple screens that if you use them for a time you don't even have to pause to find what you are looking for. 3) Very accurate. I climb much during the year and it is as close as a altimeter will get to accurate. I compare the readings with my friends GPS and we are always within 50 feet or less. 4) Being a mountaineer, I love the lightness of it compared with the steel model.I highly reccomend this watch!</review_text>
The watch is perfect! I wear it in a business casual work environment during the day. It keeps my bearings correct when I surface from the subway. On the weekends, it's ideal for roaming in the country side. The slim design and light weight make for a comfortable fit.  I find the controls and settings to be very logical.  The black faced titanium looks great. Thumbs up to the manufacturer</review_text>
Great conversational piece.  The Titatium housing gives it a cool look on the black face.  As for the performance, I have found the Barometer &amp; Compass to be extremely accurate. The temperature is very accurate, but you have to take it off your wrist for true reading.  I also love the chronometer stopwatch for jogging, timing each mile.  I have not gone skiing yet so I really did not use the altimeter or try to figure it out yet.  The only negative I found is the alarm is not that loud and for the price I think the band could be all titatium instead of titatium &amp; elastomer strap together.  I never leave home without it</review_text>
Just got my Observer and I couldn't be happier! Despite some of the reviewers comments on the instructions, I found them easy to understand. I spend a lot of time in the field and am looking forward to putting this watch through its paces</review_text>
This kayak is great for kayaking shallow streams.Firstly, it is very light. I can carry it comfortably for moderate distances over dry land. This allows me to avoid various obstacles in the water; just run ashore, pick the boat up and carry it past the obstacle. Fallen logs arent a problem any more!Secondly, it is very  durable. Ive been using the kayak for about a year now with absolutly no problems. There is an extremely durable outer shell made of nylon which protects the part of the boat that actually inflates; this prevents any kind of sharp bushes or protruding brances from puncturing anything vital. The bottom is coated in rubber which has yet to show any defect. The rubber realy helps in shallow water, or even in no water, from rocks and dirt puncturing the inner tubing.Thirdly, and probably most importantly, it sinks into the water only a little bit. Paddling in 5-6 inch deep water isnt a problem as it is with most boats, including inflatable sit in kayaks.The boat is also alot of fun in the ocean, much moreso than the standard ocean kayaks. This is mostly because you cant hurt yourself by having the kayak run into you, or flip over you. Playing in the waves is really enjoyable.The boat comes with a mesh bag with a draw string and backpack straps. This is a good idea; the mesh allows water to drain out after the boat is packed away and the backpack straps are suprisingly comfortable.There are some problems with the boat. The maximum wieght may be 250 pounds for the kayak, but this is pretty unrealistic. At 150 pounds i can sit comfortably in the kayak without there being a significant bending problem, where the middle of the boat wants to sink lower than the ends. With about 200 pounds the bending problem comes to be rather obnoxious because water collects right where youre sitting. You WILL get wet using the kayak if youre over 150 pounds, or an inexperienced paddler.There are some tracking problems that can be eliminated by using the skegs. The skegs, of course, make the boats clearance much more of a nuisance. The tracking issue isnt an issue for experienced paddlers, but if you want your inexperienced friend to take the kayak for a whirl, he'll spin in circles for about an hour before getting the hang of it.Inflating the kayak is very easy adn takes about 5 minutes. Deflating the kayak is a bit trickier, taking about 10 minutes. Buying the sevylor pump that has both a pumping and vacuum function reduces the time needed for deflation</review_text>
solid piece of equipment, and so much cheaper than the whole rack and solid cargo carrie</review_text>
We took this bag crosss country (4000 miles) and lived to my expectations.  We encountered snow storms, 14 plus continuous hours of pouring rain and the results were excellent.  I had two North Face base camp duffles inside and everything was pretty dry (some minor dampness occured due to the extreme weather encountered).  The pros definitely outweighed the cons and I highly recommend this product</review_text>
This set has a great cost-benefit ratio. The clubs perform well and also look good. The only drawback is that the bag does not come with a travel cover, neither does it have a support to keep it standing while playing. Overall evaluation is very good though</review_text>
These bottles are great, and I know I am getting a lot of water throughout the day due to the oz. markings on the side.  I love it</review_text>
This bottle is excellent if you are active and tend to drink a lot of water such as I do.  The spill proof cap is a great benefit too!  Very durable also.  I've already dropped it twice and has not suffered in the slightest.  I highly recommend this bottle</review_text>
I love this water bottle.  It is perfect for me.  I love the no leak feature and the straw seems to hold up under lots of biting.  Wish it were a little smaller at the bottom so it would fit into my car holder better.  No complaints so far.</review_text>
For $800 you get an ultra quiet , well built, sturdy machine. This is money well spent and for me $800.00 is alot of cash so when I went searching for an elliptical I did a lot of reading up on them.The warranty is by far the best on the market, the 18" stride is great (I am 5-11, 207 pounds). Its exremely low impact which is great for folks like me with bad shin splints! Easy to put together since I did myself in a little over an hour. The display is easy to use and read. It is very quiet and does not rock back and forth or sway from side to side. I have been using it almost every day of the week. This is not my first elliptical but I hope its my last for a long time. Good luck all!I have had this machine for almost a month. It still seems like a great buy to me and I have been using italmost every day. Unlike alot of machines I read about this machine has a little fan built in that works. The built in speaker is kinda neat but is not the best. I have my machine near my pc anyhow so I wont use this feature much any how. I will update my review sometime up the road so all of you future buyers can have an honest opinion. Good luck and great health and fitness to all</review_text>
Got this from Amazon. The product arrived pretty quick. Took my wife and I about 1hr to put everything together.I use it for 30 min. and I was sweating like crazy. I also like the built-in fan and speaker where you can hook up your ipod and listen to the music. THe forward peddling motion is a lot better than the reverse. There are some system out there that has smoother action, but personally, those system never really give me a true workout.This model is not Precor, but it's not $2000 either. For the price, a home model, you can't really go wrong with this system</review_text>
My family absolutely loves this machine.  It has tons of different styles of workouts to do.  I've had a long history of running, and this thing gets my heart rate going and gets me huffing a puffing.  The only complaint that I have, is that it squeaks.  We've tried a lot of different things to stop the squeaking, some days it doesn't squeak, and others it does.</review_text>
We just received ours yesterday. Came packaged well and took less than an hour to carefully put it together. Strong construction and very sturdy. I wasn't expecting gym quality, but honestly this is model is just as good as those $3K Ellipticals. We are very pleased with this purchase and you will be too</review_text>
This is a wonderful sled for children.  THe covering keeps them away from the wind and flying snow.  They sent this to me very promptly and my daughter loves riding in it.</review_text>
I gave this to my one yr old granddaughter for Christmas.  She loves it, she even loves being pulled around on the carpet in it.  After finally receiving a little bit of snow, she was able to try it out outside.  My son reports it was a huge hit.  Great sled for the younger set. The wind and rain cover is a great idea.  I'm only sorry she will outgrow it so quickly</review_text>
I hit a lot of "Almost Golf Balls" which are hard foam rubber practice balls, in my back yard.  I had gone through hundreds of wooden tees which made my back yard look like a driving range.  These tees solved that problem.  Now I have 2 or 3 tees out there and they last forever.  A great solution for my particular situation</review_text>
disregard totally what the other reviewer says. 1st of all a swing speed of 105-110 is not slow. I am a 2 hndcp and mine is in that range. Heck, TW's is 120-130 and his is the fastest.These are excellent tees, they do not break, they are easy to get in th ground and yes you guide them in as I do wooden tees. They do seem to help with a notorious big draw I have. BUY THEM</review_text>
This thermos keeps things hot for a very long time.I haven't tried cold yet.No more worries of the glass breaking inside either.Very well built and worth every penny</review_text>
This bottle is a little pricy. But it does what it claims. It preserves hot water temperature very well. I didn't try the cold temperature. The construction is very solid for high impact resistent (good for portability). I have no doubt that it will last for many many years. In all, I am happy with the quality of this bottle. But, I will take 1 star out due to its premium price</review_text>
Over the weekend I bought a Stanley thermal bottle. I've been wanting a thermal carafe for a while now, and this one has the capacity for a liter of coffee, tea, soup, etc.I was really jazzed about this specific bottle, because it is aesthetically rich in testosterone. The design seems to be straight out of the first half of the 20th century. So you know geeky-old-me, I had to perform a thermal performance test. I first pre-heated the bottle for several minutes using hot tap water. I filled the carafe to the brim with boiling water, and checked the temp using my probe thermometer. 205 degrees. This morning, exactly 8 hours after my initial measurement, I cracked the bottle for a second reading...an astonishing 177 degrees (I woulda thought 150-ish). The probe thermometer showed that the temperature of the room was 73 degrees, and I had the AC's thermostat constant the entire time.If you run the numbers through Newton's Law of Cooling, you find a K-value of 0.029801 per hour given my environment and observations. By empirical calculation, that means that the bottle's contents would cool down to 150 degrees in about 18 hours at room temp (the temperature I would still consider a beverage or soup pretty hot). 24 hours after filling with near-boiling water, the contents would likely be near 137.5 degrees...still pretty hot, and still somewhat capable of fighting off some foodborne illnesses. It would take 53 hours for the bottle's contents to cool to 100 degrees.Your mileage may vary, but this thing appears to be a winner</review_text>
This sword is an awesome replica in terms of actual size to that of Sephiroth's.  Only thing that I think takes away from the sword is that the handle is a plastic wrapped in black cloth.  When sword is held outstretched, it does become very heavy and a lot of pressure is put on handle.  Despite the handle and cloth, the sword overall is massive and amazing to behold.  Great collectible for any FF goru.</review_text>
I've been a Sephiroth fan ever since i played the game. This blade is exactly as it looks on Advent Children. The only glitch i found is that the handle bindings were not tightly wrapped around the hilt causing it to slide and overlap in areas. An easy fix if you know how to bind a sword, there is no equal to the sheer size of this blade... an absolute must for any fan</review_text>
I only have one problem with this weapon: the blade is far too short. According to the game, the BLADE - not the entire sword - is 68" long. This one is more like 50", a foot and a half shorter than it should be</review_text>
It doesn't weigh ten pounds, like some have been claiming.  It weighs 4 at most, I'd say.  Quite difficult to hold one-handed though, and *really* difficult to resheathe it without propping the sheath up or something.It really doesn't have much of an edge at all, another contradiction to what I've been reading from other reviews.The particular sword I received is in amazingly good condition.  The blade is nearly pristine.  It's straight as an arrow.  The sheath fits snugly, but is misaligned a bit and takes some work to get the tang into it.  There's no rattle when you swing it about; it feels nicely solid.This sword is an astounding value, all in all.  68" just doesn't really register until you're standing next to it.  The materials are nice, the workmanship excellent, and the packing job zealous to say the least</review_text>
Yeah, more praise for the Masamune, kids. If you have to choose between paying the electric bill or buying this sword, you can go a couple weeks in the dark and shower at your buddy's crib. It's just that cool. This version is cheaper in price and more realistic than the one made by weaponmasters.com plus it looks much nicer. On the white grease problem: I also own several carbon steel katanas. To get this grease off, interestingly enough, spray the whole blade with WD-40, let it sit for a minute or two, wipe clean with Shop Towels or terrycloth. Voila, the grease is gone. Now, to protect it for years to come, continue buffing the heck out of the blade until all the WD-40 is gone. Purchase a can of Rustoleum Crystal Clear Enamel for $5 at your local Wal-Mart (Hardware department), shake vigorously and LIGHTLY coat one side of the blade. Wait a few hours then do the other side. Finish up with the spine. You should have also gotten a little bit in the crevice between the blade and the tsuba. OK, I can hear you now, "Hey, I got build up in some spots!" Not to worry. Check out the Automotive section at Wal-Mart (or hit up Autozone) for some Rubbing Compound (also about $5). Follow directions, do not drink. Hey, now you can do ALL your swords! For less than $15 you can protect nearly 100 of your most prized collections. And yes, to test the Rustoleum claim that it creates a waterproof seal, I sprayed down a carbon steel blade, allowed it to dry, and dropped it in a bucket of water. After a week, no rust. Wow, a week in water is like a year of sitting exposed in your room! This stuff is the cheapest and most effective way to go. And if you ever decide you don't want the enamel, you can get some paint thinner or acetone from a hardware store to take it off</review_text>
This sword is awesome.   it's a near perfect replica of the masamune used by Sephiroth in FF VII: Advent CHildren.    I say near perfect because masamune is about 8 or 9 feet long.   it makes sense that the replica is only 68 inches long because no human can wield a 8 or 9 foot weapon (at least none that i no).  other than that i have no complaints.  If u love swords or r a big FF fan or r both, u should definetely get this.  5 stars hands down</review_text>
If your like me you probably have been waiting for someone to make this for about 10 years. so when I found it on here, I really had no choice but to buy it.first of all I need to remind you that this sword is 68" long. If your not sure how big that is, get a measuring tape out and see. you might find out that it is bigger than you. Also be sure you have a spot to hang it.Shipping was pretty quick. It was delivered by ups and it came a day early. The shipping was also about $22.When I opened it I was surprised to find that there was some detail put into the handle like some people that looke like samurai and some weird looking animals. I was also surprised that blade actually had a sharp edge to it, I was expecting it to be just a big chunk of carbon steel.It is pretty cool to look at yourself in the mirror holding something that you idealized since you were a kid, and to swing it and hear that nice wind sound. although you won't be able to swing it to many times, because it weighs about 10 pounds.Now, a few things I didn't like about it, which is probably what you want to hear. First they put this vasoline type gel on it to keep it from rusting, which I understand when you buy a carbon steel sword, but I just can't get the stuff off. Everytime I put it back into its holder more gets on. also there looks like something the resembles waterspots on it. I guess I got to polish it. second thing I didn't like is the made in china carved into the blade. third, theres a little glue running down where the hand guard is.All and all, this is a great sword. Especially if your a final fantasy nut like me and also a sword nut too. and to have something so rare in collection for $99 why not get it.I'm also going to add, even thou I shouldn't have to, this sword is not to be used. I know your probably saying "the" right now to me. But when your holding it in your hand your probably going to get to urge to hit something. I'm just going to tell you that physics is going to be against you, because of how long and thin the blade is. Although I do think it will be pretty cool to watch a sword fight with that, so if you decided to record it and post it. Thanks for reading</review_text>
i bought this for my daughter for christmas. she is a cross country runner and wanted a heart monitor sports watch with no chest strap. she says it works perfectly and is very happy with it.</review_text>
I am a cardiac patient and was not able to wear a strap for some time.  This watch is good for those who can not wear a strap.  I used this watch when I was only allowed to walk and not do any strenuous exercise.  And the watch worked very well for me.  Now that I am fully recovered I use a heart monitor with a strap because of my increased activity. I now use this watch when I go to work and I check my heart rate while I am using the stairs instead of the elevator, or if I am doing a brisk walk during my lunch break.  It is very simple to use</review_text>
I disagree with the previous reviewer.  If you want a truly accurate reading while doing exercise you need to have a model with a strap.  A strapless model requires you to stop the activity and read the results.  The Reebok Silver is a great value and does what it is supposed to.  The instructions are quite clear and if you follow them you will get an accurate reading.  I am very satisfied</review_text>
Just like the ones used in college intra-murals, excellent stitching and look to be very durable.  Fast shipping, and great deal</review_text>
My 6 and 10 year old boys use this backstop regularly.  They put the batting-T in front and hit hard balls into the net, then use it behind them as a ball-catch for hitting pitches(sponge balls.)  It has a red square strike zone that helps the pitcher find the strike zone, and when facing the net, provides a target for the hitter.  It pops open with great force so be carefull when you set it up the first time.  My 10 yr. old folds it and puts it away for us.  This is a quality product and an essential piece of training equipment for any age.  We like the Jugs machine balls for use in the backyard.  They are dense yellow sponge with the correct size, weight and seam.  Unlike regular training balls, we have not broken a window with them yet.</review_text>
This hitting screen works very well for such a portable screen, and the SportsRUs price is a good value. The construction is high quality. The refolding process takes some getting used to, but works fine once you've done it a few times. The best part of this screen is that there is nothing to set up once it's opened! You just pull on 2 straps quickly and it's ready to use! It comes with some stakes, but I've never used them. I suppose they might be helpful in strong winds. The case and handles work well for over the shoulder carrying. Overall, a very good value</review_text>
For kids just getting started with the game, this ball is great and is the right size for beginning leagues.  Nice indoor-outdoor construction.  My daughter is learning how to control her dribbles and is working on the shots, and this ball does great</review_text>
I bought this basketball for my sons who are 9 and 6 for Christmas last year.  The ball is 27" (as opposed to the bigger ones that are 29").  This makes for great play for smaller kids.  The ball is colorful and has a rubber feel to it all around for a non-slip grip.  Great product and inexpensive!</review_text>
Ball is excellent, my son adore it. Its just right size and quality that Ihe nee</review_text>
I started using the BodyRev because I wanted stronger, less flabby arms.  I was able to work out my legs and abs ok without any sort of gadget, but I had to join a gym to get in an arm workout worth anything.  I had been doing 30 pushups 3X a week and that was ok but too much strain and one dimensional - I wanted something intermediate between nothing and full or knee pushups and gym pullups.  (I am contemplating buying the Perfect Pushup.)The BodyRev delivers, and exceeded my expectations. After about 2 weeks of essentials and/or bootcamp 3X/week, my arms looked noticably better.  And after 2 months they are really, really solid, but trimmer and more toned.  (I'm a grrl, that's good.)  Seriously, I did weight assisted pullups for a year at the gym and my arms didn't look this good.  And the BodyRev fits under the couch, although it's usually on it so I can rev while watching TV.The Bootcamp workout is a good cardio workout that targets the arms and core.  The production quality is a little rough and sometimes "2 more" turns in to "4 more" but overall the workout is a good one and you get to pretend you're kicking in doors while Navy SEAL Alden Mills smiles and tells you to reward yourself with more pushups.  The moves are designed to use "functional training" so it's easy to imagine when the use of the muscles being worked out would come into play in real life, even if you're not a boxer or Navy SEAL.I can't yet do bootcamp with all 3 weights, but I do most of the "Essentials" 15 min workouts (better for beginners than Bootcamp) with all the weights.  Also, the BodyRev customer service is excellent.  Highly recommend the BodyRev.</review_text>
Bought this item to add some variety to my swim workout.  I'd only recommend this kickboard to serious swimmers only.  The board isn't very boyant.  The shape/design only really allow one type of grip (hold the board at its pointy top - the forearms lay on top of the board) which forces you to stay flat with your face in the water. Bottom line: Not a kid toy, but a good piece to add to your swim bag</review_text>
*****This is an upscale designer water bottle, top of the line, and so much fun. The designs Of Sigg's water bottles are gorgeous, from the plain, solid color bottles, to the ones with intricate designs. They are simply beautiful! I switched from regular plastic water bottles because of health concerns, thinking it would take more work to maintain. These do necessitate regular cleaning (I clean mine every day), but having something so beautiful to drink from makes the cleaning fun. Sort of like my rings, glasses, and watch, I now consider my Sigg personal water bottle a vital accessory, reminding me to drink more water, making a statement about my values, and expressing myself with a special design. Yes, all in a water bottle!Sigg of Switzerland water bottles are very high quality, made of light aluminum on the outside, slightly insulated, and covered with a special powder coat on the inside that prevents any leaching whatsoever, unlike plastic and polycarbonate water bottles. They are light, durable, and perfect for any activity. Well water tastes spectacular in these bottles, just like from the tap.Sigg bottles come with several different types of tops.  I bought the screw top because I don't like sports tops, and I don't mind unscrewing the top when I want a drink. It is totally leakproof, which is important to me. The top is pretty and can be hooked onto a carabiner.  I get comments on it all the time, "What's that? I love it!"  The sports top version is ok; I just am not a fan, as I don't feel like I can get enough water from the little stream from the sports top. However, for convenience, you might prefer it. For children, there is a cap-type top. All are leak-proof. If you are ever unsatisfied with the top, you can buy a screw top separately to fit your Sigg bottle.Sigg makes their personal water bottle in .6L and 1L in this style. I have both. I use the .6L for sports activities because they are smaller. When I won't have to carry the container, I like the larger bottle. Sigg also makes a smaller .3L bottle for children that is a perfect size for young people. You can buy Siggs in alternative sizes too, such as .75L, .4L (for kids), .6L, .5L. You can occasionally find this bottle in the 1.5L size, also. Search Amazon for the perfect size.Pick a style and pattern you like, as this bottle is a personal accessory, and should reflect your style. The colors are vibrant and even prettier than they seem in the pictures on Amazon.They are expensive, but they are so durable that you can plan on them lasting many years. I consider them both an accessory and an investment in my health, so they are well worth it value-wise for me.Highly recommended.****</review_text>
Have a 10 month old and are planning to have another baby soon. I needed something that would allow for 2 kiddos and for me to continue walking/running during pregnancy and after. I recently received the schwinn double jogger and I am so pleased. It was easy to install ( I did it!)and I can't wait to get on the road. It is a little overwhelming when you see it done and put together because it is so big and slightly heavy but the comfort of my kid is far more important!I rate it 4, for comfort factor, looks and easy to manuever. It didnt get a 5 because the shade latch was broken ( I called and they will be shipping out a replacement immediately)and it is truly bulky!I think I might need a new car because I dont think it will fit in the back of my volvo wagon</review_text>
This stroller was well worth the money, it is very smooth and unlike other strollers with the front wheel this one was very well put together.  My wife and I jog with it and our two kids 3yr and 5yr are very comfortable in it.  The materials used are high grade and with some care will last a long time I'm sure.  One of the selling points was it being made by Schwinn, we have Schwinn bikes in the family and this was just another good investment.Bottom line is we are very pleased with this item</review_text>
I purchased this double stroller for my twin girls.  Very easy to handle.  The swivel front wheel is a big plus and it can lock if needed.</review_text>
I love this stroller.  It is a good value, one of the least expensive double swivel joggers I have seen.  With free shipping through Amazon, you can't beat it.  It has all the features you would need.  My husband is 6'6" and the height is great for him.  My daughters are 5 and 18 months and we got this to take to Disneyworld.  My 5 year old thinks it's comfy when she is too tired to walk.</review_text>
I just got my gazelle set up and used it for the first time. Set up was a little iffy...definitely read all through the instructions before you begin. Use is very simple! Mine came with the DVD, and since I don't have a player, am not able to use that. However, the instructions in the owner's manual for the different moves are easy to understand. I inherited 'faulty knees', so was anxious to see how "low-impact" this would really be. It's great!</review_text>
I looked into buying a Gazelle because I heard it was little/low impact on the knees and I have a knee problem that has limited my excersise routine recently...When I received my Gazelle, it was fairly easy to put together. It took about an hour. The directions were easy to follow and the only extra tool required (that was not included) was a screwdriver.I was anxious to try it out. So, I streached out a bit and got right on. Since then, I have used my Gazelle at least 5 days/week and I enjoy doing it. It is a good work out and I can watch TV while doing it. It will be perfect now that summer is comming and here in Arizona it is hard to go outside for a walk or a run in the heat.I rated this item 4 stars (instead of five) for two reasons. One because your feet actually get sore (the bottoms of them from the bumps on the non-stick pad)- unless you wear tennis shoes. And the other reason is because it is a little noisy. Other than that, I like it alot</review_text>
I love this machine. It is so nice to get a good total body workout with just one machine. If you don't have a lot of time to devote to different workouts, or if you just want to get your workout over with...then this machine is great.I have been doing aerobics for about a year now and have had to scale back some due to an injury, but this machine allows me to have a good aerobic workout without any impact on my injured ankles and feet. Before I had this I was using an exercise bike, but I was unsatisfied because I wasn't getting a total body workout. Now I can get the benefits of a great workout and not aggravate my injuries.I had no problems putting it together. It took me about 30 minutes to get it together. It does fold up, but it is not easily movable on carpet.Overall I am very satisfied with this product. It was affordable and easy to assemble and gives a great complete workout.</review_text>
When I bought this product it was because I wanted a way to work out at home but i did not have enough money to buy an expensive tredmill or eliptical and thought this was a cheaper alternative. I was worried because I read a lot of online reviews that stated it was very hard to put together but I did not find that was the case I just dont think people realize it takes between 30 and 45 miniutes to assemble but the directions were easy to understand and I got it together with out any major problems.I have also read reveiws that states that the machine is very squeeky which it is at times for me but if you just spray some DW 40 on it a little that seems to solve the problem.I orginally wanted to use the machine while watching TV but I usually dont feel like I am getting much of a workout. My machine came with DVD's (I bought mine from HSN) and when I follow along with those I feel like I get a much better workout. Its good to watch them to at least see all of the diffrent execrcises you can do with this product.The machine does fold up but it is not something that should be considered very portable. I thought I would be able to keep it in a closet and take it out every day but it is just to hard.I am happy I bought this product it is easy to do and it very low impact. I would recommed it to others.</review_text>
If you are a parent and can't get to the gym, I would suggest you get the Gazelle.  I got mine for only $25 and what a bargin.  I really love this machine.  I usually watch TV or listen to music while working out. When I am on the Gazelle time goes by sooo fast.  Before you know it, it's time for me to head to work.  HOWEVER, like many reviewers my Gazelle did make noise (that's why I gave it four stars).  I brought WD40 and the squeaking did stop. Hope this was helpful</review_text>
I was shocked when I found this skateboard for $3.00, as I had seen the same exact skateboard at K-Mart for $10.00.  Upon receipt of the item, I was happy with the packaging and look of the skateboard.  It was a great gift idea for my kids ages 7 and 9.  The only thing about the skateboard that I didnt like, was that the wheels are not as fluid in movement as I had hoped.  They stick a little from time to time.  Other than that, the product is great</review_text>
Great skateboard for the money. Got this for my "angel" for Christmas and he seems to love it. Appeared sturdy and good quality like any other skateboard</review_text>
A pretty sturdy skateboard for the money.  A great holiday gift for fans of Spongebob, Patrick and the rest of the gang from Bikini Bottom</review_text>
I would say average at best.  But low cost so what would you expect.  Worth what I paid</review_text>
From novice to intermediate, this is an excellent set of lifting straps.  You don't need something like this from the beginning.  But the weight you're handling starts to exceed your grip strength, this is invaluable.Use is simple.  You just wrap the strap around the bar.  There is no real technique to it.  As you lift the weight, the weight itself will pull the strap tight and transfer some of the load to the straps around your wrists.  I don't recommend wrapping the straps too tight, as that will transfer almost all weight to your wrists and your forearms won't get the usual amount of workout.  The point is to complete the lift without your grip failing, not avoiding using your grip altogether.  If you do it right, your grip will be supporting most of the weight in the beginning, and as you complete more reps and your grips start to fail, more and more weight can be transfered to the straps.This is a simple, no frills strap.  It works and it's priced very reasonably.  Padding is a little light, but it's adequate unless you are handling some Herculean weight</review_text>
For the money, this is not a bad bed. It is pretty "bed like", pretty soft. It does lose a bit of air overnight though.</review_text>
Bought this airbed and it was just as advertised.  Looked at several vendors - large range of prices for the same product.  It is heavier than the previous model I had, but it is also twice as tall - we like that.    Had a power outage and ended up buying a spare battery pump so it works under all circumstances. Comparably speaking, I think it is a good buy</review_text>
other than not really knowing how to size snorkel gear, for 2 people, andi wasn't really interested in paying dive shop prices.i was also leaving for the Mayan peninsula in 7 days.i went shopping on line.i didn't want to rent gear, or use the gear at the resort.the only issue is that i didn't/couldn't properly size the gear.the mask did not fit my face or my girlfriends face well.and we have different shaped faces/headsbefore we go again, we will spend money at the dive shop for new masks.the delivery came well before we left for mexico.not having to deal with all the plastic packaging and marketing garbage that would normally come with this class of gear, was wonderful.i think that the masks may work well for kids.</review_text>
love the finsmask pressed on face...need anti fog agentbag was Super for collecting conch</review_text>
A GREAT LITTLE FLASHLIGHT WITH 3 ULTRAVIOLET LED'S AND THREE WHITE LED'S WHICH IS PERFECT FOR ALL SPORTSMEN.  ESPECIALLY HUNTERS WHO CAN USE THE ULTRAVIOLET FEATURE FOR "BLOOD TRACKING".  GREAT CONSTRUCTION WHICH ALSO FEATURES TWO SEPARATE SWITCHES FOR THE LED'S.  HIGHLY RECOMMENDED</review_text>
It is a great purchase for me.My kids likes too much</review_text>
I was very excited to get a skee ball like machine for under $200. I was not expecting a top quality arcade verison which would cost 10 times the price. I just was looking for another addition to our playroom that would keep the kids at my house.My husband is a carpenter and does home installtions everyday and it took him 6 hours to assmeble with power tools. I would have never been able to assemble this myself. Even after assembly there still remain a few problems. The balls get stuck alot. To me this isn't too anoying until the all get stuck which does happen. The game gives each player 6 balls to roll and as long as some keep coming back out Im okay with that, again for the price I wasn't expecting perfection.The unit does fold up so it doesn't take up as much room as you would think which is very nice. I'm waiting to see how long it will last given I have active kids. The unit is not all wood, they are plastic and cardboard parts that i worry might not hold up in the long run.For now I'm happy with my purchase because the whole family is having fun. I bought this along with a folding indoor baseketball game. Both have given my kids hours of fun , saved space,  and I know the kids are safe inside in the and being active instead of spending all day with the tv/video games.</review_text>
The bar is great, but it was twice mailed without the included collars.  Amazon failed to help, so I contacted Impex Fitness(their number is on the box if you can read it) They immediately sent me some collars, something I guess Amazon couldn't handle.  Love the bar, but it must travel the world first, because both boxes arrived completely destroyed</review_text>
I had the same issue as C. Denning previously posted. box was a mess and nothing to hold the weights on the bar. have yet to see how amazon addresses this problem</review_text>
I have a little over a week with my bar its great. I got it on the time expected without any trouble. I especially love the threaded handles cause they match my dumbells. I use it on my scott curl and great for my triceps no need for a tricep bar....... GOOD BU</review_text>
I rather lost my love of swimming since I cannot see well without wearing contacts, and the chlorine irritates me twice as bad while wearing them.  I have used several different brands of goggles with my contacts over the years and was overjoyed when I ran across these.  I debated a brand I am familiar with but reading the reviews, I had to admit I wasnt really liking them for many of the reasons mentioned with that product, so, I took a chance.  You cannot go wrong for the money with these, they fit comfortably, could substitute for my regular glasses in a pinch, and after a small amount of adjusting they are very leak proof with a wide field of vision.  The strap adjustment is a bit tedious to manipulate, but that is a definate good thing, once you have them 'dialed in' there is no chance they will slip or move out of adjustment as it uses a very clever locking mechanism to lock the straps in place, rather than the double strap through a buckle design that seems all to prevelant.  My eyes are in between the available powers offered so, I went with the closest step down from my prescription, figuring the additional distortion of the water would even things out, but, I see quite clearly with them both in and out of the water.  If you need some vision correction, and don't like fiddeling with contacts in the pool as I do not, you simply must own these goggles</review_text>
I have always wanted a home gym, but the bulk and weight of one, combined with the size and age of my house, were not a good match. I had seen infomercials for the Total Gym and checked out their website and was SHOCKED to see the over $1,000.00 price.This gym is fantastic. I really do not see how the higher priced models could be any better. The movement is smooth, the unit is 100% sturdy, and the user can do all exercises which can be done on machines at commercial gyms.I LOVE my Total Gym and am thrilled with my purchase and the modest price. Money VERY well spent</review_text>
This machine is great.  I've blown thousands of dollars on gym memberships over 20 years believing home equipment was unaffordable.  This relatively inexpensive piece of equipment is fun to use. The gliding motion makes you feel relaxed, it is non-stressful like no other machine I've ever used before.The daily workouts give me freedom to eat what I couldn't otherwise eat now that I can workout at home. It has so many variations of exercises.  It just gets the job done.  I no longer have to fear getting fat. I was averaging a pound a year the last 3 years working out with basic aerobics equipment (Jack's Cardio Cruiser) and had to do something.This machine also gives you the kind of workout that makes you feel good, not exhausted afterwards because it's low impact training and works the muscles well.  It's a very comfortable, relaxing work out. I'm feeling the affects as I write this, and it's a wonderful warm burning sensation in my muscles.This equipment comes assembled and learning how to use it is a snap.  I have no complaints whatsoever.</review_text>
The Total Gym 1500 is one of the best values for the money.  Do NOT buy this machine if you want to become big and bulky.  The machine is all about building long, lean muscle.  Think reps, not amount of weight; Bruce Lee, not Schwarzenegger.  You will see wonderful improvements in the tone of your physique, your balance, your endurance, and most importantly, your flexibilily.  One last note: the fitness board that you lie on is rather small.  If you are a larger person you may need to consider a machine that is a step or two up</review_text>
The total gym has several different models with bascially the same features.  With this model, you can do everything that you can do with the more expensive model, but... in hindsight, I wish I bought the "better" model.  The biggest difference is in the foot plate/hand extension.  It takes only a few moments to add the piece of hardware on to do the next exercise, but depending on mood, it was sometimes enough to dissuade me.  You don't NEED to do the other exercises, but I probably would do them more often if I didn't have to stop my routine to do it.  If this is all you can afford, then this is a GREAT machine and you'll be very happy with it.  If you can afford a wee bit more -- you'll be happier with one of the next models up</review_text>
I was 30 lbs overweight when I bought Total Gym. The machine comes fully assembled. You just have to adjust it according your requirements.After a few minutes of setup, I immediately tried a quick and easy workout (bicep curls). Within minutes I realized that Total Gym is the real deal. It can make you thinner and stronger in just 20 minutes a day, 3 times a week. I know that there are tons of products out there making the same claim, but if you want to invest in your health, this is one of the best ones.Here are all the pros and cons:POSITIVES:1) Comes Fully assembled. You have to make bare minimum adjustments according to your goals and fitness level.2) As the ad says, replaces an entire gym. You can do virtually any excercise on Total Gym.3) It is fun and easy. Once you start your workout, it is hard to stop4) Comes with a video that guides you through some basic excercises and also shows you the ones used by LA firefighters.5) Compact and very easy to store away.NEGATIVE1) You gotta stick with the plan. Don't give up and you will be a very happy, thinner and stronger person within 10 weeks.Remember, you have to excercise and eat healthy to get back and then stay in shape. Total Gym will help you do it.For those who are wondering, yes I lost all excess weight and gained new muscle. Most people I meet think I am much younger than I really am!</review_text>
My Total Gym 1500 arrived almost completely assembled and ready to use.  With about five minutes of adjusting and learning how it worked, I was ready for a workout.  I've owned it now for two weeks and look forward my workouts.  They are fun and relatively easy.  I do have to be careful not to overdo it, however, because my muscles feel it later.  I have tried other home exercise equipment, but this is the first one that actually lives up to its advertising</review_text>
This is a great addon to the door gym, enables you to do even more upperbody workouts. It rests ontop of the Neutral pull-up bars on the door gym, I think it's perfectly safe, no idea how'd it'd slip off seeing as it grips very well to the neutral bar. Suggest this to anyone that has a door gym obviously and would like more upper body workouts</review_text>
I purchased the door gym based on the reviews.  It is a FABULOUS device and works as advertised.  Stable, with multiple workout options from neutral grip, chin-up and pull-up positions, after two weeks of use, I can see the difference and feel it.  The broad reach bar just came, and after testing it, I agree that it shouldn't be used by kids, UNLESS they've been shown how to use it; the broad reach bar could slip off if a child, has to jump up to reach it.UPDATE: This thing is genius.  Before, I would STRAIN to do TWO PULL UPS. Now I can do 15.  I don't lift weights anymore, I use big flexible bands, the door gym and pushups.  I've never felt stronger.</review_text>
This thing is great. I love it. I don'y know what that guyis talking about not letting kids use it.My 10 year old son uses it every day. Great for upper body greatness. Very good. Just tighten brackets then it works great</review_text>
I'm 6'1" and really should have bought the 55cm product.  The guidelines for buying these balls seems, to me, to be a little on the large side.  Other than that, this is very well built and seems superior to the other exercise balls on the market.  There ar so many uses for an exercise ball, this really should be the first piece of equipment you buy.</review_text>
Ok first off dont listen to the idiot that said order from airsplat. They sent me a broken gun and wouldnt return it and this happened to many others aswell. Second off, dont buy the 'enhanced' version b/c its most likely broken. VERY VERY VERY VERY VERY VERY HIGH LEMON RATE. About 50% are lemons!. Get another gun for this price</review_text>
i bought this gun about a month ago, but didn't keep it long. i chronoed it at about 240 to 260 fps using a .25 gram ksc bb. it would be pretty safe to say that it would go 300 fps using a .2 gram. it is made very cheaply, but it was surprisingly accurate and had an excellent rate of fire. the only reason i sold it was because i paid 80$ for it and sold it to some kid for 200$;)</review_text>
I got this gun for my B-Day and I got to tell you this gun is awsome. It does not shoot 330 however with .20 gram bb but with .12 gram. The gun however is still very strong. It shoots through cans from close and kills bb on ground. Gun is very accuarte (even with .12). It does hurt when you get hit on your skin. So wear a sweater. The gears are also metal. So you know it will last. Don't buy a gun with no metal gears.Only bad thing about gun is battery. It does not come with any guildlines on how long to charge or a smart charger. So you have to wait like 10 hours but not really know if it is done. It does come with a Ni-HD so you don't have to discharge fully and charge again. You could just charge when you want to. Also that battery drains by it self in three months.Gun is plastic but feels stron</review_text>
Well for one, Do you even own this rifle?  And two, you're ruining the moment pal, I mean c,mon! "Airsoft Forums" please.  It's a waste of time.  Why not try actually going to one of these tournaments.  I don't wanna sound like a jackass, but it's true.  I own over a dozen high quality rifles and SMG's that price way over two hundred bucks and this one is the only one I was willing to spend the least on.  Let's just say I was bored to I buy rifles and whatever else relating to airsoft.  To put it short for whoever's reading this, THIS RIFLE ROCKS! GET IT!  GET IT WHILE THERE'S STILL TIME</review_text>
I bought this for a present. The Adventure glove well made and a good value</review_text>
This glove is not only a good looking glove but durable. My only complaint is that the closure around the wrist is an inch and a half longer than cycling gloves typically are. The extra length covering the wrist is fairly comfortable but very hot, soaking the gloves in sweat in all but the coldest rides. I wear full finger gloves year round for the added protection and sweaty hand have not been an issue in the past. Buy this stylish glove, wear it in the winter and keep it in the closet when it is warm.</review_text>
Perfect for camping.  Until I bought this percolator,  having to leave the campsite to go in search of a cup of coffee was the biggest drawback to camping.  As easy as boiling water.  Love it!!!!!!</review_text>
Replaced a Thermos brand vacuum bottle with this Stanley.  Has not leaked, and keeps everything hot.  Best past about it is that it has a life time warranty!  I use it daily and it works for me</review_text>
I had a steel thermos brand that was terrible! This Stanley bottle keeps my coffee nice and hot for hours! I also wash it by hand, not the dishwasher</review_text>
This Stanley product is remarkable: strong, stylish, handy, and very useful. The handle is great! We put ice and water in it this summer and the next day there was still ice in it! Highly recommend</review_text>
If you own a Shottie this is the best mag you can buy. It holds about 170 rounds compared to the stock mag which only holds maybe 17. Fits Crosman S32P and many other shotties. Slam On !!!!</review_text>
This is by far one of my best investments. Paired with the 180 round mag that came with my gun it allows me awesome play time with no reloading</review_text>
Tired of reloading your air-soft gun over and over?  This product enables the shooter to shoot to his hearts content.  Well worth it!</review_text>
I love these things! They're very comfortable and so much more convenient and easier to store than a mat. Best if you practice on carpet at home. Super for travel. I wish I'd known about these when I started with yoga; I'd have gotten them before I got a mat. Cons - (1) Not great for full body on floor asanas. (2) Foot "paws" slip a little, but I've seen something similar with back elastics to hold them in place, and I don't like the look of them.</review_text>
I enjoy using the product. It's great for travel. It's a light-weight alternative to traveling with a yoga mat. As a yoga instructor, I can also move off my mat and around the classroom to demonstate postures in large classes without slipping on the floor. I really like Yoga Paws</review_text>
I bought this because I have wood floors and cats so I don't like my 4 month old directly on the floor and he eats his blanket, posing choking hazard. This foam mat is great. I can use a wash cloth to wipe cat hair away and baby doesn't smack his head on wood flooring. Music makes my baby laugh, he loves this play mat. I looked every where for this mat to get it for less and never found one, even at the manufacturers web site. This is great mat for the money! (Though larger would be better</review_text>
Love the knife, it's just a little too large to carry in my pocket on a regular basis.  I returned it and bought the Chive..it's perfect</review_text>
Like the Chive, this knife is a nice small package that's deceptively stabby. Sure, it looks innocent, but how much of that blade do you want in your eye? Hypothetically speaking, of course. I would never indicate that you should stab people with this knife. Never ever.The high points are the sleek design, flawless assisted opening, and light weight. I have problems with thumb studs on assisted opening knives, so I am very pleased that this has an index opening. For the safety-conscious, there is a safety lock to keep the blade from opening in your pants. Not that it will, but just in case I guess.The Leek is a perfect knife for people with small hands; that i's assisted opening is a definite bonus. Too many assisted opening knives are too bulky for my hand, or too powerful when it snaps open (Kershaw Tactical Blur, for example). The Leek firmly snaps into place without "recoil" and is light and small enough for people with small hands to easily use. But don't be fooled by its innocent appearance. This knife can be a deadly little package and should not be underestimated</review_text>
This is a beautiful, slim, sharp, functional, fast knife. The knife is slim, and with the clip can be carried easily in your pocket. The safety on the end of the knife is a little stiff, but can be adjusted so that it is easier to slip on or off.The pocket clip is reversible, allowing you to carry the knife point up. This is a great feature, because when the knife is carried in your pocket point up, you do not have to swing the knife around in your hand to get it in position for opening. The knife can be deployed much quicker when carried in this fashion.The speed-safe index opening flipper works very well, opening the knife quickly with just a little pressure on the mechanism. No grand flourishes, thumb strength, or wrist flicking is needed to open this knife.The finish is good, the quality is great, everything about this knife is amazing. A great knife to own.</review_text>
I bought this for my boyfriend as an exact replacement knife. He had lost the original doing god knows what. :)He loves it, it's not too big but not too small, securely clips on your pocket and is so sharp its down right scary but I guess that's why it's a men's knife. Opens quickly and the serrated part is a nice addition.</review_text>
Maintains a decent edge, the opening/lock/closing mechanism is simple and smooth. The color is as intense as seen in the pic, and pretty resistant to wear. In general, happy with the knife</review_text>
I'm not a huge outdoorsman but wanted a nice everyday pocket knife.  The Kershaw's Leek fits the bill.  I love the size, long enough to get your whole hand envolved with the task yet small enough to have clipped to your pocket and forget its there.I was planning on taking the clip off and just letting the knife "float" in my pocket but fell in love with the clip.  The only thing better than light weight in your pocket is no weight in your pocket.I find that the knife is well designed and I really like the Speed Safe opening action.  It has a solid "click" that lets you know that the knife is in a locked position.  Super sharp and the perfect drop point blade.</review_text>
I purchased this knife at a gun & knife show three years ago and have carried it everyday since.  I've owned ($60.00) Spyderco and ($150.00) Benchmade (Automatic) knives, but this Stainless Leek model is slimmer, quicker to draw and has a better clip than both of these knives.  Because of the unique spring action mechanism, many think it's an "automatic" knife.  My only recommendation is to occasionally lubricate/clean the mechanism to keep the action quick.  I did have to tighen the allen screw to keep the safety from slipping "on" in my pocket.  I will be ordering a second one at this price.  This is a very well designed, well made pocket knife</review_text>
The Leek is a wonderful knife, but its sword-like point is subject to breakage. (Throwing the knife into a wooden target will invariably break the tip--which is what happened to two of my Leeks!) Fortunately, Kershaw lives up to its lifetime guarantee policy and quickly replaced both of my broken knives with brand-new ones, no questions asked. I just shipped them the knife, explaining what happened, and a week later got back a new knife.The knife itself opens beautifully, though I've found that the liner lock sometimes sticks and isn't that easy to depress with one hand.</review_text>
This is the third one I've owned (the first two both met unfortunate deaths in the bathroom...ahem) and I love it. The clip is sturdy, and my older one was still very accurate after three years of use. The battery lasted a few years on my first one (I wrecked the second one before having to change it)</review_text>
Very pleased with this pedometer. It's easy to set up and use. Also, the leash is an added plus</review_text>
I purchased 2 of these items for my son for his birthday(along with the rocky inflatable boxing bag too). This was an excellent investment! He immediately took to wanting to box with his sister, and then the neighbor boy too. All 3 of the children took their time rotating the 2 sets of gloves around so they would all get time to play, and no one got hurt from them. The children had an incredibly fun time with this. The only thing is, if you use an electronic pump then the bag and the gloves have a tendency to deflate a bit...but once i refilled them all with out the pump(by blowing them up myself) they stayed inflated for weeks until i decided to deflate them myself to put them a way for a bit. Overall, I'd say this is an awesome gift for any one who has children that doesn't shy away from play boxing</review_text>
This was a present on our girls 3rd birthday... She rode off an on from 2 until 9 She loved it so much we couldn't wait for the battery to run out. For the rest of the day she would only stop long enough open another gift then back to the car.  Quick to learn how to drive it... Loud?? a little bit but hey, it's a kids toy.  If they didn't make noise, the kids wouldn't like it.Great Toy!! Great Value!</review_text>
When the buggie arrived, it didn't work. I had to call Razor's Customer Service Dept. Their service is awful. The Senior Agent was very rude. I managed to figure out the problem on my own. The electrical unit was not connected. Once it was connected, it worked fine. We have two of them. The kids love them. They are lightweight and ride well on carpet. Overall, the product is good.</review_text>
Great product, fun for children, nicely designed, easy to operate.I purchased 3 of the razor bumper buggie (Ladybug) cars for 3 of my grandchildren age 4, 3, and 2.  The cars arrived promptly. At  Christmas  I charged the batteries and gave them to the children.  The cars work great! Even the 2 year old can work her car! Just like her big brothers. Although, one battery did not hold the charge correctly, a quick call to the company and a new part was sent immediately.  GrandmaLind</review_text>
This is the best toy I've spent money on in years! It's cute - my girls love them...I bought two!  They are great to ride in the garage or believe it or not....they go well on carpet!  They have laughed, bumped, even learned how to use the driving handles with their feet!  Great fun</review_text>
This was purchsed in December '06 to be given to my boyfriend by our 17 month old daughter, he loved it!  He put it on his truck right away!  Great product</review_text>
...I had a plastic one before - and it broke - love this one!!</review_text>
This is a much, much better set than you'll get from your typical sports dept. store. Though it's pricier, it is sturdy and easy to set-up. The poles are rigid and the guide ropes are good and strong, a decent all-around design. You may want to upgrade the racquets but they are fine for out-of-the-box action</review_text>
Great product. Amazon's packing for shipping reeks of OVERKILL. The box was twice as long and deep enough to pack four mats. Be more economical with packaging</review_text>
I just received this rack and it's great! I assembled it in about an hour and installed it on a 2005 Honda Odyssey.  It holds 2 Fuji Monterey bikes securely and is very easy to use. Without the bikes I can open the rear door on the Odyssey. Cycle-On Pro comes with 2 locks. One locks the rack to the car. The other locks the bikes to the rack. I would highly recommend this product. I have also ordered the 3rd bike add-on and will review it when it arrives</review_text>
My husband & I were looking for a basic bike and that's what this is!  We put it together in about an hour.  We had a slight problem with the computer connection but he was able to get it corrected. The seat is a bit hard for me....I use an additional pillow to soften it up a bit. Overall, a good buy for the price</review_text>
bike was easy to assemble. works great, and cant beat the shipping cost</review_text>
We bought this about a month ago. It went together easily enough - took about 1.5 to 2 hours - the instructions are clear.It is VERY quiet! I love that!The resistance is plenty for us - we aren't workoutaholics and don't overuse our equipment. If you are a SERIOUS biker and want something to stay in shape, I would go for one of the more expensive models. If you are like us, and work out 3-5 times a week for 30-45 minutes, then this will be perfect for you.It adjusts plenty for a tall person. Someone 6 feet tall should have no problem.Only three very minor complaints:1) If you have to adjust the length a lot for different users, it's kind of a pain to change, however, we have it on a rug, on a hard floor this may not be as much of an issue.2) If you get off it for more than five minutes the timer resets back to zero.3) The seat is cushioned, but still a little hard; I had to put an extra cushion on it.Otherwise, we DO love it. It is an excellent value</review_text>
I discovered recumbent bikes in the gym, you know, highly expensive & technical things that cost over $1k. This bike is almost free by comparison, & it's plenty sturdy & COMFORTABLE, which is very important for me because I have fibromyalgia. There are days this is the only exercise I can do.I put it together by myself, and though I suggest that if you have a neuromuscular disease, you should probably have help, I managed to do it alone! I was riding it that night.It's compact so if you want to make more room for company, you can move it easily (there's little wheels in the front), but the best bet is to set it in front of the TV so you can work out to the news or MTV or whatever you like.If you don't want to constantly stare at the clock, you can change the setting on the computer to measure your calorie burn, your distance, speed...anything you like! I have recommended this to all my friends & think anybody who prefers a recumbent bike would love it</review_text>
Feels extremely fragile and rightly so, since it broke the first time I test fired it. Fortunately, I got it for free with another purchase. I wouldn't recommend this gun even for beginners</review_text>
This is a very good begineer pistol.   Not real sturdy, but well worth the $3 I paid for it</review_text>
The box it arrived in was badly damaged and the elliptical almost fell out of the bottom when we picked up the box to bring it inside.  I was surprised that pieces weren't missing.  I started to put it together and it took about 45 minutes.  The directions were easy to follow, except for the nuts and bolts, I guessed which ones they were referring to because there is no guide that tells you which one is which.  Getting the pedal bars on the base of the machine was the most difficult task.  By the time I had it put together I was sweating.After the assembly using it is very simple and it does what an elliptical should do.  I find that the right handle seems to move a little so I will have to see if I can tighten it a little more.  The display went dead in just a few days but after putting some new non-generic batteries it seems to be working okay.It is easy to move around the house and doesn't take up a lot of space.  When you are on it it doesn't move around like I read in reviews of other ellipticals.  Overall, now that I have it all put together and the display works, I am happy with it</review_text>
This paper cutter puts the rest to shame. I have purchased quite a few others in the past and after cutting several sheets of cardstock and cover weight paper, the blades dull on the previous cutters. This one? Not even close. I make 300 programs and menu cards for a military ball and the blade is as sharp as the first time I used it.</review_text>
I have had this bike for over 3 months and ride it about 5 to 6 days a week for 20 to 25 minutes each day.  It is a Great Bike!  It was easy to assemble (though I did have my husband doing most of it) and takes up very little space.  I keep it close to the TV so that I can ride it while watching my favorite shows.  It is very quiet.  It has more features than what I use - I just want to know how long I'm riding, how fast, and how far.  But I'm sure    the extra features may appeal to others.  I highly recommend this bike.  It  was very reasonably priced and was well worth the money.</review_text>
This bike is quiet and works great!  It is a nice inexpensive no-frills bike.  I recommend it to anyone who doesn't need a fancy machine</review_text>
I've only had this for a couple of days, but I'm pretty happy with it.  The set-up wasn't too hard except for connecting the tension cable which took quite a bit of fiddling.   The bike sits pretty high, and since I'm short it's a bit awkward to get on, but the seat is comfortable and the machine is very quiet.For the other reviewer with the complaint about cycling through the stats on the display.  You can easily set the display to show only one stat:  just read the manual.Update:  I've had the bike for a couple of months now.  I use it 4-5 days a week for about 30 mintues a day.  It's holding up well and I'm still very happy with it</review_text>
I received this bike as a birthday gift and am please overall with it. One irritant I found was that some of the hardware was already installed on the bike, so I spent 10 minutes looking for screws, nuts, and washers that were already on the bike.  Just be aware that when you purchase this, even though there is a separate package of hardware that comes with the bike, the majority of the hardware is already installed so don't assume that you got shorted some pieces.The tension is a little difficult to set up and I plan on looking more into it.  I did what the instructions told me to, however there doesn't seem to be an "easy" setting so far on this bike.  The tension setting range is from 1 - 8, with 1 being the easiest, but I don't notice any differences between the ranges.I know the other person that reviewed this bike didn't like that it cycled through the information while riding, but I actually prefer that it does.  I found it nice to be able to just look at the screen and know how many miles I had ridden, what my speed was, etc..without having to interrupt my workout to push any buttons.</review_text>
I bought this bike to rehab from knee surgery. At this price point I was willing to take a chance and buy it sight unseen. It works as advertised and I've incorporated it into my daily exercise routine.The bike is quiet when in use; I've used wind trainers before that sound like cyclones compared to this bike. I don't have to crank the TV to hear it while pedaling. The tensioner has 8 levels and provides a good spectrum of wheel resistance. The electronics controlling the 6 exercise programs, timer, calories burned, distance traveled, and pulse all work well.The only minor negatives:1. The setup instructions were clear but hooking up the tensioner was unnecessarily difficult. Took 20 minutes and a lot of sweat.2. The stabilizer bars (front and back) are just a tad short, so there is a slight side-to-side movement as you pedal. Nothing serious.3. As you exercise, the LCD readout cycles through all the stats...would be nice to be able to select what data you monitor.Overall I'm happy with the purchase, esp at this price, and can recommend it others</review_text>
We love the poker table that I purchased. It is alot sturdier than I had expected and it looks really nice</review_text>
I purchased this because I get my directions mixed up so easily and am always wanting to know what the temperature is outside.  This was so easy to install and set up.  I just love it and would encourage anyone to get this if you have a vehicle that does not already have the temp and directions in your rear view mirror</review_text>
I installed the V2000 only for the compass, as my vehicle is already equipped with a temperature sensor.  I appreciate the easy-to-read dual display of compass rose and degrees.  The V2000 seems to be very accurate as it displayed the same degrees as my army-issue lensatic compass.  It is easily installed and aligned and was very helpful at night with an overcast sky, when no stars were visible.  I would definitely recommend this product</review_text>
This unit works as advertised. I mounted it using the suction cups on my windshield in the lower left hand corner, and ran the temp sensor cable about a foot over to the edge of the door frame to get outside temperature. The suction cups work well if you clean the glass first.Pros: Easy setup and good results.Cons: temp gage is too small to read easily</review_text>
I was so reluctant to buy this item. Having read the user review of it's relative models and it sounds so horrible. Anyhow, it turns out that this one work like it's supposed to. I read the manual and follow the instruction carefully and it functions like a magic. Very darn accurate for my standard (ordinary people who get lost every now and then). Compare to the map, it'll be off no more than 5 degree. I'm happy with the purchase after finding that the $2 compass sold in Target won't work in my car. Now we're travelling with more confidence</review_text>
I bought this product for my boyfriend who absolutely loves it! I've tried it before, it has a GREAT flavor, just like drinking chocolate milk! The shipping was quick too</review_text>
I have found wilson balls to give very good distance off the tee.  The feel is also good around the greens when chipping and putting</review_text>
I bought this for some serious ninjaing if you know what i mean. Yeah, last summer i was fighting some evil goblin dudes. I was using my katana, then I threw some stars and knives, then i used 2 tantos. As i was fighting i was wondering how i fit all of these weapons into my little pockets. I remembered later that i had  little hobbit slaves carrying all of super cool ninja weapons. So in the middle of my battle i sent one of my hobbit slaves to fetch me a laptop with wireless internet connection. When he came back i found a very nice desk in the middle of the battlefield and went to amazon.com. I found this super cool NINJA UTILITY BELT!!!1!!OHIO! So i ordered it. A couple minutes later a little boy on a moped gave me a package. (not really) It was my NINJA UTILITY BELT!!!1!!OHIO!  So i unrapped it and there it was It was so cool, it was black. (in the picture it may look brown.) I slipped it on and buckled it up. (It was a little hard to buckle, but i have a jammed finger so it might be easier to other people...like buff ninjas.) It was awsome,it held 18 stars, 2 throwing knives, and 2 sais. (sadly that is all i have so far, but it might hold more. I didn't try to fit a tanto in it yet.) It was a little hard to open the velcro, but once you get the hang of it it's a breeze. So I fired my hobbit slaves and got back to the battle.......................I had won all thanks to my NINJA UTILITY BELT!!!1!!OHIO! So that is my story of the NINJA UTILITY BELT. For any new coming ninjas, true ninjas (such as myself), or any halloween costume I suggest you get one or more . They are very useful and will serve you well.</review_text>
I love this Fast Bag,  it fits all my goodies; cellphone, bike-tool, wallet while i'am riding.  It is a great value for the price and it looks great. Every one wants one. I truly recommend it</review_text>
This is the second 25 qt. Igloo Marine Cooler I've purchased this month - it fits well behind the seat of the Hobie Mirage Outback Kayak (you have to put a large watertight Plano box in the well to serve as a base for the Igloo). Add a Fentress set of rod holders, and you are outfitted for fish..</review_text>
The Igloo cooler that this is replacing is my original 25 qt. legend cooler that is over 18 years old. The original legend cooler has held up extremely well to regular use. This new cooler is nearly identical to my original Igloo legend cooler. The only differences being the original was red and it had a drain (this cooler is small enough that you don't need a drain).I find this size of cooler very handy for fresh water fishing, salt water fishing for weakfish and for keeping sodas cold on long trips</review_text>
The box was kind of damage but I guees it was because the product was so big and huge.beside this fact anything else was so perfect!.Thanks a lotI recomend him 100</review_text>
This product has everything I was looking for. The price was great. It came damaged and had to have it fixed</review_text>
Doorbell rang.  I was excited!  My heart pounded!  I came down the stairs! All 5 poodles were barking!  I opened the door and my box was delivered as promised! I slid the heavy box inside my greeting room.  My son opened the box for me and my heart dropped.  The tube stand below the seat was completely bent.  Thanks to my son and his girlfriend; they grabbed some heave pipe and tools and spent about a half hour straightening it out enough to match up the bottom rail support.  FINALLY!  Then it was assembled in like 40 minutes.  I love it!  But receiving anew product all jacked up did disappoint me.  The bike functions as designed!  Im breathing better, shrinking my mid section, and all in all HAPPY</review_text>
It wasn't too difficult to figure out putting it together. Although, one of the legs was bent...and if it wasn't for my dad who straightened it (needed strength), I wouldn't have known how to straighten it back. Also, one of the plastic covers was broken (just put it on top), but can't tell. It took me about 35 to 40 minutes to put together. I like it! There's about 4 people that use it altogether. I like the cycles and the heart monitor! Easy to program.</review_text>
I'm a large lady with a bad back so trying to institute an exercise program has been a challenge for me.  This bike is comfortable to use, yet sturdy enough for me to get a good workout without being concerned that it would collapse under my weight.  It's adjustable so my husband, who is 8 inches taller than I am, can use it comfortably too.  Be aware that assembly is required.  Overall, it's worth every penny</review_text>
Quick delivery, better straps then the ones at the local gym, safe, easy installation</review_text>
I really like this storage rack. Cost versus function is quite high. It now provides a place for our 4 bicycles plus associated gear...no more scrambling around locating all the necessary equipment for a ride on either the trail or road! It doesn't have room for every piece of sports gear we own, of course, but seasonal adjustments puts everything we need within reach</review_text>
Easy to assemble and solidly built. Small point, the description said it holds 6 bikes but it only came with hooks for 4</review_text>
I have a garage full of bikes and I needed some organization badly.  I saw this rack during a search on Amazon and it looked like just what I needed.  When it arrived I was immediately impressed by the materials and construction : it is very well made and the pieces feel substantial.  All the fasteners are allen heads which is a quality touch.  The quality was such that I thought it must be made in the USA ! But alas, after searching the packaging carefully, I found the elusive "made in China" sticker.  Oh well, what isn't made in China?Assembly went well and all the parts went together without much struggle.  Follow the tip in the instructions to leave all fasteners "loose" until assembly is complete.  When I got it together and tightened all fasteners snugly I hung 4 bikes on it and it is very stable.  I have to say I am very satisfied with this product and feel comfortable in recommending it to others.</review_text>
This is a reasonable light that certainly does a good job of making you visible to motorists.  I would agree with the reviewer about brightness - it is not really bright enough to use as the only source of illumination.For me the most disappointing factor is the 'no tools' fitting strap.  It grips poorly on glossy surfaces - like many handlebars, for example! I ended up gluing rubber patches to the inside of the strap to improve this.Worse, the strap tensioner actually broke apart after just over a year of use.  The pivot pins are just not up to the rest of the build quality.Pros- Good light for sodium lit city streets- Really waterproof- Solid caseCons- The 'no tools' strap simply sucks.- You'll need another light if it is genuinely dark where you ride.Not really worth the investment.  I bought a cheaper 5-led light - with a proper screwdriver tightened quick release fixing - that I am far happier with.The CatEye is now an expensive spare flashlight.</review_text>
This compass has it all.  You will not be disappointed.  It is well constructed and thought out.  A must have for anyone who leaves the main roads.</review_text>
I have used my MC-2G for about a year and am very impressed, I can not think of any improvements that I would make.  To adjust the magnetic declination, the compass is flipped upside down for access to the adjustment screw and for direct reading of the declination scale.  The fine green index line was a little difficult to see until I started the adjustment and the line moved away from the red declination marks.  Now that I know what it looks like - it is easy to spot.  Two of the scales read directly in miles, one scale for maps using 1:24000 (1 inch=24000 map inches) and one scale for maps using 1:62500 (1 inch=62500 map inches).  I believe the scales do not go to the corners of the compass because the corners are rounded, plus the three scales would then overlap.  This is my favorite compass</review_text>
US Special Ops forces use this compass. This is pretty indicative of its reliability.I own this compass as well as the Silva Ranger. They're both great compasses, but I prefer the Suunto (in spite of the fact that Suunto now makes the Silva compasses as well). The housing is indeed easier to turn on the Suunto, which is handy when you're shooting by sight. The Romer scales on the base are nice, although if you're serious you're probably already carrying a transparent Romer scale card (that's the plastic Graphic Training Aid thingy you take coordinates with, for all of you Lt.'s out there).When I backpack, I take this Suunto as well as the Suunto GPS plotter compass, for working with (surprise) my map and GPS. If the Romer scales on the baseplate are really, really important to you, you might look into that compass as well/or instead of, as it features more scales and is just as accurate a compass.All in all, this is the ultimate baseplate compass, in my opinion. I have miles and miles of rifle-piloting in the US Army behind me and now hump the hills for pleasure; land-navigation is a passion for me. Suunto makes the tools that I find most useful in that pursuit</review_text>
I believe some clarification of this compass's features is in order.  I am retired military with over 24 years, much of it using maps and compasses.  In my opinion, this compass is the nearest I have seen to perfection for this style of compass.  The half-moon hole is for easy sighting of a distant target with the mirror raised to about 45 degrees.  The "backward" markings are designed to be read by that same mirror, thus appearing "right-sided" in the mirror. If there was a 6 star rating, I would give it.</review_text>
The compass handles very nicely.  The housing is more comfortable to turn than the Silva Ranger CL.  This started to become significant after a few minutes of handling.  The Suunto can be used with one hand whereas it was difficult for me to operate the Silva due to the small knurls on the housing.The bottom part of the mirror has a half-moon hole in it allowing a midpoint view of your map.  Very nice.The global gimbal system on the needle is pretty handy as you don't have to hold the compass totally flat for it to operate correctly.  Or I could learn to hold the base level, too.  Presumably in the southern hemisphere the magnetic field causes the compass needle to roll a bit.The one very strange thing about this model is that the declination markers inside the housing are printed upside down.  It appears that Suunto went with the declination readable from the opposing side while making the declination adjustment since the compass must be turned upside down to do this.  It's an interesting way to differentiate.The inclinometer is probably pretty handy for snow travel among other things.The base is a little wide for my hand, as is the Silva.  The mirror appears replaceable.  Good thing since it's glass.  The map markings don't start on the edge of compass.  I prefer this since I never feel comfortable with that, but it's a personal preference.  It has a 1:24000 and 1:62500 (?) scale for map measurements.The sighting notch seems to work well.  The lid snaps on to the base tightly and due to the thickness of the lid, you can't quite twist your thumb to pop it.  It's a practice problem, I'm guessing.The key on the lanyard is for adjusting the declination, though I don't think I'd do it because I'd forget to realign it.The compass is very heavy compared to a baseplate design but that's due to the lid.  It's a consideration if you're an ultralighter.  Those ounces really do add up.  There are lighter mirror compasses available.The base does not have a centimeter scale whereas the Silva does</review_text>
I have some of the regular bones swiss bearings and these feel faster.  I would recommend them</review_text>
I had a mix of ABEC 5's and 7's on my skateboard.... and i thought it was about time to buy some good bearings... so i bought the Bones 6 balls... WOW, the bearings are worth every penny... you go faster and its alot smoother... the Bones 6 balls spin longer not broken in than my mix of bearings... I will keep on buying Bones products from this day foward. My friend just cant seem to keep up with me when we skate around town... and hes always outta breathe when he reaches me. lol Grade A+ bearings hands down.</review_text>
I have been skateboarding for over 30 years and I own 14 skateboards (12 are longboards-I'm 43 after all!) I'm in the process of converting ALL my boards to these bearings. So far I have 8 boards with these bearings and I could not be happier. They are fast and durable and less than half the cost of ceramics. I'm not aware of any bearings that come anywhere close to matching these in terms of performance and value. Don't waste a $100 on ceramics-GET THESE</review_text>
Wow... when I first bought these bearings I knew what I was after. All my friends that skate and everyone I know uses Bones. No wonder it doesn't have any reviews... cause it doesn't need one. If you take good care of them and clean them once a month or so they'll last you a long time and it also depends on how often you use your board, but anyways if your looking for really good bearings for a decent price than these are the way to go</review_text>
-comes with extra security cable-includes 1 year free theft coverage on your bike when secured using the lock (altho if you read the fine print, it's redeemable only if the u-lock is actually broken apart and you can show that)-nice set of keys, including one with a light-nice finish on the lock-the keyhole is weather-protected (the shinier middle part rotates to cover it)-snug secure fit (tho make sure it's big enough for your locking situations)I'd recommend this lock for anything up to medium-high level of security</review_text>
the pennants are a great memento for the winning season of my favorite baseball team.  they are in great condition and will be displayed for years to come.  awesome product and a great price</review_text>
I just want to thank-u for the quick turn around time for the wiffle balls.. My kids got into playing wiffle ball and at this time there were not to many around, but u came through..Thanks againFrank</review_text>
I just bought these guards and they protect my skate blades very well. The only problem with these skates are that they are longer than my size 6 blades were. So if you have that problem, just trim. After all, it does say *Trim if needed*</review_text>
I picked up 1 of these as well as 3 single gun versions when they were $24 each, just before Xmas 2005. They are built nicely with metal hinges and latches.The description says aluminum but the sides seem to be a sturdy silver plastic, not painted platic thankfully. The frame is aluminum though. Well worth what I paid. I wish I bought the range case before the price went up. It was $42 before.Only problem is with smaller guns, the padding doesn't hold the psitol tight enough so it moves during transport. Nothing a thin layer of extra padding or magazine added under the thicker padding won't fix.The locks are a nice extra but won't hold back an older child or adult determined to get at the pistol.</review_text>
My [...] old has been using this at her local YMCA (the 3 flotie one) and she is swimming independantly.  I love that I can change the amount of boyancy by removing the bubbles as needed</review_text>
This is the same kind of swim belt used in our local instructional swim class. We have tried others and we always come back to this one because it works better than the rest.</review_text>
Our local YMCA uses these at their toddler and preschool swim classes.  It's completely adjustable with 60" of belt.  The 'bubbles' are on the child's back and therefore out of the way.  Unlike a lifejacket, this does not allow the child to just float.  They need to keep moving and therefore actually learn to swim, first by "running" in the water and then by stretching out to a normal swim posture.  Once the child progresses in his or her skills, the 'bubbles' can be halved and reduced until the child can swim without any help</review_text>
We purchased this swim belt after being introduced to it during our four year olds swim lessens.  Not only was it a great aid then but even more so when using it on our own.  We would highly recomend this to anyone whos child has difficulty staying afloat when vertical, but wants to be on there own when swimming.</review_text>
if ur looking fer a sniper at a nearly unbeatable price, buy this thing omfg it owns. it shoots acurately up to 100 feet sometimes more. but make sure u only u .20 grams or it will be really inacurate. u shud get scope for it too if ur a hardcore sniper wit a ghillie suit and stuff. only thing is that u have to carve out the scope mounts on the top of the gun which is is right above the bolt. and if u use a scope u can take off the ironsight peephole piece of crap. ur better off taking off the peephole sights no matter what cuz there practicly useless in a game. just look down the barrell of the gun and use the front sightand it'l work fine. hope this helps anyone looking to buy thid gun. i would suggest this gun to anyone who wants to be a good to great sniper. it OWNS!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
The quality is good.  Very accurate.  The only bad things is the wrist band is small in lenght for my wrist.  I used the last hole of the wrist band.  Everything else is good.</review_text>
I love my watch. The function to count calories burned during your workout is very helpful. I take a lot of classes like step and turbo kickbox so its great to be able to have an idea of what I'm actually burning.It is easy to take your heart rate and if it doesn't take the first time, you just have to lick your fingers and then it reads fine. I haven't had a problem taking my heart rate while cycling or jumping around.The watch is a little bulky so I'm glad I got the petite. It is definitely sporty so I wouldn't wear it to dinner or anything, but it looks fine for the gym! I'm really glad I got it so I can track my calories burned better</review_text>
I just bought my MIO and I love it! I love knowing my heart rate when I exercise. I don't leave the gym until I reach my goal of calories burned. MIO helps me know if I need to increase my intensity, or slow down. I also love knowing my heart rate during the day to monitor my stress. If it's too high I know that I need to relax and take a deep breath. If you want to lose a few pounds or get in shape, this is the watch for you. Plus the purchase went towards a great cause.</review_text>
I easily overlooked all of the issues that other people had with this watch.  It was close enough to being accurate since I was not looking for soemthing exact.  My two complaints are that it was not waterresistant at all even though it claimed to be and that after buying a new second watch that one broke within 4 months.  This is an unrelaible and cheaply manufactured item.  Spend a little more and get a watch that has a chest strap. They may be tedious but they work and they dont break down</review_text>
I have enjoyed using the heart rate monitor, but sometimes have a difficult time getting it to reset.  Probably just because when I am done with my excercise, I am warm and tired.  Sometimes it will take me several minutes to get it cleared.  But it serves it purpose for the heart rate monitor that I bought it for, so I do like that way.The band is not the most comfortable, but assume that is just part of the necessary design.</review_text>
I wear this watch constantly now!  I love how it warns you when you go over your planned calorie allotment for the day so you can go work out and automatically subtract the calories it calculates from your total, automatically bringing yourself back on track.  I also like learning how many calories I burn at work, versus at rest, versus during, say, rollerblading.  Really helps you budget your calories in line with your activities.  It comes with a calorie index (pocket-sized book) that contains the calorie content of all foods that don't have tend to have caloric content on the packaging (ex:  fruit, beans, vegetables) and grants you access to their website which helps you have the appropriate expectations when it comes to daily calories needed and such.....  If you're someone who needs a lot of information when it comes to motivation, or someone who gives up trying as soon as you feel like you "sabotaged" your diet, this is an excellent product because it gives you the information you need to undo your mistakes and keep moving forward towards a goal.</review_text>
I recently purchased this cute trike for my godson, who turned 3.  The trike was very easy to put together, and the look on his face when he opened his "birtday pwesent" was worth it.  Although he is having a bit of difficulty getting his feet and hands and eyes to get it "all together" to ride, it hasn't stopped him. We have about 25 inches of snow that is slowly melting, but the first thing he wanted to do was "take it out in the snow and tow Daddy's snowmobile"!!  We are gonna' love this trike for a good many years, because it will be passed on when my godson outgrows it:)!</review_text>
I bought this for my son's 4th birthday.  He and everyone else love it! His legs are short and I thought he still needed a trike.  He absolutely loves the tow hook on the back.  It is extremely well made and the tow package is very strong and sturdy.  The seat has multiple positions for plenty of growing room.  My 6 1/2 year old loves it too.  They both hook things up and tow them around.  This is by far the cutest trike out there and I would definitly reccommend it.  It was slightly confusing to put together, but once I got things figured out it was easy.  The instructions just aren't thorough enough, but it's just basically common sense anyway.  This wouldn't keep me from getting it.  Just thought I should be totally honest about it.</review_text>
Great buy, My three son who this was for and his 7yr old brother and Five ans 20 month old sisters love it. It is use well ans shows no signs of distress. Easy to put together.Was here in time for CHRISTmas. Looking for the "Lighting McQueen" one now and will purchase with [...</review_text>
My son got this for Christmas. He loves it. So far has seem to be very durable as to I have 3 rough boys. The boys especially love that the tow really works, they go around towing everything. Takes only a few minutes to put together</review_text>
We ordered this trampoline for our four year old's Christmas present. It was the best $30-$40 we've ever spent. She is very energetic and jumping seems to calm her. Even in the middle of a meal or conversatin, she will start jumping. The small trampoline fits in our living room right between the family room area and the dining area, so she has plenty of opportunities to jump.This is a bit stiffer with not as much bounce as the outdoor trampolines, but if it was that bouncy, it would be more dangerous for a four year old, and it would sag to the floor, since it isn't high off the ground.It is low to the floor, and not super bouncy so I don't have any safety concerns with it.Now, if I could just motivate myself to exercise on it, it would be even more of a find.</review_text>
Even a moderate wind tears it off the trampoline, so we had to attach velcro straps to keep it in place. During rain, water is collected inside it and causes the trampoline to dangerously sag, so we had to make a hole in the middle of the cover to let water out during storms</review_text>
I was moments away from purchasing this but decided to call local knife ship for any details and found out the clock wasnt waterproof. So seeing as i am in my school cadets experiencing rain, lake and mud i really needed a sturdy tool that i wouldnt be afraid to get wet. but with thorough research this was probably best tool for your average user who doesnt want the classic red handles. so good size, colour, design, tools but not waterproof.</review_text>
I agree with the other reviewer that this is similar to the Climber, but this has a better look.  It's just nicer.  The pen is great for work.  Very handy...I've found myself using it at bizarre times when I am searching for the pen.  In terms of the clock,...mine is going on 7 months with no forseeable problems.</review_text>
transparent onyx swiss army knife,beautiful,21 feautres,I own over 10 knives and this is my best one save over 50% by using amazon.com instead of using swissarmy.com.I researched the internet, and this is the best deal I could find anywhere for this knife</review_text>
This pedometer works very well, and really helps to keep you motivated.  The instructions that come with it are really hard to understand, but once you figure out how to use the watch, it's pretty easy to use.  The colors are a little brighter than what you see in the picture.  It would be nice if there were more color choices.  Overall, I am happy with this product, and I recommend it.</review_text>
One of the best tihings I've ever purchased! I love top have the ability to keep track of the miles I run and the calories I burn. Because I always suspected that the stats on the treadmill were off. Just wish it came in more colors. I'm not really a girlie girl so wearing a pink watch everyday would be a bit much</review_text>
I recently purchased the Tech4O watch.  This is a great fitness tool. I love the watch. You need to be somewhat technical to figure out how to use the watch, it comes with a lot of instructions. I love the pedometer functions and tracking that this watch can do.  I am just starting out on my fitness plan and this watch has helped me to track my progress on the number of steps I have done and encourages me to do more</review_text>
This thing is great!  I joined weight watchers a while back. The watch helps me keep track of my steps easily and is super easy to use. I don't have to think about it I just turn on and check how far I have walked at the end of the day.  I have taken off 12 pounds so far.  Thanks ACCELERATOR .....You are effortless!!!!</review_text>
The knives came in a very short amount of time, withing four days. They are solid piece of stainless steale, very sharpa and well balanced. The sheath is pretty neat, it holds all three knives at once. It is an excellent buy</review_text>
I recently bought several blow-up and plastic snow sleds to try. This one is the favorite of the whole family. While all other sleds go wherever they want, this sled has a steering wheel and indeed goes wherever you want. It also seems very durble - I am 180 lbs and rode it together with my 7 year old daughter, even jumping over snow bumps</review_text>
I have used this glove for several years and find that it lasts much longer than the competition (foot joy, etc.)sometimes as much as twenty rounds. The only difficulty is finding them</review_text>
It was fair in craftsmanship. The blad was slightly crooked, but that was the only thing I could find wrong with it. The carving in the sheath was beautiful, and my boyfriend loved his gift</review_text>
I got this in the mail yesterday. It arrived in a long box filled with packing peanuts. After digging around in the foam clumps I retrieved the black and white spoted box which held this sword.After examining it I found out a few things. I got a blade that was worth the cost paid for it.The detail in the dragon carving on the sheath is nice. I can see some glue around the top of the pommel where the blade connects to the grip. However it is not distracting or noticable unless you look closely.Its balance is okay, but it is no toy for it does have an edge. With enough force you can injure someone, especially if you stab them.This is something that can be used for practicing swings as well as just admiring.The blade is covered with oil when delevered. You can wipe it off, or leave it on if you do not intend to use it. The oil does preserve the condition of the blade which is a plus when it is not being used.Overall this is a great purchase. However I do not think this sword could survive combat without being chipped. Not sure about the quality of the steel used in creating it. So its a great blade to admire and own if you have no intentions of practicing actual swordplay with it</review_text>
Ok, the sword's appearance is pretty nice, it didn't dissapoint in that area.I suppose I'm not a blind swordsman, so I can't really complain, but it's about as sharp as a butter knife, possibly a little more dull.The sword fits in the scabbard well enough, but when sheathing it gets stuck at the end, and you have to force it just the right way, and it's not as clean as I'd like it to be.All petty nitpicking aside, it's a nice show piece, maybe with a little sharpening I could become a blind samurai</review_text>
The product was received on time and in excellent condition.  I had to, however, return it because it did not fit me</review_text>
The WayFinder is a very nicely packaged and built, rugged and accurate compass. It provides 5 degree sensitivity in the numeric display, versus the typical 45 degree compass points of most automotive application units. A result, in some environments, e.g. areas with lots of metal in the surroundings, is that you may notice a numeric readout change back or forth that you would not see in the typical 45 degree type compass.It should be noted that interference environments affect ALL compasses, but when this one is significantly affected, it will tell you by displaying DISTORTION, so you know the currently displayed accuracy is suspect.  In the areas I have tried it, the WayFinder is as accurate as my lensmatic engineering compass, but a LOT easier to use.It comes equipped with a dual suction cup mount which stays put on my motorcycle windshield while driving down washboard dirt roads at high speed.   Another post on this topic indicated that the compass would not stay put.  Chalk that up to operator ignorance. Suction cups must be wet to stick to glass, but the manual did not mention this, likely assuming people have common sense, when obviously they don't.All suction cups require moisture on the cups to stick to glass.The only bad thing about this unit is that it has been discontinued, and is being replaced by a unit with more features at a LOT more expense.Bottom line, if you need a high quality, off-road tough, accurate compass, find a WayFinder before they are all gone!</review_text>
I bought this device primarily for the temperature feature, but guess what, it wasn't temperature, it was degrees of direction.  Despite my misunderstanding, it is accurate.  The only drawback is that the suction cups do not work on the windshield.  I keep it in my glove compartment and pull it out when I'm lost.  The backlight is not useful because it is too dim.  Might as well have left that off and sold it a couple of bucks less</review_text>
An excellent auto compass. Easily set up. Reliable operation. Seems like an excellent value</review_text>
I purchased a ripstik and let me tell you, THE BEST THING TO RIDE! Whenever I go down the street everyone stares and ask what is it. They all say they want one too. The best thing of all is riding hills! I can even go up them but when you go down its like snowboarding. I recommend this 100</review_text>
Owning 2 ripsticks for the kids in our household is not enough:  My husband and I are also hooked~~ Looks like we'll need 2 more.  Fun, fun, fun.  Best on a smooth surface- indoor tile or concrete, not black asphault.  Highly recommended for ages 10-100</review_text>
I bought this for myself to play with (I'm 35) and after all the presents were opened and toys, video games, and everything were forgotten (about 4 hours after Christmas), this was the ongoing favorite of the season.  Everybody, younger (down to 8) and older (to 45) had a blast with this thing after a couple minutes coaching. It's already on everybodys wish lists for upcoming birthdays and such.  This is a GREAT present for 11-18 boy. Fair warning though, there will be some good spills on the fairly short, steep learning curve - helmets, knee pads, blah, blah, are a must (and a video camera!</review_text>
I agree with the last guy, "They aren't actually anti-gravity boots!"These are great, but i think the harnesses could use some more padding, I keep feeling like I am going fall on my head if relax my feet. No complants on the product other than that. Except, these aren't even close to hoverboards</review_text>
This mask and snorkle for the money was fantastic. My husband and I spent 8 days on Isla Mejeres Mexico this past week and we really used our snorkles, NO SALT WATER got in our mouths at all. The mask was clear and very comfortable. Would highly recommend. We received shipment prior to leaving within a week of ordering. VERY HAPPY CUSTOMERS</review_text>
This is a really good mask that allows better peripheral vision and the snorkel works very well also. I used them in the Whitsundays all day every day for 5 days and I was particularly impressed with the snorkel because you can duckdive and swim upside down or any way you want and the water pressure will keep the snorkel shut tight so that no water can get in. I've used it a few times since then and it still works perfectly. I wish I could snorkel more often! I've never actually seen anyone with a better snorkel</review_text>
I don't know what the other people are talking about, but this gun is a spring gun and can not shoot on automatic.  Also, there are no batteries that come with it, except for the laser batteries and even if they don't work, it's not the end of the world.  The gun shoots about the suggested speed for .12 grams but I would recommend using .2 grams.  This gun is so accurate with .2 grams and can shoot nearly the same distance.  People who said this gun is a piece of crap and is easily broken are retarded.  It is made of plastic and will break if you treat it like a metal gun.  I have hade mine for several months and it works like a charm</review_text>
i ordered this m16-a4 and instead i got an m16-a2..and that is cool because the m16-a2 is better and cost 60$ on airsplat and it has 305 fps very good gun reccomend to anyone...just having little trouble with the foregrip</review_text>
My grandson and I surfed through Amazon's website, from very remote locations, and this airsoft rifle is the one he wanted.  It arrived on time, in perfect order, and according to my grandson, it's awesome!Good product, great delivery.</review_text>
The Gun has great Velocity at least 300-325. Has great accuracy from shortrange and longrange.(point blank - 120 feet) Comes with decent accessories, Dual LED blue flashlight, great for night games,it illuminates the bb's and makes them glow in the dark and a laser which worked for me for about 30 secs and then the wires split apart. Not visible outside during sunlight but good at night. The magazine is great, holds about 19 in the first part of it, and then the attached speed loader about 65. Has a three point extendable stock, a decent hand grip, a little wobably at times. Easy to cock, right under the handel on top of the gun. Overall the gun is a great buy, cant beat it for the money.  Looks like a real M16.  The orange tip is spray painted on</review_text>
I purchased this gun for my dad for father's day. This completed his Marine Corps kit. He has his sword, uniform and now his M16. He loves it. I couldn't afford to get him a real M16 so this was the next best thing</review_text>
These skates are comfortable and affordable. By adding an arch support to each skate, I never had foot or leg pain through the roller skating party</review_text>
My daughter loved this bike.  It was easy to assemble and came complete with a bell and a basket.  It is a wonderful part of her Hello Kitty collection!  I only wish the shipping was not so expensive and that it got here in time for her birthday</review_text>
There is no "one" solution to securing a handgun with the exception of a vault, but this little box makes me feel a little better when I need to leave my pistol in my vehicle. It provides safe, secure storage and is not too big or too small. And the "Secure-It Handgun Storage Safe" is very well made with a professional finish and top quality securing cable. You'd play hell ripping one of these things from an automotive seat rail, and even if you did it might take some work to open the safe. This is also an excellent place to store your registration too</review_text>
The BandFlex comes in two large boxes, each around 70 pounds. I was surprised that UPS delivered them, since I got a note from Amazon indicating that Eagle Freight was handling the shipping. (BTW, this is one of those times when Amazon Prime pays for itself, since shipping is free under Prime, but pretty costly without it.) One box contains the long arms and beams, and the other contains the base and other smaller parts. There are many bolts that are of very similar (but not identical) lengths, and sorting them out and keeping track of them during assembly is time-consuming.Two cresent wrenches are required to bolt the gym together, along with a Phillips-head screwdriver. I would suggest using a tape measure or ruler to sort out the bolts. The assembly diagrams and instructions in the owner's manual are adequate, but could be clearer. Overall, assembly took me about 3 hours. The only really tricky part was attaching the bungie cords--and the pulleys that they ride over--to the gym. The 3 cords (on each side) need to be stretched a little while you thread a single bolt through all 3 pulleys and keep the cords from slipping out or the pulleys from moving out of alignment or the bolt from missing the hole it mounts to. One pulley set that was pre-assembled at the factory was over-tightened and needed to be loosened a bit, which was easy to do. When done, the gym is very solid and sturdy.I suspect that it is actually a standard "stack" weight gym that has been modified to use bungie cords instead of a weight stack, which is fine by me, since it probably is part of the reason it has such a low price compared to the competition. Plus it keeps the overall weight of the gym down to around 140 pounds or so, which means that I can put it on the second floor of my apartment without worrying about overstressing the loft's floorboards.The gym has several attachments and allows many exercises, including unexpected ones like rowing (complete with rolling seat). Since the cords increase in resistance as you stretch them, they give plenty of "weight" at the end--perhaps much more than the 10/25/35 pounds suggested in the manual. On the other hand, they give less resistance at the start of an exercise. Overall, I find the exercises to be challenging, and I'm still a ways from using all 3 cords at once. Plus, there isn't too much "transforming" needed to ready the gym for the next exercise type.As another reviewer suggested, cutting off the safety clips on the bands makes changes in resistance much easier (but has caused the cords to spontaneously unclip on me a couple of times, so proceed with caution). Adding carabiners between the cord hooks and the cable rings *might* be a workable alternative to cutting the clips.However, changes to resistance for all of the exercises that use the "lower" pulley/cable set are hard to do, as you need to duck under the bench and attach/detach the pre-tensioned bands onto a very small metal ring. The pulldown bar uses this same cable, so it has the same issue.The gym really does fold up into a surprisingly small footprint, and has rollers on the back to aid in positioning. But it is definitely a full-sized gym when unfolded, so it needs a bit of space.Overall, I'm quite pleased with the gym. My biggest complaint is that, when starting exercises that use the bench at an incline (like fly or bench presses), it is very difficult to reach waaaay down and behind you to grab the cord handles, as they're on the floor by the base of the gym. I've found that hooking the handle cords through the training belt and then draping the belt over the bench helps--at least the reach isn't so bad, but it still isn't ideal. Some sort of velcro or hook on the back-top of the bench where the handles could hang until needed would help a lot.Other than that, I think the gym is sturdy, is very usable, and is a definite bargain for the price</review_text>
I purchased this on sale, so that made this an extra good value.  And, Amazon ships this FAST-- it took about 3 or 4 days to receive.It's very easy to put together. I wanted to do this before my husband came home, so I had to add rubber mat flooring AND put this together, which I was able to do.  The only part I needed help with was stretching the gray resistance band and getting the pulley and bolt in, since it was difficult to hold on to the band to lessen resistance and screw the bolt in at the same time.It really was pretty easy and the instructions were surprisingly well-written.  You must measure the bolts since they are close in size.The machine is great for the price.  The only thing that makes this a difficult machine to use is how the resistance is altered.  That part is very poorly designed and I keep meaning to go to the hardware store to find an alternative hook or clip to use.  The way the leg attachment cables need to be changed is enough to make you want to choose some other exercise over leg extensions! However, if I find some clips similar to what the bowflex uses on its resistance machines (they are built totally differently-- but I like their clips/hooks), I think changing the resistance will be much more pleasant and definitely easier.The machine enables you to do very many exercises.  The leg curls are great, the preacher/machine curl attachment is wonderful.  You can even do leg presses on this machine, believe it or not, but only to 130 pounds.  Still, that's great for me!  The lat bar gets a lot of use and that's easy to adjust.  All the resistance for the upper body is much easier to adjust than the leg attachment exercises.  Still, they aren't as easy as pulling a clip and reinserting it.Another benefit here is the bench itself.  It's adjustable to many positions (no decline),and when the upper part is removed, you can use the machine as an rowing machine.  And, I've tried many rowing machines, this one is very smooth and almost fun to use.All in all, this is a great value, but not as user friendly as it should be.  My husband and I love it since we now don't have to wait for eachother for equipment when we do similar workouts and are working on a timer, since we already have other equipment. So, we have an extra bench now, and extra upper and lower pulley station now, and it makes working out together much more fun</review_text>
This is a nice piece of equipment for the price.  I was looking for under $300 a collapsable workout center.  That is exactly what I got.  It works for what I wanted and it allows me to have a great workout.  The only con I see is that the bands don't give enough resistance.  For a starter gym it is great, but if someone is moving from the gym to home workout it might not be enough resistance.  To purchase replacement bands you have to go through Stamina, but each band is around $10 or less so that isn't too bad.  I also had to modify some of the workouts that were described in the book to make them more efficient</review_text>
The Stamina is definitely not a Bowflex, but then I can't afford a Bowflex.  I really like the sliding seat for doing rowing type exercises.  The Stamina wasn't too hard to assemble, but there were some quality issues with the parts that I had to correct to get everything to fit together.  My main complaint is the difficulty in changing the resistance bands.  Much of this was taken care by cutting off the plastic safety clips -- they really aren't needed.  There were also quality issues with the length of the ropes not being even, which I had to correct by knoting one.  However, overall I'm pleased with the value</review_text>
The sleeping bag received was not the sleeping bag pictured, but I kept it anywa</review_text>
This pitch counter was a very useful aid to our Fall baseball teams as we were able to accurately track both the number of pitches thrown and the efficiency of our pitchers and those of the opposing team. Little League's new pitch count rules start next spring and this is a great tool, much better than the manual tally counters.Works just as advertised and worth the extra money</review_text>
The product works as advertised. used it snorkeling in Maui with water temps of around 70-75 degrees with no fogging up. The only drawback is applying a small amount since it is in a gel form...the trick is to squeeze out a bit on your finger then rub inside the mask. Does not take much</review_text>
This is a great mat.  After using the "paper thin" one's at the gym my tailbone was sometimes sore and I had to double up the mats.  This one is 1/2 inch thick and is so comfortable.  It really makes a huge difference and I am able to focus on the moves without having to worry about discomfort.  Highly recommended.  I loved it so much I bought one for my husband</review_text>
My sister absolutely loved this mat!  I gave it to her for Christmas.  She just got wood floors and needed a mat to work out on.  This mat is the thickest I have seen.  I was very pleased with the high quality</review_text>
I love this mat for my pilates class - it's nice and thick, yet grips well for standing positions. Easy to roll up and keep in my car, too. I highly recommend this for pilates exercise classes. You will appreciate it when doing "rolling like a ball"</review_text>
Bought this to do pilates on my hardwoods. Really the perfect amount of cushion & does not move with rolling exercises. Great for spine and hipbones. Came rolled up and the edge still doesn't want to completely unfold, that's why it gets 4 instead of 5. I'm sure it will eventually come out but it should've been packaged more carefully. Also, since it is thicker than a normal mat, it takes up a little more room, but it is worth the comfort</review_text>
I got these as freebies at the Gulf Coast triathlon, and have used them in every race since, and for long training sessions.  I actually buy them by the case. They taste great (esp. cran-razz and strawberry, but not so much cola), are a great pick-me-up, and are very easy to eat, even mid-race. Best cliff product I've tried yet</review_text>
As a 6 time marathon runner and triathlete I have tried more than my share of gels and substances for carb replacement.  My running group favor Clif Blocks for a number of reasons.1) They taste great and are not too sweet.  Over the course of a long event you can't stomach more gel after a while--- these seem to go down OK hours into an event.2) They carry well and don't cause a mess like gels.  Even the gel flasks leak, but no problem here.3)  You can vary your intake (one cube every 10min or 2 every 20 or 3 every 30 or 40).  You can also get them down WITHOUT WATER.Yeah, a little pricey but well worth it if you are serious about doing the outdoors thing</review_text>
I've been (marathon) training with these for a month, here are my thoughts:THE GOOD:  These things taste supernummy - better than any gel, bar or energy food I've had. I find myself eating them for breakfast. Every flavor is my favorite, with lemon-lime being the most favorite. The caffeinated ones really do have enough caffeine in them to wire me (I weigh 115 though, I guess it doesn't take much). Keep 'em in your pocket, they don't melt.THE BAD:  No protein ingredient. Packaging is hard to open - I use scissors.THE UGLY: Expensive.  $2 for 200 calories</review_text>
If you are like me, and found the taste and consistency of products like Gu and Clif Shots to be pretty nasty, you'll be very happy to switch to these Shot Bloks, which remind me of eating gummy bears. You can get the energy boost and electrolytes you need while participating in strenuous sports such as climbing, running, biking, etc. without the mess and inconvenience of those gooey energy products.I've tried most of the flavors, and found all the ones I tried to be tasty and enjoyable to eat. I like being able to eat just a few Bloks at a time from the package, in contrast to needing to consume an entire package of Gu or Clif Shots at once (or suffer the sticky consequences). Shot Bloks seem to give me the same kick-start as those older products, and I actually LIKE eating them.Give them a try -- I think you'll be pleased with them</review_text>
I have a two year old and a four month old, so this is the extinct of my workout. It was the perfect investment for me. I'm satisfied with my purchase, my husband even plans to use it. It took us alittle while to put together, but it wasn't because it was difficult. Matter a fact it was pretty clear cut. For the price I think it is a good piece of equipment</review_text>
My wife and I assembled this elliptical a week ago and have been using it quite a bit.  We love it.  The stride length and pedal design make for very smooth rotations, with minimal up and down motion.  That was a must for us, since my wife wanted to be able to read magazines while using it.  We bought ours from a different online source, and for some reason, it was missing the power adapter.  I called technical service at Horizon Fitness, and they immediately shipped an adapter to us in 3 business days.  I also called them ~3 weeks ago when I was doing research on ellipticals, and they were just as friendly and helpful then.  The only other problem was that there was a small crack in the top-right side of the elliptical's plastic housing, but it is not very noticable, has no chance of getting worse, and is entirely cosmetic.  Overall, we are very pleased with our elliptical</review_text>
This elliptical is great, I was able to put it together in 1-2 hours. I've had it for 2 weeks and so far works like a charm. The only reason I give it 4 stars is that every time I turn the console on it makes a LOUD beep (by design), which is a problem because I usually workout late at night, when the kids are asleep (loud noises sometimes wake kids up). There is a mute option, but it only works after the console is turned on. Other than that (which is really a minor annoyance) this machine is great</review_text>
Received this item yesterday in the mail.Delivery was quick considering I used the free shipping option (about a week and a half to get).Piece of cake to assemble, instructions are clear and easy to follow and the bolts and nuts are packaged into 8 or so little baggies one for each step in the instruction set (this way you don't really have to figure out which bolt they are referring to).  I assembled it by myself, didn't need more then one person which is nice.  The hardest part assembling it by myself was the first step, which is to attach the front stabilizer bar that has wheels on it.  This requires you to lift the front end slightly and keep it elevated while you screw this piece on.  Once you have it on though it is easy to move at that point because of the wheels.Gave it a try and it runs smooth and quiet for me even with high resistance I can still watch TV without turning the volume to a crazy amount.So far overall I've found it great to use even though I've only been using it for a day ;)The only problem I had was the back right stabilizer bar got dinged and because of that the plastic cap on the end cracked.  It is a decorative thing but that has been my only problem.  I watched them unload and carry it into my apartment  (Eagle freight) and they were not gentle at all so that being the only thing broken makes me happy.</review_text>
This, and the .5 (for day hikes) are the only kits I carry now; I leave a larger kit in the vehicle. I haven't found a more useful and lightweight kit out there. Nothing but the essentials, with room for a few personal meds.I think this and the .5 are the best buys for the money -- the .7 isn't enough more or less.If you are serious about weight, and confident in your abilities to manage a situation with a "limited" amount of gear, this is the kit for you</review_text>
As a woman who likes to go to the dog park at night I appreciate the small and easy to handle size.  Don't let the small size fool you though this is more powerful than many of the larger stun guns out there yet it fits easily in your hands and works well.  It is easy to carry on your belt in your briefcase, or purse.  It is discrete yet gives a great feeling of security.  Just flashing it is sufficient to send a strong message.  The light is also a nice additional feature for those after dark walks</review_text>
Received the XPort Hitch Rack and put it together quickly - instruction clear and hitched easily to my truck.  It was easy to install, not heavy, not made out of metal but strong enough.  I absolutely love the rack and now I can take my bike wherever I want without hauling it in and out of the truck bed.   To discourage theft, located a lock that I can insert at the end of the bolt that holds the rack in place.  Great product</review_text>
I borrowed one of these for a campout high in the Wyoming mountains. We were with a large group sleeping out in the open.  I recently purchase my own because I liked it so much. On the trip had a "burrito" consisting of my sleeping bag, a wool and fleece blanket covered by a small tarp.  This little baby was underneath. Not only did it provide comfort on the hard ground, it provided protection keeping me off the running water on the ground when hard rain started to pelt us for 2-4 hours.  I think the convoluted water resistant design of this helped. Except for a little bit of water on the top opening of my sleeping bag, i was dry, one of the very few in our large group.  Most of the other people were drenched.</review_text>
Hey, these might not be the best, but it works good for me... maybe im a dumbass but ya...</review_text>
I was a little skeptical when I first ordered the Delux Hoist System, but I really was excited about being able to make use of the space in my 12 foot garage.  We recently purchased 2 Kayaks and by using the Up & Away Deluxe hoist system, we were able to store them between the garage door rails and up out of the way.  The system is really easy to install, works great and I'm so glad every time I walk through the garage that I made this purchase.The only reason I gave this 4 stars instead of 5 is the ropes that were provided with the system.  Over time, they will surely degrade and need to be replaced with a tougher version.  Outside of this minor thing, I highly recommend this system if your looking to store your bike, kayaks or even ladders up and out of the way.  Makes great use of wasted space</review_text>
My son loves it, many of his friends have one as well.   Loves showing me "new" tricks, his 10 year old brother enjoys it as well.  Hopefully no broken bones in the future.</review_text>
Excellent product - high quality and great functional design.  I bought it as a gift for my wife, and she loves it</review_text>
We have had hours of famly fun playing basketball, 21, PIG, and other family games outside with this hoop.We live in a real windy spot, so I filled the base with sand and it has not blown over yet.I like the rebounding action provided by this design. It is very helpful when practicing.It is very easy for an adult to adjust the rim height.Two basketballs store easily and out of the sun on the base behind the support truss.This is a stable,well engineered basketball hoop that I highly recomend.Assembly took a while. Don't expect to put together quickly or by yourself. Filling the base with sand makes it very stable but is trying on the patience</review_text>
I've been using this product for nearly 1 month now, and I absolutely love it!  Along with healthful eating, this DVD is great for losing weight. I have already lost about 7 lbs.  I recommend this product to everyone</review_text>
That's right: Hungry Hank, my best new friend, nearly 10 gleaming inches of finely balanced razor-sharp 420 stainless-steel goodness with a side-order of gleaming steel knuckles to drive the point home.So to speak.I think it's safe to say we live in an Age of mounting barbarism, rudness, all sorts of petty nastiness, and general crap not even a sick dog should have to put up with.For all our technology, our Civilization is poised precariously on the edge of a great, gawping, yawning abyss, situated above a vast declivity, hinged on the threshold of a new Dark Age, with the tapers of Civility, Decency, Honor & Nobility guttering in the growing darkness.No big deal: it's still possible to live well. And Living Well has never been easier since I picked up the Hungry Hank Bowie Knife!Rude & surly salesclerks, snivelling anti-war protestors who want everyone to turn French or queer (wait---sniff, sniff, do I smell redundancy?), idiots who drive 40 mph in the passing lane on the freeway, then turn around & tail-gait you in the slow lane when you've got a semi in front of you with nowhere to go?It's a Mad, Mad, Mad Mad Mad World out there, ol' hoss, and sometimes it's not enough to grin and bear it. Or maybe it is---when BEAR IT means you're whipping out this stainless steel monster: "Now THET's a knife", you can drawl, in your best Down Under. Watch lips curl, sweat spurt, and the crowd part.Hungry Hank is my new pal. I don't bother to keep him under wraps, I just wear him in his sheath on a big ol' Pancho Villa belt outside my business suit. Hank works wonders in all sorts of forums---the office, snooty French restaurants, the theater, the parking garage, the gym---and all of a sudden, it's like all the little mongoloids teeming around me have picked up Miss Manners---man, are they polite!For instance: I was on the verge of cramming my gucci-soled foot down my boss's throat a month ago: I'll need you in on Saturdays, Garrett! You don't really want to go to Aspen, do ya, Garrett---you wanna go to *Toledo*, to work on the Nebbelfish account! Where in the Nine Hells is that spreadsheet on the Bungfuster account I needed, like, yesterday?The other day I decided to take a little sorty into the boss's realm---only this time sporting my new best colleague, Hungry Hank. I buried Hungry Hank into middle of Bossman's mahogany desk, it made a satisfying ka-chunk!---and said, "hey, man, there's those files you were looking for."Now I have a nice corner office with lots of glass and no distractions.Or the other night, at the new French place downtown---Bou De Cul, I think it is---the maitre d' came out ready to serve me & my sweetie pie a nasty little table back by the kitchen. So I took the lull to whip out Hungry Hank, buttoned one of the little crepe-y menus right to the table---and, Voila!---madame et monsieur had one of zee best tables in zee house! C'est parfait, merci beaucoup, Hungry Hank!Or my mother-in-law. I used to dread her visitations: the old leathery harpy would caw about the house, the job, the time not spent with her adorable little daughter, etc., the usual. Then one fine night Mommy Dearest came trooping in---only to find me sharpening up Hungry Hank, leafing through a Soldier of Fortune, and smiling significantly at her.The divorce, closed the following week, was painless. The wife didn't want anything---not 50%, not 5%, nothing. And no more Mommy Dearest. And---surprise of surprises---the life of a Single American Male in the Age of Post-Sexual Liberation is a helluva lot better than being shackled up to an Old Ball and Chain---Hungry Hank cuts through steel, evidently, just as well as he saws through other things!Bottom line: you're getting a great knife. And you're getting also getting a fine, superbly balanced little life-changing tool that cuts right to the heart of the matter.So to speak.JS</review_text>
Shipping was quick and the knife, what can I say? Great quality and super cool</review_text>
I love this board,It was a great deal and is awesome!</review_text>
Beginners do not try this at home. This workout is vintage Cathe: Heart-stopping cardio, and tough weight work, topped by Cathe's friendly demeanor and excellent cuing.  This dvd utilizes the High Step, so this workout is perfect for exercisers that lack a lot of space. You will need a loaded barbell, and a medium/heavy and light set of dumbbells (Cathe uses 5 and 10 lbs).The workout is an hour long, but you will be so busy, time will fly by. There are five cycles, each containing cardio and weights.Cycle one:Cardio followed by Legs and TricepsCycle two:Cardio followed by Legs and ShouldersCycle three:Cardio followed by Legs and BicepsCycle four:Cardio followed by Legs and BackCycle five:Cardio followed by Legs and ChestFinally, you enjoy a well-deserved stretch.The legwork consists mostly of Leg Presses (followers of the Firm workouts will be familiar with these) mixed in with another leg exercise. For example, in cycle one, leg presses are followed by barbell squats; in cycle two leg presses are followed by plie squats.Modifications are shown for some exercises, and you can always adjust your step height and/or weights.This dvd contains premixes (cardio only, strength only, cardio and upper body, cardio and lower body, etc.) for those who are short on time or want to focus on a particular body part.I recommend this dvd for someone who is familiar with weight training, and with Cathe's cardio workouts.</review_text>
I have been working out 5 days a week (about an hour) for 4 years now. I've done the "Crunch", "kathy Smith" and "buns of steel" various workout tapes. They're not a challenge for me anymore. So I took the plunge and bought this video.Cathe is an incredible trainer. This is a perfect full body workout. It was super easy to follow and the moves are challenging but easy to do. You're sure to sweat during this workout.This workout is perfect for those that have mastered "crunch", Kathy Smith" or anything similar. TRUST ME! If you need a challenge, this is it</review_text>
I find this unit to be an excellent choice for the money. It has adjustable speed from 1.0 mph to 10 mph in .1 increments. The belt is of ample width and long enough for longer strides. The display is easy to read and the controls are well marked. It has readouts for speed, fat burned, calories burned, speed of belt distance travelled and time of session. Also there is a pulse monitor. It has a safety key that is necessary to operate the unit and which clips to you for emergency shut-off. If you want to pause a session you push the stop button and all read-outs are frozen. If you pull the safety key the unit stops and the readout goes blank. The belt platform folds up fo storage in case it is necessary. My only complaint is I wish the pulse monitor operated a little faster. The assembly instructions could use improvement and the description of the screws could be better. Although the instructions recomend a helper for some steps I was able to assemble it alone. It appears to be a solid unit and I expect to get much use out of it</review_text>
The kids are loving them. They adjust quite easily and I am very pleased with the item overall</review_text>
This was a present on our girls 3rd birthday... She rode off an on from 2 until 9 She loved it so much we couldn't wait for the battery to run out. For the rest of the day she would only stop long enough open another gift then back to the car.  Quick to learn how to drive it... Loud?? a little bit but hey, it's a kids toy.  If they didn't make noise, the kids wouldn't like it.Great Toy!! Great Value!</review_text>
These cars can be summed up in two words FUN and LOUD.  I have two and my four year old loves it and so do all his friends.  They work great throughout the house and hold their charge really well.  I am even thinking of getting a third.  They do leave little marks on the wood floors but it cleans easily.  Well worth it.</review_text>
When the buggie arrived, it didn't work. I had to call Razor's Customer Service Dept. Their service is awful. The Senior Agent was very rude. I managed to figure out the problem on my own. The electrical unit was not connected. Once it was connected, it worked fine. We have two of them. The kids love them. They are lightweight and ride well on carpet. Overall, the product is good.</review_text>
Great product, fun for children, nicely designed, easy to operate.I purchased 3 of the razor bumper buggie (Ladybug) cars for 3 of my grandchildren age 4, 3, and 2.  The cars arrived promptly. At  Christmas  I charged the batteries and gave them to the children.  The cars work great! Even the 2 year old can work her car! Just like her big brothers. Although, one battery did not hold the charge correctly, a quick call to the company and a new part was sent immediately.  GrandmaLind</review_text>
This is the best toy I've spent money on in years! It's cute - my girls love them...I bought two!  They are great to ride in the garage or believe it or not....they go well on carpet!  They have laughed, bumped, even learned how to use the driving handles with their feet!  Great fun</review_text>
We bought these so the children could have something to play with during the winter.  We backed our vehicles out of the garage, and zoom....they were off having fun.The box says "Ages 3+" and up to 55 pounds.  The bumper buggie looks small, but it is roomy enough for my 5 1/2 year old.  He weighs 45 pounds and is 45 inches tall.  He can stretch his legs out in the car, but chooses to keep his knees bent while driving.  My two year old can also work the controls.It is easy to use and the kids can do a complete 360.  My only complaint is that it is a little bit noisy, but no more than other battery-operated vehicles.I highly recommend this item.  It is so much fun!  Best part is that there is little assembly required.  The only thing we had to do was screw the seat into the car</review_text>
This treadmill works fine, although there is nothing in the instructions about the incline. May be obvious to some but at first I couldn't figure out how to change it. Also it's not easy to put together. The control panel fits on top of the legs but it's almost impossible to line them up with the holes and screws properly. Great value for the price but don't put it together alone</review_text>
A gift for our goddaughter.  She is very pleased with it--size, and waterproof performance</review_text>
After having several pedometers through the years that became damaged after their clips either broke or slipped off my waist, I decided to purchase the VIA wrist pedometer.  So far, the VIA Wrist has performed very well.  It has 5 primary operational modes (Time, Step, User Data, Alarm, and Chronograph). The Step Mode has 5 sub modes (Step/Time, Step/Kcal, Step/Distance in miles or kilometers, Timer, Steps Target). The User Data mode allows the user to input his/her age, gender, weight in lbs. or kg., & stride in inches or centimeters. The step/mileage counter appears to be accurate when I compared it to one of my expensive "waist" pedometers. The VIA has a plastic wrist band which may or may not pose a problem over the long term.I plan on purchasing another VIA Wrist pedometer as a gift for a relative who is a cross country jogger.</review_text>
This is an excellent product , easy to set up and pretty accurate and it makes me push myself to get my steps in because the stats are right there on my wrist. The only reason I do not give it five stars is that the watch band while waterproof and cleanable is not the most comfortable configuration with the watch. It is the only complaint I have</review_text>
I've lost or dropped so many pedometers, I was about to give up.  I came across this marvel & decided to give it a shot.  It's the best of all!  It can't drop off, its accurate & its more than a pedometer. It's also a great tool for sticking to your goals</review_text>
My Trek mountain bike came without a kickstand.  I purchased an aftermarket one at the bike shop but returned it as it got in the way of the pedals and never really fit right.  The Greenfield fits behind the pedals and doesn't get in the way.  It's rock solid and holds up while biking the trails without bouncing around.  It also holds the bike stable when deployed.  It does ad some weight but no more than other kickstands.  Easy to use and install.</review_text>
Excellent design construction and functionality. Works well in any surface and adapts to most bikes</review_text>
You need two Allen (hexagonal head) wrenches to install this kickstand.What I don't like:There are no instructions included. Even the Greenfield Industries website has no instructions. While I suppose that there is only one way for it all to fit together, a few diagrams would have been nice. Also it would have helped to know that the attachment point should be moved as far to the rear as possible. Until I did this, my heel struck the stand when pedaling. I presume this is a function of both my shoe size (size 11, male) and the length and position of the horizontal frame member to which the stand attaches. On my bike, I think that a rider with a size 13 or larger show might well have a problem. Again, the Greenfield Industries website should provide this information, but at this writing it does not.The inner mounting bracket has a mysterious hole at the top, and there is no matching hole in the outer bracket. There are no lockwashers provided, though perhaps they are unnecessary.What I like:It is light, strong, reasonably priced, easy to install, and appears to be well made. Rear mounting avoids conflicts with the pedals and crank arms. It looks great, though it makes the bike look rather like a police bike -- perhaps not a bad thing if one is worried about theft.</review_text>
I love this swim cap. I actually look like I know what I am doing when I put it on. I have long hair and it always took me forever to put on my latex swim cap, and even then I still had hair poking out.</review_text>
My local YMCA requires everyone to wear a cap, so I wasn't too psyched to squeeze into a latex cap everytime.  This cap is the best of both worlds.  The lining makes it easy to put on and the silicon still gives me some of the benefits of a rubber cap</review_text>
I wear this swim cap because my local YMCA requires women with long hear to wear caps.  I don't wear it to keep my hair dry, which is good, because I don't think it's designed to do so.  However, it is very comfortable (for a swim cap!) and does its job so they let me in the pool</review_text>
I like the size of this bag.  It's big enough for myself and husband both to use at same time yet small enough it doesn't take up large storage space.Easy to put together.  Bag and stand seem sturdy</review_text>
I ordered 4 black Diamond Gen IV flashlights on March 2 and they arrived March 8th.  Not too bad. All flashlights were "shaken up" and worked as advertised.I put all 4 through a test and found that one had a sticky switch.  The switches could be more durable. When the flashlights are lying on their sides, sometimes the light comes on even though the switches are off.  The 2 hour light span, as advertised, is a bit overrated.  After 1 hour of continuous use, the lights were barely visible.  A few "shakes" restored their brightness.Overall, they seem to be a good product for emergencies.</review_text>
~~~~~~This is the best flashlight ever~~~~~~I don't know why anyone would give this flashlight anything below 5 stars. This is amazing and super easy to use. As long as you follow the instructions which are very clear and easy to comprehend and shake the flashlight the way it says, the light is VERY bright. And it doesn't fade right away if you do it right either. And the good thing about this is that if it does start fading, all you have to do is shake it some more and you've got the bright light again.I recommend ordering more than one of these. I just got one to try for my boyfriends BDay present and we both love it.Im going to order these for our cars and more for the house.This would be a great thing to have in a childs room. If the lights ever go out or they are scared, you dont have to worry about a battery not working or going dead on them. This is easy enough for even a small child to use.As another person commented on here. This is by no means a spot light flashlight but it works 100% for what it was meant for. This is a batteryless flashlight people, what in the world are you expecting? A flashlight that shakes itself? With 3 Million Candlepower of light? Give me a Break. And as I said before, this is SUPER EASY TO SHAKE. You must be a real wimp if you think its hard to shake.</review_text>
These gloves fit well. They're comfortable. They have wrist support.  Durability and washability don't seem to be issues.Included workout software is crappy, in my opinion, which makes the gloves somewhat overpriced. If the software had been up to snuff (installable instead of CD based), I might have given this product a five star rating</review_text>
Just ordered my third pair of Go-Fit workout gloves. Not available in stores in my area. The best I've come across in twenty years in reference to grip, wear, washability, and quality construction(I workout 5x a week). An outstanding value for the price.</review_text>
I've had these gloves a few weeks and think they're great! I use them for weightlifting workouts three times a week. Not only do they seem well constructed and durable, but they have nice features like a terry cloth patch on the back for wiping sweat and one longer finger to make them easier to pull off. I didn't really have much use personally for the CD, but the gloves are well worth the price</review_text>
I love these gloves. I use them for cardio and weightlifting. I work out 4 times a week and wear these gloves every time I work out. very comfortable. great grip for lifting the big weights. don't ever smell. I haven't listened to the CD yet.</review_text>
This sword is a really nice one, it is worth the money. its just great</review_text>
this product is excellent as long as you're honest about your "pinching".  very easy to program and use</review_text>
I love that its small for my wrist. Its simple to use and I love it. Its also a really cute color, I actually find myself using this as a watch when Im not exercising</review_text>
I like the smaller size watch.  This particular monitor gives a summary of each workout session. The directions made it easy to set up and read the watch face.I mainly am interested in keeping an eye on the calories burned as I give myself targets to hit when I ride my bike.However there is one annoying part with this watch - the wrist band.    It is easy to strap on but not easy to take off.  The buckle does not open easily too take the watch off.  I have to hold down the middle metal piece that locks into the wrist band holes and play with the strap moving it up and down until I am able to take the watch off.I have to strap the watch on loosely or it is very hard to unbuckle if I make the wrist band fit properly.I didn't have this problem with my previous men's polar wrist band.  The wrist band feels like a stiffer plastic/rubber piece then my prior polar band too.</review_text>
I really like this watch.  The heart rate is extremely accurate. I love the reminder to work out feature also.  The only thing that I wish it had is backlighting or some sort of light feature.  I like to jog at night and it is impossible to read the numbers.  Even in the gym, it is difficult to read in certain lighting conditions.</review_text>
for helping to lose weight.  Gives a visual feedback to the effort extended so you have a more accurate picture of what your are or are not accomplishing.  Am happy with the accuracy and have had no problems with it to date after almost a year.  Just wish it had a backlight since it is often dark when I am walking.  When it is easy to see I can quickly pick up my pace or change my route to reach the goals I have set for myself.  Harder to do if it is dark and you cannot read the screen.  I was worried when I got it that the band on the watch would be small because I have large wrists - not a problem at all.  Was also worried about the comfort of the chest strap - do not notice it any more than my bra.  It was also plenty big</review_text>
I love this.  It makes me accountable for my exercise.  It's accurate and I love that it keeps calories and records and logs it all.  I have used it in water and on land.  It is perfect for all levels of exercisers.  It is comfortable and looks nice.  Great features</review_text>
Gift for wife who works out at 5:30am.  Primarily because it would support her current routine:  Lots of Aerobics.Nice that it's compatible with many of the treadmills/ steppers...Easy to set-up and use.  Medium chest strap fits her, (size 4) and adust to fit me as well(42'' chest. had to try it).  Got this primarily because of design, color.  Ofcourse the features are very important, and I trusted that this model had most of the valued features in HRM's.I've owned Polars before, and it helped me maintain a great workout schedule.  My wife uses it everyday, and really enjoys the summary feature which recaps the week totals.</review_text>
I purchased a ripstik and let me tell you, THE BEST THING TO RIDE! Whenever I go down the street everyone stares and ask what is it. They all say they want one too. The best thing of all is riding hills! I can even go up them but when you go down its like snowboarding. I recommend this 100</review_text>
Owning 2 ripsticks for the kids in our household is not enough:  My husband and I are also hooked~~ Looks like we'll need 2 more.  Fun, fun, fun.  Best on a smooth surface- indoor tile or concrete, not black asphault.  Highly recommended for ages 10-100</review_text>
As another reviewer hinted at, it probably wouldn't be very hard to make one yourself, it's really just a rope with a handle on one hand and  a flattened piece that fits in a closed door with a stop on it to keep it from slipping through. Here's what I like about it: you know how fitness books always say : "Don't let your feet get in front of your knees when you squat". You can't do much of a squat following that rule, unless you have something like this:  You can lean back while squatting, thereby keeping your shins vertical for the whole movement. Perfect technique! Even better, you can hold on with only one hand, and the effort of your core to keep in position makes this a more complete exercise,(I don't know the weight capacity of this piece, so I won't advise this just yet, but a one-handed grip straight-shin squat with a heavy dumbell in the other hand is an  incredible exercise.) Not to downplay the other uses, but this alone is worth the price.</review_text>
I got this about 3 months ago. Great product, very flexible and easy to use. Simple to setup. Only suggestion is to put grip tape on the handles</review_text>
I am very pleased with the Jungle Gym. I've used mine for several excellent workouts during week long motel stays. No more finger pain from door pullups and no more fear of the motel room's bathroom door coming off the hinges during the pullups. The Jungle Gym is also great for free hanging pullups, dips or pushups from a tree branch or other suitable surface. The handles are slick plastic and rotate a little against the nylon webbing with makes for a nice grip workout. The instruction sheet packaged with the Jungle Gym demonstrates several more exercises.I most often add Jungle Gym pullups to a deck of cards workout for time (pushups, handstand pushups, situps, squats, or other bodyweight exercises with a different exercise for the four suits and jokers using the face value for the number of reps) and you can pummel yourself from top to bottom. If you are driving, it's easy to toss kettlebells or clubbells into the fray and you'll know there isn't enough oxygen in the room! These workouts make any Crossfitter proud.Lightweight, versatile, compact and it's never caused me any trouble getting through airport security - it's one of my traveling staples. I definitely recommend purchasing one if you like being able to work out irregardless of where you are</review_text>
Superb Build Quality. Very quiet. Requires power to operate resistance. Very easy to assemble</review_text>
I absolutely love my schwinn elliptical machine.  It is a smooth and sturdy workout that is equal to going to the gym for me.  The instructions were easy to follow, however it was challenging to esemble.  You need two people at least and about 3 hours uninterrupted.  But once it is together, it is well worth it</review_text>
I am a soldier who has recently returned from deployment. While I was deployed I injured both knees and am unalbe to run due to the impact. I had tried ellipticals while I was deployed and was quite impressed with the work out I got. When I returned I went out and started searching for one of my own. My goal was to keep it under $1000. I tried many different brands and discovered that not all ellipticals are created equal. Many of them are cheaply made and shake side to side or make alot of noise. The stride is very important. I am 6 foot tall and the 16 inch stride on some of them just didnt cut it. I ended up buying a Proform 160 from the Proform website since it had an 18 inch stride and seemed to be sturdy, however, after discovering how little they care about customer service, I cancelled my order. I ended up buying an Image 9.5 from Walmart. I used it for about 3 weeks and came to the conclusion that the foot pedals were spaced too far apart and it put pressure on my knees and made my hips hurt. After thinking about it for a minute it made sense to me, who runs with thier feet that far apart anyway. My feet almost land in a straight line when I run. So I set out to find one with closer pedals. Overall I tried almost 2 dozen different machines and finally found the Schwinn 430 at a fitness store. I tried the 418 and 438 also, but the 430 seemed to be the most comfortable to me. The 438 and some of the other brands seem to have a high arch on the upstroke. The 430 was very smooth and ultra quiet. It is very well made and should last for many years. Amazon had the best deal on it and had it to me in about 8 days. It is a very comfortable machine. After all of this I would say to anyone wanting to buy an elliptical, try alot of them, I tried all the ones at Sears, Oshmans, Academy and Fitness in motion. Make sure the stride length, pedal angle and pedal spacing are comfortable for you, after all, if its not comfortable you wont want to use it. The only thing I think could be improved on the Schwinn 430 is a backlit display. Luckily I work out with the lights on so its not a problem, haha. I tried many machines that were between $2-3000 and this one was still more comfortable to me. It is a heavy machine, so get help carrying it in, but you will be glad its heavy when you ride it. It is some assembly required, but it has fairly clear instructions, so there shouldnt be a problem with assembly. Happy Hunting</review_text>
This arrived earlier than expected.  Great delivery company, and ours was brought into the house, even up several stairs.  My ten year old son put it together with a little help from dad (took about two hours).  Was a breeze to assemble, no problems at all.I am so glad to have this!  It is a great workout, and unbelievably quiet.  Very sturdy and well built.  I love it</review_text>
Our Schwinn 430 arrived yesterday, four days earlier than expected.  My husband and I put it together in about an hour and a half, and it was relatively simple to do.  All the parts were packaged and labeled very well and there was an insert with a correction to the instructions on step 2.As for the feel of the machine, it's very smooth and sturdy.  If you're not looking for any fancy electronics and are looking to save some $$$, it's worth getting it over the 418 and 438. The pedals on this model are made of plastic, not rubber, and are cheaper looking and feeling than the other models.  However, with sneakers on, you probably won't notice the difference.  Also, the handle bars with heart rate sensors are lower than the other models, but they don't feel too low, which I was afraid of.All in all, I'm so glad I decided to get this elliptical machine.  The whole transaction has gone very smoothly, and I'm working up a sweat already!  The 18" stride is a good compromise for me(5'2") and my husband (6") and is comparable to the feel of higher-priced machines.Hopefully the machine will hold up to a lot of use.</review_text>
This is a fabulous product! My advice is to take everying out of the box carefully and layout all the parts. One bolt was listed in the instructions incorrectly. The bolts included were correct-just wrong reference in assembly instuctions. I just used process of elimination to figure out which ones to use. Amazon emailed me an update to the instructions (which I was pleasently blown away from). Unfortunatly, it was about a week after I assembled the product. Completely quiet and smooth opperation. Use the feet to accurately stablize so not to stress out the base rails. I am combpletely satisfied</review_text>
The Winter is here:(  That means, in the midwest at least, I have just finished my first season of golf.  I have topped balls, "shanked" balls, and even missed contacting the ball.  However, I was determined to better my game.  The first Swing Groover II I bought broke.  I called the stored I ordered it from and they were willing to replace the device.  I did receive a new Swing Groover II.  After using the Swing Groover II, I must say I am well pleased.  It has transformed my swing.  All season long, I thought I had a built in draw in my swing (I saw many balls going left).  The Swing Groover II has corrected that and now many of balls are straight.  Also, the Swing Groover II has given my a confidence to go out on the golf course and have the to go where I want it to go.  The Swing Groover II is accurate.  I went to a professional and had my swing speed tested.  My swing averaged 80-85 mph.  With the Swing Groover, my swing speed is 75-80 mph.  That sounds accurate to me.  Looking forward to the start of the golf season :</review_text>
For the money, this is an excellent training tool.  I, as others I see posting, have used more sophisticated equipment but found the results to be very close +/- 5% margin error.  Many, many, golfers are in denial about how hard they muscle up to the plate and how far the ball travels.  I find my driver to travel approx. 250 on the course, more sophisticated machines, and with this tool - club speed slighty over 100 with a slice from time to time, as recognized with the Swing Groover --- so it gets my humble endorsement.</review_text>
I recently bought this product, and I find it a good trainer. &#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;I've used a much more expensive analyzer at a golf shop, when getting fitted for clubs, and the swing speed shown on this unit is within a couple mph of the golf shop machine. &#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;The yardage shown on this unit seems to be short, but when one remembers that yardage is dependent on so many factors--type of ball, temperature, humidity, elevation, wind, one's particular physical state on each day--that imo, yardage matters much less in practicing than a consistent readout of swing speed.&#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;When I bring good tempo to my swing, the result is immediately visible on the readout. Get off tempo, and my swing speed invariably drops. Using this analyzer has helped me groove my swing, and even add a few mph. &#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;The unit is best suited for teed up shots, as the instructions discourage you from hitting down on a ball as with an iron. And the ball can't be set flush with the &quot;grass.&quot;&#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;Even with that drawback, I've had lots of fun working on my game, with the Golf Channel on, and snow flying outside my Montana living room.&#60;br /&#62;&#60;br /&#62;All in all, I'm pleased with the product</review_text>
Actually the Met RX bars are just as good, and the Balance Bars are a tiny smid below.  Odyssey Bars are great, too.  And the Premier Bars have a great taste. The Zone Perfect bars, on the other hand, taste a bit like plastic to me, and they're not even as high in protein, and are higher in carbs.  Before, during, or after a hard workout, or even in between meals, these babies really take the edge off that hunger and energize you</review_text>
I had one similar to this when I was younger - i am now 21 - and I still totally remember this toy!!! The one my brother and I had was acutally for 4 people though - not for 2.  I was so excited to see this... I know that many people thought I was crazy when I would talk about my favorite child toy.... This is it, many people did not believe there was such a thing.  This is also a great toy because it is good fo a child's vestibular system (I have an AA in ECE)so I will be buying one for my son asap - he's still a little too young - but as soon as he is 2 1/2, he will have this toy!!!</review_text>
We are very happy with this seesaw. The kids love being able to rotate 360 degrees in either direction in addition to going up and down - and sometimes do both at the same time. The Kettler beats the other seesaws available on the market hands down and is worth the extra money.  The only flaw I see is that if their is a significant difference in weight between the 2 kids riding that the seesaw can topple. The seesaw also needs to be on very level ground or the same problem can occur</review_text>
Nicely designed pair of very affordable gloves... they seem to have gotten this right.... XL a good XL fit... they even have XXL which are huge.  Very nice for the money</review_text>
I bought this belt a while ago but could not use it, because I have no idea what gel I should get for it. It says a water based gel or water. Water definitelly does not work. Could anyone tell me specifically what gel I need and where I could buy it?Ignore my rating since I did not actually used the belt.Thank you</review_text>
Used properly, this microprocessor, with its built-in timer, makes this fitness work-out a snap. Owned original AbTronic belt that was made of a fine rubber material that conducted the electronic pulses. Keep plenty of gel on and fresh batteries, and you cannot go wrong</review_text>
the belt has really helped my husband tone his stomach up. he loves it and uses it everyday</review_text>
sit up while laying down. this works well as long as you have enough gel on it</review_text>
I used to have this ab Sonic before and lost it in one of my moves so I had to get a second one. it is a great "tool" that will help you define your muscles in between work out or when you can not make it to the gym because of a last minute business apointment or similar. I don't think it would do much on someone who do not work out at all and just think that absonic is a magic wand that would make you gain muscle and loose 20 pounds of fat overnite ;-) but I do see results and i see my abs more firm and getting more definition.. worth to try to the price ;-</review_text>
Lack of alternate shipping method to Canada is the only reason I do not give it a 5 stars rating</review_text>
I bought this trainer for my husband for Christmas.  He has been pleased.  He rides an hour and thrity miniutes every night.  It is fairly quiet.  Keeps him in shape during the winter months</review_text>
As a resident of the Pacific Northwest and a person new to the sport of triathlon, I confronted an unfortunate truth this winter - there are not many good biking days after September.  Between work, weather, and sun deprivation, I was finding it hard to regularly fit in a trip to the gym for a ride, much less get on my bike.  The Minoura hybrid trainer was tops on my Christmas wish list.I had looked into other options, and the Minoura seemed like a good point of entry.  The fluid/mag hybrid was touted and low noise and "road-like", but the overall cost I still found affordable.  I have been quite happy since I first unpacked it.My observations:1) The instructions were simple and actually written in English (a welcome change over the all-graphic instructions that are all too common).  The one point that was unclear was the use of the skewer (the crossbar through the rear wheel).  A skewer is provided, but my bike fit fine using the skewer that was already in the rear wheel.2) Once assembled, it is quite simple to attach the bike.  I spend more time getting my shoes, shorts, and a towel for my workout than I do putting the bike on the trainer.3) The balance and stability are good.  I have not had any concerns, even when listening to an ipod or otherwise not devoting full attention.4) The most important aspect, the workout, has been exactly what I wanted.  I'm able to get my heart rate up to whatever training zone I want.  The resistance provided by the magnet is smooth and in proportion to the effort I expend.  Need to simulate intervals?  No problem.  The resistance changes nicely with each shift of the gears.  When the workout ends, my thighs "feel it" about like they would after a similar length of time and effort on the road.5) The riser block is a nice touch and ships in the same package as the trainer.6) Consider getting a training aid to encourage you to vary the workout.  Otherwise, it's too easy to get in a steady cadence and not vary it through the duration of the workout.</review_text>
The combination of both the magnetic resistance as well as the fluid resistance makes for a trainer that does a good job in creating a true road experience. There are no adjustments other than adjusting the trainer to the wheel diameter of your bike. As you change gears and the wheel spins faster, you experience the resistance you would encounter on the road with the wind pushing you back. Even after an hour of moderate speed, the fluid and magnetic units only were moderately warm to the touch. The heavy flywheel helps add to the smoothness of the ride. If you are using a slick road tire, the amount of noise generated is relatively small. There is some minor assembly required, but the instructions are well translated and illustrated. Even a 5mm hex tool is included. I recommend also getting the riser, if one is not included, to allow proper leveling of the bike. The unit comes with a skewer, which can be installed easily on your bike in case the one already on the bike does not fit in the lugs of the trainer that clamp the bike to the trainer. In my case the skewer already on the bike (Giant) worked fine.I recommend this trainer as a step up from those with only magnetic resistance and at a price point nearly a hundred dollars below the premium all fluid drive models on the market</review_text>
This belt is much more comfortable than those full-back styles.  It seemed too skimpy to hold up my large frame in the water, but worked great!  I got the model with 4 floats, but a smaller adult could probably use just 3.  This is a very good value</review_text>
This small flash light is really bright!  I bought two and am very pleased with the quality and the amount of light that this little light puts out</review_text>
This product is well designed and constructed (caveat - I've only had it for 3 months).  I love it.  The design allows one to arch his/her back (like doing a "bridge" stretch) while crunching to further isolate the muscle group and provide a more effective work out.  And working the obliques is easy as turning slightly to one side, giving a surprisingly effective workout.  And it folds up into a compact configuration for easy storage.  The dark gray mesh looks much better than the blue fabric used on the standard model.  I would have given this product 5 stars except taxes, shipping and handling added fifty dollars to the cost, bringing up to $200.  A bit pricey, but I don't regret the purchase one bit</review_text>
I enjoy using this ab device. As the advertisement states it gets you off the floor and my back doesn't hurt while doing the workout. After the workout you can reverse jackknife and relax which stretches the muscles</review_text>
I am very satisfied with my purchase, now I just have to find the time to use the product on a regular basis</review_text>
Okay, I caved and bought one of these, thinking I would be regretting my purchase in no time.  Well, how wrong I was.  It comes almost fully assembled and I was able to unpack everything and attach the cables, foot pedals, and hand grips in about 10 minutes.  I like the mesh material of the seat, as opposed to the earlier versions that were made with a nylon type matierial. The Ab Lounge comes with a nice workout DVD and an instruction book with photos and clear step-by-step instructions for 8 various abdominal exercises depending on your fitness level. I have been using it about 3-4 times a week, about 15 minutes each time, and I actually enjoy doing my abdominal workouts now. It's also pretty comfortable to stretch my back out on this too.  And the best thing of all, it folds up very compact (to about 5 inches thick) so I can store it under my bed!  Overall, it's just awesome and I am very pleased with my purchase!**Editing my review to add that the recall was referring to injuries that occurred when opening and closing the chair, not while exercising on it. I read about the recall when I was deciding whether or not to purchase the Ab Lounge.  The company has since added some safety features to the new units that have been sold since late 2004 to make it easier and safer to fold up the chair and unfold it.  If you have an earlier version, there is a repair kit available to make it compliant.  You can read about the recall at the cpsc.gov website, by entering Ab Lounge in the search box</review_text>
IF YOU HAVE MAJOR BELLY FAT IT WILL REDUCE IT I HAVE LOST 3 INCHES ON MY STOMACH IN 3 WEEKS OF USE I HAVE TRIED MANY OTHER AB EQUIPMENT THEY SIMPLY DONT WORK THIS DOES WHAT IT SAYS IT DOES IF USED PROPERLY I COULD FEEL IT THE 1ST DAY</review_text>
The Ab Lounge Ultra works well and is easy to store; however, the DVD that came with it is faulty and I have not received the replacement requested over 3 weeks ago</review_text>
Ok 1 the instructions are [...] so unless you have a good understanding on how airsoft guns work then i don't suggest unscrewing any screws2 i also experienced a steady decline in fps as did my friends so i was determined to find out the cause. i thought it was some kind of loss of pressure and sure enough i was right there is an o-ring that is attached to the bolt and it had slipped off of where it was supposed to go. i popped it back into place and after 1-2 hours of fiddling i finally got the dang thing back together, there are lots of small parts and spring and lots of grease which doesn't help, and it worked like new, so if you want to take apart the gun and fix it every month or so then go ahead and buy it but if you don't then don't buy it (it's only 35 bucks what do you expect</review_text>
this gun is pretty good and fast. its got a short clip so buy another 1</review_text>
This gun is purely amazing. received 3 days after ship dat with standard shipping. The gun shoots alot harder than 300 fps. I had an airsoft war with my friend and he has bruises from the gun. Overall Great Gun. Would buy from seller again</review_text>
I've been playing airsoft for about 5 years now and after using ics, classic army, tokyo marui, i can truthfully say that this guns feels and shoots no different than the other 300$ dollar brands. The only difference i notice is that the gun makes a little more noise than other guns. No problems what so ever.  I would however reccomend getting a btter scope (the one it comes with is crap).P.S. I am not audre</review_text>
this gun came in 3 days wen i ordered it, ive been airsofting4  a while and alot of my friends have Tokyo Maruisand theirs shoot like 300fps and up and thier are consistantly accurate..this gun is accurate if you use 20g bbs instead of 12g.  the 12g are cheaper, but when u shoot they go about 22 feet the curve what ever way they want to...one thing is that the clip only holds about 30-50 bbs... if you try u can fit 70 but i like to fit only 30 or twenty so that i rely on skill rather than automatic...i like to play in an orchord(lots of trees) and i knida wish that the guns orange tip wasnt so bright...somtimes i think the gun could use a sling and a sliencer and a real scope...  the scope that came with is only good for looks  and scaring people... the sights work way better.it hits really hard for 300fps... i recomend an upgrade battery and motor so u can play longer and shoot farther....  it does shoot pretty far as is.When in automatic it spools up and shoots harder and really fast.  I RECOMEND BUYING THE 330ROUND CLIP FOR IT ONLY 30 BUCKS MORE AND IT SAVES YOUR BEHIND....</review_text>
i dont know anything about airsoft or bb i just want to shot pinatas with my friends i want to know a straight answer. IS THIS GUN WORTH THE MONEY</review_text>
I purchased this stability ball set used, and so far, I have been very pleased.  The ball comes with a foot pump which is very simple to use; I was able to inflate the ball in less than five minutes.  The ball is perfect for stretching--a chart of stretching exercises is included--and can also be used to enhance core workouts as well as Pilates and yoga.  One thing I've noticed is that if I don't use the ball for a few days, I need to reinflate it slightly; I'm not sure if this is a defect or typical of all stability balls, but adding the extra air takes only a minute.This set also comes with a video called Tone, Trim, and Tighten.  Instructor Gin Miller provides an overview of using the ball and then leads a workout which includes a warm-up, abs work, back work, a lower body segment, wall squats, and stretches.  In the back and wall squat segments, only one set of a single exercise is shown; the video suggests that you rewind for a greater workout.  However, the addition of the video makes this set a great deal, so if you want to give ball workouts a try but don't want to spend a lot of money, I definitely recommend this set</review_text>
I bought this table about a month ago and have used it a couple of times and I am very pleased with it.  It stores in a bag just a little bigger than a folding chair, it sets up easy, is very sturdy and is even adjustable.  It even looks good. Definitely recommended</review_text>
The table is great. It is light weight, compact and will work perfect on my camping and rafting trips. My only concern is that it is lightweight, but the price if right</review_text>
I have not had any problems I have been using it now for almost two months semi daily.  It holds the bikes well, and does not require that I keep extra bungies. I use it on a Ford Explore</review_text>
This eliptical is NOT as good as the heavy ones you will find in a gym, but it's almost as good, & for the cost it's especially appealing.  It took about 2 hours to assemble, but I'm not an expert at mechanical devices, so, Reader, you can probably cut it down to 1 hour (nevertheless after two hours I felt an uncommon sense of elation).  The users of my eliptical are 150 pounds & 99 pounds respectively (but I'm sure it can take up to 250 pounds--both of us together perhaps), & it does move a little (I exercise vigorously, so it moved about 3 feet this morning) during exercising, but for under 300$ it's worth it.  Definitely, worth it</review_text>
This is almost a better workout than the treadmill to me. I still use my treadmill, but this definitely is a total body workout. Great cardio workout if that is what you are looking for.</review_text>
Although I'm not sure that I would call it whisper quiet, at least not by my definition, it's is by no definition loud.  I really like this machine.  It was easy to put together, easy to understand display and easy to use.  There are 8 resistance settings and even setting 2 you can feel the machine working.  I like that there are no wires or clip-ons for a heart/pulse monitor, simply hold onto the handles and you get that information.  It is heavy so make sure you have someone to help you get it inside but all in all, this machine is a winner</review_text>
Cross trainer is excellent in quality. Just as good, if not better then like excercisors of different manufactures and brands.I am quite happy with the price and quality and not to mention the fast delivery</review_text>
I think this machine is good for starters but can get a little boring at times........  Pop in a dvd and pump those thighs!!!!!!It is sturdy and didnt take that long to put together, clear instructions.  Doesnt take up alot of room, isnt an "eye-sore" in the room  and I feel it was a good deal for the price of $199.00 on sale.......Free shipping didnt hurt either!  All in all I give it FOUR STARZZZZZ</review_text>
I bought this set and the slim pack (25) and mix and matched for a great gift for a friend.  They really enjoyed the wild patterns and wide variety of flights.  Pick your flight based upon your mood</review_text>
I work at a hospital and we needed some pedometers to give out during our National Walking Challenge week.  WE are encouraging members to walk 10,000 steps a day. Hopefully, these will be perfect for that</review_text>
A great buy. Tested with same accuracy as a $20 pedometer. Quiet operation. Easy to use.</review_text>
The Sportline bulk pedometer delivers exactly as its branded couperpart at half the price. I have been a walker since I got a diabetes diagnosis five years ago, and the Sportline unit is reliable and seems to be accurate. The bulk model reviewed here is the same device as the one I bought at Target five years ago. Functions include the step counter, a calorie counter and an approximation of the distance traveled. Doctors recommend walking for multiple health conditions and this counter helps keep you honest!Great value</review_text>
Sometimes the simplest thing can be the best thing in the world. Gee, I wish I came up with this gadget, I would be a millionaire by now. If you want to work your arms, abs, back, just use this EVIL WHEEL everyday. Forget about Sit Ups, and wasting money on BIG HEAVY machine. This Wheel can be used for ANYONE ANY age, ANY sex, and of course at ANY place~! Do not worry, I will come up with some gadget next time and be a millionaire! We all be glad I did it~!</review_text>
For the most part it works as advertised, however as I was testing it I noticed that sometimes you can walk by it and the device wouldn't go off. If I attempt this a second time however I would be detected. I would just suggest for this reason you should buy two to overlap the "secured area". They're cheap enough for that and give you ample time to armed/disarm the</review_text>
There's nothing better than a dishwasher-safe, durable, narrow-mouthed water bottle that fits in cupholders</review_text>
Place the float low in the small of the child's back which will float them more horizontally. This position will encourage your child to kick and stroke, increasing their ability to swim independently.Products like water wings and float jackets will certainly float your child, but will hinder their ability to actively swim</review_text>
Both of my children (ages 6 and 3 1/2) use these same floats in their swim classes at our local YMCA.  I absolutely loved them! I was so glad to finally find them online at Amazon.com.  I bought 2 for use at our local pool and our trip to Florida</review_text>
This is a great product if your child is learning to swim, older children 5-7 age.Where the parents are still watching them ,but it gives them alittle more freedom to learn the strokes,needed for swimming lessons.It also can grow with your child as they learn to swim, the pads come off as needed.I have seen these also used in the swim classes, that use them. Its a confidence bilder for the child.</review_text>
I've had it for over a year but have only used it a few times. I haven't gotten sick. The water I used it on was likly clean. The only warning is making absolutely certain that the threads on your bottle lids are clean and dry which may be difficult. It only takes one drop of contaminated water to run back into the sterilized supply. I look forward to purchasing the filter cap. I looked at the MIOX but the fact that takes up to 6 hours to work on viruses put me off.</review_text>
This is one of those items that I spent over $100 that was not an electronics gaget or larger "item."This steripen treats most drinkable water without tablets, clorox drops, or other additives.It uses UV light to make most waters drinkable.For example, there is usually plenty of water in flooded areas (but none that is really drinkable - unless it is boiled, treated or plain bottle water), the water gets all foul by mixing with other nasty stuff that can make sick or even kill you. As long as the water did not mix with "chemicals," than you may have a chance with the SteriPen.I have been using it, testing it on rain water, melted ice water - & I am happy to say that even with my sensitive GI - no problems!!! I even carry an extra in makeshift emergency kit!</review_text>
After too many years without a bike I finally decided it was time to buy one for commuting from work.  Since the bike cost more than I planned for, I wanted to get a good helmet at the lowest price.  I started by trying on lower priced helmets but just didn't get a comfortable fit.  When I got to the Influx, the fit felt good.  A month later, I'm still happy with my new helmet.To get a proper fit, the straps must be properly adjusted.  The five simple steps are detailed in the owner's manual complete with diagrams.  Basically one wears the helmet in its proper position, adjusts the Cam-Lock adjustors, pull the chin strap tight, set the geared positioning system (GPS), and test the helmet's fit.It is recommended that after an accident, the helmet be replaced, as damage is not always obvious.  Bell offers a crash replacement policy for purchases in Canada and the US costing $35 in the states. Excessive heat can damage this helmet, store in a cool dry place when not in use.  Heat damage is indicated by uneven or bubbly surfaces.This lightweight helmet provides the protection I need, fits comfortably, and keeps my head cool.  The Influx has proved to be a good purchase for me.PROS:Comfortable fitVented to keep you coolProvides protectionCONS:Removable visor can block too much field of vision at times</review_text>
I have had this product for over two years and it has not failed to hold on to my bike yet.  However, my only issue is that the heavy duty plastic straps that hold the bikes on have started to snap off.  I have lost 3 of 8 straps and there does not seem to be anyway to replace them (short of using a home created version...NOT SAFE).  The vendor does not appear to be available on the Internet or sell replacement parts as I need</review_text>
I have now owned one of these for 5 years, is a decnet product.  It can sway as some have mentioned, that is a use for bungie cords!&#60;br /&#62;I have used this product, fully loaded, traveling 500+ miles each way several times, and thru the mountains, with no real problems.  The retainers are now showing some age and cracking, so I am looking for replacements to contine using the product</review_text>
I was very afraid to purchase this rack reading some of the reviews, but I did anyway and I love it. Very sturdy rack, as long as you follow the instructions to the T. Now I have a two inch hitch--I don't know if that means anything or not.  But I would recommend this rack to anyone</review_text>
After reading all these reviews, I was not going to get this bike rack, but did anyways.  And I'm very impressed, if you follow all of the directions to the T, you will have no problems. This bike rack is very sturdy I could stand on it and not be afraid of it breaking. In spite of what the others say about wobble it does not for me.  Now I have a 2" hitch and had to use the adapter. For the price you can't beat it</review_text>
I had searched long and hard for a bike trailer/stoller, but nowhere could I find mention of this product's front tire. So, I am writing about it first, the front tire is rubber and needs to be inflated prior to use, just like the back tires.Overall, this is a great product for the price. It fit my budget and safety concerns.The manufacturer details and many reviews say you do not need tools to assemble so it is very easy to put together. I found that while it was simple to put together, attaching it to my bike was a bit of a challenge. You need to bend the tow bar to fit in the coupler on your bike, which is difficult the first few times. The bug/rain cover is tight the first few times as well, or it could have been the way I was attching it to the velcro as I was streching it from one side to the other. However, I think it is good that the material was stiff in the begining as it tends to strech with time and use. My son loves to kick his feet up against the screen where the velcro attaches the top and front together, it seems to be holding up pretty good.The trailer itself is wide and I could not fit it through my door. This is largely due to the covers around the wheels. I do have an older house so back then they didn't seem to be concerned with door width. Most stores have the automatic doors which are more than wide enough. I did go to a movie rental chain and the trailer just barely fit. I only have one child so bringing the handle bar for stoller is easy, but seems awkward if two children are riding in it. I have seen reviews mention both children have plenty even with cargo.The product comes with a safety strap for the handle bar when using as a stroller (not pictured in many shots I've seen) and has brake straps you hook around the tires (also not pictured). The belts inside are not your typical 5 point harness as the shoulder straps, lap belt and crotch straps do not connect in a single point. The lap belt must be put on the child first and tightened, then the shoulder straps are adjusted to the height of the child and tightened, then connected to the crotch strap. The shoulder straps are slightly paded, but I haven't seen any other bike trailer in this price range that have better padding or any whatsoever.I also found out that bike trailers are just like cars, every year they have new models so the previous year's model goes on sale.If you are going to be an AVID biker who will alternate biking and jogging daily on dirt trails or beaches or will be taking your child(ren) on weekend excursions through the mountians or rough terrain then this probably isn't the bike trailer for you. But keep in mind, the next version up is priced that way too (the next cheapest I found was over $350 for just the trailer, the bike attachment was almost $200 and the stroller kit was just as much).</review_text>
Very Nice Stroller. Good quality and easy to use, turns great. Fits two children easily.</review_text>
I have had this trailer for 5 days and have used it 5 days in a row. 3 days as a jogger stroller and 2 days as a bike trailer.*It is easy to set up and take down. Yes it does take a little time but I am getting good at it. I don't feel like you need to be "strong" to do either.*We live in an apartment and have to carry this item from our back patio through our apartment to the front so being compact and light was an issue for me since I will be the one mostly using it. I am glad we went with aluminum, as it is light. It does fold down nicely and even with the wheels on I can still get it through the apartment without hitting furniture.Pros:*As a bike trailer it pulls smoothly.*Easy to put on my mountain bike.*I feel it is made well and safe.*My 2  yr old seems comfortable in it and loves the pockets for her treats/drinks. There is even a compartment for my backpack.*It is simple to transition into a jogging stroller.*As a stroller it is light and easy to push until....Cons:*It seems there is not enough weight up front so the front wheel wobbles uncontrollably which makes it impossible to push. I have to lift it and then set it down again to get it to go straight. I end up jogging with the front wheel held up, which is not fun. However, I guess I could buy a jogger stroller that was really meant for jogging but they shouldn't promote it as a stroller if you can't push it. I am going to contact the company and see if there is a way to fix this problem.*The 5-point harness is no different from other trailers I have seen. They do seem flimsy and are a little stiff to attach to the ring.*Today I got home from a ride and realized the flag was missing. I am guessing it flew off when I was going down a hill.*I hope the canvas holds up. There are already two very small holes where the flag is inserted and rubs.*The rubber on the clasps for the stroller handle is already coming off.All in all I am happy with the product for the price. Just a few concerns as mentioned above. I am not a hard-core rider but do intend to use the product frequently so I hope it holds up. It seems sturdy and well made but time will tell.</review_text>
I bought the trike for my nephew as a Christmas gift.  I got it baring in mind that his older brother was getting a real 2 stroke fourwheeler from Santa.  It arrived well in advance of Christmas, even though I purchased it a mere two weeks before the holiday.  The assembly required could have been done by trained monkeys.  He loves it, although his little stubby legs are a bit too short to reach the petals still.  His parents are now forced to cart it back and forth everywhere they go because Bren refuses to be parted with his trike</review_text>
What I like most about this practice net is the easy pop up and twist take down. They say it is good indoors too but you will need room. Probably best for basement, it is bigger than it looks on the box</review_text>
This is one of the best nets I have bought.  It is very easy to set and take down and it sits up without needing any spikes in the ground.  It great for the garage</review_text>
I purchased this chair because I sit for long periods watching soccer games and tournaments. My back ached from the the portable chairs due to the lack of support in the lumbar section. This chair has eased my back pain and the table attached to the chair is wonderful. It is easy to carry, very comfortable, and I recommend this chair. I have also used it camping and for tailgating at football games</review_text>
This kick board is as advertise--sleek looking, yet quite functional. It fits into a regular backpack unlike many kick boards so it's easy to carry</review_text>
i wanted a pair so badly,and when all my friends started getting them,i wanted them more,they are the coolest shoes.the removable wheel should be easier to remove though. However they are really cool and my pair are coming soon but heelys still rock!!!!!!!!!!!!!</review_text>
I have never had the need to exercise thanks to great metobolism.  Recently, I decided it was time and began my research to find a piece of exercise equipment for my home.  At first I was sold on an elyptical but I have minimal room and they take up a lot of space.  Then I happened upon this rower and based on the reviews here I thought I'd give it a try.It took me roughly 45 mins to put it together without much effort.  I have started using it and couldn't be happier.  It's easy to use and you can either push yourself or pace yourself.  For storage, it doesn't stand up on it's own but easily stores under a bed or against the wall.  I would highly recommend this product and look forward to years of use</review_text>
The Stamina 1205 Precision Rower is one of the best I've ever used.  My doctor insists on a rowing machine to strengthen my back muscles.  I have rather sever scoliosis and keeping the back muscles strong inhibits the increase of the curvatures.  This is a wonderful machine and well-suited to building the muscles I need to maintain my health</review_text>
Great machine, adjustable for different fitness levels, and easy assembly. Not too heavy and stores under the bed. Wonderful addition to my home gym. This single machine works several muscle groups for a great full body workout that does not cause injury to joints. I love it!</review_text>
Overall, pretty good machine for the money.  The seat is pretty uncomfortable.  It might be okay for up to 10 minutes.  I think it'd be better suited for someone 5'4" to 5'8" because I am 6' and the range of motion is not optimal.</review_text>
I bought a used rower years ago and came to work it several times a week.  I'm a busy person, so I don't have time for a sophisticated work out routine.  I just want to work one machine for both strength and aerobic training.  Rowing is great for this purpose.  When I broke my rower, I started shopping.  Unfortunately, even used rowers are over $100.  I struggled with this model versus the smaller ones that stand up vertically for easy storage.  I couldn't find any reviews on this that addressed the storage question.  Finally, I chose it because it didn't look like I could break it from normal usage, whereas the kind that fold nicely seem flimsy.Pros:- This machine is very sturdy.  It's solid, stable, and does not rock at all when in use.- It is amazingly quiet.  The only sound is the whisper of the pistons.  I can use it with the TV on normal volume.- The seat is very comfortable.  I sat on it for 30 minutes the first time with no discomfort.Cons:- It does not fold, collapse, or stand up vertically. It just sits on the floor.  It would be very awkward to try to store it under a bed.  Don't lift the back end too far or the plug for the timer will bend.  This is why it only has 4 stars.- The front bumper pads are just stuck on.  You can't drag it backwards without them popping off.  The back ones also just sit on there, but they face sideways, so they won't come off.- The instructions were difficult.  My wife and I kept flipping back and forth in the manual to figure out to which bolt each step of the direction referred.The work out was great.  I really like using this machine.  I only wish I had a better place to put it when I'm not using it</review_text>
I bought one a while back. The Blade is not very sharp for starters and needs much work to get it sharp.BUT the handle sucks. Once I reground the blade I actually used it camping and hiking. After using it to chop branches and the like the handle began to wiggle about. On checking it out I found that it was held on the the hilt with a small screw and GLUED in place.  I ended up dumping the knife and got THE REAL THING. Now this was in 1995 and I ended up in Arkansas and bought the real knife from the makers of the knives in the movie.  It at the time was a $800.00 knife. All hand made etc and very strong. Held up very well and now sits in a case on the wall. You do get what you pay for</review_text>
this product was shipped just as it said it was with no surprises.  would recommend.  th</review_text>
*****This is an upscale designer water bottle, top of the line, and so much fun. The designs Of Sigg's water bottles are gorgeous, from the plain, solid color bottles, to the ones with intricate designs. They are simply beautiful! I switched from regular plastic water bottles because of health concerns, thinking it would take more work to maintain. These do necessitate regular cleaning (I clean mine every day), but having something so beautiful to drink from makes the cleaning fun. Sort of like my rings, glasses, and watch, I now consider my Sigg personal water bottle a vital accessory, reminding me to drink more water, making a statement about my values, and expressing myself with a special design. Yes, all in a water bottle!Sigg of Switzerland water bottles are very high quality, made of light aluminum on the outside, slightly insulated, and covered with a special powder coat on the inside that prevents any leaching whatsoever, unlike plastic and polycarbonate water bottles. They are light, durable, and perfect for any activity. Well water tastes spectacular in these bottles, just like from the tap.Sigg bottles come with several different types of tops.  I bought the screw top because I don't like sports tops, and I don't mind unscrewing the top when I want a drink. It is totally leakproof, which is important to me. The top is pretty and can be hooked onto a carabiner.  I get comments on it all the time, "What's that? I love it!"  The sports top version is ok; I just am not a fan, as I don't feel like I can get enough water from the little stream from the sports top. However, for convenience, you might prefer it. For children, there is a cap-type top. All are leak-proof. If you are ever unsatisfied with the top, you can buy a screw top separately to fit your Sigg bottle.Sigg makes their personal water bottle in .6L and 1L in this style. I have both. I use the .6L for sports activities because they are smaller. When I won't have to carry the container, I like the larger bottle. Sigg also makes a smaller .3L bottle for children that is a perfect size for young people. You can buy Siggs in alternative sizes too, such as .75L, .4L (for kids), .6L, .5L. You can occasionally find this bottle in the 1.5L size, also. Search Amazon for the perfect size.Pick a style and pattern you like, as this bottle is a personal accessory, and should reflect your style. The colors are vibrant and even prettier than they seem in the pictures on Amazon.They are expensive, but they are so durable that you can plan on them lasting many years. I consider them both an accessory and an investment in my health, so they are well worth it value-wise for me.Highly recommended.****</review_text>
The Sonocaddie is a basic but very accurate GPS range device.  It does not show the shape of the green or give your position in relation to the fairway or green. So if you are in the trees on the right it will only give you the straight line range to the icons shown in the three columns.  It is very simple to map or edit your own course if it is not in the on-line database or you want to change one that is.  The distances to the front, center and back of green, using the big green feature, are very accurate.  If you need a meat and potatoes GPS range device with no frills or color then this is the device for you.  No annual subscription fee is just gravy on top</review_text>
I just purchased a SONOCADDIE GPS Rangefinder and after going to their website to download my favorite courses, the only thing I was able to download were the holes with handicap and para ratings.  So, that meant I was forced to go to a course and attempt to record signicant course landmarks as well as "record" front and back locations on each green.  Turns out this process was a whole lot easier than I thought it would be.  After posting "records" for about 3 holes, I circled back and was really impressed with the system accuracy, speed, reliablity and readability of this cell phone sized unit. Some other key features include the ability to hold settings for 20 courses.  You can find other GPS units that my be easier to read or include more data relative to scoring or just recording your round for your foursome, but I don't think you will find one that is any simpler to operate.  Not having an annual subscription was another plus for me</review_text>
The foam rubber had a strong sour odor when I received this, but after I aired the pieces for several hours outdoors the smell diminished enough that I can do yoga on it without wondering if I am killing brain cells.  The pieces lock together easily and tightly though the seams strain when I do a down-dog (pull strongly on them).  Edge pieces are provided to enable you to construct a neat tidy 3x4 mat with smooth straight edges.  Handily, they're the same size as the colorful foam tiles of my baby's playmat, so I can use them to extend his mat into a nice large area also.  The shipping cost was higher than I expected but the item itself was on sale when I bought it, balancing out the purchase value</review_text>
The Cold Steel Spike Tanto is a lot of knife for a reasonable price.It is viciously sharp and will remove arm hair quite easily.  It has a width across the spine of the blade that is unmatched by any knife its size I have ever seen.  Virtually indestructible.  The case is excellent if plain.  This knife leaves very wide wounds in steak; I think stitches would be the only way to close the wounds.On the down side it doesn't hold an edge very long and its handle is very short and I wear a medium glove.Overall this is a knife built for the sole purpose of self defense.  It is small to make it easily concealable and comes with its own neck chain.  It is a knife that won't let you down when the going gets tough, used in its intended purpose it should be virtually indestructible and wickedly efficient.</review_text>
This device is the best device for working out both your dorsal and ventral forearm muscles...I still find it surprising that almost no gyms have this simple, yet incredibly effective device.</review_text>
Cute boy's bike---We are pleased with style, color, fit....However,  Columbia only provided a general manual on safety, fit, and technical information on adult bikes they sell.  Nothing specific on how to put this bike together.  Most of it was assembled when it arrived---hardware in the allotted holes, and we did assemble the handle bars, training wheels, etc.  Now we just have to do the fine tuning of tightening handle bars with special hex tools, tweaking breaks, adjusting fenders so they are centered...  If we had an instruction manual for the specific bike, we would be able to make sure everything was assembled correctly.  When I contacted Columbia's Customer service, the only thing they recommended is that we take the bike to a bike store and have a professional assemble.  I asked if they have an authorized dealer in my area they can recommend (especially if something were to fail under the warranty down the road...) The CS rep. said "no, any bike shop could do it."   I asked if they send out manuals to dealers, and if so, maybe I can receive a copy.  The response was "dealers put together bikes all the time and any of them should be able to do it".  If I bought a $500 mountain bike, yes I would probably want a dealer to assemble.  However, in my opinion a 12 inch children's bike should be able to be assembled by competent parents who have a good set of instructions.  If it's recommended a professional dealer put it together, it should be noted on the description in BOLD letters so I know what to expect before I buy.</review_text>
I bought this item thinking it was cheap. It turns out that i got a different holster than the one shown above. the one received was even better it even included an extra mag pouch on the holster! it fits my .45 perfectly so i dont think that a desert eagle or anything bigger will fit. i'd recommend this item to anyone since its such a good dea</review_text>
I bought this, a helmet and a leg holster, thinking, wow its cheap and i bet it is cheap.  It's great quality stuff. It looks better than the image itself</review_text>
I am really happy with it for the price.  It was a bit tricky to get adjusted, but not as hard to figure out as they say. As long as  you know those two straps on the bottom are for a belt.  It seems well built, although i havnt had a chance to test it out in extreme conditions yet.  One thing to keep in mind is it might not be the best for smaller body types.  I am quite thin and it took quite a bit to get it to fit me.  I still dont think it fits the way it should but at least its comfortable.  Ill  probably end up modding it to get it fit better.SMALLER PEOPLE MIGHT BE BETTER OFF WITH A THIGH HOLSTER</review_text>
THe first time i saw this i thought it was a bra. =) but once i got it it was awsome, i like it cuse u can wear it under a coat, and pull out pistols like in the movies.</review_text>
Ok, so I bought this thing and shortly there after realized there was no size listed on the page. I got lucky and it works for what I carry. However, I wish for items like this they would give a little more info. It wasnt really all that hard to figure out. Very comfortable as well</review_text>
I admit, it's a little tricky to figure out at first, but if my 55 year old mother can figure it out, then I'm sure someone who's been on the police force for 30 years should be able to, also. For anyone thinking of buying this, the long velcro straps hanging down are for your belt. After you figure that out, you should have no problems. I wish it would fit a little more snug, but maybe I have some more adjusting to do. Over all, it comes in real handy</review_text>
I've been using this holster for about half a year now and I haven't had any problems with it yet. Once you figure out how to attach it to your belt its actually pretty comfortable. I did have some trouble figuring out how to wear it also, hehe</review_text>
Great machine with excellent results. Quiet and smooth so there's no problem watching TV while you work out.</review_text>
I enjoy rowing on a lake when I have the chance and I've also used the much more expensive concept II type rower.  I had planned to get a wind resistance type rower like the concept II but when I read the reviews on the Kettler Kadett I decided to give it a try even though I had used a piston type rower before (and hated it).  I'm very happy with my purchase.  The Kadett really is like rowing a boat, the motion is very smooth and it is very quiet.  Assembly was very straight forward, just read the directions and look at the pictures to verify.  The workout is first class and a nice addition to my nordic track</review_text>
I bought this rower about 6 months ago after comparing different ones. Decided to splurge on this as I thought it would give realistic feeling and be durable.Overall, I like the rower - it's built solid and has smooth operation. It takes 1-2 hours to put together. Unfortunately, we were missing a small, but important part - had to call customer service - called on a Friday and got the part Monday. In the meantime, I was so impatient that I went to Lowes and found a part that would work so I could start using it immediately.The only cons about it are the straps for the feet - they do tend to come loose after a little while - could probably be easily fixed with something else.The only other con is the placement of the feet. I do wish that I could adjust them a little bit in terms of position.Otherwise, I've enjoyed the rower and think it will last many years</review_text>
I bought this particular rower based solely on the great reviews it has received here at Amazon, and I was not disappointed.  This is a fantastic rower.  It really and truly does mimic a natural rowing motion AND it is very quiet when in use.  You can listen to music or watch t.v. and not have to have either one driving everyone else out of the house while you workout.I find the rower extremely relaxing for a workout.I am a 40+ female and I assembled the rower by myself in under two hours.  That included putting the rowing handles on the wrong side the first go around.  Do what everyone else has suggested and lay all the pieces out.  The hardware is very efficiently packaged in a segmented package so you only need to open the parts you need as you go through each step.  It really couldn't be any easier to assemble.I bought mine through Amazon and the only gripe I had was that Amazon required a signature on delivery and I was not home the first time so that ticked me off because I wasn't aware of the need for a signature.  Just be forewarned about that if you aren't usually home when your UPS deliveries arrive.If you're into rowing for fun and exercise, you will love this Kettler Rower</review_text>
I found it $30 cheaper on another site.  I liked the reviews here and shopped around and found a better deal.  Once it arrived, it was a great machine.  Took an hour or two to put together, not a big deal.  I took it slow and patient and everything fit properly.  The quality is excellent, not thin tinny parts, but solid machinery.  It's whisper quiet, so you can enjoy television while rowing.  It's small when wide open, and the arms fold back even farther for easy storage.  The only problem is the data panel -- the booklet instructions are in some inscrutable language, so I never learned how to use the buttons on the panel.  That's ok, though, because it gives you elapsed time and number of reps, and I don't really need a lot more data when I'm rowing.  Also, the data panel kind of slides on to the top of the machine and sits between your knees.  If you bump it while rowing, it can get loose or pop off.  But overall, this is an excellent machine, well worth the money</review_text>
First, this is a beautifully designed and built machine.  The rowing action is smooth and closely resembles the feel of rowing a shell.  It is quiet and can easily adjust to people of differing heights.  While the machine does have a large foot print when in use, it does easily fold into a compact size for storage or to simply clear floor space.  Due to the quietness of this device, it is a joy to listen to music or watch a movie while working out.  Other exercise equipment I have is too noisy for this.  As others have stated, it is easy to under estimate the amount of exercise you're getting.  Even though I often end an hour of rowing feeling like I really haven't done much, the feeling in my legs when standing up afterwards lets me know that I've had a good workout.Assembly was time consuming, but not really difficult.  As other reviewers have stated, the parts are of high quality, finish and the fit is excellent.The three minor problems I've encountered were easily fixed:1)	on a smooth cement floor, the machine tended to drift during a long work out.  Carpeting or a rubber pad under the machine fixed this.2)	The hard plastic handles become slippery when wet with sweat.  Wearing a pair of cotton work gloves resolves this problem and has the extra benefit of protecting your hands from friction with the handles.3)	As shipped, the foot straps tend to work loose during exercise.  This is due to an assembly problem at the factory.  When the straps are properly positioned, they don't slip.  To fix this problem, remove the two screws (one in each foot plate) that hold the straps in position.  While you're at it, you might want to reverse one of the straps so both buckle to the outside of your feet.  When you tighten the straps, position them so the back of the buckle touches the foot plate.  This leaves the end of the strap going through the buckle pulling along the same plane as the buckle.  To loosen the strap, pull the end of the buckle away from your foot, increasing the angle at which the strap enters the buckle.  The straps loosen during exercise because the factory setting leaves the end of the strap pulling at an angle to the buckle.  A very slight change in this angle is sufficient to loosen the strap.  Note that I didn't try to replace the two screws.  Replacing the screws with the buckle properly positioned may make it easier to tighten the straps.Despite the minor problems mentioned above, this is an excellent machine and well worth the expense.  It clearly deserves a rating of five.</review_text>
I'll break this review into parts:Shipping: #1 (see previous review) - horrendous, disaster - paid for a new machine/rec'd a trashed, used one. Sent it back. UPS.Received #2 - New machine via DHL. The box was torn AGAIN and some parts came out. DHL tried to dump it on the porch, but caught them fleeing the scene. Everything was new and wrapped in plastic this time, so I decided to inspect carefully and see if any damage was done. I believe the box damage occurred when DHL picked it up by the edges of the lid. This is a heavy box.Inspection: I unwrapped all pieces and opened the plastic small parts bags. Only slight scuff marks were present on one piece of the machine. Laid all parts out on the floor and checked them against the parts checklist. All parts present and accounted for.Assembly: After parts inspection, it took me 2.5 hours. DO NOT use your power screwdrivers as I was tempted to, but you might want to get your own socket/wrench set and a Phillips screw driver. The tools included are: Allen wrench, a nut/socket wrench (?), spanners and a couple of little rods to insert through the spanners. (I thought these were parts originally).The directions are primarily in German with other languages including English or (GB) for Great Britian. Assembly instructions are pictures which can be confusing. Cut out the parts list page and keep it as a reference so you don't have to flip back and forth.Important: Keep all connections "loose" before proceeding to the next step!!! If you tighten the nuts and loosen them, you break the locking feature and Kettler says this is a safety issue. Tighten all nuts and bolts BY HAND, to feel how firm the connection is. Also, there is a left and right as well as an up and down to things. Study the diagrams carefully!! The quality of the parts is phenomenal. The nuts and bolts are machined beautifully and gleaming. No cheap, pot-metal - just fine German steel! Ja!! You don't have to worry about cross-threading or stripping, everything fits perfectly.Caution: Pinch points in the arm/piston area during assembly do not cut your fingers like I did!!After assembly, I tried it out for the first time, it was like heaven! The motion is similar to what you see Dr. Jarvik doing on the Lipitor commercials during the news, where he's rowing across the lake. You feel like you're flying, and it's whisper quiet! What a great stretch!! It felt fabulous, go slow at first to assure the proper rowing form. Keep your back straight - read the book! If you're tall like me, 5'10" - this is the machine for you. Also, my boyfriend - who is 6'5" (and German!) has PLENTY of legroom to spare when he uses it too!Also, resistance can be adjusted by turning the pistons, it's a little tricky be sure to install with the number "1" on the top.The computer has loads of features, but haven't checked them out yet.After usage - I folded the arms up. It's very compact when folded. I don't see how one can stand it against a wall when folded, but I have a small, dedicated room for gym equipment and I can push it against the wall in folded position on the floor. Allow 65" for the full extended "wingspan" of the machine when planning floorspace.Overall, I love the machine!! I wish Kettler had provided photographs of the finished machine rather than drawings. If you don't want to mess with the footstraps loosening during workouts, get some black velcro to add on. I plan on doing that.One final note: There is a warning printed on the rowing arms, I asked my boyfriend to translate it from the German. Here is basically what it says: "Don't use the rowing arms as a means to support yourself/weight (as in getting up, because the machine can tip to the side)".It's so nice to have a German around the house!!You won't be disapointed if you buy this machine, I would buy it new, rather than used. I think you'll love it as it has that true, sculling motion as opposed to the back and forth of the cheaper types.</review_text>
I initially tried to order my Kettler Kadett from a company called Mercantila, a.k.a. Rowingmachines.com.  It was a complete disaster and nightmare including some false advertising, trying to cover up some mistakes on their part which caused about a month of delays, some horrible customer service (or lack thereof), some false charges, and a lot of headaches.  Eventually enough was enough and I wound up ordering it directly from Amazon, which cost me a few bucks more, but was well worth it.The machine comes mostly disassembled and took about an hour and a half to put together.  There were a few confusing moments as the instructions are only pictures and no text, so making sure you have the right part takes a little extra focus.  It came with all the tools necessary except an allen wrench which was necessary for one small thing.In terms of overall quality, it's very high.  I'm not concerned about this thing breaking, nor does it rattle or have ill-fitting parts.  That said, the housing for the computer is a little wimpy and doesn't attach very securely to the main body as I've knocked it off a couple times.  A small piece of tape at the base has kept it firmly locked into place since.Some people have complained about the location of the straps on the foot plates.  I actually find their location ideal, although they do tend to loosen themselves during a workout.  I made a trip down to the store and bought some velcro which I sewed onto the straps.  It took 15 minutes to do and I now have the best foot straps in the world.The best thing about this machine, and the reason I bought it, is that it REALLY DOES in fact mimic an actual rowing motion.  When I close my eyes I can actually believe I'm on a boat on the water which makes my workouts much more pleasant.  So for anyone with any doubts, you can in fact believe the hype, it IS like rowing a boat.  Additionally, all the action is very smooth.  The seat is very sturdy and comfortable and it doesn't wobble.  The arms are also smooth and the grips spin freely.One other reason I bought this machine is that I'm very tall and the Kadett adjusts to accommodate my size.  It does this by placing the footboards on a center beam that slides inside the central housing.  This beam can be adjusted allowing my incredibly long logs to get a full complete extension without the seat hitting the end of it's track.Although it takes up a lot of space during use due to the outrigger style "oars", it does fold up to the size of a traditional hydraulic rowing machine in about 30 seconds.  I keep mine leaned up against a wall and out of the way in an adjacent room, and as it's not very heavy it isn't a big deal pulling it out every morning.One problem I did discover, is that the numbers on one of my adjustable hydraulic pistons is misaligned.  So it was a minor nuisance to set the resistance initially as I had to do it by feel.In preview, the Kadette appears to be overpriced compared to virtually all other hydraulic rowing machines.  But it really is a completely different kind of animal in terms of the rowing action that makes it worth the price tag.  It still suffers from a slow start as the pistons come up to temperature like any other hydraulic rowing machine, but the rowing motion is like heaven.</review_text>
The Kettler Kedett rowing machine is an amazing piece of equipment.  I unpacked mine last night and despite missing a washer and having to wade through 90 minutes of assembly instructions, I was impressed from the very start.From the solidity and the perfect fit of the parts, it is clear that this machine is the product of German engineering.  I haven't seen anything so well designed in years.  Each part fits well, tightens nicely and still rotates or slides with ease.  The machine is sturdy, sits well on carpet or hard flooring and easily folds into a compact shape when not in use.A workout on the Kadett is better than any workout I've ever experienced, aside from rowing or kayaking.  The motion is very realistic, with nothing to distract one beyond the small chirping of the pistons and the occasional knock of the seat  against the front of the rail.  It is easy to close my eyes and imagine myself rowing down a quiet river.  The entire experience is more like meditation than exercise -- the perfect way to start, or end, a busy day.After a 45 minute workout, I wasn't sure that I had really gotten a particularly strenuous workout.  Then I stepped off the machine and realized that my legs were like rubber.  It was that subtle.I highly recommend this machine to anyone looking for an alternative to the ordinary.  The full-body workout provided by rowing is a beautiful thing.  The price is less than most elliptical trainers, the unit weighs only 66lbs, and it gives your arms a workout too!  I can't say enough good things about this machine.Happy rowing</review_text>
Coolest bike rack/ month ever- works very well and fits many different types of bikes.</review_text>
When I travel I always travel for a week at a time, and stay at a condo,where there is a clothes washer. So taking a lot of clothes is not nessessary. This backpack is large enough for 3 skirts,1 pair of capris,6 summer tops,1 zip-up hoodie,1 beach towel,bathing suit,underwear,2 pairs sandals,and a bag for personal care products. The small detachable backpack is perfect for the liquid bath products and extremly convenient when checking through security at airports. By having the two zipped together before bording it is one bag, therefore you can have an additional carry-on. When you get to your seat just un-zip the little pack and they both fit in the over-head bins,and you keep the third bag at your feet! The airlines have lost my checked luggage on two different trips, taking the joy out of traveling. So when I found this piece I knew  I would not have to check luggage again unless I wanted to!I did not use the big bag as a backpack but I looked at the straps and they are made with quality materials, and I know I won't hessitate to use it in that cappacity. My daughter is planning a trip through Europe next year and has already asked to borrow mine. Shhh,,, don't tell her, but she is getting one for her college graduation!!</review_text>
the crux has been the perfect canister stove so far. heats quickly, stays on the canister and packs down ridiculously well.</review_text>
overall, I am very happy with this product.  However, the lock is indeed quite heavy and I feel the added security is not worth the additional weight.  The security cable is a nice added feature.  Although I am not unsatisffied with the product I might suggest getting a lower model instead</review_text>
I bought this to keep my bike(s) in my possession when going to the mall, bars, stores, etc. There isn't much to say other then the U lock is very hardy and heavy and the cable is a good thickness as well. It is also nice that the U Lock comes with multiple keys, and the cable comes with a velcro strap to help manage it when riding.The visible combination of U Lock and cable alone is probably the best deterrent, although if put to the test it looks like they would hold up well. Almost all surfaces of both parts are rubberized so they'll resist scratching your bike's paint. The clasp to hang the U Lock seems somewhat iffy, but I haven't had problems yet. Overall if you want a strong U Lock with a cable to keep your front wheel or seat, this is a great combo at a pretty fair (comparatively) price</review_text>
kinda on the heavy side and big but I mount it on the front fork so it worked ou</review_text>
This treadmill is rugged, ideal for larger folk weighing up to 300 lbs. It is simple to set up and can be used right out of the box, no assembly required. One of the best features of this treadmill is that it has extra-long handlebars, which make it appropriate for elderly users as well as younger ones.  We've had ours for more than a month and we've used it every single day since we got it.  The belt will migrate from side to side if the treadmill is not set on a totally level surface, but that's about the only problem, and easy to fix. My mom -- almost 90 years old -- likes it just as much as I do.  It's a great workout.P.S.:  shipping is only $19.95, and worth every penny.  It came via air on Fedex -- and arrived two days after I ordered it</review_text>
It's easy to use and there wasn't any assembly required.  You just basically unfold it and it's ready to go.  It would be more movable with wheels, but it's fine.  The only thing I don't like about it: is you have to adjust the "tread" every once in awhile.  It slips to the side sometimes; other than that, it's great</review_text>
At first I loved this thermos for the size and ease of cleaning. But everytime I use it I love it more. It keeps coffee hot for hours. Over 7 hours after filling this thermos with coffee, it was still hot enough to burn my tongue. It also works great with cold liquids. I had ice water in it one afternoon and the *next evening* when I went to open and clean my thermos, there was still ice! I was amazed. I recommend this product to anyone. :-</review_text>
I almost got Giro Zen. But the high price made me think twice. Then I came accross this Hex. It is not as perfect fit as Zen to me, but still comfortable. It has similar features as Zen, with a lot less price. It even has better looking then Zen in my opinion. Highly recommended if it fits you</review_text>
Very nice looking and sharp but sword isn't very well balanced. Overall I really like these swords especiall since they were very cheap in price</review_text>
This is a fine weapon for the average citizen who is not inclined to carry a knife or handgun, but it cannot be as effective as a cane or a police baton, two other alternatives to consider.  The cane is perhaps the most innocent seeming yet it has reach advantages over the kubotan and will deal a most damaging strike.The above review is a good one, but please ignore the advice about sharpening keys and using the kubotan as a flail.  This is unlikely to provide any real stopping power to a determined attacker.  The kubotan excels as a loadfist weapon, so use it to enhance your hammerfist and punch strikes.  You can also use the point to 'stab' your attacker's body points and bony targets like the back of the hand can be excruciatingly painful when struck.  In other words use the kubotan like it was intended to do so.  Nowhere in any traditional yawara training is it used like a mini-flail like the above poster suggested</review_text>
Thank you so much for delivering the sword on time.Great product and awesome speed</review_text>
Wow, I had to admit that this is indeed a very great sword. Most people are selling this sword for 89-99 dollars. this sword is only $45 and it is the SAME sword as the other ones. for me, the shipping was 20 dollars, so that makes it $65 total. Some people think that since this sword is half the cost of the other ones of the same kind, that it might be kind of shabby and poorly made. This is not true. My sword is perfectly made and it was in pristine condition when I got it. The only problem was that there was a small scratch on the sheath, but it is so small that it's not even noticable unless you get your face really close to it. I highly recommend this sword to ANY sword collector, not just Bleach fans. If you ARE a Bleach fan, you have to get this... Seriously, you have to get it. Do NOT waste your money on the ones that cost twice as much</review_text>
I got one of these about a month ago and have used it several times now. Overall, I've been pretty pleased with it. Assembly was easy (despite the marginal instructions). I've been pleasantly surprised with how sturdy and smooth the machine is. Given that I paid less than 200 bucks and got free shipping, I had some concerns in those areas.As other have said, the digital display is nothing fancy (it shows time, calories, distance, etc.) and the machine lacks high-end features (ultra-quiet fan, highly adjustable resistance, etc.) But, it's relatively inexpensive, it works, and I enjoy using it. It's not the greatest rowing machine in the world, but I doubt you'll find a better one for the same amount of money.</review_text>
Great rower for the price.  If you do not want to spend the money on a water rower, get the Integrity 3000.  I found the assembly easy and straight forward.  I have used it near daily for a few months, and it is sturdy and solid; even with my weight.  The mechanisms are smooth and comfortable.  Once you get the fan going, the resistance works well.  The display could be more accurate and informative.  However, even without it, you know you are getting a good work-out.</review_text>
It's relatively easy to assemble, although I did smash my finger pretty good while attaching the elastic cord. The resistance is not great, even if you pull really hard, so it does take longer to "feel the burn" with this rower compared to others. BUT, it is only $200, and you CAN get a good workout if you put a little extra time in</review_text>
Hi! I'll try to make this short, sweet, and to the point.Why I Bought itI like to workout about 4-5 days a week, but I live in LA and it's sometimes hard to get to the gym if I work late or if there's traffic. Also, my neighborhood is not so nice, so I prefer to avoid jogging at night. Enter the Fitness Quest Integrity 3000 Air Rower.AssemblyIf you can assemble Ikea furniture or a coffee table from Walmart, then you can assemble the rower. You put in about 4 pins, and then hook a strap from the rower to a bungie cord under the seat. Finito. As far as tools go (despite what the instructions say) all you need is two wrenches. Use a socket wrench (about $10 at Target or Walmart) and you'll be done even faster.QualityThe rower is of surprisingly good quality for the price. It's made of a two piece aluminum frame and feels sturdy. At first, I was a little skeptical about the chain connecting the rower handle, because it looks really small and cheap-o. But, after a 30 minutes of hard rowing, I could tell that the chain was more than adequate. One reviewer on the Target website said that the chain exploded into a million pieces while she was rowing. Maybe she had a faulty chain; who knows. All I know is that I can row 150 pounds on the weight stack at the gym, but there's no way I could shatter that chain simply by rowing. As a stress test, I even rowed as hard as I possibly could, and the rower was fine.PerformanceThe performance of this thing is really great. The resistance level and smoothness is as good as the cardio rower I use at the gym. This is an air rower, so the resistance increases the harder you pull. Additionally, you can increase the resistance by wrapping the tension strap around its base one time before connecting it to the cord under the seat. The seat slides very easily, and the foot pads swivel to allow your ankles a little more freedom to move. Also, the rower folds vertically for easy storage. When it's folded, the rower is about 4 feet tall and takes up about 2 square feet of floor space. It easily fits in a closet or in the corner. Although, it's too wide to fit under a bed.ValueGreat value. My buddy has a rower that costs twice as much, and the difference is hardly noticeable. The performance is great, and if you buy the Amazon item you get it tax-free and with free super saver shipping. I looked at a couple of other rowers (mainly piston rowers) and nothing even came close to this level of quality and performance for the price.IssuesThe only negative thing I can say is that it is a little noisy; even for an air rower. (For those of you who have never used an air rower, the resistance is created by a big fan which makes a "whoosh, whoosh" sound when you row.) The noise isn't terrible, but it prevents you from hearing the TV or radio clearly... even with ear phones.SummarySo all in all, I think that this is a fantastic value. The quality is great, and the performance is fantastic. I highly recommend this product</review_text>
very few bounceouts, overall a very good board. the only reason 5 stars wasn't given was because when darts are pulled from the board a dust seems to come out with them and can make a bit of a mess in your case</review_text>
this is my first bristle board, so i don't have much knowledge for comparison, but i would definitely reccommend it.  the wires are super thin and are white to help visibility.  due to the thin wires, i can't remember the last time i had a bounce out.  after a year, it still plays really well.  i did have to modify the back stops a bit so that it would stay tight against the wall and thus remain quiet</review_text>
Very satisfied with this dartboard.  The absence of staples, the thin wires, and the excellent bristle surface make this hard to beat</review_text>
I have played on many boards and this is one of my favorites.  The bristles are tight and the lack of staples on the rings keeps shots from flying off the board.I really like it.</review_text>
This is a great fork mount. Not only does it look slick, but the easy installation and taking your bike on and off the rack is a piece of cake. The locking fork mount keeps the bike secure. The only problem I've had is lifting up the clamp-sometimes it's closed so tight that it makes it hard to open</review_text>
I have only borrowed these tents in the past but finally bought my own.  The 12 x 12 is actually a 10x10 awning with legs that spread to 12x12.  The shade is so easy to put up and the carry case with wheels is super strong.  You can even put the shade away with the awning still attached.A great shade awning</review_text>
I bought two of these canopies to use at an outdoor craft festival, after my canopy rentals fell through. Purchasing two of them turned out to be cheaper than renting, anyway, so it actually made more sense to purchase. When they arrived, they came in nice, wheeled carrying cases for easy transportation. They went up very easily (once I figured out the mechanism, which took all of 2 minutes) and remained standing throughout the 6-plus hour festival. They are sturdy and well made, and, ultimately, I highly recommend them</review_text>
I am well pleased with this product which is real good construction. The joints are what makes it great , but be careful that the side brace arms point in instead of out when you put it up to keep from breaking the joints</review_text>
I am very pleased with the swim caps I found on Amazon and look forward to using Amazon during the holidays.  Thanks you</review_text>
Good solid quality. I have my treadmill on it. The mat protects my carpet and it cleans easily.  Good investment at a decent price</review_text>
The mat is good, however I would recommend a mat that is wider</review_text>
This product stretches the tendon at night while you sleep.  The pain I used to experience when walking right after rising is greatly reduced after wearing my Thermoskin Plantar FXT.  I pull it tight enough to feel a slight stretch.  I am very pleased with this product!!!(Also, by day I wear shoe inserts by Heel That Pain.</review_text>
Simple, yet very effective heart rate monitor!  I got it for over a month replacing the dBase HR monitor for the gym.  I ride bike quite a bit so I got the Polar S720 initially.  I thought it was way too much for a simple HR monitoring.If it wasn't for the relatively high price (got my for $69, when other brands offer for $40 or less), the S120 would get my five-star.</review_text>
Great features! Love the design.  Easy to set up and use</review_text>
After spending many years using crude methods of determining heart rate (pulse counting, perceived rate of exertion) during many different forms of exercize, I finally broke down and considered a HRM. I am nearing the end of my marathon training (first one) and have become more concerned about my proper pace for the race and for training.This monitor - Polar S120 has been the perfect training aid in that I can easily record and view at a glance, my pace for each mile and whether I am training in the proper zone for each run (pace, long, recovery).  In the past, I had always simply timed my runs and figured out my pace after the fact, now, I get real time feedback.It is the best tool for my running, no question.  I am glad I didn't spend more money than I needed to. In my research for this monitor, I found that not many will record 'laps' (miles in my case). For runners, this is very important.The fact that it will only record one session at a time is not significant to me because I will transfer the info into my training log right away.  and that is less time consuming in my opinion, than to look for cord and upload it into my computer.  If the watch logs too many sessions, I might get lazy and not record it in my own journal which is important to record other aspects of a training session that the monitor cannot record - whether you are coming down with a cold, other current stresses, such as work, kids, traffic, dogs (which surely makes my heart jump a few beats).Another helpful aspect is that I can toggle the info in each of the three lines. If I want to do intervals, I can set the count up or count down timer for the time I want for each interval and have that showing on the center line, or, lap time, or split time, or even the clock.  It is easy and helpful.The manual may seem difficult at first, but, you really need to just play around with the watch while reading the manual.  Get your important settings out of the way first, just get comfortable and it will be easier to understand.  Very happy with my choice, and even happier that I didn't spend way too much money</review_text>
This monitor has the basics along with some advanced features.  I like having the alarms when I go out of my set training zone.  The logic for the set up of the different screens takes some getting used to; just keep using it and it will make sense.  I had one workout where the heart rate skyrocketed and didn't read quite right, otherwise it has worked perfectly.  I use it for biking and running.  The only reason I didn't go for the 150 is because I already have a bike computer that I like.</review_text>
After trying many heart rate monitors, I decided the S120 provided the best array of features for my needs.  I also considered strongly the S150, however, I don't have as much information available instantly (speed, distance, time, heart rate, etc.) as I do with the S120 and my CatEye Cyclocomputer.The S120 lets me target my heart zone and helps keep it within my training range for the day.  Also, when I am done with my exercise set, I get a report on date, length of exercise, average heart rate and maximum heart rate.Unfortunately, the S120 has been discontinued.  I haven't found any in the current lineup that come close to providing the features I find most useful.One warning I'd like to share is that when the batteries need replacement, send them to the factory service center, I think there are three in the US.  I bought one on ebay that was used and after a swim, I noticed the crystal fogged up.  I sent the unit to Polar for service and the PC board on the unit was destroyed because the battery was replaced incorrectly.Yes, Polar battery replacement is pricey, but it is certainly less expensive than replacing the whole unit, as I will do now.  And yes, I am going to buy another S120, my third one in all.</review_text>
It would be greatly beneficial for you to include the measurements of the coolers you advertise.  I find it necessary to find the item at another location to obtain the actual measurements.  Measurements are always important to boat owners.</review_text>
This block is just what I wanted for my yoga practice.  I use it at home and I also bring it with me to class.  It's the perfect size and it's sturdy even though it's a foam block (as opposed to wood).  Certainly a fine block and a great price</review_text>
Super easy set up and take down. Compact and appears durable. Good to have the cloth "pillowtop" which is like a thin mattress pad. I would recommend this product</review_text>
I recently decided I wanted to retire my current swiss army knife, a wenger standard issue...I thought it would be cool to move up to a knife that had a few more functions, but still not too many. The Centurion had a regular phillips screwdriver and a flat awl, unlike the standard which just had a small flat head that could handle phillips screws and the awl without the sewing eye. This Knife is HUGE! Which was my main problem. I wanted to have a knife that I could carry in my pocket and not weigh me down, This knife was too large for my taste. I would have needed a sheath to carry it in and I'm not the utility-belt type.(I've already got a leatherman super tool, and if I wanted weight on my belt, I'd just wear it on there.) The blade was much larger that my standard, living up to the "folding machete" claims, but the locking blade and locking bottle opener/screwdriver are nice features.That being said, this is a nice knife. The blade was sharp, it was very light, and it felt comfortable in the hand. I wasn't crazy about the composite scales, they did feel kind of cheap compared to the alox handles of my standard, so I don't know how long they would hold up over a long period of time. This knife is more suited for residing in a pack for outdoor activities like hunting, fishing, hiking or camping..but it is just too much for a every day carry item. I've also read that in some areas the blade violates concealed carry laws.In conclusion, this is a great knife, but not really suited to my purposes</review_text>
The blade is heavier (slightly thicker)than the little red knives and the size feels good in the hands. Great to throw in the glove box or the small tool box. I can't vouch for the long-term durability of the synthetic handle material - it feels light but appears to be strong. I wouldn't want to chop wood with it but for small jobs like boxes it works well. I haven't tried the screw driver tools but they are nice to have in a pinch.</review_text>
I bought this as a christmas gift for my husband.  He absolutely loves it.  It's a great knife</review_text>
I gave this as a gift and he uses it all the time.  The molded grip fits just right and the tools are useful without making the knife too bulky</review_text>
Although I am overall satisfied with the knife, the appearance is somewhat disproportionate feeling. What I mean is that at first glance, the main locking blade seems a little dainty, slim, and frail; but upon further inspection you will see that the blade is plentiful thick and the metal "feels" strong and hardened well. I attribute this to a simple design oversight that pairs the new curvy body with the old straight blade design. Some curve and design in the main blade, which the new one-handed opening eyelet designed knives by Victorinox implement, would make the overall feel more satisfying to the eye.Overall construction has a well designed feel that is expected with Victorinox but I am not sure that a locking bottle opener is totally necessary, even if the large flat screwdriver head is on that tool. The blade is razor sharp right out of the box and feels good to hold in your hand. A sheath would have been a nice addition, even if it meant to add a couple bucks to the price, but that might just have to be an aftermarket purchase for those requiring one.For the price, this knife is a great buy!</review_text>
I'm not very familiar with knifes, but it looks good to me.  I just think the appearence of the knife could be a little better</review_text>
I am pleased with this knife.  The main blade was sharp and the other tools work well.  I think the handle feels on the cheap side.  I was expecting the knife to be smaller.  (I didn't read the description carefully).  Overall, I would recommend this handy knife</review_text>
Over time, I've found that I can't stand treadmills, elliptical machines, stair climbers, etc.  But for some reason, I can sit on a spinner/stationary bike for 30 minutes & not care about time, so I decided to get a trainer for my mountatin bike instead of a dedicated stationary bike.I searched the net for a week & decided that I wanted one with variable resistance.  I chose this one, got it for about $140 shipped with the riser block & the handlebar shifter.  The unit is designed well.  It holds my bike well.  The resistance levels are very adjustable when combined with the speeds on my 21-speed mountain bike.  I can easily fine tune the tenstion level from effortless to very difficult.One thing to mention: I have knobby mountain bike tires.  As others had said about trainers, the units can be noisy because of the tires.  Mine was fairly loud, but didn't bother me.  However since my wife works out at the same time, she found it annoyingly loud.  After the first 30-minute session, my tire was noticable worn & there were rubber bits on the floor.  The trainer will wear out terrain tires.  I got a "comfort tread" tire for dedicated use on the trainer.  It is much quieter, but not silent.  My wife is much more pleased with this tire as she can hear her MP3 player or the TV while she is working out.</review_text>
I have only had one issue with the trainer, my tire slips/spins faster than the trainer at times as I increase my pedaling effort.  I need to make a few more attempts at adjusting the pressure as this might be my fault.  Otherwise it's been great.  Came assembled, very easy to setup and adjust.  The adjustable resistance is great.  Combined with the 14 speed you get a huge range of resistance from very easy to quite difficult.  This is my first trainer so I don't have any baseline to compare it to, but I would recomend this to anyone, especially novice/intermediate bikers who have long, snowy winters to deal with like we do here in Michigan.  Great Product</review_text>
The product was great and fortunately did arrive ok.  This was the second pole of this miodel and I searched quite a while to find a supplier.  I was happy to find it on Amazon.  It is the most compact staff available and it works great as a camera monopod.  HOWEVER, apparently the packer did not realize that it needed to be folded up for shipping.  He tried to ship it wihtout compacting it (see picture).  It was in a HUGE box and during shipping the tip wore through the box and was sticking out at least 6 inches.  Your packing staff needs more instruction on this item</review_text>
Great product! Sturdy, light and easy to use.  Worth the price</review_text>
When you need enough to go around, these durable whistles do the job</review_text>
This item was purchased as a gift and I was very unhappy when I received the item. The box it came in was very bent up and the top of the box would not even close properly. The flashlight was missing the cord to hang it from and it was hard to get to work after following the directions. I would not buy this product again</review_text>
The quality on this item is acceptable. It looks like it will hold up well. I have never actually had to shake it, because it gets shaken so much during delivery that the battery in it is pretty well charged up. As far as brightness, I would say it is about as bright as a AA battery flashlight. Everyone should have one for emergency, because it is always ready to go and you do not have to go looking for batterys for it. You have light so you can go looking for a better flashlight :) I did look around on the auction sites and found one they were selling for a slightly better price. It does make a good gift because people have not seen them before. They are usually real happy and say they will put it in the glovebox or whatever.</review_text>
If you find yourself having to use your kubotan, chances are, it will be in a critical situation.  Traditionally, kubotans are made out of a durable hardwood.  However, I chose to get one made out of hardened aluminum for added reliability.  Hardened aluminum will not break in the event that you have to use it to put pressure on someone's wrist.  I think it's safe to say that the person's wrist bones would break before this little metal rod does.A friend of mine, who studied martial arts, used to carry a wooden baton like this one.  If he still carried them today, I am convinced that he would choose an aluminum one though.MY FRIEND'S TIP:Here's a tip from that old friend of mine. The keys themselves are a part of the weapon. And you can make them more effective, which will increase the damage from the baton. Take some keys that you no longer use. Any metal key would do, but try to find different sizes. About four of them would do. Take the keys to a grinder and sharpen the teeth of each key. Now, put the four keys in the keyring along with your regular keys. Face the sharp keys in opposite directions. Meaning two should face one way, but the other two should face in the opposite direction. The idea is that when you swing the baton like a flail, the sharpened keys would cut into the attacker's flesh. The keys are faced in opposite directions so that you can do major damage regardless of which direction that you are swinging.CITAN'S EXPERIMENT:Please keep in mind that you can also cut your hand. I tried this technique. I wore a pair of leather work gloves and swung against a wooden post. The sharpened keys bounced back and hit the back of my hand. Without the gloves, my hand would have gotten badly cut. For what it's worth, I swung against a large watermelon and the keys didn't bounce back though. I don't have anything else to add here, except maybe it might be good to swing against an attacker's fleshy parts to prevent the keys from rebounding. I'm not an expert though. But it was fun trying it on a watermelon.</review_text>
Come on, what good is a 5-inch stick on the street? The answer is "plenty." Many people who would turn their noses up at a pocket stick wouldn't hesitate to defend themselves with their knuckles. You might see people like this walking around in bandages, splints, or casts, because hands are soft, with small bones, and heads have big, thick bones and are full of teeth. But even the cement heads of street criminals don't fare well against hard metal. A good hammer fist with one of these will cause even a tough guy to see fireworks and canary birds.As I wrote in a review of another pocket stick: Let's not kid around. This may be touted as a nonlethal weapon, and it may (or may not) look better for you if it turns up in a search or in court than, say, a knife or a gun, but the purpose of this or any effective weapon is to harm an attacker until he cannot attack anymore. It can injure, maim, or kill just as surely as a bullet-- just not so easily. So before you bonk someone's coconut with this little item, make sure you consider the moral, spiritual, and legal consequences.This brings up another vital point. Salesmen, martial arts instructors, and your lawyer may be well-advised to call this a "defensive weapon." Fine, but out there in the world, there is no such thing. Calling this a "hesitation" stick and showing judo masters using it as a submission tool for fancy joint locks just distracts from what you will be doing with it if, God forbid, the need arises. And that is bashing a criminal assailant until he is unable (or unwilling) to continue his assault, preferably before he ever gets one shot in on you.Assisting you in this purpose is the pocket stick's handy size and shape. You can stick it in a back pocket like a pen and have it out and attack with it quicker than any weapon I know, and the chances are relatively good that your attacker will never see it and will literally not know what is hitting him. This is especially advantageous if two nasties are closing in but haven't struck yet. You can hit first and then see if the second punk wants to step over his buddy to face one-on-one odds. While he's thinking it over, you can run.As you can see, this is not what is usually called a defensive mindset.I'd take the keyring off because it's in the way. I really don't see the point of hanging keys on a weapon. Is it supposed to make us think it's not really a weapon so that we feel better about ourselves? No, thanks.Anyway, mine's in my back pocket next to my wallet</review_text>
I bought this for an international trip. It was GREAT for the 9 hour flight. I put it on my seat and was really comfortable for the flight. The size was just right for the airline seat too. Then we spent much of our trip on a tour bus, which had hard, uncomfortable seats. So, I used it again on the bus. It was great either as a sitting cushion or for my back. It didn't work for lumbar support, but just to pad my back in the bus seat. Of course the fact that I could roll it up during travel was perfect.</review_text>
The product is great.Small, bright, easy to hold, a tad heavy but not enough be an issue. I recommend it. A good "defensive" product also</review_text>
Larger than I thought.  Too large for my needs.  Had difficulty assembling due to strength issues.  need more compact privy.  Great when size (unassembled as well as assembled) is not an issue.</review_text>
Worked good for a shelter to put a porta-potty for the ladies of the camp but was not strong enough to hold shower bottle.  We used a 4 gallon bag for showers but tried filling 1/2 way.  The shower bag was still way too heavy.  We had to deal with some crazy wind and the shelter survived.  It laid down a few times but stood back up when wind laid a little.  I am happy with the purchase but will probably build a rack out of PVC pipe to support a shower water bag</review_text>
Shelter is well constructed and can be securly fixed to the ground, so you are not exposed to the world when a breeze comes along that attempts to blow it away.  A folding rack placed in the interior keeps clothes off the ground.  It has a small interior pocket large enough for soap and small shampoo bottles.  Overall, a well designed item</review_text>
Good shelter, tried it out as a shower this weekend.  Only problem was dressing after a shower, no room for keeping clothes dry.  Good head room thoug</review_text>
On those hot summer days, these bandanas really do help a person stay cooler. I love having them, when I mow the lawn and the weather is miserably hot</review_text>
This is a great headlamp!I am a sheet metal worker involved in new construction and have used several headlamps.  Lighting is always a problem in the latter half of a job when the walls have been sheetrocked and the lighting  has not been turned on.Whether looking for a tool in the gangbox or searching rooms for material, having the headlamp on my hardhat is a definite plus.This model is either on or off, it does not have colored beams, it does not have flashing modes, stuff that may be useful to somebody, but not in construction</review_text>
The light is better for using as a personal source of light. The other, larger ones I got are GLARINGLY brighter and lots of fun</review_text>
This product is very good for getting a golf specific workout if you don't have very much knowledge of workout routines and exercises. I saw it and scoffed, but figured i'd give it a try. I found out that I was definitely not in as good a shape as I would like to think :) I havent checked recently, but last time i looked all the stuff that comes with it without the cd would be around (or over) 60 bucks anyway.Two thumbs u</review_text>
This Soccer Ball was a great idea.  My daughter is 6 and play soccer and all of the girls on her team love the ball. The parents have asked me where I got it from because their daughters want one too.  The kids love the ball so much that it makes them want to do more stuff with it.  This is a great ball for the younger kids.</review_text>
I got this ball because I want to lose weight and get in better shape.  I also think it's fun to bounce on!  This Bell body ball comes with a foot pump and a video led by Mindy Mylrea.  I like the video a lot and have been using it with the body ball regularly, but the pump needs work.  Ours broke before we finished pumping up the ball, so we had a hard time getting it completely inflated-- I think one of the valves came loose.  Other than that, though, I've really enjoyed using this product.  Bouncing on the ball makes me feel like a kid again and when I work out seriously with the ball, I can definitely feel the progress.  This is a cost effective way to get back in shape.</review_text>
Though advertised as 65cm, once fully inflated I measured it as 71cm. This isn't a problem unless you are in between sizes like I am (I have a relatively short 31" inseam for my 5'9" height). I probably should have opted for the 55cm.Otherwise, this is a decent ball. It holds air adequately; I only have to top-off with air once every few weeks. I also like the neutral, pearl color which is much better than the super-bright colors of other balls out there</review_text>
I bought this to stretch my back out.  Works just fine</review_text>
No problems to report. I got this for my husband use who is 5'10", and about 180 lbs.  He hasn't had any issues with it so far. Haven't measured it to see how large it inflated to, but it seems to be fine</review_text>
THIS KNIFE IS WELL MADE.  I RECEIVED IT AS A GIFT FROM MY BROTHERS.  THE COMPASS DOESN'T WORK WELL, BUT THE KNIFE IS GREAT.  IT WAS MADE WITH GOOD QUALITY</review_text>
Came like a week after i ordered it,combat ready blade, came with some survival stuff in the handle; matches, fishing line + hook, stuff like that. The only problem is the compass in the handle was rattling around the box before i even opened it. I glued it on with ease</review_text>
Why not just take up belly dance?  This machine uses some of the same principals, but you'll get a safer, better total body workout belly dancing!  Check your gym for classes or buy an instructional DVD</review_text>
It really twists your entire body , especially you feel it near the abs and the stomach! it's worth buying</review_text>
The Bally twist board is better than I thought. I've only had it for a few days, but I like it a lot. It's easy to use and feels pretty sturdy. Do I recommend it? Yes, if you want a cheap and easy way to exercise</review_text>
This stuff is packed with energy. So if you don't workout be very careful when using it as a meal replacement.It's not the best tasting and somepeople maynot like the texture, but i've grown used to these bars and they've been an essential part of my exercise routine when i haven't had a meal for a while before the activity.Do not store these bars in warm areas like your pocket while hiking on a hot day, they will become sticky and disgusting</review_text>
I ordered 6 pair for me and 6 for my husband. He loved them so much I ordered another 6 pair for him and 6 for myself! I wore them to run a marathon on Maui and had no blisters at the end of the race. They got soaked everytime I went through the aid stations and my feet never felt wet! They are very comfortable, no seams to bother me. Some pairs came with what was called "grab bag logos". I don't know what the logo's are and really don't care 'cuz who looks at sock logos anyway?!</review_text>
Compare the quality of these socks to the $7-11 A PAIR (not for 6 pairs) at the local running stores.  The only draw back is the mfg gets to choose the colors.  Still, a great buy</review_text>
This was a very good deal on Coolmax socks.  I will definitely purchase them again</review_text>
I've used Jansport bags since elementary school and continue to use them to this day.  I ended up using this particular bag not for books but rather as an alternative to a traditional carry-on piece of luggage.  Its also comes in handy for the occasional overnight stay at a hotel where a normal piece of luggage wouldn't be practical.  My only compplaint was that Amazon's method of ordering was not very user friendly when it came to picking the color. I selected black w/ balck suede but eneded up recieving a color I did not choose (black w/ brown suede).  It still looked fine and I kept it rather than go through the hassle of returning it for the correct color</review_text>
I got the back pack in time... but I selected the wrong color so I shipped it back and got my money back... no problem there either</review_text>
JanSport Backpacks w/the suede/leather bottoms are great!  They last a super long time.  My husband had his for well over 15years using it from highschool to college to my son using it for school!  We have tried several others for my son & daughter but have found that although the price is higher for a JanSport, it is worth it for the amount of life we get out of them.  Great product</review_text>
I bought a similar backback almost 3 years ago.  (Jansport with leather bottom...it only had one backpocket though)It lasted me up until last month...the back pocket started to tear near the zipper at that point.  I wanted to replace it with the "normal" Jansport backpack (without the leather bottom) but when I went to the retail stores to check them out, they didn't feel like quality of the one I had before.I'm so glad I bought this one to replace my backpack.  It is such a sturdy backpack.  It's even better than my previous backpack because it has an extra pocket in the back and the pockets are larger.  The texture of the backpack also feels stronger.The price on amazon is also very good (I saved a great amount over buying at the mall).Perfect for a college student...even with a full load of books</review_text>
I'm replacing my handy-dandy little Signature knife after 4 years.  Nothing matches Victorinox quality.  The blade in the knife and scissors cut through the toughest package tape.  Though small, this knife is not a toy.However, DO NOT LEND THIS KNIFE OUT TO ANYONE.  I made that mistake and the first time it came back without the pen, and the second time w/o the tweezers.  Under normal use I never found those parts fell out or were easily lost.  I can only guess that they were tempting to play with, and one friend wanted to see if the pen was replaceable (it's not) and the other just used and lost the tweezers.After 4 years of frequent use, the casing is starting to break so I'm getting another.  My only complaint is that I have to remove it from my keyring when I fly</review_text>
I shopped around for quite awhile - this was the best price I found.  This is the same football that is sold in sporting goods stores, when you can find it in stock, for at least $30 more</review_text>
It is a cute little gadget, not always a super picture. BUT when it is tuned in, it is awesome for being so small</review_text>
This TV wrist watch is more like a wrist TV with a rudimentary time/date piece at the top.  The TFT active matrix color (that's right, color!) screen measures about 1.5" diagonal.  There's no speaker on the "watch"; instead, you listen in via the included special earphones.  The earphones are special because the cord also acts as the TV antenna, so in order to watch TV on this thing, you must use the included earphones.I got mine from a website called shentech dot com.  (I'm *not* affiliated with them in any way.)  Just sixty nine bucks only!  You should know that NHJ went bankrupt last year, that's why the TV watch is on clearance now.  What a pity.  It's so cool...Yeah, it's really cool to be able to watch TV on a watch.  The TV runs off a built-in LiIon rechargable battery which can last over an hour, probably close to two hours.  Recharging the battery takes around 90 minutes when connected to the AC.  You can also recharge the battery using four AA batteries; or you can power the TV using AC or four AA alkaline batteries.The TV watch really comes in two pieces: the TV unit, and an ugly plastic base with wrist strap attached.  But NHJ also includes a neckstrap, very thoughtful of them, as watching TV on your wrist can get tiring.The problem is, reception is just not that good.  No, you can't hook up cable or a DVD to this.  You just have to live with over-the-air (OTA) broadcast signals.  The earphone-antenna is rather weak in picking up the signals.  It helps if you are situated close to the TV broadcast towers or live on high floors.  The reception is also very direction-dependent, and sometimes if you hold the earphone cord in your hand it may help.  Overall, the reception on the TV is quite disappointing, but works if you are willing to experiment with different positions.The TV tuner can tune in to channels 1 to 64, but due to the reception limitation, you proably will just get a few channels to look acceptable.  For me, the Jerry Springer channel appears the best, so I can watch 2 hours of Jerry Springer on my wrist every day.  Not bad.Anyway, this is absolutely the coolest gadget in the world, and the price is really great.  Just don't expect warranty repairs if yours breaks</review_text>
I'm up and down with this thing, but it's still the best one out there. It charges via a docking station that plugs into an outlet.  That's a 90-minute charge for one hour of viewing. That mini docking station can also be battery-fed and connected to the watch to make for a much longer viewing experience.It fits just like a normal watch and takes up just as much space. The headphones double as the UHF/VHF antennae, so if you hate those two little buttons that keep falling out of your ears as much as I do, you're kind of out of luck in trying to use your ultra-cool stereo headsets. Until I figure out what to do next, I just fit the buttons inside the headset cups and it works fine.The reception and the headpieces keep the elusive fifth star from making it's appearance here. If you think you're going to watch your favorite shows in a basement or on the train, forget it. Otherwise all local channels show up sweetly and crisply with only the most minor intermittent fluctuations</review_text>
It is larger and heavier than it looked on-line.  It is able to hold my grandson's wooden sword he uses in his karate class</review_text>
I purchased the 'Double Dragon Sword Stand' for my 16 year old grandson.  He is into all the Japanese and oriental items and dragon items our one of his favorite.  He was very pleased with the stand and thought it was quite unique.  It is displayed in his room with the sword we also purchased for him.</review_text>
I bought the stand for my son's dragon katana and it works beautifully.  The detailing on the piece is outstanding.  It could use a little more weight in the base for balance when in use</review_text>
I have been doing mat pilates at home for 2.5 years and really wanted a reformer to make my workouts more fun (or at least interesting).  I first purchased a reformer from Costco for about $[...].  Horrible quality and no one would answer the phone for the 10 days that I called them.  Took it back.I purchased this from Amazon after some research into both quality and price.  The free shipping made it an easy decision (although it did take over two weeks).This is a very sturdy piece of equipment.  It does not fold or collapse so you do need a lot of space for it.I am happy with the quality of the unit.  One of the DVDs that came with it was poor quality.  I called the 800 number and they replaced it quickly with no questions.I would definitely recommend this for someone who is starting out in pilates.  I don't know about experienced reformer users, since I am not one.I can tell you that after 2.5 years of mat pilates 3x per week, I am finding the level 1 workout challenging (which is a good thing, I think)</review_text>
A very solid and well built substitute for the more expensive reformers. Although there are a few differences in the convenience of certain features - or rather, the lack of them :) - for me they're quite compensated for by the large difference in price between these and the ones by Peak Pilates, Balanced Body and other companies producing traditionally designed and built reformers (a difference of hundreds or thousands of dollars, depending on the other model). My few minor issues:1. The metal T-bar does lower out of the way, althought there are only the 2 adjustments - up and down. It also doesn't lower or rise easily - I had to thump mine into place.2. The headrest also adjusts, although again to only 2 positions - up (a couple of inches) and down.3. Winding the ropes around the hooks on the sides to adjust their length for various exercises is a bit time-consuming. The more expensive reformers have much more easily and quickly adjusted nautical-type cleats.4. The padding is adequate, but not as comfortable as, yet again, the more expensive models (especially, for me, the shoulder rests).5. The footbar does adjust angle (either straight up or angled back/forward) but doesn't lower completely out of the way. Instead, you remove it when needed. (Like when you want to use the included jumping "board" - actually a nice little trampoline accessory.)Also, this isn't an issue for me, but it might be for someone else - this reformer uses 4 heavy duty bungee cords for resistance, rather than springs.The bottom line is that with this reformer (and the box accessory I bought separately), I can do almost* every exercise in Ellie Herman's Pilates Reformer book without feeling like my reformer is wobbly, unstable or a distraction in and of itself. And I saved a lot of money ;)*(For those of you wondering, there are only 3 exercises in that book I can't do with this reformer. The "Rocking Swan" and the "Grasshopper", because the footbar angle doesn't lower down far enough, and the "Round Back" reverse knee stretch, and its variations, because in that exercise your hands hold the frame of the reformer - and of course the Aeropilates doesn't have side frame boards to hold.)Hope this helps</review_text>
I cannot believe the difference that the manta ray makes for my workout.  It evenly distributes the weight.  It is totally comfortable. I haven't had a bruise since I started using this. I also like having my own to use at the gym.  My gym has the foam ones that smell pretty bad.  You can't go wrong with this device</review_text>
This thing is great for doing squats.  The shape conforms to the neck/shoulder/trap area nicely and actually distributes the weight across your back more evenly; much moreso than those round pads or the bar alone.  Very comfortable on your back so you can focus on pushing the weight.  Another thing I really like about it is that once you center the pad on the bar (it pops right on and off) you know for sure your body is centered under the weight, so you're not teetering.  The plastic is flexible and soft enough so that it's comfortable and it's super easy to clean.</review_text>
It is light weight enough, and does exactly what it is meant to.  I'm very happy with this purchase</review_text>
This table is great for Reiki. The table is sturdy and light weight making it great for traveling. Since I do most of my business in my clients home I was looking for a table that would be easy to load and unload into my car.</review_text>
Good quality, comfortable, easy to fold and unfold, light weight, good value!  The legs are rather lightweight, so would probably not be good for heavy use by heavy people.  But for me it's great</review_text>
This table works just great for me. I do Healing Touch, and the people that have used this table say it is very comfortable</review_text>
I found this to be a good table for my personal needs at a fabulous price.  I shopped all over the web and this is definitely the best deal.  It's lightweight because it's a little short and skinny.  I prefer it short and skinny so I can store it easily in a small room.  Check the measurements to make sure it's long enough for what you want.  I like extra-extra smooshy padding, so I added a cheap foam pad from Walmart over the table and put a twin size sheet over that, but you wouldn't have to do that if you like a regular massage table feel.  I don't use it as a portable table, so I'm not sure how convenient it would be to take down and up.  It is probably better as a personal massage table, not as a "professional" table.  I have a larger table in my office where I work.  Hope this helps</review_text>
I have used this table for 9 months with my very busy mobile therapy business. It is a great table because of its light weight and slightly smaller size. The face slot is comfortabe, but my only complaint is the foam, as it does start to compress after heavy use. I would be a good table for personal use and for moderate professional use.</review_text>
All in all it is a good stroller. My only complaint would be the seatbelts.  They are a little weird especially for a toddler.</review_text>
I've had this stroller for a couple of weeks, and so far I'm pleased with it. My older kid is 3 and the younger one is 3 months. Both seem to like it. I've had a single-seat Bob "sport utility" stroller for two years, and here are some comparisons that might be useful:The InStep is much cheaper (I got it for $80; paid ~$200 for the single Bob). I think it's a better value for the money, though the Bob is clearly better built and probably more durable (more on that below).The InStep is much heavier, even taking into account the single-vs-double frame. The Bob has an aluminum frame while the InStep uses steel. I'll need to be careful not to leave it out in the rain, as I have done with the Bob.The InStep has an inferior construction to the Bob:- fabric is thinner, appears less durable- quick-release on the front wheel is of lower quality; consequently, it takes more work to adjust the wheel to keep the stroller going straight; the Bob's is more like what you'd find on a quality bicycle, with fewer centering issues. On the other hand, I prefer the InStep's quick-release mechanisms for the rear wheels to the Bob's.- the handbrake doesn't work as well as on the Bob; perhaps due to the InStep's greater weight, perhaps not. The handle is plastic, though quite solid. It's easy to use from either hand, though it's oriented to the left one.- the canopy doesn't curve downward as it does on the Bob. As a result, the kids tend to get some afternoon sun in their eyes even with the  canopy in place. I've "fixed" this by safety-pinning some fabric down from the edge of the canopy.The InStep's parking brakes are separate from the hand-brake and engage using cogs attached to the rear wheels, whereas the Bob's parking brake just locks the handbrake. This has the advantage of 1) being more secure and 2) not loosening the handbrake cable over time. The disadvantage is it takes slightly more effort to engage than the Bob's handbrake lock.As noted in the other reviews, the InStep's seats are very reclined, even at their steepest settings; however, my kids don't seem to mind this at all. In fact, for sleeping, the InStep may be more comfortable.The seats themselves are smaller than the Bob's, but that's to be expected on a duallie of this size. Speaking of size, the InStep is obviously much wider than the single-seat Bob. It won't fit through narrow (30'') doorways, but that's exactly what I expected based on the published dimensions, which are similar to other dual strollers'. It fits just fine in the trunk of my car (VW Golf) when I remove the wheels. One advantage of the increased width is a more stable stance on sloped terrain. On some of the steeper driveway aprons, I find the narrower Bob near its tipping point; not so with the InStep.The ground clearance on the InStep is much lower than on the Bob. When I descend tall curbs, the bottom often scrapes a bit. But since the bottom is free to lift up (unless you're in the habit of carrying heavy stuff underneath), there's no real damage.The InStep has shock absorbers (nice!), but they're much stiffer than the Bob's. Perhaps they'd be perfect for two heavier kids, but with my kids (combined weight = 40 lb), it seems a tad too stiff.The little pouch attached to the handlebar is a nice addition on the InStep, missing from the Bob.As noted by other reviewers, the straps on the InStep take more work to secure and remove. The Bob is clearly superior in this regard, though I don't see it as a huge factor given that I strap the kids in, run for an hour, then unstrap them.The Bob has three 16'' wheels, whereas the InStep has a smaller front wheel. I was a bit concerned about this when I bought it, but after going running with it several times (on pavement), I see no problems with the smaller front wheel. If anything, it makes the stroller slightly easier to pack into my trunk. For off-roading, the smaller wheel and low ground clearance might be a problem, but that's not a concern for me right now.Overall, the InStep was a terrific value and I would highly recommend it for the right price</review_text>
Wonderful machine.  I find this a great way to work out or to warm up before lifting weights at the gym.  This machine is the kind you find at health clubs. It's extremely durable and sturdy.</review_text>
Everything I always wanted in a bike, without having to rig it up myself. This bike is made for a wide range of uses, including mine. I like to use panniers, and this bike has rack mounts. I love a single speed.This bike has rear-facing (track-style) dropouts- thus, I can have one gear on each side of the wheel and easily change from low to high gear without changing the chain length. This is not really the case with converted horizontal dropout frames. Other non-track single speeds on the market look like fun but lack the pannier mounts.The large tire clearance is super fun. The first time I really noticed it was when the bike path was congested and I took off across the grass. Now I use this bike to carry me to and from my research site- 3 miles down a primitive road and over two creek crossings. So much fun. And with the aforementioned rack, I can carry tools out and samples back with ease.And the price- for this price you get a complete bike. No self-assembly required.For those of you unsure about purchasing and committing to a single speed check this out: this bike comes with a set of screw on gear cable guides and a screw-on rear derailleur hanger so that, if you so desire, you can convert it into a multiple speed bike in the future. This is nice to know, although I am not sure why anyone would want to deal with this.Once you get this thing going and loaded up with 50lbs of gear, however, you might want to avoid mountain passes, unless you don't mind walking or hitchhiking</review_text>
We purchased these for our vacation to hawaii, they worked great! we have snorkeled a few times, and these are DEFINATLY worth the money instead of renteding them. the masked fogged up a little but not too bad. the bags to carry them in were also very handy</review_text>
I bought this set for my wife for our trip to Cozumel, Mexico and the split fins seemed to work very well. A big plus was the carry bag- it is very spacious, includng a special pouch for a water bottle on the outside. The only drawback is that the mask inluded with this set seemed to have a bit of a limited viewing area in comparison to others out there and my wife did have some suction issues with it</review_text>
I am new to snorkeling and was going to Aruba and Curacao on a cruise. I had previously bought a mask elsewhere due to concerns about fit on my moustache. I tried the set out in a local pool a few times before the cruise. The first time I used the other mask and I wore socks under the flippers to prevent chaffing. The snorkel seemed to flood with every lap. When I kicked harder, the fins came loose. I quit after 30 minutes or so.The second time, I vigorously blew out the snorkel when it started to flood, and it stopped flooding. Also, I used the Madera mask with lip balm on the moustache and it worked fin. I still wore the socks and still had the fins coming loose when I kicked hard to swim fast, rather than just crawling, but I lasted about an hour.When I went to Aruba and Curacao I abandoned the socks, and the fins did not come loose when I kicked hard. The snorkel stayed dry and I continued to vigorously blow it out after diving and that may have helped. The bag worked well, as a bag in the hand, and it can be worn on the back. I rinsed the equipment and let in dry in the bag when I was on the boat.All in all I found this to be a great value for someone starting out, such as myself.</review_text>
Great value for the money.  I was looking for a set with silicon mask and found this bargin.  Tried it in Hawaii and satisfied with performance.  I am going to get my kids their own set for a planned trip to Hawaii</review_text>
Finally a back pack that won't fall aprt the first month of use. Large storage area fits books, lunch pack, shoes and all the extra "stuff" my 8 year old has to have with hi</review_text>
very sturdy and the service is great.  The size does not stack up with most of the other bolsters...so mixing brands is not recommended</review_text>
I have had my watch for two years now and it is by far my favorite outdoor watch.  I make regular use of all the features.Compass:  Once calibrated it is accurate, within 1 degree of my GPS.  I used it exclusively to complete an all day orienteering event and numerous camping trips without complaint.Altimeter:  The altimeter, despite the proprietary "zero drift" technology, will drift over time, as all barometer-based alitimeters will.  On a four day hiking trip in Colorado, I set the altimeter at a known elevation and it worked flawlessly for the whole trip.  Based on map readings and GPS, the watch was never more than 200' off on a trip that regularly ranged from 10,000' to 14,000'.  Another feature not mentioned in the manual is an alarm system that goes off whenever you attain an altitude of a famous mountain.  For example, when I hit the altitude of Mt. Fuji, the alarm sounded and "Mt. Fuji" scrolled across the face.  You will have to set the altimeter to a known point for it to be accurate.  As a helicopter pilot I have flown numerous times with it and it is fairly accurate, but the sampling rate of 60 seconds is kind of slow - you can change it, but I don't seriously use it in the aircraft, and 60 seconds is plenty of time when you're hiking.Temperature: Like any wrist mounted temperature sensor, the watch will react to your body temp.  This watch has a feature that allows you to compensate for this by lowering the temp by a known factor.  I have mine set at -8 degrees so it is relatively accurate on my wrist.  This is the only watch I have found to have this.Barometer:  Accurately shows trend data - no complaints.Alarms: I like having numerous alarms, and the alarm is sufficiently loud to hear while hiking in 30mph winds with the watch under layers of clothing.The watch also has a feature to shut off the display after 1 hour of no button pushes.  This saves battery power and my battery display shows a full charge after two years of consistent use.The manual is not very clear, but the interface is user friendly once you play with it. The titanium bezel does show some wear, but the mineral face is as clear as the day I bought it and I am extremely hard on watches.Overall, I am extremely pleased with this watch.  I think I will buy a second one when the first one bites the dust</review_text>
Before I bought this watch, I did a lot of research on the offerings from Suunto, Polar and Nike, and finally ended up choosing the Lance 4 watch for my cycling-specific activities.  And I have to say, my disappointment began within 2 minutes of opening the shipping box.  Here are the three major ways this watch (and Nike itself) have failed me:1) This is a complicated, multi-function instrument.  But if you're expecting a detailed instruction manual, forget it.  What you get is an elaborate pictograph that illustrates which buttons to push.  It skims over the setup procedure and many of the most important functions, and omits many features entirely.2) Relative to the above complaint, I contacted Nike customer service about the setup.  Since I'm a cyclist, I was particularly interested in the altimeter function, and dismayed by how thin the "manual" is.  The instructions say you can select a 60-, 10- or 2-second sampling rate of the barometric pressure in order to determine altitude.  What it fails to mention is what the ramifications are for choosing one over the other?  Is one more accurate?  Does one use more battery power?  We'll apparently never know, because Nike's customer service failed to answer the question.  While they admitted that they had received several complaints about the manual -- and were considering writing a new one -- they simply sidestepped my question about the altimeter function in their email reply.3)  And then there's the performance of the watch itself.  In most cases it's impressive -- that is, in every case except the one for which I purchased it:  the altimeter.  On my group rides, there are always at least three other people with altimeters.  A post-ride comparison of altimeter results always puts their readings within 3 percent of each other.  The results from the Nike are at least 20 percent off.  That means the altimeter results are not to be trusted.While the watch is attractive (that's why it earned 2 stars instead of just one) and has an excellent band, it simply doesn't give me the accurate altimeter results I need.  And since the altimeter results are so far off, I can only assume that its built-in weather sensor (also based on barometric pressure) is hugely flawed, too.With the manual being as light on information as it is, with Nike's customer service either unwilling or unable to shed any light on the watch's usage and with the flawed performance of the altimeter function, I can only say that this watch represents a major disappointment.  It may meet Nike's standards for fashion, but it fails my standards for performance</review_text>
THE SUIT IS FAIRLY WELL MADE FOR THE PRICE, HOWEVER BE FORWARNED...IF YOU ARE A SMALL ORDER MEDIUM OR IF YOU ARE A MEDIUM ORDER LARGE. SIZING IS ON THE SMALL SIDE. IT DOES WORK WELL</review_text>
Make sure you drink a lot of water! It makes you sweat! This suit is useful if you are an athlete and need to weigh in for something. I wouldn't use it all the time because you lose water weight, and you need water to feed your muscles. It's not going to make fat disappear, just water.</review_text>
This really does act as a combination Roman Chair-Sit-Up Bench.  It will give your abs a good workout and you have control over how much intensity you want to do and still keep good form.  It's also half the size of my old incline bench, which I used to "misuse" to make it like a Roman Chair, so it fits in my new apartment easily.  Regarding the instructions: the drawing on the cover of the instruction booklet makes you think that the leg holders are attached "inside" the frame, but if you look carefully at the drawing of how to put it together, and even double-check by looking at the photo of the bench on the Internet, it goes on the "outside.</review_text>
My 8 month old nephew has loved this toy since he received it when he was around 5 months old. He doesn't drop it as much as other toys because it is so easy for his little hands to hold</review_text>
Great for the stage when a baby can't really "play" with toys.  Because the tubing is easy to grab a hold of, my seven week old baby can easily grab on and shake it around.  If I put this just within reach, when she moves her arms around she can grab it involuntarily.  I make sure this is on our blanket at every play time.</review_text>
We bought the Winkle when our son was three or four months old. We actually bought it a at childrens art museum. He picked it up in the store and played with it immediately! It quickly became his favorite toy. He loved that he could easily grip and hold on, it was a good car toy, too.This summer we were visiting Grandma, and his six month old cousin picked it up and wouldn't let go. We have searched all over the place for another Winkle. I am thrilled that Babies R Us has found the toy and is now carrying it.I hope your little ones enjoy it as much as my son has.</review_text>
Our son loves this toy. He is absolutely fascinated with it! He loves reaching for it and will actually put forth quite an effort to do so. He is teething right now, and it must feel good on his gums because he instantly puts it in his mouth and will not take it out. He has a very strong grip and will actually put up a fight when we try to take it away from him! This is a big hit</review_text>
Yet another big hit from Manhattan Baby. My girls LOVE their toys. This one is routinely shaken and chewed on. The simplicity of their baby toys is ideal & gets baby's attention! The little rubber tubes are tough & haven't come off the rattle center no matter how hard the babies pull on it. It's very safe. We LOVE these toys</review_text>
I received this toy as a baby shower gift for my daughter.  It was one of the first toys she could play with.  The rings are small enough for her to grab without hurting herself (another rattle toy I had was hard plastic and she tended to bonk herself with it), and can also be used later for teething.  The toy is also quite light. She loves the bright colors of the rings and the little rattle cube in the middle.  Overall, this is definitely one of her favorite toys.Unfortunately, the toy got lost during a trip out, and we like this toy so much I am going to buy another one.</review_text>
I spent 30 years in the tennis industry, frequently introducing rackets, and I believe this racket incorporates many features that maximize playability.  Suggest Babolat's 17 gauge Hurricane Pro but keep the tension down so that string can grab the ball.  Well done Babolat</review_text>
Well, this one is definitely a solid weapon... Now I feel a real weight that allows me to fight much more aggressively comparing with my previous Head Liquidmetal Fire.</review_text>
If you have bamboo floors I highly recommend this stuff. It will erase all of the tiny scratches that seem to accumulate so easily on these floors.It works pretty well at masking deeper gouges, but it isn't perfect. Someone looking will still be able to spot the gouge, but it's usually good enough to get your security deposit back.And yes, the price of shipping is more than the price of the product, but it's not like every hardware store carries this stuff. I checked my area, and no one carried it, so I ordered it online. Even with the shipping costs, it was still worth it</review_text>
*****This is an upscale designer water bottle, top of the line, and so much fun. The designs Of Sigg's water bottles are gorgeous, from the plain, solid color bottles, to the ones with intricate designs. They are simply beautiful! I switched from regular plastic water bottles because of health concerns, thinking it would take more work to maintain. These do necessitate regular cleaning (I clean mine every day), but having something so beautiful to drink from makes the cleaning fun. Sort of like my rings, glasses, and watch, I now consider my Sigg personal water bottle a vital accessory, reminding me to drink more water, making a statement about my values, and expressing myself with a special design. Yes, all in a water bottle!Sigg of Switzerland water bottles are very high quality, made of light aluminum on the outside, slightly insulated, and covered with a special powder coat on the inside that prevents any leaching whatsoever, unlike plastic and polycarbonate water bottles. They are light, durable, and perfect for any activity. Well water tastes spectacular in these bottles, just like from the tap.Sigg bottles come with several different types of tops.  I bought the screw top because I don't like sports tops, and I don't mind unscrewing the top when I want a drink. It is totally leakproof, which is important to me. The top is pretty and can be hooked onto a carabiner.  I get comments on it all the time, "What's that? I love it!"  The sports top version is ok; I just am not a fan, as I don't feel like I can get enough water from the little stream from the sports top. However, for convenience, you might prefer it. For children, there is a cap-type top. All are leak-proof. If you are ever unsatisfied with the top, you can buy a screw top separately to fit your Sigg bottle.Sigg makes their personal water bottle in .6L and 1L in this style. I have both. I use the .6L for sports activities because they are smaller. When I won't have to carry the container, I like the larger bottle. Sigg also makes a smaller .3L bottle for children that is a perfect size for young people. You can buy Siggs in alternative sizes too, such as .75L, .4L (for kids), .6L, .5L. You can occasionally find this bottle in the 1.5L size, also. Search Amazon for the perfect size.Pick a style and pattern you like, as this bottle is a personal accessory, and should reflect your style. The colors are vibrant and even prettier than they seem in the pictures on Amazon.They are expensive, but they are so durable that you can plan on them lasting many years. I consider them both an accessory and an investment in my health, so they are well worth it value-wise for me.Highly recommended.****</review_text>
*****This is an upscale designer water bottle, top of the line, and so much fun. The designs Of Sigg's water bottles are gorgeous, from the plain, solid color bottles, to the ones with intricate designs. They are simply beautiful! I switched from regular plastic water bottles because of health concerns, thinking it would take more work to maintain. These do necessitate regular cleaning (I clean mine every day), but having something so beautiful to drink from makes the cleaning fun. Sort of like my rings, glasses, and watch, I now consider my Sigg personal water bottle a vital accessory, reminding me to drink more water, making a statement about my values, and expressing myself with a special design. Yes, all in a water bottle!Sigg of Switzerland water bottles are very high quality, made of light aluminum on the outside, slightly insulated, and covered with a special powder coat on the inside that prevents any leaching whatsoever, unlike plastic and polycarbonate water bottles. They are light, durable, and perfect for any activity. Well water tastes spectacular in these bottles, just like from the tap.Sigg bottles come with several different types of tops.  I bought the screw top because I don't like sports tops, and I don't mind unscrewing the top when I want a drink. It is totally leakproof, which is important to me. The top is pretty and can be hooked onto a carabiner.  I get comments on it all the time, "What's that? I love it!"  The sports top version is ok; I just am not a fan, as I don't feel like I can get enough water from the little stream from the sports top. However, for convenience, you might prefer it. For children, there is a cap-type top. All are leak-proof. If you are ever unsatisfied with the top, you can buy a screw top separately to fit your Sigg bottle.Sigg makes their personal water bottle in .6L and 1L in this style. I have both. I use the .6L for sports activities because they are smaller. When I won't have to carry the container, I like the larger bottle. Sigg also makes a smaller .3L bottle for children that is a perfect size for young people. You can buy Siggs in alternative sizes too, such as .75L, .4L (for kids), .6L, .5L. You can occasionally find this bottle in the 1.5L size, also. Search Amazon for the perfect size.Pick a style and pattern you like, as this bottle is a personal accessory, and should reflect your style. The colors are vibrant and even prettier than they seem in the pictures on Amazon.They are expensive, but they are so durable that you can plan on them lasting many years. I consider them both an accessory and an investment in my health, so they are well worth it value-wise for me.Highly recommended.****</review_text>
the bench is in pretty good shape for beginners to intermediate athletes. woulda got 5 stars but one of the bench's parts came bent and me and my brother had to pound it back into shape with a Maul could have been shipping but the box was not crushed and the metal in this part is very strong.  I still like the bench it is cheap in price but gets my workouts done</review_text>
